Excellent Stockpot. Bought this stockpot to replace a 1995 Faberware Millenium one.This stockpot is, by far, much better quality than FaberwareMillenium model was when new.I would buy more Swiss Diamond pieces as needed
best thing ever. One cup of coffee at a time doesn't get better than this.Perfect for a household of coffee drinkers that wake up at different times
Great Value Dessert wine glass. These aren't as nice as some of the specialty wine glasses, but for the money, these are the best port glasses on the market.   Lead?  Perhaps a concern in a long-term decanter, but not from a 7% non-soluable port glass
Taylor wireless thermometer. This thermometer is convenient and easy to read.  Having the indoor/outdoor temperature info easily accessible in such a weather changing place as Denver, is great.
mattress pad. I really love this mattress pad. It is easy to wash, dry and better yet, easy to put on. It stretches nicely and yet keeps in place. It isn't bumpy and looks like it will hold up for a long time
Just perfect. I worked in a laundry and dry cleaners when I was in college so I knew the principle operating techniques of this item but it still takes practice, to learn positioning of the items and to keep from burning yourself.  No it isn't as large as the ones in the laundry but where would you store that thing any way and did you really think it would sell for under 2 hundred dollars?  It works just as the instructions say, just takes time to learn, don't give up and soon you will be able to press very quickly.  I can do about a dozen garments in an hour and I don't repress with an iron
The name fits. This stuff is so awesome! I wound up with quite the large puppy. She was house broken but only if she had constant access to a yard. We didn't. Needless to say she soiled everywhere. I used puppy training pads to soak it up (ironic). Once the liquid was absorbed into the pad, I just sprayed this on the stain, let it sit for about 15 minutes, gave it a quick wipe and stain and odor were GONE! I mean it, there is no stain and no odor left anywhere. You can't even tell where they were and there were ALOT. It's an amazing product and works better than I ever expected
Fantastic Flannel sheets. These sheets are warm, soft, and ever so inviting.  Garnet red just made for an even better Valentine's Day evening, even though it was 2 weeks later.  Truely lovely sheets, would buy more.
GORGEOUS!!!. These are the same exact glassed that I received from Waterford.  They must be getting them from the same manufacturer and placing their names on them.. but they are still gorgeous, heavy and I love them
Kitchen Aid Mixer. I bought this mixer for my daughter for a wedding present. I own one myself and it's wonderful! It is able to mix a large amount and do a good job. It's sturdy and a great product!
Fun, but not terribly practical. First I'd like to say that Lodge Logic is the greatest. No seasoning, could it get any better?  This is a great little pan that does a wonderful job at making perfect little cornbread sticks.  I've done them in the oven, as well as over coals and they've turned out fine every time (first time they stuck and broke when I took them out, but the pan still cleaned fine).  The only reason I gave this a 4 and not a 5 is because it's not terribly practical.  It'll only cook one small batch at a time (1 1/2 cups of cornmeal mix).  However, if you want something really fun and different, this is it
Great Purchase!. We have been using Riedel crystal wine glasses (and still do on occasion with the handful that we have left), but I finally decided to buy Spiegelau glasses for our everyday drinking glasses.  Because we drink wine and entertain regularly, our collection of Riedel glasses has been diminishing --- although the crystal Riedel's are beautiful glasses (and still used for the right occasions), they are extremely fragile and I have personally destroyed several while simply hand washing them.  At any rate, after years of attrition via visiting friends and family, we needed to stock up on new glasses.  Because I hate to hand wash dishes, I began to look into the dishwasher-safe glasses from Riedel and Spiegelau for the new replacements.  I was going to just buy the dishwasher-safe Riedel glasses (name recognition of course), but I couldn't get over how much better the Spiegelaus were priced.  Moreover, all of my favorite restaurants use Spiegelau (and come to think of it, I don't think I've ever seen Riedels at a restaurant). Therefore, I took the leap and stocked up on the Chardonnay, Cabernet, Riesling, Port and Champagne glasses.  I'm really glad that I did --- all of them are terrific! Although not as elegant as the fine crystal versions, these are excellent for everyday use and large dinner parties.  I've already bounced one off of a granite countertop and it survived the collision without incident. I've also washed them all in the dishwasher several times and they've come out great.  I am very, very happy with this purchase.  I'm sure that the comparable dishwasher-safe Riedel glasses are just as nice (possibly nicer?), but you can't beat Spiegelau's price!
I LOVE this knife. I have been using the Kyocera Black Ceramic Chef's Knife for years and someone got me this knife for Christmas and it is my new favorite knife and I use it as my No. #1 knife now.  I don't care too much for Rachael Ray or the fact that she endorses it, because really, this knife doesn't need celebrity endorsements.  You hold this thing in your hand and it feels like it becomes one with your hand.  It is the perfect weight and it has a quality edge.  Whoever made this knife really did their homework
Love them!. These spoons are so nice. The strength is a nice change from all those wooded spoons I've used over the years. The red color is perfect for my kitchen too. My wooden spoons are now in the trash
Excellent knife. I purchased this for a gift for my daughter.  She says that this knifeis the greatest.
High Quality, Great Cleaver. Top rated by Cooks Illustrated.  Great balance.  Cuts easily through bones.  My first practice ended up with some nice marks in my wooden chopping board.  Will last a very, very long time.Save your chefs knife and use this to cut through bones
Excellent microwave. I'm used to industrial microwaves(the ones used in resturants)& this one out performs those at allmost all tasks. The only place where it only matches their performance is with large frozen meals. I will definitly recomend this microwav
Great alternative to non-stick. I was looking for a pan to cook eggs (omlets) in, but didn't want to get non-stick, or teflon or whatever.  This pan was recommended by the nytimes.  It's not as perfect as an old seasoned cast iron skillet, but the le creuset pan is big, heavy and practically non stick, especially if you use a bit of oil.  I cook everything in it -- chicken, hamburgers, fried eggs and omlets, sausage, pancakes -- and it's easy to clean, almost as non stick as my teflon pans (which I chucked).  For what it is, it's pretty great
Smaller Size is Perfect Fit. After reading some un-favorable reviews, I was a little hesitant to purchase this item. My need for knife protection, in a drawer that I wasn't ready to give up half the space to one of the larger trays on the market to, nudged me in the right direction. I got just what I needed with this knife storage tray; safe storage for my good knives and 3/4 of my drawer still there for the rest of my utensils
Very pleased... I was skeptical about spending so much money on a home coffee maker. But I figured it would be money well spent if it is well made and will last much longer than cheaper brands. We love our A10 Pour-O-Matic! It is super fast, easy to clean, and best of all it makes the nicest, smoothest, most rich tasting coffee we've ever had in a home brewer. I would highly recommend this coffee brewer, splurge, you won't be sorry
A useful addition to your kitchen knife collection. Excellent for slicing ripe tomatoes and thick-skinned fruit as well as dinner rolls, this is a great little knife to complement a quality set of sharp non-serrated knives
Sometimes you just want one cup..... This one cup coffee maker is nice if you just want one cup of coffee.  You must adjust the coffee to your particular taste.   It includes a mug and a washable filter.  It also includes a measuring spoon. It fits most mugs.
PLEASED. Received items in a timely manner. Could have purchased items locally but chose to do 'online' instead.  Thank you for the quick service....:
Deep Dish Pan with Great Looks. With a fairly intensive effort on my part in the "hint" department, this was a Christmas present. It is one of those presents that you really actually like the more you use it. I like it a lot. I've made five or six lasagnas so far and a few dishes like manicotti. All of them were cooked evenly and it behaves like a "non-stick".Tonight I made a nice 5-layer lasagna that brought it up almost to the top with no overflow. It is 3-1/8" deep from the inside bottom to the top edge. Compare this to 2" for your standard Pyrex 3 qt 9x13 dish.It cleans easily, has a nice color and a nice finish. It still looks brand new.
Works well and fast. I have been using this instant read thermometer for the past couple of months and am impressed by the speed at which this tool registers the temperature of the different items that I am cooking.  It seems to be accurate as each meal that I have used this for has been cooked correctly.  (I have used this for chicken, beef, pork, and other assorted dishes.)  The thermometer appears to be extremely sensitive as moving the tip to different parts of the meat can give significantly different readings -- so a word of caution about making sure that you are inserting the probe into the proper location.  In the past few years I have used several instant read thermometers (both digital and non-digital) and this is the best one (of the four or five) I have tried.
works fine for us. My partner and I bought this crockpot and the lid fits fine; we have not had any problems with anything leaking out.  We've used this product for soup, stew, and a bunch of other recipes; they've all come out great
Garlic Roaster. If you like garlic this is the quickest way to get warm fresh garlic to spread on french bread, crackers or what ever you desire.. Very fast. Just love the smell of roasting garlic. Very easy to clean also
4-Piece Children's Flatware Set. This is a wonderful set of silverware -- the picture on each piece is not only cute, it appears to be dishwasher safe as well.  The fork is shaped slightly different than the other WMF children's forks we have, but my daughter seems to love every piece of it.  Excellent purchase
Serves its Purpose. Maybe I got a different bread box than the other reviewers.  I've had mine for at least 3 or 4 years now.  It's used a lot and still looks brand new.  Mine is very solid and doesn't appear flimsy at all.  It seems to keep the bread fresh.  The only problem is sometimes I forget that I have bread because it is hidden in the bread box.  Overall, I love Polder products (have a white trash can too) and think they're worth the money
Cutting Board. I love it and it performs as advertised
Doubted It!. Seriously I doubted this knife would live up to my expectations.  I first got it and thought it maybe wasn't sharp enough.  I've never used ceramic knives before and now I've used it a couple times I will never buy any other kind again.  I am sold on ceramic knives.  I don't know how durable it is but I put it back into it's box after hand washing it just to be careful because it cuts like a dream.  I've cut chicken breast, green onions, bell peppers, steak, pork, carrots, broccoli, all sorts of stuff just to try it out through meats, veggies and fruits.  I put it on the chicken breast at one end and pulled it right through in one clean cut.  I cam straight down on the green onions just to make sure I move it a smidge anyways to cut through.  Seriously I won't use those metal knives I got for my wedding gifts or christmas gifts any more it's ceramic all the way for me.  I also nearly cut through my finger nail but luckily was fast enough to stop but I have a chip on the top of my nail now so carefull
Blackbird. The pillows came on time and were pretty much what I expected. They were a good value and I have to say I like shopping on Amazon
This is a great idea !. Thought this was a great idea when I saw it. So I purchased it.
Great for teens. We got 3 of them and gave them to my teenage daughters friends, and they loved them.  Super gift for a teen girl
Happy Customer. I am pleased with the product I purchased.  It was purchased as a gift for my mother-in-law.  She seems to be very pleased with it.The transaction was easy and I received the merchandise in a timely manner.  The product came new in excellent condition
Lots of Room. This product has lots of room for our CD's & DVD's.  It also looks nice.  The shipping was fast.  I originally thought it could use more shelves & after contacting the manufacturer, they were prompt in sending me more shelves.  What service!  I do see some irony in the fact that the cabinet is so well made & comes with a lock, but the back is made of cardboard that is easily coming off because of the usage.  Go figure!  Otherwise, a good product & serves it's purpose well
As described....awesome. I have had 4 different bread machines, all of them had the single paddle upright loaf style.  I didn't mind the bread they turned out, but I didn't like the loaf shape.  My prayers have been answered!  I can't quit making bread now!  The loaves come out perfect, and if they don't I have come to relize that with bread it is typically the COOK's error, not the machine's.  You need to really read the directions, which I find most people don't.  If you are going to spend this kind of money on a bread machine, you better be willing to spend some time getting used to it.  I've made all kinds of sweet, sourdough, french, italian, herb and cheese, fruit, and beer breads in the machine.....you name it, and they all come out just fine.  If not, I tweak the recipe, I don't blame the machine.All in all, an excellent product. This is my favorite bread machine so far.  The only down side is the sourdough setting.  Don't be fooled... the light sourdough is made by adding vinegar.  For true sourdough, you have to wait the 7-10 days.  But if you can't wait....  Oh, and the "big viewing window".  Unless someone installs a light inside the machine, you can't really see what's going on anyway.  After my first 50 loaves I will let you know how it's holding up
Good value,  and... ...be aware that it is not top of the line cookware. It's a little lighter which might be an advantage for some people. I bought several of these as gifts and the only negative I heard is that it seemed to scratch a bit easily. Having said that, I would have used only wooden or plastic utensils anyway so that would probably have been avoided. For the money, it's worth a shot. You can always use it as a planter :
Nice product, taller molds are more useful overall. A serious foodie that has been perfecting her cooking skills for the last 25 years in her home kitchen writes this review. My favorite cookbooks are "The Professional Chef" by the Culinary Institute of America and "Culinary Artistry".  If you love to make your food as beautiful as it is tasty, you will enjoy this product.I find these molds most useful for making risotto cakes, making short vegetable stacks, small frozen mousses or cutting rounds from cakes to serve as a bed.  For items like stacks you can pack the mold and then slide the ring up to make a taller stack.  However, this "stretching method" will not work for a taller frozen mousse.  I imagine you could secure two molds together for a taller frozen mousse.  But since I have not tried that I am uncertain as to how well it would work.  The height restriction of 2 inches makes these molds a little less useful than my set of molds that are 5 inches tall.This product is well made and should stand the test of time.  If you don't already own a taller set of molds I would suggest that you consider that purchase first, I find them to be much more useful in my kitchen
nice product. the lamp looks nice but it is smaller than what it appears in the picture
Outta this world. Biggest damn spice rack I've ever seen!  No kidding, this thing is huge
Love My Sheets!!. I was very pleased with my new sheets.  They were exactly as advertised and are so soft.  Don't need ironing either.  You gotta love that!
great blanket. The micro suede blanket is warm and light weight.  It is not a bulky blanket.  I really like it and if anything ever happens to this one I will get another micro suede blanket.  I have had alot of blankets over the years but this is the only blanket I can say this about
DualDaddy Great Purchase. Exactly what I expected. Good service by Amazon. Good price. Shipped quickly. And the fryer seems to be even better (heats quicker, larger capacity) than the old Frydaddy (many years old) which I dropped and broke. I'm very satisfied
Vornado Vortex Heat. I just had to post after reading the reviews.I have had a Vornado Vortex Heater since 1994, I paid twice what this one costs and it has been excellent.  Whisper quiet just like the Vornado fans.  It has moved with us, been used up and downstairs, been dropped and mistreated.  It was recalled and rebuilt in December of 2004 and I would definately buy another
Satisfied. Just what we were looking for and a little more.  We only wish that the potwas slightly larger.  Our recipes that used to fit comfortably in our old cookernow fill the new pot a little much and we get some spillage if we stir tovigorously or without care. Perhaps this is due to the shape, oval, as aginsta round shape
Perfect for Pasta!. I love this container - I keep my linguini and spaghetti in it after I open the box and it keeps it fresh! The lid is held securely on by air! You squeeze two tabs with your fingers on the top to let the air out to open/close it - with the lid on, its an airtight seal, so no more worrying about bugs or stale pasta. I like the clear canister, because I can easily see if I have some open pasta before I get a new box out of the pantry and its made of a very durable material that won't break and is dishwasher-safe. If you eat a lot of pasta, but don't always eat the whole box in one sitting, then this is a must have
Excellent bacon press. This litle pig has it all. Right size. Well constructed. Fun to own and does the job right
Translucent Pot Holder. Very satisfying purchase.  The product is of high quality and has all the most functional features.  It is comfortable and flexible and cool to the touch.  I am very happy with this purchase.  The inventing mind was right on the dot.  Thank You..
No Kitty Smell!. I love this thing!  I hate the smell of the litter box.  My teenage daughter has two cats, Princess and Abby.  Abby is the skittish one, yet she was in the Litter Robot using it right away.  The daughter like, most teenagers, was very poor about cleaning the kitty litter box and the house usually smelled like kitty litter.  The smell in her room was so overpowering that I could not stand to go in there without holding my breath.Once we got the Litter Robot the smell went away and we are living happily ever after.  It worked perfectly right out of the box, we have used it for several weeks now without any problems.  I am so pleased with this Litter Robot, it works perfectly even when operated by a teenager
Eureka Quick-Up. These little vacuums are the greatest thing since sliced bread.  For people like me who can no longer lift heavy things it is just ideal for doing my cleaning.'  I am amazed at the pick-up power it has.  I highly recommend it for anybody with sore shoulders and neck or sore legs and knees.  It makes vacuuming so much easier and it is just as efficient as by big heavy Electrolux!
A few tips for effortless use!. After reading the other reviews, I almost reconsidered my purchase.  However, the juicer works great - as long as you follow a few tips.1) Make sure the lid is thoroughly clipped on TIGHT!  Check once, then check again.2) Don't use the paper filters, particularly if you are juicing in quantity.  Once I threw mine in the trash, the balancing issues went away immediately.  It makes clean up a little harder, but if you scrape the outside with a hard toothbrush under running water right after use, it's not a big deal.3) If the item being juiced won't go through, be patient, and pulse-push it in.  Don't cram it with the pusher.My only concern is that when you juice quantities, so much pulp sticks to the side it's hard for all of the juice out to strain out.  It's best to rinse the drum off every couple of cups of juice.Using the above tips - I expect to be giving this juicer some heavy use for a long time
Nice Little Spoonrest. I was actually looking for a stoneware spoonrest, but liked the pattern and price of this one and decided to go for it!!  I'm glad I did, though.  Bought several and gave as gifts...and they were well received.  One person said that they preferred the melamine since they had a tendency to break the ceramic/stoneware ones!
beautiful. the dishes by sango the novas and these are simply stunning, the pictures do not do them justice..they also will blend with many other dish patterns which is why i chose these.. thanks amazon for a great selectio
Pleased. I especially like the size of these corn holders.  They are easy to hold on to for small children and people that have difficulty holding objects in their hands.  I plan on ordering some for my friend that has difficulty gripping the small cob holders
The best part of waking up is Italy in your cup!!. This coffee maker is exactly like the one our hostess used in a b&b in Rome.  It is easy to use and it takes us to back to Italy every morning.  Coffee needs to be gound fine.  This is an espresso maker, so if your looking for an American type of coffee, look elsewhere.  We love this though.  It looks awesome, is easy to use and makes incredible espresso.  This is the brand sold all over Italy
Good value for the dollar. The main thing about this product is it is good value for the dollar. The item is inexpensive and gets the job done with a large cooking area and adequate features. There are a couple of features that could be better, but of course you are going to have to pay more to get them. Such as a less hot to the touch exterior, and as already mentioned, the timer cannot be turned to stop, but the temperature can be turned off, so not a big issue
Wonderful alternative to plastic containers!. I bought two sets (8 containers) of these about 3 months ago, and I absolutely love them. The shallow dimensions make them equally ideal for casseroles and cuts of meat, and their smaller size (a nice 2 cups) helps with portion control. They're much more durable than plastic lunch containers, and they can be reheated over and over without any signs of wear. I highly recommend these; I'll never go back to plastic
Reliable and easy to use. I've used a lot of different blenders over the years, and I've never come across one with this low of a cost and this kind of reliability. It chops and blends anything I throw at it and cleaning it up is so much easier because of it's small size. Great for college when you don't have a lot of spac
Great product -- but this one had a defect!. Hi, bought the LightWedge as a holiday gift because i love mine.  But the oneI purchased here, though it came hermetically sealed in its package, had aflaw -- the toggle button which allows for dimming the light did not work.It moved, but it didn't dim.  Felt bad, because it was a gift.  Otherwise,i think it's a really great item that provides light only for the page, anddoesn't light up the room or blind your eyes in the darkness.
Villa della Luna soup/cereal bowls. Beautiful! The size of these bowls are so that they can also be used for serving bowls too. The colors are beautiful and the quality is wonderful
Best Lil Deep Fryer. I have waited a long time to buy one ... not sure why. I was going to go with a T-Fal product. Glad I didn't. Got this one home and waited awhile before I actually used it. Then I deep fried chicken patties and french fries. What a dinner we had. It was gr8!! The frier heated up quickly ... made the food fast ... did everything I wanted it to. It has continued to work as expected ever since I picked it up. Even easy clean up. Nice!
N-ice cream spade!. works very well.  handle is balanced and fits well in the hands.  cuts right through ice cream.  excellent product.  worth the price for those frozen ice cream buckets that feel like they'll sprain your wrist with every scoop
Great gate!. This is a low gate, so if your dog is large or a jumper, it may not be right for you.  Otherwise this is a great product.  It is asthetically pleasing and very sturdy, yet low enough to step over.  It's defintiely my favorite gate and I've been through a few
Great pan. I have an entire set of Swiss Diamond in addition to this pan. I bought Swiss Diamond because, due to weak wrists, I needed sturdy cookware that was not as heavy as stainless steel. Because aluminum is the primary, affordable, lighter-weight alternative, and one does not want food coming in contact with aluminum because of the possible leaching of it into the food, I sought non-stick pans with a coating that would not flake or scratch off and end up in my food. After much research, I discovered Swiss Diamond. I have not been disappointed. The pans are a great weight--hefty without being too heavy, and after several months of use, the coating is holding up beautifully. I confess that I do not primarily use metal utensils in it, however, so I can't testify about how they hold up against metal.These pans caramelize food beautifully, and the evenness of the heat distribution in them is a pure joy. They do take a few extra seconds to heat up, but hold heat very well. I really love how flat the pan's bottom is, and imagine if you have a flush electric cooktop, these would be especially appreciated. Though I have a gas range, I had trouble in the past with pots and pans slipping and sliding on the enameled grates, but these pans do not slide. And I was delighted to discover, after realizing I had accidentally left this pan on low heat for an hour with no food in it, it did not warp at all and is still in perfect condition. This cookware cleans up easily and perfectly, too. I love that they are coated on the outside walls of the pans so any dried or cooked on food comes off the outside as easily as the inside.One thing to note is that if you are looking for a pan to cook eggs in without oil, this may not be your best choice. The texture of the diamond coating seems to grab more than a slick Teflon pan would, and the first time I tried to flip my fried eggs without a spatula, I had less than stellar results. But with sufficient oil, I can flip the eggs without a spatula or a problem (I need to make my daily quota of coconut oil anyway for health reasons, so I'm fine with putting oil in the pan). If you use a spatula, you should easily be able to flip eggs without oil.I do hope these pans turn out to be durable over the years. So far, after a few months, they are aces! In fact, my husband may be growing weary of my exclaiming, "I LOVE this cookware!" over and over again.
A wonderful pan. This is the best saute pan I have ever used.  It provides perfectly even heating and is very easy to clean
Nice Design + Powerful. - Tall design works well when blending "deep" drinks- Powerful motor chops ice quickly and evenly- Comes with "KitchenAid" carry-on pouchNot much else to say about a blender really
Mission Hutch. This is a beautiful matching piece to the desk.  I searched and searched for a mission desk/hutch unit and this is by far the best buy around.  The wood is completely finished - no rough spots or uneven color blends.  Easy to put together.
No Buttery slips!. This butter dish is great because of the little top knot.  It's very easy to pick up the lid.  Besides....it's cute
A fantastically social meal!. When the focus of the meal is in the middle of the table, it makes for a wonderfully social evening. We first sampled raclette in France and loved it and could not do without the machine. A great appliance
Decent grinder. This grinder has worked well enough for me.  The biggest problem I have with it is that the plastic lid rattles loose while grinding--so you need to hold it in place to keep it running.  This is a minor deficit since most grinders need their tops held on while grinding.
fiestaware bread tray. this bread tray is just the right size and the perfect finishing touch to a table set with fiestaware
Most useful item in my kitchen. I have had this for almost 5 months and use this for almost everything.  The chopping accessory is great for onions, tomatoes, etc.  I do a lot of Indian cooking and this is a huge time saver.  Easy to clean.  A ton of power.  Have had to use my regular hand blender as this has so many accessories.  The balloon wisk is great for whipped cream, and egg whites, etc.  Cannot recc. this enough.  Use this every time I cook
I loved this product. We just got our Zojirushi Gourmet Duet Dual-Mug Personal Coffeemaker this weekend. We used Boca Java blended coffees and our well water (we live in the boondocks). The directions were simple to understand. The amount of coffee that fills the cups was perfect. We used regular #2 filters (not the unbleached kind). I was stoked! This is a great cup of coffee! We have used $400 coffee makers that didn't perform like this. I definitely recommend this
great deal. I love this duvet.  I knew ahead of time that the back side is regular cotton but that didnt dissuade me.  It is very soft and plush and beautiful.  For 20 dollars you cant beat it
little but mighty. This Mini Prep Plus is perfect for the small jobs you do while cooking a meal and takes less time
Great for wheatgrass. I just bought the omega 8005. I am very impressed with this unit. I have been juicing the last 13 years and this is the fourth juicer I have used. The auger, end cap and hopper are all quality. The fittings are secure and quality. The unit looks good. It is quiet. It leaves very little mess. I don't have to worry about one drip hitting the base motor. Cleanup is quick. I bought it to juice wheatgrass which it does a fine with grass.  The supplied plunger does work, but using a carrot to push the wheatgrass down the opening is much easier and twice as fast. The 10 year warranty is phenomenal on all parts and labor.I actually use my old centrifugal juicer to juice a glass of carrot juice, and the omega to juice wheatgrass and leafy greens. I believe in using two different tools for two different purposes. If I were only going to juice hard apples and carrots, I would not get this juicer because it would take too long to extract the juice from these.  I would get a centrifugal juicer. But a centrifugal juicer cannot do what this omega can do, namely spinach, parsley and wheatgrass.
I Love It!. I had bought my first Fiestaware Cereal Bown sight unseen from Amazon.com, and I absolutely love the rich, cinnamon color of Cinnabar!The Cereal Bowl comes in handy and we use it for hot and cold cereal, soup, ice cream, and leftovers (smaller portions). It's microwaveable, too!If you've never used Fiestaware before, this would be a great introduction to the line, especially if you have use for smaller soup/cereal bowls.
Presto Popper. This is one of the best units I have ever used.  The care of the powercups is a bit tricky but just let cool and wipe with a dry cloth and you will be fine.  We love this unit because we have little mess and fresh popcorn instead of microwave popcorn in a bag which tastes nothing like the fresh popped corn.  I love to add spicy salt to my oil before adding the popcorn which will lightly cover the popcorn to create your own unique tastes.  I highly recommend this unit
Thanks for the bulbs!. Since these Might Bright Replacement Bulbs are very difficult to find in the stores now, I was so glad to have found them here. Now I know where I can find them in the future!Thanks for stocking them
GIFT. This was purchased as a wedding gift.  I have an older Kitchen Aid Stand Mixer and have been very pleased with it.The box WAS damaged when the mixer was received.  However the mixer, upon inspection, seemed to be fine
Great look, reasonable price. I purchased 2 sets of these glasses in December 2006.  They look great, have a nice heavy feel to them, are of obvious good quality.  I could not be happier, and I'm now going to order the larger 13.5 oz. size too.  If you have any doubts, you can forget them now, and buy these classy glasses.  If you like the look of this style, you will not regret this purchase
THIS IS THE BEST THING EBEAR!!!. I made lattes the beary first day I got this and LOVED it. I think I ordered one as a gift for my friend almost immediately after finishing my drink. She loves it as much as I do:) We both wanted a stovetop milk frother and after doing some research, I went ahead and got this lovely set by Bialetti. I wanted to be sure it was awesome before getting it for my friend;p I believe we both used it at our Thanksgiving dinners and everyone loved the drinks too.In about 7-8 minutes of turning on the stove and the espresso is done. The challenge for me was making the drink hot enough. This meant that I would have to heat up the milk several minutes (on a medium setting because I was afraid of burning the milk) prior to making the espresso. Another trick is to keep the cups hot with hot water before making the drinks. I read somewhere that a french press can be used to froth milk but I wouldn't risk doing it in glass with metal mesh. There are a few other frothers I have seen with this type of construction. This Bialetti frother pot is nonstick and not only is the mesh in a plastic disk, it actually has a double disk, which I think really adds to the frothing. I've done a lot of looking around at various milk frothers in various stores and no other frother has a double disk pump. If you add sugar to the latte, it's best to add it to the espresso before the milk or else it'll just sit on top of the foam. I love hazelnut so I bought a flavoring syrup (which I stir in with the espresso before adding the milk) and it's AWESOME. I also like to add a little cocoa powder on top;
A good knife, but not a great one. This was a difficult knife to rate, because on the one hand it is a very nice knife, and on the other, I can't recommend that you buy one.1)  This is a beautiful knife.  I don't prep with it, but it has a permanent place on my magnetic strip, because I just like looking at it.  If you want a Damascus-pattern Japanese knife that looks pretty, this is a good choice.  You must also look at the Hattori HD (different Damascus style, black Western style handle with visible rivets), and the A.G. Russell Damascus (better Damascus pattern with white Eastern handles and visible rivets).  They are harder to find, but nothing a quick Google won&#8217;t fix.2)  Do not buy this knife unless you have held it, and preferably used it.  This is true of any knife.  Handle comfort and balance are extremely personal issues.  My love affair with this knife ended as soon as I took it out of the box.  I'm a right hander with large hands and I use a pinch grip.  I like my knife balanced exactly on my working fingers.  With its curved, offset bolster and ridged handle, it's specially designed for a right hander with small hands, using a pinch grip, and even then it's mediocre.  Using that grip, the balance is 2cm (3/4") nose heavy.  My $25 10" Forschner Fibrox embarrasses this knife in term of handle comfort and balance.  The only Shun knife with a real handle is the Ken Onion custom.3)  This knife is razor sharp out of the box.  But really, any good knife will take a 15 degree edge, you just have to be willing to put it on yourself (or find a pro you can trust to do it for you).  My Wusthof Grand Prix has a 15 degree edge and is as sharp as this knife, and gives me at least 50 hours on the board before I need to touch it up with my Sharpmaker.  The same goes for my Forschner.  VG10 is better steel, but you will still need to hone it with a sharpening steel, and it will still go dull on you.  It&#8217;s only 7% harder than the average good knife and the Vanadium helps but isn&#8217;t going to change your life.If you just want a light knife with a thin spine, you can get the same thing for a quarter the money from a Forschner or some other industrial (F. Dick Pro-Dynamic or Messermeister Four Seasons, etc) If you want a light, razor sharp Japanese knife with a hard blade, you can get the same blade performance and a better handle for half the money from a Tojiro DP.4) If you're in the market for a Japanese knife and want a complete set of Eastern and Western shapes, your only real options are the Shun or the Globals.  I'd rather have a Hattori, but they don't make a bread knife, or a western boning knife, or a Chinese cleaver, or a paring knife (although the petty knives will do most of the same jobs).  But unless you're really attached to the idea of a matching set, buy this knife and the 3.5" paring knife, and go industrial on the rest.  A $15 Forschner boning knife will spank the $90 Shun boning knife.  The same goes for the bread knife.  All pimpery aside, if you ask Alton Brown, he&#8217;ll tell you that a $100 bread knife is a waste of money (but he&#8217;ll still be more than happy to sell you one).5)  The 9" Shun sharpening steel is too short for this knife.  Find a nice 12" sharpening steel, or buy a 12" fine ceramic steel.  The ceramic steel will take off metal, so if you don't really know how to use a steel, stick with metal; it's more forgiving of bad form.All that said, this is a good knife.  The edge is flawless, the steel is good, it&#8217;s pretty, it has a nice blade shape, and the price is reasonable.  If you like the hand-feel and don't have any trouble paying the mortgage, it will be money well spent.  But I still prep with my Forschner, and leave the 10&#8221; Shun on the strip next to the 10&#8221; Global and the 10&#8221; Wusthof to impress any foodies that happen to wander through my kitchen, and as a silent testament to Brown, Bourdain, and my dream that Rachel Ray will someday learn how to use a real knife.
rejuvinated our cat!. This product worked great for our 17 year old cat. Due to his increasing arthritis, we were concerned that we were going to have to put him to sleep soon to put him out of his misery. After being on this 2.5 months, he is back to normal. He still moves slow, but he's not in pain, and you would move slow too if you were 80+ years old! We highly recommend this.
Great Collar. This collar works out great. It performs just as the Amazon description shows. It is unintrusive and snaps off when certain force is exerted. It's fun, too, because of the colors, and affordable
Not too Shabby. It is thicker than other bed pads, but not as thick as I expected. Quite cushy and comfortable to sleep on. Easy to put on the bed.
KitchenAid Pro 600 is a must have if you bake alot... ... Very powerful with heavy mixes and still remains quiet and undisturbing to the rest of the house even allowing easy non shouting conversations during get to gethers and home-made pizza night. The 6qt bowl will still mix small batches so don't think it's too big for everyday use. Red Cayenne color is much more durable and appealing over the Red (the pictures don't do it justice). And at amazon prices you really don't need to shop elsewhere...trust me I wasted alot of time trying
Good product. We have been using this poacher in my restaurant for the last six weeks. It is easy to use and seems to be standing up well to commercial use
my new coffee maker. I had a problem intially with the purchase of this coffeemaker, but withgood listeners at Etronics, I was able to get excellant service. [...].As far as the coffeemaker, I dearly love this machine. It makes the freshest coffee and the taste is like that you buy at a coffee house. Theonly change to the coffeemaker I would like to see is that when the coffeemaker starts its a very startling noise.This coffeemaker to me is the best by far of other coffeemakers
Simple, cheap and FUN!. Both of my cats really love this and my wallet adores it because it's cheap as well as being on the fairly durable side as well. My cats are active (they love to play, run after and catch things) and like to play two or three times a day. As several other reviewers have noted, you should keep a light grip/pinch on one end and that's enough to make the other end swing and weave around in the air. Then, just roll your end between your fingertips a bit and it'll bounce a bit and swing around and  (hopefully) entice your kitties play with the other end. I've also held it in the middle and let both cats go at their seperate end but it's stiffer that way and doesn't move as much.Boo is about four and half years old and the other, Poxie, is three. Poxie will play with anything that moves (or is shiney and will chew carboard for the heck of it), so she loves it. Boo is a bit pickier likes to "stalk" things and be convinced that he really does want to play. I usually to drag this around and wiggle it on the floor a bit to catch his interest but he always comes around and will start batting at it in the air as well. Both will go wild if it wiggles (and makes noise), just barely visiable, from the edge of a cardboard box or paper bag though =)It holds up very well, they will pounce and chew on the cardboard and wire. The ends of the cardboard do fray a bit and get soggy but they're tightly coiled with the wire and it lasts a good amount of time. The price is great also, so no qualms about getting a new one very couple of months
A fantastic product. The pepper ans salt grinders are fabulous. Don't understand why it gets so many bad reviews! It works great, gives out as much crushed pepper as a regular small pepper mill does. And the pepper and salt coarseness are perfect too. Plus it is very handy unlike traditional mills where you have to rotate with both hands. Great product
Open sesame. This product is great. I was so tired of using other types of can openers, and I've tried them all. With the electric ones the cans would slip off and splash water all over the table. The manual ones also slip off and then I'd have to saw the rest of the lid off with a steak knife. Both types leave a very sharp lid. I've cut my fingers many times. The OneTouch solves all the problems associated with opening cans. You just place the One Touch on top of the can press the button and the One Touch does the rest. This can opener even leaves a lip on the top of the lid so you can close the can. Fantastic !
corning ware creations ramekin. like the color.  bakes well.  good size.  freezes well
like it. I like it.  The shaped tongs help in gripping heavier things, as opposed to a smooth tong end.  It was worth the purchase
Cute Cat Toy. This is one of the only cat toys my cats will actually play with. Often, they seem to prefer cat toys which you wouldn't think of as toys. Take for instance the tops of milk bottles or the random sighting of a blind cord. You just never know what is going to catch a cats attention.This butterfly is one of the best cat toys I've found. It crinkles like a paper bag, but it is a durable piece of crinkly plastic in each wing. In the center, there is a ball of catnip and some filling.So far, this toy has held up miraculously well and I've even seen our cats toss it up in the air and pretend it is some bug they are chasing. Rather amusing.For even more fun, dip this toy in a bit of fresh catnip.~TheRebeccaReview.com
Big, bold and beautiful!. When these mugs arrived, I was surprised to see how gorgeous they are.  The color (cobalt), the glaze, the shape, the weight, the generous handle - all perfect!  They even fit under the spout of my Senseo coffeemaker.  Great mugs, I love them!
AWESOME AWESOME AWESOME AWESOME. The money tree arrived today on time. It was a gift to me :) I opened the box and couldn't believe how perfect this tree was. I'm going to have to purchase some more of these soon. Especially for the holidays. The roots on this smaller tree are as nice as the roots on a bigger tree. Thanks
Everyone wants one of these. We have this rack in our RV and everyone who sees it, wants to know where they can get one.  It holds quite a few dishes for it's compact size.  It folds down to just a few inches of space to stow under the sink while traveling.I can see it would be very handy for those in limited space like a small apartment or dorm room.It's plastic, but pretty sturdy.  When it gets a little gunky from all that accumulates in the bottom, I run it through my home dishwasher, but you can just scrub the bottom under the rack to clean it up
Floor Mate. As the other reviewer said, necessary to run your FloorMate.  Check out Lowe's...1/2 the price
Nice Timer. I use this timer more than my OXO twist-n-ring type of timer.  The keypad makes it very easy to set.  The timer 'beep' is plenty loud and continues to ring for 30 seconds until you stop it.  If you don't stop it, it will give you reminder beep every 10 seconds.One nice feature of this timer is the 'memory' function.  It allows you to set the timer back to the last setting with a simple press of the CLEAR/MEMORY button.Pro's:- Easy to set- Loud beeper (with reminder beeps)- Operates as a digital clock when not being used as a timer- Can be set from 1 second to 99 Hours 99 Minutes 99 Seconds- Timer can be paused if needed via START/STOP button- Compact size- 4 rubber non-skid feet keep timer firmly planted- Solidly builtCon's:- The 0..9 buttons are easy to push but the CLEAR/MEMORY andSTOP/START buttons are somewhat difficult to press.  I findthat I have to check each time I start the timer to verifythat it truly did start.- No beep confirmation for button presses- LCD display can be a little hard to read in certain lighting condition
Lovely!!. If u like frothy coffee and hate washing ur coffee machine or dont intend to buy one now..this thing definiltey makes up...its almost like a motorised  superfast whisk and u must not fill the cup more than half or u can pretty much swirl the coffee out on urself...but once u get the hang of it..u will fall in love with it. I like it
Black spoon rest. Very nice product and resonable. Any negative (very small), would be the steepness of the angle (not flat). Very nice however
Excellent. This is a great pillow for cervical support and stretching.  It's cotton and washable and worth the price
Best Foil Cutter Ever!. We've been using ours for about five years now, and it's the best foil cutter (requires only one quarter of a turn to do the job!) as well as the most convenient! It stays on the fridge with the magnet and is always at hand to do the job - the cutter removes from the magnet part with a little squeeze - so you always know where to find it! This and an Estate Opener are the two wine tools that anyone truly interested in wine should own!!
Handles are delicate. This is a great slow cooker but the handles on the insert are delicate - one broke almost immediately
Yeah, it's NOT a slipcover... which is why the title says "THROW." It's the thing you buy to put on new furniture so when company comes, you can rip it off quick and stuff it in the ottoman-cum-table with the fliptop lid.It's just meant to keep the nice stuff nice longer. You could do that, though, with an old bedspread, but this thing is nice. I got the gold, a very pretty soft color, and it makes my brand-new sofa look wonderful (while I'm trying to keep it looking wonderful longer in a house full of kids and animals - not including my husband.)So now that we're clear - it is NOT a slipcover - hopefully folks will recognize this for what it is, and buy it for that purpose (just make sure you've got a place to stash it quick.)When company comes, you'll look like you're the world's greatest housekeeper - or at the very least, your guests won't leave with a pet-hair coat on the seat of their pants.
wonderful for your dog!. I have a basset hound.  More importantly, a DEMANDING basset hound that constantly tries forcing me to not walk, but RUN with him, whenever we go for a walk.I was afraid when purchasing this retractable leash, that the cord would not be strong enough to hold up over time, and that the cord would probably rip out the minute the dog spots a rabbit or another dog and takes off running.  But so far, three years later, it hasn't happened.This leads me to conclude that this leash is a wonderful purchase.  Oh, and the fact that there's a handle located conveniently for you to hold is another bonus.  I mean, come on, the handle fits in your hand nice and snug.  Good leash.  I highly recommend it.
Rather nice glasses. These are very functional and versatile glasses. I use them quite often
LOVE IT  LOVE IT!. EXCELLANT PRODUCT THAT I PURCHASED ON LINE.I REALLY LOVE IT. IT MATCHES SO GOOD IN MY NEW KITCHEN AND I AM SO PROUD OF THE LOOK.I DEFINETLY WOULD RECOMMEND THIS TO MY FRIENDS. I LOVE THE STYLE AND THE RETRO FEEL
Dog groomer effective at removing undercoat. Until we bought this tool, we never had an effective comb that would remove our dogs undercoat. It has helped to reduce the amount of dog hair we clean up, especially in the spring when out dog begins to shed
A Great Product. The fry pan is easy to use and clean, the skillet part is easy to remove when heated, and also stores well in the provided tray holder. We use it every day, what a wonderful machine!!!
Sharper Image Soa; Genie Automatic Soap & Lotion Dispenser. Extremely convenient, practical, and yet, pleasant to view
Good Product. Speedy delivery and good product. I like that the bar slides out to better fit any size sink
Cow Tea Kettle. The whistle of this tea kettle brings the herd to the kitchen in a hurry - The delightful design brightens up the kitchen, great capacity and pours without spilling.The delivery service was very fast.
T-Fal Fryer. I recommend this fryer.  I have had other fryers in the past and highly recommend this one.  Easy to use and extremely easy to clean as well as storing the oil.  Frys food quickly and parts go right into the dish washer.
Excellent Pillow for people with neck or shoulder pain. We bought this pillow for our daughter who was experiencing neck and shoulder pain in the mornings.  After just a day or two of using this pillow the pain and shoulder strain were greatly reduced.  After a few weeks, the pain is gone.These microbead pillows are great for people who need neck support while they sleep.  I highly recommend them if you have this problem
Great Oven Mitts. Excellant protection and grip, will not burn, wipes off easily, stores more easily than reqular oven mitts. Wish I'd found these years ago
OK the second time around. The first vacuum shipped to us arrived damaged, but it was replaced quickly.  This vacuum has a lot of useful features without being too heavy. Only problem is that the main hose has a weak connection to the main vacuum canister so you end up just getting a lot of dust in the air.
Pretty and functional. These are gorgeous bowls. They are my preferred bowl for baking and cooking. I am very satisfied with them - no discoloration problems and they clean up very easily. And they look fantastic on my pot rack
Miele's the bomb!. Okay, so it's hard to get excited about things like HEPA filters - or the vacuum cleaners and other devices they are used in.  When my wife concluded her extensive search for a replacement to our old canister vacuum and anointed Miele the winner, I was slightly less enthusiastic than she.  It's a vacuum cleaner.  It's just a tool for keeping things trim.After a very short while I began to understand her admiration for the design and build quality of this particular tool.  The HEPA filters and bags used are no less a part of this than is the vacuum itself.  If you tire of vacuums that are constantly gritty with the dust they stir-up but don't quite capture, get a Miele.  If you distain the smell emanating from your vacuum's exhaust, get a Miele.  If you long for a simple, easy to use and maintain system that even your husband will use, get a Miele.Use genuine Miele bags, and change your HEPA filter as recommended.  The difference in cost is minor, but you will be amazed at the difference in results
My kitchen workhorse -- expensive but so worth it!!!. This is by far the most-used item in my kitchen.  Think about it:  If you could increase your cooking surface area when browning meat or vegetables or cooking soup, chili or spaghetti sauce, wouldn't you do so?  This dutch oven does exactly that.  I use it to brown everything--I rarely use my (very fine All-Clad) chef's skillet any more.  And I actually love the high sides--they reduce spatters without reducing browning, since the cast iron almost guarantees perfect browning.  This is a great pan if you need to develop fond--nothing burns in this pan once you get it up to temperature.  I actually have 3 Le Creuset dutch ovens in varying sizes, but I end up using this big one most of the time.  Come on--you know you want it.  Buy it
OK for large pots, but.... .... this is a great coffee maker if you make 8 or more cups at a time. When this machine arrived from Amazon, I had a house full of company, so we used to to make full pots. After the house guests left, I went back to my morning ritual of making 4-5 cups at a time, and discovered that this machine just can't make a decent short pot of coffee.I also discovered that it is a tiny bit taller than the specs say, so it may not fit under your kitchen cabinets!Other than that, it is built like a tank and nicely finished. If you normally make smaller pots, look elsewhere.
Great buy. Works fine for most applications. Only issue I have so far (3 months) is that  the whisk doesn't fit the bowl shape well enough to whip small amounts of cream, or egg yolks. The latter is more of a problem as I want to use the unit to make mayonnaise and similar sauces.
Cat Grass. I have five cats and 2 Drinkwell water systems. When I saw this new Drinkwell Aqua Garden I was excited. Now my cats can eat grass whenever they want. What a great idea
pleased. I am very pleased with the Chemire Dinnerware Set.  It is very durable and the colors are great.  The dishes are larger than I had expected.  They are a little heavy due to the size and thickness.  I would recommend them to others
Love that Thumper. This will be the third Thumper I've bought.  Lost the first one on a trip, second is still going strong after 5 or 6 years and the third is for a gift.  It's simple to use, loud enough to wake you and doesn't mind a good smack in the morning when you want 5 more minutes.  The thumper pad is big enough to hit when you're groggy!  More products should be as easy to live with as this one!
Rival Crock Pot. I love this crock pot!!  I've made several recipes from the enclosed cook book - they came out great.  The best part is that the ceramic insert is so easy to clean
Not bad for the price. [We have not assembled this yet but DID get and assemble an identical one in oak. The same comments apply to both.]This coat rack is not as nice as one we got in England, which unfortunately toppled and broke after 10 years' service, but it is functional and my husband likes it.The British one had rounded, solid hooks and NO plastic. This version is a bit more like a cheap imitation, with bentwood hooks and a plastic umbrella holder.But it was a good compromise when I could not find a top quality replacement, and for the price it was well worth trying out. (But you do get what you pay for!)So far it works ok but ask me again in winter when it's laden with heavy coats
Very "clean" presentation. This server blends in well with any level of service.  A good size for rich sauces; but a little small for gravy lovers.  Bormioli always gives more than it costs.  I have lots of thier crystal
Very useful...........daily. I find that I use these almost daily.  They basically have become my new prep bowls.........for small amounts.  Nice quality, easy stacking, even great color.  Will probably buy a second set.
Beautiful and elegant but handle with care. I love these glasses for white wine, and they set off iced tea perfectly.  The down side is that you have to hand-wash them, and they are prone to breaking.  But this is a terrific price for a beautiful set of wine glasses
Vornado Filters. Great performance and quick delivery.  Sometimes can't be found in stores, this solves my shopping delema
no more doggy fueds with neighbor. i absolutely love this product. my neighbor has four little yippers and my shepard/chow mix was antogonized by the yipping on our side of the fence. I hung the device on my side of the fence and the noise keeps the neighbors dog from picking "arguments" with my dog. all barking and fighting has ceased. all the surrounding neighbor as well as me can get a good nights sleep now
Love It. This pan is the best!   Nice heavy weight, great size.  Can grill 2large or 3 medium sandwiches at the same time !
Everybody can use a little Le Creuset. I purchased this little pot as a gift for a friend.Something to hold all the kitchen utencils that we all use each day. Being a chef I know that I can rely on Le Creuset. And this small pot is no diffrent. I was so fond of  it I have bought my self two for my own kitchen. Knowing that it can stand  up to heat. I have it next to the stove. I say try it in you kitchen. My  only request is that they shoud come in a set
momster. It really cools the wine fast and looks nice.  Great gift to take to a dinner party.  Not good for keeping things cold for long (1+ hours), so drink fast
Great for the money. I highly reccommend this and for the money...it is a real find. Good HEPA cleaner with mutiple settings, from quiet to high power, easy to read display, good looking....an all around winner.
THIS IS THE ONE. THIS KNIFE IS GREAT, FINE BALANCE, HEAVEY ENOUGH THAT YOU DON'T HAVE TO FORCE IT, VERY SHARP SEAMS TO KEEP EDGE GOOD, HANDLE FITS HAND JUST GREAT. DON'T THINK YOU COULD BUY ANY BETTER OR COME CLOSE TO THE PRICE FOR THIS QUALITY KNIFE
Great value for money. I own many all-clad pans, but still found this pan an excellentvalue for money. The build quality is excellent. Another reviewermentioned that he received a worn-out pan - that must have beena mistake. The one I received is brand new and the cookingefficiency is better than much more expensive all-clad stainlesssteel pans. Also, the pan is not very heavy, so handling is notdifficult. Also it works on all cooktops, including induction. Thispan does not come with a lid, so you may have to order the lidseparately.  Overall, I am very impressed with this item
excellent. My cat loves to play with this toy and so do I.  It comes with catnip which adds some energy to my cat but as a human I have to take something my doctor gave me.Great invention
Great item. Beautiful, exactly what the bride wanted.  Nice packaging, items arrived in perfect condition
Rachels Knives Are The Best. Wow, what a Christams gift for my wife!  She watches Rachel Ray, buys her cookbooks and makes her quick and wonderful dishes.  And, I must admit, they are great!  My wife has not stopped using the knives!  She claims they are the sharpest knives she's ever used and has warned me SEVERAL times to be careful when using.  They're lightweight and tough.  They keep an edge and are fantastic for slicing, chopping or cutting.  I found out about them from a wife of a friend who said the same thing!  They're definitely worth the expense.  And to my wife - keep on chopping and cooking baby, I'll eat every bite!
Worth The Price!!. This is the coolest thing I've ever bought for under $20. You have to be sure it's sitting on a flat surface or the chocolate won't flow evenly. The motor made a sad little sound when we first started it up so, I can't give it 5 stars but, I know I read in other reviews somewhere that you have to run a bit of vegetable oil in it first before you pour the chocolate in.  Regardless, the sound goes away after the chocolate's been flowing for awhile.The clean up was extra sweet and messy...I didn't mind it.  Also, I did have to get back online and read some other reviews to find out how other people remedied the oil in the chocolate.  Another reason why it didn't get 5 stars.  The recipe in the manual made our chocolate too smooth. When you dipped a strawberry in it, it didn't harden fast enough. Thank goodness they sent a 10% off coupon on quality chocolate. The other remedy may be less oil in the chocolate.Other reviewers said it was gross but, it tasted just fine to us. Come on, it's chocolate!! It's already bad for you!Still, this is a big hit and totally worth the money. I will be looking into better chocolate NOT a better fountain. This one is GREAT
so far so good. PEACE AT LAST!!!!! We have only had this for 4 days, but we are very happy. I ordered this because of RUDE neighbors who leave there 2 dogs(who bark and bark and.... they don't stop) out 24/7 is a dog run outside our bedroom window. Other neigbors have complained as well, they still won't do anything. After setting up the bark stop it didn't take long before they got the idea, they get 1 or 2 barks out then nothing :) I called the other complaining neighbor and asked if she heard the dogs "trying to bark" I told her that we bought super bark stop and hid it, she thought that was great.( now maybe we can enjoy a nice fall day with the windows open or working in the yard)update 10/18 okay the real test came last night and again this morning.What was the test?? SIRENS!!! I just had to laugh, they couldn't bark and howl!!! All I heard was this muffled grumbling coming from them. I am so glad we bought this!!!!
Looks The Same As the "Kitchen Kettle" I Bought for X-Mas. Not sure if the kettle on this is bigger than Presto's other gem the Kitchen Kettle, but if it's the same as that, then this is a great addition to have for the kitchen. Great for soups, stews, steaming, deep fry cooking, lots of other cooking applications. Easy to clean, easy to use thermostat on the cord. Haven't gone wrong with the Kitchen Kettle, so I feel this version should be of the same high quality as well.
Premium toast. Tried 3 other toasters in 6 months. Uneven toasting, broken knobs, you name it. This little gem is great at making even toast and also a fine bagel. Only takes a few days to get aquainted with the settings. It also looks great and doesn't eat half the counter. Very pleased
A Great Machine. After getting poor results from a steam driven Krups I decided to give home espresso brewing another try with a pump driven machine. After many days of research I settled on the Villaware Moderno. In addition to good reviews it was the only pump machine in this price range that did not have a boxy, or plastic look.All in all I a very happy with my purchase. The machine heats up fast, its easy to use and the foamer is fool proof. I steamed half and half for my cappucino and got mountains of very stable foam on the first try! For espresso I used the Illy pods that came with it and got very satisfactory results. The espresso was plenty hot and had a moderate amount of crema. But I understand that you get less crema anyway if you use pods. The hot water dispensing feature also works fine. I dispense the hot water into a large pyrex measuring cup for preheating the espresso cups.Some things worth mentioning. Cleaning: In addition to washing everything with soapy water, I ran 4 tanks of water through the system before I could get rid of that "metallic smell". Definately run water through the steam nozzle before using it. I noticed little particles of stuff coming out in the rinse water. Dripping: yes the portafilter does drip after you stop brewing but I shove a shot glass under the spout after I remove the cup and no problem.
as good as the full-size steamer. I compared this travel model with the full-size J-2000 steamer.  They were both very good at removing wrinkles from business-type clothing.  We steamed a full week's wardrobe, and the clothing done with the travel steamer looked just as good as the others.  The only drawback to the travel model is related to its small size - it needs to be refilled every 3-6 garments, and the smaller steam head means that it takes longer to steam an item.  However, I actually found that the small steam head worked better on small areas like collars and cuffs, especially since it has squared corners.  The corners mean that you do have to be a bit careful with delicate knits, though.  Worth the price if you really need to look your best when you travel
So glad we bought this fence. I had my doubts that this fence would work for us.we have 2 large rotties and I didnt think it would contain them.The collars make a beeping sound that warns the dog to get back before any shock happens. I am amazed our dogs will not cross the border and if they hear the beep they run backwards in fear.I would say the amount of shock the dog receives seems a little harsh but it really puts the message across. We also like the fact that you can adjust the amount of area depending on our needs
Good Coffee. This is not the first french press I have purchased. I like that it is unbreakable. I just wish it were a little bigger
better than the garbage. i bought one of these for my apartment, and it's quite an investment considering the constant cost of refills.  it does contain the odor better than a garbage can, but does not completely eliminate it.  the instructions seem a bit confusing at first, but it's a piece of cake once you figure out what they are trying to show.  with that in mind, it's a step in the right direction and does a fair job of containing the odor (particularly for indoor environments) and is a better alternative than the hooded litterbox for kitty's respiratory system
Love It ! ! ! ! !. I just love the Euro-Pro Shark. I have a dog and it is great for picking up loose dog hair and little crumbles from his dog food.  I use it several times a week.  It is light, quiet and really does a good job at picking up dirt, lint, and pet hair.  I have had other cordless sweepers and nothing compares to the Euro-Pro Shark.  It is a great purchase
Beautiful. They are bigger than what I'd consider ice cream bowls- but thats perfect for me. They came in perfect condition and are absolutely lovely
Great, but... I needed a saucepan to cook oatmeal in that would let go on the bits that stick to the bottom.  Sounds silly, but I love oatmeal and hate cleaning the pan afterwards.  This cleans up easily and cooks evenly.  I have used it for cooking rice, gravies and other foods that seem to stick and it always cleans up well.  Now, for the lid.  There is a black band on the inside of the lid and it scrubed off one night recently.  I sat down, wrote an email to the company and by the next day, they have a new lid on the way.  They asked only where to send it, nothing else.  I like companies that stand by the product they sell.  So, if you are going to buy from this line, check that black band, it should be between the glass and the metal, not on the inside of the lid.  If you have a problem with the product, ALWAYS notify the manufacturer, they will almost always make it right, like Calphalon did for me
Does the job better than some others. My last Back to Basics blender lasted only about 6 months, but I bought another one anyways. I like the size of the cup - quite large. I also like that it has more than one speed unlike some other blenders that are similar.
BIG. This seems to be a great unit. So far it cleans well without chipping, which was my biggest concern when ordering. One small problem is that there is a space between the cooking unit and the base unit which allows food to spill through.The biggest concern I have to pass on is that this unit is really BIG. The description mentions that the cooking surface is 13.7", but does not mention that the base unit is 18.5" wide, so make sure you have a space to store it. I had to store mine in my oven
Hamilton Beach Indoor Grill with Removable Grill & Timer. This was an excellent purchase.  The grids are removable and go right in the dishwasher without any impact to the non-stick coating.  It has an audible timer which also shuts off the grill making it a great purchase for the elderly who might not hear the timer.  This is the second time we've purchased the grill, we gave the first grill to our son after we'd used it for a couple of years (it was still like new and we'd used it a lot).  We called around our local area looking for another HB grill and couldn't find one so we purchased a George Foreman.  The features we were looking for, especially the timer that shut the grill off, were only available on the larger grills.  We're cooking for two and really didn't want the "family size" grill so we left it in the box and pursued the HB until we found one on Amazon.  We're now happy grillers again and hope they never stop making the HB with the features we love
forget the cork. I understand that the cork product itself effects the wine taste, however, replacing it with these items for just a few days does no harm.  They are easy to use, clean, store and saves tons of time trying to squeeze the oversized cork back into a bottle
Best knives. I have owned several sets of &quot;never need sharpening knives&quot; and other varieties, but this is absolutely the best set of knives I have ever owned.  They slice through so easily and with no mashing of whatever you're trying to slice.  They do need an occasional sharpening, but that little bit of effort is well worth it.  Also, the knife extends all the way to the end of the handle, so it won't seperate from the blade or break like so many others have...especially while trying to slice through hard cheeses.  Excellent knife.  You really don't need a whole set though, as one serated and one straight would be sufficient
A high-quality, multi-purpose pan. This pan is a high-quality, convenient addition to my kitchen, which is precisely why I bought it. The interchangable bottoms are easy to use and easy to clean. It's made of a strong, durable, substantial matierial--not a flimsy, easy-to-dent piece! As an apartment dweller with a small kitchen, this pan is ideal: it is easy to store and has multiple purposes. However, it has one small (potential) drawback: when used as a bundt pan, it's a little small--your standard bundt cake recipe will slightly overfill the pan
Now I can load my dehydrater with more stuff each time I use it. I couldn't find these trays anywhere locally and I was very pleased to find them online. I may be back to order more
A lot of beautifull collors!. I just love the design and I supose that everybody must find one collor they like`.It`s a lot of them
Time to clean up the house. Before I bought a Dirt Devil, I owned a vacuum that worked great for over 5 years.  In January I broke that vacuum on a Friday the 13th (yes, that really is a bad day) thanks to me accidentally ramming the front of it into the side of the living room coffee table.  After it hit the table I knew immediately it was a goner.  Sometimes you just know.  Also, the electrical smoke shooting out the front was another good indication.  No one to blame but me.  It actually upset me because, before that innocent, everyone in my house kept accusing me of knocking a big dent into the side of the dishwasher in the kitchen.  I really believe I didn't put that dent there, and I tried hard to defend myself every time that topic came up, but now I look incredibly guilty because of the way I knocked the vacuum into the coffee table and ruined it.  I'm an innocent man!  I DID NOT BANG THE VACUUM INTO THE DISHWASHER!And the worst part about that vacuum breaking was that I was actually DONE cleaning the floors before it broke, and so I shut the vacuum off, but then (and this will bother me forever) I looked down on the carpet and realized that I had missed a spot near the coffee table, so I turn the vacuum back on and THEN I accidentally hit the coffee table and destroyed the vacuum.  If I had never bothered with that spot on the floor the vacuum probably would continue to run fine today. A mistake I have to live with.After it was discovered that we couldn't save the vacuum cleaner, we went somewhere to get another one (actually I stayed home while my dad shopped around).  For years we saw commercials for Dirt Devils and figured they would be a very wise purchase.  Well, that turned out to be not entirely true, but in another way, it WAS entirely true.  Let me try to explain why I think this is a good vacuum cleaner.  I have to warn you- it's kind of mind-boggling.The one big complaint people seem to have with Dirt Devils also happened to me- one time I was vacuuming, and I left it running while I was busy trying to arrange the dog beds across the floor in a way I could easily vacuum over them.  Well, while I was doing that the vacuum was positioned on top of the cord, and so it accidentally sucked up the cord, made a big scary noise, and damaged it.  I immediately ran over and unplugged it.  I had to wrap electrical tape around the spot on the cord that was damaged because the wires inside were exposed.  This happened after the second week we purchased it, and I thought I was going to freak out because I thought I had just ruined a brand new vacuum.  It turned out to be okay.  Truly a scary moment.  That was a sign to just take the dog beds outside for now on and shake the hair off myself.I like how Dirt Devil vacuums have a plastic case design to hold the dirt and hair, instead of messing with those darn vacuum bags.  Vacuum bags are a pain in the butt because not all types are designed the same.  For instance, one time I bought a 3-pack bag of vacuum bags that had a round hole on top of the bag, but the inside of my vacuum at home required bags with a SQUARE hole, so we had to go back to the store and search for vacuum bags that were created with square-shaped holes instead of round-shaped holes, so it would fit inside my vacuum.  A big, unnecessary pain.  ALL BAGS SHOULD HAVE EITHER ROUND OR SQUARE HOLES, NOT BOTH.Anyway, with the Dirt Devils plastic container design, you can simply push a button to remove the container from the vacuum cleaner and empty the dirt and hair into your trashcan/front yard, and use a brush to wipe away any sticky remains.  No bags needed.  This is convenient, but if there's one complaint it's that the container fills up after vacuuming the entire downstairs after only ONE time (this includes the kitchen, living room and den floors- but I DO have a big house).As I mention above, something very strange is going on with my Dirt Devil.  When I first bought the vacuum back in January I thought the sucking power was sort of weak, and I had to go over certain areas on my carpet three or four times to completely clean it.  However, as the weeks went by, the sucking power gradually increased to where now I'm afraid to leave the vacuum turned on over any kind of loose rugs, for fear that the vacuum cleaner will suck the rug right off the floor.  I have no idea where this sudden burst of amazing power came from, and why it's getting stronger as time goes on.  I don't know if I'm happy about it either.  I think I am.   You just have to be careful not to leave the vacuum running over any kind of rug or doormat.All I hope for is that my Dirt Devil vacuum lasts me until the end of this year.  I can't handle the frustration of buying vacuum after vacuum not ONLY because of a money issue, but also because you know how people can be- they will continue to say *I* destroyed my vacuums by accusing me of being exceptionally harsh with them- accusing me of pushing around my vacuums aggressively and angrily, banging into the side of everything I come into contact with.  I'm really not the kind of person that does that.  These people can just knock it off.  Okay, sometimes I break out into hives and get extremely itchy, and during these moments it's hard to push the vacuum around calmly and carefully.  But I've learned to just shut the vacuum off and wait for the itching to go away before starting it back up again.So there's really not much for me to complain about when it comes to Dirt Devils.  Okay, so sometimes if you vacuum over cracker crumbs or something the crumbs will shoot back and hit your leg.  But please, don't tell me that actually hurts you.  It's doing that because the vacuum is so damn powerful.  It can't help it!  It's a great vacuum for dog hair.  On hard floors, the Dirt Devil is a pretty quick and wonderful experience, too.  Dog hair is gone in an instant.  The noise of the motor is louder than most, this is true.  That's a slight problem.  But I only need to vacuum once a week so it's not like I have to hear the thing running everyday.  The noise would probably become a problem then.  But in the end, my experience for the last three months with the Dirt Devil has been a good one.
T-Fal Avante Toaster. We have one of these in each of our 19 kitchens and we like them very much
Designed to be a vacuum you don't have to fight with. The light weight, compact design makes the Miele vacuum cleaner highly maneuverable. It can be easily picked up and moved up and down stairs. When you move about the room, you don't have to drag it around like a dead weight, a gentle tug and the main motor unit follows along effortlessly.It doesn't have a motor-driven carpet brush. At first, I thought it would be a disadvantage, after all, that's a standard feature on most of the American vacuum cleaners. But now I see the logic behind it. The standard floor tool is lighter and easier to move around. Its joint swivels in two directions making it easier to get into corners and under furnitures. The hose also doesn't have embedded electrical cable making it more flexible. For our carpet, the standard floor tool works well enough. The manual does recommend getting the battery powered electro-brush if really deep pile carpet or rug neccesitates it.The motor is powerful yet very quiet.Overall, this is a excellent cleaning tool that makes vacuuming less of a chore
Everything they say. These are great. The color and the cost. My family thinks they make the room look so modern. They don't look cheap but they are light enough for me (female, 5'5" 130) to move with one hand. I slide them under the dining room table, instead of using chairs. This is a great space saver if you live in a smaller apt or house
Wonderful wine glasses!. I highly recommend the Spiegelau Authentis line for value and beauty.  These glasses truly do enhance the experience of the wine and are priced so that you can enjoy them every day.  While a delicate and beautiful showcase for wine, they are also sturdy enough to stand up to being used (and washed!) on a regular basis.  If you are looking to amp up you wine drinking experience, give these a try
So Far So Good as Bedroom Pop Cooler. I read all the reviews for this fridge and other like it.  This one seemed the best out of all the ones available.  however, I'm a little worried because some people said it breaks after 3 months.  I got it as a present for my nephew who uses it solely to keep pop cool in his bedroom.It seems to be working well for that.  I think the most important thing to remember is that it has to have air space around it for the fan to vent the warm air out
Great cookie sheets. I have lived in Europe recently and was unable to use my jelly roll pans and cookie sheets because of the standard size of the ovens there.  I purchased these because they would easily fit their ovens.  I used them at Christmas and was thrilled at how the cookies came out.  I have never used a cookie sheet that cooked such as to have the cookies literally sliding off the cookie sheet without any nudge.  If you have a gas oven I would suggest watching the first batch to see the actual time you need in.  I accidentally browned the bottom a little too much the first batch.  They are more weighty than my other cookie sheets, but that is their only draw back.  A true find for the frequent baker
A Superior Set. This is hands down the best set of knives I have ever owned. This is my second set of Henckel Knives, the first having walked out of my house one afternoon.Nearly any new knife will seem very sharp. The real question is how long will they keep an edge? These knives retain their sharpness quite well. The carbon steel used is quite good and utterly smooth. The body of the blade is the appropriate thickness for the task. That is some are thinner and more flexible, like the boning knife while others are thicker and more solid, like the chef's knife.Of course you will need to sharpen knives periodically. I recommend sending them to a professional knife sharpener or, if you are so inclined and skilled, use a specially designed kitchen knife sharpening jig. Remember, dull knives are more dangerous than sharp ones because you use more force and thus are more likely to slip. A chef's knife is sharp enough when it can cut well into meat by simply drawing it across using only the weight of the knife (it should not catch). The "cutting a sheet of paper" trick is just that, a trick and not a good indicator of sharpness.While the set does include a sharpening bar, I find these require some skill and practice in order to get a both good edge and keep your own blood inside your body.All knives, including the steak knives have a wonderful balance and handle shape. I have had no trouble with my hand slipping onto the blade. I have medium sized hands and fit well. I also find the handle design to be handsome.The variety of knives in this set is good, something for nearly every task. I particularly like the large chef's knife and extra small paring knife.The steak knives are nice in that the upper half and tip have small serrations while the lower half is a smooth blade.I like the fact that you get both long and short serrated bread knives.The video that came with my set was well done and quite helpful.Like any knife set, for long life you should not put these in the dishwasher. It is not that the knives cannot somehow tolerate being immersed in hot water, no. Rather it is simply impossible to prevent something else from hitting blades. That would result in premature wear and harm the actual razor-thin cutting edge. But then this caution applies to all knives so this is not really a limitation of this set.Though you may be tempted, you should not try to chop firewood with these knives as this will lead to premature wear
Cooks everything perfectly!. After being disappointed with GE and Black and Decker toaster ovens, I spent a little more and got this Cuisinart.  It is the best toaster oven hands down.  The light, medium, dark toaster settings really work.  I have little ones and make a lot of french fries and mozzerella sticks.  This toaster oven actually crisps them, they don't come out cooked but mushy like they did in my other ones.You can cook 3 bagels at a time as well as small pizzas.  It it nicely oversized compared to others.I have stainless steel appliances and this oven looks great out on the counter.Great product
Great cookware. I am a senior who grew up with much heavier cast iron.  I had to give it up because of its weight.  These are still very good cookware but slightly lighter in weight, therefore easier to handle, and the pre-seasoning is super.  I am sorry now that I didn't add a cover to my order, thought my Calphalon covers might work, haven't found a good match for this size pan so keep that in mind if you do buy.  This will be used as I have traditionally used this size, it will fry, it will make pineapple upside down cake, it will turn out a perfect meatloaf.  I am happy to again be using cast iron, the original and best of the "nonstick" ware.
No Buttery slips!. This butter dish is great because of the little top knot.  It's very easy to pick up the lid.  Besides....it's cute
Best Book Lights We've Tried!. First, in the interest of full disclosure, I am writing this review under my husband's "real name" because it's his account.My husband and I are avid readers and we often read in bed before falling asleep. As such, we've looked at and tried just about every book light on the market.We initially found these lights by chance at a Costco, sitting by themselves (the only package available) on top of a stack of books. We tried them out and they were fantastic. Most book lights had one of two features we liked, and a lot more that we didn't. These were just what we wanted.They are lightweight.They are very, very bright.The battery is easy to change.The light bulbs have never needed to be replaced.They are compact and don't weigh down a paperback.The clip is strong and stays in place.Best of all is the swivel. You can direct these lights anywhere you need them, left/right, up/down, all around. Plus you can direct the arm that holds the lights to various angles. It's perfect for night-time or car/air travel reading.Someone said it's hard to find batteries for the lights. We've never had that problem. Target and WalMart carry an extensive supply (I think they are 2032, we get Duracell and Energizer brands and they last a long time). Very easy to replace, just unscrew the back of the light and pop them in.I will say the first lights we got in that original two-pack from Costco (we have never seen them at the store again, it was such a fluke) did have a problem with one of the two lights. One of the batteries always gets stuck and is next to impossible to remove. We end up unscrewing the other half of the light where the bulbs are and pushing the battery out the other side. This is obviously not intended to be the way to change the battery. HOWEVER this has NEVER happened with the lights we've bought from this company through Amazon - only one one of the first two we got at Costco, and I'm not even sure they were made by the same people, although they look identical.Since buying that first two-pack, we've bought four more lights from this company at Amazon. My husband and I keep them in various locations of the house, in our travel bags, in the car, etc., and get constant use out of them. They are durable, and long lasting.Only one thing I have a complaint about: the claw-clip is supposed to open using a thumb-press movement, but I find it difficult to use. It's easily worked around just by opening it with my fingers and attaching it to the book. Maybe I have small hands, my husband doesn't have this problem. It's a minor issue, though.Finally, I love the colors. Pink, blue, and purple especially. They just make you happy to look at, but maybe that's just me. :
Built like a tank. The huge motor gives this machine an ability to almost grind rocks! The grind setting knob is huge and easy to read. The coffee bin seems immune to that darn static cling. The bean hopper is generous in size also. The instruction book, yes, a real book, tells you how to not only clean the machine well but also how to change the grinding range for anything imaginable. Even the operating noise is much less than expected. When I compared the price of this machine vs the metallic finished Pro-Lines, I find it obvious that Ferrari Red is the way to go
Simple and Excellent coffee. I have tried many different coffee makers and being a coffee junkie I keep looking for the combination of simplicity, cost and excellent coffee - this has all three!The first two or three times I tried this the coffee didn't come out that good, either too weak or not enough body but now I have it down and the coffee is excellent. I make a double espresso and then add in extra water to fill my travel mug for my 2 hour commute each day.The other good news... I've now found a good use for my single cup coffee maker - it produce the right amount of water at the right temprature  to use in the aeroexpress.
Nice kids pillow. My son loves it very nice. It is a nice gift for ages below 5. It got a good shape, nice grip to hold
It DOES work!. At first I wasn't sure if it was working but when the water evaporates I notice the cat smells again. You don't even realize it's doing anything until it's not working (it does require water to work). It's that unobtrusive! The smellkiller is GREAT and I would recommend it to anyone. I plan on giving these as gifts! While it's not like you'll never have odor in your house again (seems to me some people have that outrageous expectation of this product) it will make a noticable difference. Go ahead and buy it. Cheaper in the long run than air freshners
Good Decanter for the price. This is an excellent decanter - the shape allows for easy handling and it is an excellent value.  I have two and would recommend this decanter to anyone requiring a simple decanter
Disney Cars pillow. I sent as a gift & was told the baby loves the soft pillow
Coffee Maker that Rocks!. After much research and consideration I decided to buy this product as a Christmas gift for my husband.  I am not the type of person to research products before I buy them, but taking into consideration how picky my husband is about his espresso (and being Cuban and drinking cuban coffee since birth--makes you critical and suspicious about the quality of the coffee made by these new espresso machines), I did not want to buy something that was not going to meet our expectations. I have to say this product has surpassed my expectations and my husband is very pleased with it.  My main concern was how HOT the coffee would be, and this product makes the coffee with the right temperature and richness that we have come to expect from the corner cafeteria coffee.  I've read reviews about the noise it makes, and after having the Deloghi product, the noise this machine makes when warming up is NOT that loud at all.  We are very happy with it.  Buy it, you'll be happy too
The Best Grill On The Market. The grill is so capable that I sold our gas grill at a garage sale!  I purchased 2 of these for myself in blue, and one for my mother in red.  She was delighted. I use one for beef, fish, poultry and the other at the same time for veggies, etc.  It is exceptionally well-made, (guaranteed for 101 years) - and the weight of the grill reflects it's quality.  If you have weak wrists or if lifting anything heavy is a problem - unfortunately - this wouldn't be for you.  Also, it is more difficult to clean then any of my other Le Creuset pieces; however, no more trouble to clean, then the rack from our gas grill.  In fact, less so as it's smaller and fits into the sink more easily; simply let it soak for a bit in warm water and it's no trouble.  I use mine at least 3 times a week, and am only sorry I didn't purchase it sooner.  I highly recommend it
The Best Popcorn!. This is the best popcorn popper ever! It's easy, really fast and fun. Every kernel pops up light and fluffy. We used the pre-measured movie theater packs and we think the popcorn tastes better than what we get at the movies. We also popped a store bought corn and it also popped up light and fluffy with no kernels unpopped. We are not fans of microwave popcorn and we usually popped in a pot on the stove. The Whirley-pop makes a better popcorn and is so much faster and easier because of the material it is made of and the way the steam is vented. We love it and never have a problem eating the full batch.
Quality Shears. These shears have no problem cutting through chicken bones.  I have not had the problems other buyers have with the safety catch. I highly recommend these shears at this price range
Great for the home. Professional like sharpening in the home at a good price.  I love this sharpener and trust it's performance on good knives.  The magnetic guides make sure you sharpen the knife correctly so go ahead, run your expensive knives through it; it does a great job
getting salty in my kitchen. Product just as promised - looks great - works wonderful -- a very happy purchase from my en
First Allergy Pillows, but... These are really nice- they don't make noise, they don't feel or sound like plastic, and my husband has been commenting on his good sleep since I got them, and I don't know if he noticed that I even put them on the pillows. After washing, they feel just like regular pillow cases and are quite cool to the touch, which I like, since my face and feet always get too warm while I sleep.I purchased the standard size cases and didn't realize I had jumbo pillows, but they still fit, they are just a bit fat, so it is nice that the size isn't made to be perfectly small.
Solid, good rugged design. I have got to say I'm pretty impressed with this bag.   I have a 10" Lodge camp oven and was worried about the legs punching holes, but the bottom has padding in between the inner and outer layers so it's really not a problem.  I am not only able to put in my oven, but also some of the objects that are necessary to go with it.   The handles are of tough webbing.   I'm quite satisfied, especially at the price.
very nice. It is a very good piece for this price. I got one minor defect in one of the chairs, will try to contact the customer service but am lazy. A great deal altogether
So Useful I Bought Two Sets. After two plus decades, I finally decided to replace my wood utensils.  Though they had served me well, they were no cracked and splintering.I was considering nylon or silicone utensils to replace them, but about the same time, I had purchased a bamboo cutting board and really loved it. So I checked out bamboo utensils and found these very nice and reasonably priced tools.First, they are great with all types of cookware, whether traditional or nonstick.  And the burnished bamboo surface is very tough.  It doesn't mind high heat or the dishwasher.I also like the bamboo container.  It's small enough to place anywhere in the kitchen.  I have on set by the stove and another on my prep table.The only thing I wish it had was a deeper spoon or ladle for serving.
gin from Texas. This is a great coffee pot.  I have been searching for the best cup of coffee and this works for that.  It is really nice and I like the cordless feature
Love it!. After years of laying clothes out to dry on couches, the floor, and on hangers that warped the shape of clothes, I finally did a little research of drying racks.I purchased this one after reading the great reviews, and I must say that I agree.  I love it!  It really does fold down flat and stores easily.I also want to add that Amazon shipped it in a big box with lots of air pockets, so there was no damage to the product as other people have complained about, so Amazon is listening!  Thanks! (April 2007
Red Fattie. Very pleased with the new toaster so far; wish it wasn't so "fat" on my counter, but it is eye-pleasing, light weight  and fairly quiet; the only disappointment for me was that the english muffins, for example, do not pop up high enough to grab them without having to "go in" and  burning your fingers if you are not careful; "they" had said that this particular model had a higher "carriage" so this would not happen, but it does.Otherwise, great little fat red bug.Price was excellent with no shipping fees or tax from Amazon
Very nice and comfy sheets. My partner and I both really like these sheets. They are thick, soft, smooth, and cozy
Wonderful set, but cup handles not large enough... I ordered two sets, one in green and one is white, because I like the mixed and matched look.  The cups are large, but the handles are very small even for small hands.  The rest of the set is great...very sturdy and large.
Little Small. I have a hard time giving this three stars because it deserves more since I just have no concept of how much an ounce is :). I thought 12 ounces would be enough to be able to play around with the milk for Latte art on my drinks but it helps if you have enough milk for the drink. Personally I would upgrade to the bigger pitcher unless you only drink true doppio macchiato's (the drinks in the tiny cups). I am a Starbucks Barista and know when I see a quality product and this definately meets my standards. Good product, just stupid buyer :)
design vs. function. This style of this slow cooker is its attraction. However, after only three months's usage (and I use it at least once a week), it was such a disappointment when one of the handles broke off.I immediately began searching for a replacement for the pot and it seems there is none anywhere.Take care with those handles
Mikasa Parchment. In reading the review, I was surprised to see the comments about packaging and breakage.  I have been using Amazon for years, probably on a monthly basis.  I have never had any missing items or breakage.  I received my Mikasa in perfect condition and it's beautiful for the holidays.  My only suggestion is it would be nice to buy additional place settings.  My dining room sits 12 for the holidays and I could only buy 8 place settings.  I'll have to track down additional settings elsewhere
Sonic Electric Jewelry Cleaner Machine. I bought this as a gift for my mom and she said she loved it! She said all her jewelry is clean and sparkley again.It was lightweight and a perfect size for countertop use.
Best slow cooker!. I love this item! I used it a couple of times already and the chicken was the best that I ever had!  I couldn't believe that it does everything that it says it does!  The food is tender, flavorful - even the next day! This is the best thing I have added to my kitchen in years
Perfect addition to the Milano Chair. This was a perfect addition to the Milano chair.  It's well built and sturdy enough to use as an extra seat should the need arise.  I was skeptical about buying furniture on-line with only a picture to go by but have no regrets
Perfectly elegant. The size of this elegant little sugar bowl is just right. Unlike an earlier reviewer, I found the spoon to be quite adequate and very nicely shaped... but then, i don't use 3 teaspoons of sugar either.  I like the mirror finish with the brushed finish inside and the slot for the spoon so that the lid fits perfectly. I'm now eagerly awaiting the companion cream pitcher
Peace at last!. I had so many barking dogs that I was feeling like shooting them. My rental business was suffering and the neighbors were enjoying their dog's disruption of the neighborhood (some kind of power thing I guess). When ever anyone went out in their yards these dog would charge and bark as though they meant to kill. When my last short term renter (a pastor) yelled NO! at them I became desperate. I had been told about barking collars and had them for my own dogs. I was looking for a new collar (cironella) I plugged in anti bark, and then up popped this Super Bark Product. I bought and put it on a poll in the garden behind a tree. The dogs barked the entire time right at the fence, until my daughter turned it on. They ran like bats out of hell back to their house and haven't been heard since! Now I was a little sceptical at first, but I can't praise this product enough. You can not get anything else that will do this for you. You can complain to the county till your blue in the face or spend thousands on an attorney and not win. If you move, you might end up with more barking. Look. It's worth the money, believe me!!!!
Ultimate Cool!. It looks beautiful and it has a toaster built in!  This little microwave gets more attention than any of my brand new stainless appliances in my recently remodeled kitchen.At first I was hesitant about the lack of a touch keypad for entering cook times etc.  But I can honestly say that I do not miss this feature.  The "dial" on this unit replaces the standard touch pad found on most microwaves and is extremely effective and easy to use. Turn it fast for "minutes" and turn it slow for "seconds."  It works much like the infamous click-wheel on iPod's.Great form and function. I'm very pleased with this purchase
Nesco American Harvest Jerky Spice Original Flavor. This is the best jerky spice on the market as far as my family is concerned. When our store quit carrying it, we started buying it through Amazon.com. There is no other spice like it. We did try others, but they could not compare to Nesco American Harvest
AWESOME OPENER !!!. You will not be disappointed with this purchase. It's so easy to use...set it in place on top of the can and hold it comfortably with one hand while effortlessly turning the handle with the other. You won't have any liquids seeping out and making a mess, so the opener stays clean! Both the can and lid have smooth edges. The lid will also fit snugly back on the can. It's wonderfully compact which makes storing easy. I just can't say enough good things about it. I absolutely love this can opener!
Good overall unit. Good things:Dry and wet pick upLightBad things:Does not have a charging station.Average suctio
CDN Proaccurate Digital Programmable Probe Thermometer. After much research into these devices, I decided to purchase the CDN brand for my husband as a gift.  I chose this brand since it had a higher temperature range than that of the other brands available.  This one goes up to 482degrees.  So far he seems to love this thermometer.  It seems very accurate in reading the internal temp of the meats.  He loves that it allows him to program what type of meat and for beef the taste(rare,m.rare,med,well). The cable connecting the device to the probe seems to be pretty strong--braided wire. I have seen other devices by other brands that the cables "burn out".  This was one of the deciding factors in purchasing the CDN brand. My husband loves the magnetic feature that allows him to stick it to the side of the oven!  I am also excited to see the thermometer comes with a clip for candy making and frying.  I havent had a chance to use it for this purpose yet, but it makes the device much more versatile & useful.  The temperature display is quite large and easy to read...so it will work good for someone who cant read small print.  I would actually give this product 4 &1/2 stars.  The only reasons I would deduct half a star are: 1)the casing is plastic (cannot use on BBQ)and 2)the timer beeper isnt that loud (you cant hear it if upstairs or more than a room away, so you need to stay in earshot to hear the timer go off).  All in all its a great product.  I would recommend it.  Buy it and you will never have dried out or undercooked meat again.  Its well worth it!  The chef in your life will thank you
Fast and convenient cooking. I bought this grill to make lefse but so far I have only used it for tortillas and pancakes. It works wonderfully and cooks 4 -5 pancakes or tortillas at a time. I can cook them in less than half the time it took using a skillet on the stove. It has been easy to clean too. Now I all I need to do is find the time to make lefse
Good enough for the time being!. I am the worlds biggest procrastinator when it comes to putting together furniture!  I bought this piece, along with the desk, in January and here it is April, and I am just now getting the job done.  The table part of this product was fairly easy to put together and at this point my spirits were high.  The file drawer on the other hand is a different story.  None of the pieces are labeled, getting the two sides and the front to align long enough to put the screws was almost impossible and I did need to use a hammer to fishish off the screws.  I liked to never figure out why my drawer was not sitting right, when I finally figured it out that I had it in on the wrong side.  Overall, putting it together could have been made easier with written directions instead of just pictures, screws that actually screwed all the way in and pieces that are labled.  The file cart is a little wobbly but seems to be sturdy enough to hold my printer...for the time being
very good. It works well, probably better than the other solutions available, but there are some disadvantages: there are 2 LEDs that illuminate the page, and illumination is not perfectly uniform. How could it be? In addition, a faint diffraction pattern resulting in concentric circles or arcs radiating out from the LEDs is visible on the page. Finally, because the "lens" is made of plastic, it accumulates static electricity and hence dust; pages actually stick to my lightwedge
great skillet. i really like the electric skillet, it is the first one, i have bought. it is big enough to fry a chicken cut in half,both halves at once, and deep enough to make a stew. easy to clean just like promised. the only thing i was not so happy about was the handles. they give a lot, they bend, and one of mine is already broken. but that is really the only complain i have and i consider it a minor and would buy the skillet again
Excellent Machine. We've been using it now for about four months with out a problem. It works well on breads, meats and cheese. Contrary to the previous comment the unit is easy to clean and, in my opinion. (some people wash there hands 50 times a day too!) I would recommend this unit to all who wish a rugged and dependable product
Good pillows. These pillows are still new, so the jury is out on how well they'll hold up over time, but so far, they do provide decent support and a good night's sleep. Worth the investment. While I'd stop short of calling them "luxury," they are nice
GOOD VALUE. I ordered the white seashell pottery dinnerware and am very satisfied.  I had years of multi-colored dinnerware and decided I wanted something simple yet attractive and my husband and I love the ocean!  A nice change of pace was the fact that there were no cups & saucers - just mugs and a large size at that
LOVE this. I bought the Litter Locker Plus as we had 6 ferrets and wanted to dispose of their litter in a way where it would not smell as with 6 ferrets you change the litter box twice daily. I love it, you do NOT smell any urine or poo, and the refills are so easy to change. I will be purchasing the Litter Locker Plus with refills for my Mom and her cat.
Heavy duty. Solid and very sharp. This pizza wheel from KitchenAid is a very solid product.  Its hefty weight is balanced nicely and comes razor sharp from the factory.  The plastic blade cover protects the cutting surface from nicks in your kitchen drawer, and it also protects your clumsy fingers too
Tuffy Says, "First Choice From My Toy Basket". Our Bichon chooses almost daily from his toy basket the toys he wants to play with.  The minute he saw this little red dog he was very pleased. We like the terry finish and the rope middle...our little guy is pretty rough on his stuff... this toy seems to be holding up
Lip comes in very handy. This is a wonderfully crafted, stylish - with simple lines - lazy susan. I use it mainly for condiments and spices besides the stove, but also on the table for the little bowls with sauces and supplements that go with fondue, Mexican or East Indian dishes. In that case I appreciate the lip which holds things back from sliding all over the table, especially when eating with kids (or spirited guests).In general: a lazy susan is not meant to get in contact with food directly (improvise with the glass tray from your microwave, it's easy to clean). And in a fridge or kitchen cabinet corner your susan needs a lip, otherwise small things disappear forever..
This is IT!. My mother had one of these saucepans and used it daily as far back as I can remember for everything from boiling potatoes to making gravy.  When she passed away I took it and use it all the time.  It came witha double boiler insert which also got (and gets) frequest use, particularly for melting chocolate.  My pan has to be at least 50 years old, the handle is still tight and the cover still seals.  It's as good as they day Mom bought it half a century or more ago.  What more could you ask
Nice but too low. I have never owned a memory foam pillow before so I don't know if it's a regular sizes for all of them. But I found it to be very low. I have a wide shoulders and the pillow didn't support my head very well. My guess is that it's probably better to get some of the other ones (heavier) like 3 or 4 lbs. they might be a little bit bigger.The foam feels very soft and comfortable, though
Dking. I love this blanket, it is just long enough, and soooo  soft.  I love it, we have had a cold winter and it has came in handy.  Buy it.
The Best Oven Mitts by Far!. These are the best oven mitts EVER!  You know you hold on to a cookie sheet too long and you can start to feel the heat through the oven mitt..... well not with these!  I have tried so many oven mitts and I will never look further than the OXO Silicone Oven Mitts.  I love the magnet too; they hang above my stove on the side of the microwave - easily accessible!Highly recommend them!
Kitchen Helper. I really like this tool rack.  It's sturdy and simple to attach to the wall.  The metal hooks slide so you can adjust them to fit the width of your hangable cooking tools.  It comes with 6 hooks.  I have a set of measuring cups hanging, two sets of measuring spoons on one hook, and my can opener and Oxo y peeler on the other.  I like being able to get to my measuring cups and other frequently used items without having to rummage around in the drawer looking for them.
Great Value. Color was very close to that of the picture and worked perfectly.  Unit is slightly oversized but has not been washed yet. Soft seems to be durable.  Terrific pric
Its a cool gadget to have. It worked just as i expected. I like it and its very useful everytime i travel or read late at night, which i often do. It could be a bit brighter that it is, but still no other problems. Battries also last a long time
Excellent Condition. Pleased. Item brand new and shipped in a timely manner. I do wish it was bigger. "Grand Pappy" through me off, thought it would be bigger than it was, but it was still what I wanted. Most important, vendor delivered as promised
Love It. This is just what I was looking for. It works beautiful. I would buy another, if I needed it.
So far it's working well. I've only had the product for a short time but it's definitely making a noticeable change on the edge of my Global knives.  I'm rather impressed.
roliing pin rings. very useful in the kithchen makes pie & pizza crusta in a jify without the worry of them being uneven, dont know how i did without the
Buying Towels Online. This is the second or third time I have purchased linens on line from Amazon. When I receive the merchandise it is always as expected. Although I have to pay shipping, for me it is a convenience expense. I live an hour away from a shopping center, have an intense work schedule allowing little time for shopping in a conventional way. This is a terrific way for me to buy what I want, get the quality I expect, and make the best use of my time
iRobot Roomba 4910 Replacement Filters......... My roomba is still going strong since I recieved it as a christmas gift. I strongly recommend getting the Replacement filters and changing them as directed to get the best out of your IRobot. The filters are easy to install and work great.
Easy, Fun, Delish !!. The smell of the roasting coffee is just the beginning of the great experience with this roaster. Easy to use and a snap to clean. I use a digital scale to measure the quantity going in (the volume measurements varies according to the beans, so do it by weight. Bravi instructions are 225 mg; No more No less.)The smoke during roasting is part of the process. Putting the roaster under my kitchen hood handles that.  The most fun is having guests watch it happen. Most have never seen/heard (yes, you hear the bean cracking)coffee roasting. A conversation starter for sure! During the automatic cool down, the kitchen smells wonderful (the aromas seem to improve during cool-down). Then, get ready for a GREAT coffee experience. I set my digital roast level to 15, and get the right color for my taste. When grinding, I only grind enough for immediate use. Also, for some reason, the grounds of my home roasted beans seem to 'fluff up' about 20%, so I have to cut down the quantity of ground coffee I brew (usually I use 1.5-2 Tbs per cup) so the grounds don't expand beyond the filter (I use a drip machine). The dark rich brew and fresh taste from home roasting is unlike any other experience I've had with coffee. To help make sure your Bravi is ready to roast, you need to be sure you have cleaned up any beans and chaff from previous roastings. Clean the chaff collection pull-out dish to avoid smoke from burning. Also, brush off the surface under the bean collector bin. (If a bean is left under the bin, the Bravi may not sense it is closed and ready, and not start.)Great experience and I recommend the Bravi to anyone
NOT BAD. Great size towel however I wish they could have been a little thicke
Heavy, beautifully made, did I mention HEAVY?. All Le Creuset is beautiful--you can hang them on your pot rack & just ogle them, altho they are also great to use! This 6-3/4 Quart Oval French Oven weighs at least 14 lbs, & I think the weight & quality is obviously part of the appeal. But, if you have a "bad back", or are "downsizing" & packing to move, as I am, the weight can turn into a negative. Also, you should check around for price--I'm pretty sure Amazon had these at a much lower price a week or 2 ago, & there also good deals on the main online auction site. BTW, I have the Citrus Yellow, which is my favorite color
Black latter bookshelve. I have been looking for a ladder bookshelve for over a year and couldn't find any in person at a store that didn't look bulky or have way too high of a price tag. I wish I had ordered these sooner because they were exactly what I was looking for. They have a very low profile so they fit in my space nicely, yet they display a lot of items. The instructions said it would take 2 people to put together, but I was able to put it together myself with no problem (Think Ikea like connections). Overall it was the quality I expected and it looks exactly like it was pictured so I was very pleased. Delivery was quick and it came exactly when promised
Who Doesn't Love KitchenAid?!. First, I love KitchenAid--what a quality product!  Second, I love the color (yellow) of this blender and the easy clean-up.  There are no crevices for food to get in and around.  You wipe the button "pad" off and that is it.  (Whoever invented this feature deserves a gold medal!)  I love my KitchenAid blender so much my parents bought one too
Better than I had expected. This is better than what I had expected. Shelves are sturdier than what I thought they would be
A little extra effort, but well worth it. I have to start by saying I got a great deal on this machine.  I already wanted one and the Bodum store in Dallas was closing so I got it for 50% off along with a grinder and other Bodum goodies..  I have to agree with other reviewers issues with cleaning. It is a bit of a pain but I've found that a bottle cleaner with just a sponge tip--NO SCRUBBER-IT SCRATCHES--works just fine.  I put the funnel in the dishwasher about once a month.  I've found that the grounds will dry faster and be easier to clean out of the funnel when the coffee isn't piled on the filter before brewing.It's unfortunate that it's been discontinued but I'm happy I have one.
WMF Coffee Press. AAA+++ This press lives up to it's marketing description. My only concern is how to replace the glass insert. I tried a generic replacement, and although it fit okay, the pouring lip is narrower than the original and leaks at the edges. How do I get an original glass replacement
Popsicle Molds. I purchased this Ice Pop Maker Popsicle Mold for my five and seven year old great-grandchildren. I love the molds for the convenience. They love the popsicles. And, I use soy milk because of milk intolerance in one and juice with added calcium and vitamin D for the other child that will not drink milk.  This is an fun way to get better nutrients into them as they enjoy their treats.  Thanks, Jo
Good, basic coffeemaker. For those who want just a simple coffeemaker that makes a decent cup of coffee, this is a hard product to pass by.  The water filtration device is nice, but not necessary in my household, as I already have a filtration system installed, but a nice option anyways.The coffeemaker has a nice, reusable, easy-to-clean filter that I've had no problems with, and it brews in a reasonable amount of time.  The only change I'd make to it is add a timer
So far, so good. We've had the super toasty for about one month.  Very good for our needs.  Toasts very well, evenly and quickly.  Perfect small size for our counter.  Matches well with our black and chrome applicanes.No temperature setting is the only drawback.  But we don't miss that much.
Great product - love it. I got mine for Christmas in 2004 (older model) and I love it.  I have only used it to make 1 mug, so I'm not sure how it performs making 2.  I liked the mugs that came with it, and they fit easily in my car cup holder (I have a Toyota Celica).  I've since lost both mugs, but it wasn't hard finding replacements that fit under it.  The coffee is more than hot enough for me, I usually have to wait about 20-30 min for it to cool down enough (I am not one to order coffee extra hot at Starbucks).  I usually turn it on in the morning after getting ready, but before I am ready to walk out the door.  By the time I have fed the dog, gotten my things together, packed lunch, etc, I can pick up the mug and be ready to go. I have no idea how long it actually takes to brew, I'm always doing other things. On average, I'd say I use it about 5 times a week, and it still works great after 2+ years of continuous use
Best vacuum ever!. This is a wonderful little machine - extremely lightweight and easy to maneuver but with AMAZING suction power! It also has a feature to quickly and easily lessen that power with a quick flip of a small tab to easily vacuum blinds and curtains.  Lots of great attachments.  I absolutely love this little vacuum cleaner.  Plus the filter makes it easy to quickly empty and you don't have to mess with bags.  I love it!  I give it 2 thumbs up
Very good for knives. This holder for 12 knives does exactly what I want it to do. Safely transport very sharp knives back and forth to my church culinary chores without taking a chunk out of an unsuspecting colleague. I give it only four stars because it doesn't seem quite as good as some similar products I've seen on various Food Network documentaries, which seem to easily carry things which are a lot less flat than the average knife.But, if the price is right and carrying knives is what you want, get this product, it is especially good at being stiff, avoiding the risk of pushing a sharp tip out at you at an awkward moment
The Perfect Filter for my Honeywell QuietCare Humidifier. This is a genuine Honeywell filter designed to be used with the 11 gallon Honeywell QuietCare Humidifier (Model HCM-6013i). It's just perfect.The box reports that this filter is compatible with the following humidifiers:Honeywell series HCM-6000Holmes series HM3500 and HM3600Claims On Box:Removes Minerals and Pollutants from WaterHas Protec Microbial Treatment to help prevent the growth and migration of mold, fungus, algae and bacteria on filter.Helps capture dirt, dust and pollen.Reinforced for maximum efficiency and longer filter life.Exclusive Dry Lift Handle
Great replacement but be careful of the size. When I received it, it was half the size of my press!  Their 4 cup is actually 2 mugs.  If your press makes about 4 mugs of coffee, then you need the 8 cup replacement.  The 4 cup did fit in my press so I kept it and it works great
Great cooker, must have for life. I live very close to my office and cook every day. This guy helps me to quickly finish tough work with delicious taste. Before I have it, I had a really bad experience once when I forgot to reduce the scale of my electric stove for beef and it dried and smelled a lot. With this pressure cooker, every thing is simple and quick. I don't need to wait for several hours or left it without attention.I like it! and recommend to all my friends.
Excellent Grill Frying Pan. This frying pan allows you to grill almost like on a barbecue and with little oil or butter.  Cleanup is easy if you soak pan first and then hand wash since it is not recommended for the dishwasher.  I like this pan so much I bought one for all the ladies that cook in my family
Amazon hostess starter set. The starter set was great but the service from Amazon was even better. they handled the lost set with speed and great customer car
great value so far. I have only used these knives once so far, so I cannot speak to their durability, but I am impressed.  Some people may prefer some forged blades from another name brand, Henckels' premium line, but for the price, this set includes everything anyone would need to start a collection.If you are concerned about the handles being too slick, they are meaty enough to fill your hand and I have not had any trouble holding on.  Just be sure to keep them clean, honed, and sharp and they will melt through even the most stringy chicken breast
Powerful & QUIET!. I purchased this pump because it needs to be able to supply a lot of air through about 6ft. of tubing, the first 4ft of that being straight UP.This pump works wonderfully! Not only does it pump enough air to run a 3in bubble disk, and a 6in bubble wand, but it does so with so much power that I actually have my splitter set to only 3/4 power!And, as amazing as it may seem, it does all this - silently! I've used the big blue rounded pumps before, and they are silent for a while, but then get unbearably loud. I've been running this pump non-stop for months, and it hasn't increased in sound level at all. It's truly amazing.I have no problem recommending this pump to everyone, it's cheap for what it offers, and it offers a LOT
Cuisinart nylong fork - red. excellent product - red nylon forks are hard to find, this is exactly what I wanted, it matches my other utensils and it's wonderful to use.  Shipping was fast and product was perfect upon receipt.
This is my second one. Received the first one as a gift. When the handle broke I went looking for an identical skillet. My favorite of about 5 different electric skillets I have used. Cooks evenly and cleans easily
Kitchen Staple. I have had this Multi-Cooker for years, and I still love it.   I started out using it to steam clams and crab legs.   Then I went on to use it as a stock pot - it's great for quickly reducing to freezable size.  I recently have found a great hot wings sauce (Ken's) and have been using my true-blue multi-cooker as a fryer, and it is working out great.   I just love this thing.  It is easy to clean up.  It's light and easy to handle.   It heats up quickly and has had no technical problems.   I love being able to tell what temperature I am cooking on (can set degrees - not just high medium or low temps) and be able to see through the glass lid at how the contents are doing.  This is definitely a kitchen must-have.
I love my toaster.. It's fast, simple, easy to use, and makes great egg sandwiches for breakfast. What more needs to be said
Does The Job, for the size. I just received my oven today, one day after ordering, and used it to cook a dish for dinner.  It did a fine job and was surprised to find it so quiet.  Often these types of convection ovens can be noisy, not so in this case.  It also is a rather nice look machine and the company that sent me the oven was excellent.The reasons for not giving it 5 stars are that the inside is not as big as I would have liked, but it still is a fairly decent size.  I also think that the control panel is a pain to set up.  Not difficult, but I guess I am just used to using dials.  Overall a good oven and the company that sent was also excellent to deal with
great shears I've ever owned!. They are really very sharp compared to the last shears I've owned.  The color matches my kitchen motif and I can take them apart and use one side to open a package
Vornado 285 model. I purchased the vornado adjustable height variable speed model 285 from the vornado website for 80$. I like the fan .It does circulate the air when pointed to ceiling and makes the room cool. It is also kinda quite.It does make the air circulating sound but it not noisy but pleasant. The only thing my wife didnt like is the black color of the fan. they could make it in different colors. It doesnt have any remote controls or oscillation like the other fancy fans have. But overall we like the fan very much and it performs as mentioned and i would recommend buying it
Great spice rack!!!. After reading such great reviews, I decided to purchase this spice rack and I have not been disappointed.  It is very attractive, sleek and modern.  I also found that some of my standard shaker tops fit the bottles! This is GREAT because some of my mixed spices are too large to fit the standard shaker top that comes with the bottles.  I am very pleased!!!!  If you need a spice rack, this is the one
best deal on amazon. simply awesome. its better than the top of the line, which I have too. this was the mixer buy of a lifetime because of the free shipping,( everyone else wanted 70.00 shopping. if you can wait 10 days for free shipping and add something else small to get your order over 100.00 (it was 99.00 when I bought it anything over 100.00 was free shipping), there isnt a better mixer deal out there.its big sturdy and works just as well as a new one. no scratches. no imperfections . get more than one as a gift. now Im coffee maker shopping. any suggestions?  :
Pizza Blade. Very nice product to use for pizza, but I'm going to use mine to transfer wedding size cake pans from the oven to the cooling racks on my kitchen's island!  The large handle makes lifting the heavy pans much easier and safer than reaching way into the interior of a hot oven with your arms
Fabulous. I really enjoy using these tidbit trays. They are great when you just want to have one item on your tray.  They even work really well eating a bowl of cereal in bed.  I have a 7 month old baby and the trays work really well to set the baby food on while I feed her.  I feed her in the high chair and keep the tray of food on my lap.  It keeps eating time much much cleaner
Great humidifier- read directions. I have purchased my fair share of humidifiers and this is, by far, the best yet! Other reviewers have mentioned the filter indicator is always on, but if you read the directions...it states the humidifier has to be running for an hour before it can give you an accurate reading. I also have a table humidifier from the same company...the best! Let's face it, humidifiers are not perfect, but they keep me from getting sinus infections throughout the winter....I highly reccommend this item!!
3-piece child set. I got this set for my grandson for Thanksgiving dinner because he loves to use the type of silverware that grownups use.  He loved it.  He's just 19 months but he felt so special. Of course we had to watch him carefully since he is still very young. But he tends to eat at the table and doesnt play that much. The flatware was such it blended well with my daughter's flatware
High Quality Stainless Steel & Copper Pans. Revere Copper Clad Bottom, 10 pc Set, Stainless Steelis of the highest quality at an exceptional price...
Great use for our son's room. We purchased this heater back in October for our now 8 month old son's room to help take the chill off the air at night when he's sleeping.  We picked this one because it was silent (no fan) and had a temperature control with an on/off switch.  It works quite well even with the door slightly ajar at night.  After 3 months of use, the heater is starting to make little creaking noises, but is still working fine.The only down side to this heater is the metal surface gets really hot so we will have to be careful once he starts crawling and walking
You can't screw up coffee with this one... I received this as a gift from my sister.  First off, you must know that both my sister and I are "coffee snobs", meaning we really enjoy the taste of a good quality coffee.  Every previous coffee pot I have owned never made a good cup of coffee, and if it did, I don't know what formula was used to make it.  I tried every which way, adjusting bean amount, grind, etc, to no avail.  Coffee always had a bitter taste.The first pot I brewed in this one was absolutely perfect, and so was every one after that!  Excellent taste and quality.  I also found out that I can actually use a lot less coffee with this machine, and still get the strong, full bodied "Starbucks" flavor that I like.For those who complained about the temperature of the coffee, I have to agree to some extent.  On cold mornings, I must prime the coffeepot in order to produce a hot coffee.  That is only because of the hot coffee entering into a freezing cold metal pot!  It has nothing to do with the brewing process or temperature.  I also noticed someone actually commented that the heating element is barely warm to the touch.  That is because there IS NO HEATING ELEMENT!!!  The stainless pot is what retains the heat in the coffee.  Just make sure to prime your pot if you like it hot!All in all, this is a fantastic machine that brews a high quality cup of coffee
good lamp, a little heavy. I've been using the lamp most nights for the past two weeks.   The light is very good & covers both pages if one positiions it well, and the batteries are still going strong.   There is a little light spillage, but not so much that it bothers my mate.   The clip grabs the book cover well & works for both paperbacks & hardcovers.   An ounce or so lighter would be nice, but it's not really very heavy
Had1, ordered 5 more. My Mom and Dad gave me an AL DENTE PASTA MACHINE for Christmas several years ago. My 5 adult kids just love the noodles it makes so, this year I got them each one for Christmas. They were all very happy about them, AND they have all used them already,(guess I'll make cooks out of them yet). I love mine, use it a lot, easy & fun to use, makes the best home-made noodles ever! Cheryle M. Lansing, Mi
8" chef works well. Since I was planning to spend a few days in a commercial kitchen, and my 6" Henckels knives are both embarrassingly small for serious work and embarrassingly dull because I'm too lame to sharpen them, I decided to grab the 8" chef's knife (at Bed, Bath & Beyond, with a 20% off coupon.)It worked extremely well for all the tasks I set it to today, including mincing parsley and chiffonading mint as well as the usual cutting tasks.  Despite its shallow curve (I strongly prefer knives whose edges are mostly straight, rather than the curved French style) the blade rocked very well for mincing, and was flat enough to cut completely through the rolled mint leaves in one short stroke.  Furthermore, the sharpness impressed the other people who used it, though we shall have to see if it can be REsharpened to the same degree.The handle design is clearly not for everyone, but I found it very comfortable when I held the knife as many cooks do, with the back end of the blade pinched between thumb and forefinger(s).  In particular, most knife handles/bolsters seem to be designed for people who grip knives solely by their handles but the integrated bolster made it feel *right* to grip knife at the blade.  The handle *seems* to be just the right weight to balance the blade, but I'll reserve judgment on whether it actually IS that well-balanced until I've spent more than a few hours using it.I'm impressed enough with the 8" chef that I'm considering getting the block set, which includes the chef and a paring knife (I have no idea if the handle design will work well for that, though) as well as three other not-entirely-useless knives: 5.5" serrated, 6" utility, 5" santoku (which probably would have been great for the chiffonade.)   I must admit a 6" chef is probably marginally more useful than a 6" utility, but it's nice to have at least one knife you're willing to hand to your less skilled friends.  It also has a diamond hone, which will actually sharpen knives, not just align their edges (though I use a DMT diamond hone for sharpening.)I find this assortment considerably more useful than many others, which include things like boning knives, carvers and bread knives--all of which are IMO far too specialized to include in a basic knife kit, especially for home cooks.  The only shortcoming of the block set is the inclusion of laughably dubious kitchen scissors.   I hope that Calphalon will see fit to add to the line at least a 10" chef, and a 9-10" santoku, but most of the funkily ergonomic (or just funky) knife lines I've looked at don't have those, alas.I have no idea if I'll continue to like this knife as it enters daily use.  I hope that Amazon will let me revise my rating later if it turns out to be overly optimistic, but based on this one afternoon's use (and since they force me to rate it) I'll give it five stars.~ Kiran &lt;entropy@io.com
Very pretty crystal glasses. The pictures don't do justice to these glasses.  They are really very pretty, made in Germany, and etched crystal.  There are three separate etchings on each glass, a flower, bee, and butterfly.  I paid less than $16 for these glasses, with super saving shipping, because they were part of a 4 for 3 special being run by Amazon.  They are very much worth that price.  The only reason that they don't get five stars is that they are a little smaller than I thought they would be.  I intended for them to be used as water glasses, which they can be, but they just could have been a little bigger
BUY THIS ONE! Powerful and Deluxe.Best price on Amazon. The Dirt Devil 083414 Extreme Power Stick (cordless) Vacuum really performs! I did 1200 square feet and it was still going strong. Bigger collection cup than others, and this Dirt Devil goes easily from the bare floor to the area rugs, or carpet, without a hitch. I have a lot of tile with area rugs and some carpet. Every other vacuum I have had sucked up the area rugs and had to be lifted onto them and avoid the edges. This vacuum just rolls right on and cleans them corner to corner! I leave the brush on all the time since we have 2 large hairy dogs. The hair does not build up in the brush because suction is strong enough to pull it thru. Small footprint, stores on charging base, lightweight and easy to assemble and use. It has dual filters so there is absolutely NO EMISSION smell and the outside filter that protects the inside filter is very easy to clean, then all snaps right back in place. The best stick vacuum out there.
Great Popper. I think the Stir Crazy popper is great. The only reason I didn't give the item 5 stars is that the base cannot be washed in the dishwasher. It would be nice if you could remove the cooking surface and put it in the dishwasher
great product!. I was surprised by what poor reviews most of the crock pots received on amazon.com, but I decided to buy this little one when I saw it at Target for $9.99.  Figured even if it didn't work well, that's not much money to lose!  Well, this is my first crock pot and I love it.  I'm glad there's one this small.  I usually fill it only half way and then have leftovers, but it could probably feed a family of four without leftovers. A lot of reviews for other crock pots said that the lids often fit poorly, but the lid on mine is perfect.  I've used it seven times so far and everything has been wonderful!  I particularly like the applesauce recipe that comes with the crock pot, it makes the best applesauce ever and it's nice to just peel them the night before and wake up to hot applesauce (also good over ice cream).  Keep in mind that the crock pot only has the low heat setting, but I haven't had any trouble cooking recipes that call for the high setting in here.  Just takes a bit longer.  Also, it's not tough at all to convert recipes for larger crocks to fit this one.  Mine doesn't have any problem with cooking to hot, maybe it was just the other reviewer's crock pot.  I would recommend this to anyone, it's well worth the money
professional saladshooter. Great product, easy to clean.  We purchased this mainly for grating cheese, much cheaper to buy a block of cheese also many more varieties to choose from. will be great for many things though!
Love this appliance!. Nice space saving design.  Toaster toasts BETTER than any regular toaster I have owned recently.  Looks smart, too.
Best One Out There. I can't say I've literally tried or tested every counter-top buffet range there is, but this one's construction is clearly superior to all competitor's products.  I hesitated - Broil King?  Who are they? - sounds like some cheap, discount store brand, but I bought due to the all-steel construction because all the others, made largely out of plastic, seemed seriously cheesy to me.  This unit is genuinely solidly built out of all metal, nicely chrome plated with nice quality controls.  It works well to boot - like a good quality stove-top.  You really get a full range heat control.  I use mine at holiday time when my gas range is suffering from no vacancy.  This will gently warm things without burning when set at low - a true test of the quality of the unit.  Cheaper units "look" like they have full range controls but in fact, you get off and screech.  Thanksgiving can be ruined if your mashed potatoes "warming" on your extra burner burst into flames because the "low" setting was mostly wishful thinking on the manufacturer's part.  An excellent unit - a bit of an investment, but definitely worthwhile. I only use it twice a year, but will never regret it
Beautiful. We purchased the stainless steel version of this flatware when we got married 16 years ago.  It has held up so well, that I just purchased ten more place settings (the Friday only sale) to use for entertaining.  Our older set still looks new even though we have used it every day.  This flatware is heavy and really nice to hold, (the handles are not so heavy or thick that they are hard to hold or to eat from).  The super simple design works and looks beautiful with any table setting design from casual and contemporary to completely elegant for special occasions.
Very Happy With Purchase. These mortar and pestles are used mainly for crushing perscription medicines. They work very well for this purpose and are great for traveling, since they are light weight. An excellent product
Good price. I priced the exact same item at our local "big box" pet store, and saved about $25 ordering online (including shipping)
Excellent light weight pitcher. This pitcher is the perfect size for entertaining. It makes a lovely appearance and is light weight. I had one in crystal and this is much better. Additionally it's a breeze to clean. 5 stars all around. Appearance, weight, capacity, ease of cleaning, and price!
A Pleasant Surprise. First tea infuser I've used that is the correct depth and width.  In an age with so many ill-designed, poorly made, and cheap items on the market, it's a pleasant surprise to purchase a product that works so well.  A must-have for any serious tea drinker.IMHO the best cup of tea is infused in an iron teapot with a stainless steel strainer (I prefer Iwachu, made in Morioka Prefecture, Japan), from filtered or spring water heated in copper teakettle (I prefer Simplex, copper with pure tin liner, made by hand in Birmingham England); but, if you're making only one cup of tea, the Bodum Yo Yo is the best option
As Advertised. We purchased this item mainly as a copper accent for the kitchen, but have come to find it quite handy as well as decorative.  The size was just what we were looking for.  Very nice quality. This pairs very well with copper salt and pepper shakers we bought at the same time, and they look great on the kitchen workcenter.
It's a Cast Iron Grille Pan. Well, it's a cast iron grille pan. What else can I say about it?Like all cast iron pans, it's quite heavy, but it will also last for a lifetime(or more). It is also non-stick, providing that it is cleaned and cared for appropriately(there are appropriate seasoning instructions that come with the pan).Since cast iron is able to reach higher temperatures than non-stick cookware, it makes it a great choice to cook meat when cooking outside is not an option, just make sure to heat the pan for three or four minutes before using it.If you're unfamiliar with cast iron cookware, follow the instructions that come with it and you'll enjoy a great pan for life. Just remember that it doesn't go into the dishwasher
Grandma had one... ...and now, so do I. It's fun for making milkshakes quickly and does blend quite evenly if you manually do the up n' down with the drink cup. Very easy to clean up after use.For as frequently as I use it, it's mostly a nice-looking decoration, so I can't personally testify to its effectiveness as a daily-use appliance. But I do like it for its nostalgic appearance and has, thus far, worked like a dream when I wanted it to over the course of two years
Handy-dandy tote. Holds Champagne bottles too. Stores flat. Nice workmanship. Great for trips. XLT value
Great design, beautifully uniform scoops. After too many bent spoons to count, we broke down and bought this scoop. Its engineering has exceeded my expectations on a couple of fronts:First, the scoop itself has very thin (but strong) edges that slice easily into even hard ice creams with less effort than other scoops I've tried.Second, the shape of the scoop does indeed produce beautifully round spheres of your favorite frozen dessert...ideal for anyone who values presentation and function
Functional and stylish canister. This is my fourth purchase of this canister.  They look great and do everything that a canister should do
my wedding. I just wanted to tell anyone who is thinking of getting this item that it is worth the money. I was married august of 2000 and this toper just made my cake. threw all the moving this piece has been treasured by me and conztntly reminds me of how much I love my husband
You Get What You Pay For!. After spending a week reading reviews and looking at toasters. I decided on the KithcenAid KMTT400SS.  The reasons for my decision;1 Top brand name.  (We own a Kithchen Aid Table Mixer and Dishwasher)2 Very good reviews.3 Quality you can see and feel.  Fit, finish and materials are top notch.4 Extreamly even toasting results.5 Relatively quick toasting.6 Very wide slots.7 Bagel and warming functions.8 Body of toaster remains cool to touch.I'm am very happy with our choice.  If you're looking for quality you won't go wrong.  You can buy a cheaper toaster, but in my opinion not not a better one
Good space heater. The heater is quite good. My only complaint is that there is no real temperature control. It has an ON-OFF control. Whenever it is ON, it blasts the full heat. The ON period can be controlled (probably also the fan speed), nothing else. However, for its price, it is a good piece
The Best Yogurt Starter!. I had purchased the Euro Cuisine Yogurt Maker about a year ago, then just recently noticed that Euro Cuisine came out with their own brand of starter. I have to say, that using the starter made the yogurt making process so much better, because the ingredients they use in the culture is so healthy and it makes the yogurt so much more delicious. I already fell in love with the Euro Cuisine Yogurt maker, now I have fallen in love with their starter as well
My first "real" dishes. For my 2nd apartment I decided to get real dishes instead of the hodge-podge I had from dorms and thrift stores. I could not be happier w/these dishes. The price was reasonable and they are incredibly durable.  I really like the plum-it's a rich purple and it was easy to match it to other fiestaware.  I liked the color so much I got the mugs and 2 other kinds of bowls to match the dishes. It was a great deal and it will be easy to add to my kitchen set.
Great for diet shakes. I bought two Blend-N-Go cups so my husband and I could make smoothies, and they worked great the one time we did it.  Then we gave up real food and went on a liquid diet, where you mix flavored powder with water.  The Blend-N-Go Cup is terrific for this.  We blend the powder with water and a few ice cubes, and it makes the drink thick and frothy like a milkshake, which tastes much better.  Also, there are different shake formulas for men and women, so I can't just make up one batch for both of us.  The Blend-N-Go makes it quick and easy to make two different drinks at once (but only if you buy two of them).
Very pleased. I love this pattern and this butter dish is no exception.  It washes very easily in the dishwasher and is a nice addition to my growing collection of this pattern
Better than Prescription. My golden retriever has had ear infections since she was 8 weeks old.  Over the years we have tried allergy shots, dietary changes, and prescription ointments - all costing a fortune.  We tried Zymox and it is absolutely fantastic.  Her ear infections clear within a few days of treatment.  The itching and head shaking stop immediately after application, and if I treat her ears once or twice a week after an infection clears, I can keep her clear.  This stuff is great and at 1/2 the price of prescription and no vet charges, I'm happy to keep it on hand
Henckels vs. Wusthof. I'm sure by now, you're confused by which brand you should choose... is it the Henckels or the Wusthof Santoku?  If that isn't your dilemma, skip on down to the next reviewer.  I just got the Santoku for a steal of a price... and that is why i went for this over the Wusthof which goes for $5 more (Classic hollow-edge).  I was looking at the Wusthof for over a month and was completely impressed w/ the feel and balance.  I think the Henckels still comes in just below the Wusthof.  There are hundreds of other knife manufacturers in Solingen, Germany... it's only that Henckels spent tons of money on global marketing.  Back to the knife... once i got home, I quickly dug for a carrot (tougher to chop) and a cucumber.  I tried to chop the carrot like i was banging on a drum... and it chopped fine.  As far as the traditional, knuckles out cutting technique, it worked fine.  My only advice for you is to definitely try out both knives and look for the most comfortable.  You'll notice that one may have a heavy-heel/light-handle feel to it(vice versa)... it is ALL PREFERENCE.  I actually got kind of tired chopping the carrots b/c theAlso keep in mind... the hollow edges on the knife really don't make a difference.  If anything, it's an aesthetical bonus.  So try out the non-hollow edged ones... it may be a few $$$'s cheaper.  Also keep in mind, the difference between the Pro 'S', &quot;4-Star&quot; and &quot;5-Star&quot; knives are the handles.  I didn't like the &quot;5-Star&quot; knives b/c of the ergonomic handle.  Anyone can tell you that you're not supposed to wrap your hands around the whole handle.  Instead you should be using your thumb and index to grip the finger guard/bolster.  So thus, the Pro 'S' is a good pick, but I'm still going to give the 5-star rating to the Wusthof Classic 7&quot; Santoku
Fast, User Friendly. Works just fine for my needs ... I use it to press my 'wrinkle-free' Dockers. The water container for the steam is a bit awkward to fill . . . but once it is filled it lasts a good long time.  Heavy duty, well-constructed , dependable unit.  First package 'disappeared' at UPS.  When they shipped the first machine, it was evidently damaged and returned back to Amazon by UPS. (probably due to the thin cardboard used for packing)  The replacement shipment arrived just fine, and, as always Amazon customer service very helpful on shipping replacement while first package was still 'lost'
Fully taste the great wine you paid for. If you're going to spend money on good wine, don't put it in cheap glassware - you'll be throwing your money away! What a reviewer below referred to as the "odd/ugly angular bend" is exactly what enables these glasses to bring out the full flavor of the wine. Do you just want your table to look "pretty" or do you want the food and drink to taste fabulous? If you want the latter, shove aside some of those Martha Stewart table decorations to make room for these glasses and enhance your fine wines
Excellent choice!. I would recommend this knife set to anyone...the quality is great, the look is great, and these things are very sharp.  Nothing bad to say about them
Great for a gift and pets. I saw these in stores last year and added to my cart last week with the free giveaway.  I have to say this has turned out to be a great toy for my dog!  Probably not what it was intended for, but she loves it!  Thanks for the free gift
Great Invention. It does leave the egg a little soggy but all you have to do is drain the water off before putting on your sandwich. The only other problem I jhave with it is that the egg sticks the the pan its in. Even pam dosen't help much. The sadwiches are delicious and it only takes about 10 min. or less. I highly recommend the product
Love this unit. This lives up to it's great reviews.  It is beautiful and works fantastically and matches very nicely with my decor.  Highly recommended.  (It will scratch easily though, so be careful.
Nice mop pads. I purchased these to use with my Steamfast mop. They are machine washable and fit fine even after being thrown in the dryer. Perhaps the Steamfast head is slightly smaller than the Bissell...I don't know about that but they fit well on it. They are sturdy and well made.
Anti-bark dog collar. This is a great product. We have a toy beagle who barks in the car at people, kids, bikes, dogs and pretty much anything. We use the collar on him maybe 2 times and now he hardly ever barks in the car. We still use the collar once in awhile. We are going to now try it when we walk him and take him to the beach. So far we like it a lot
SO PLEASED. I came looking for another set.  They are heavy but elegant.  The best part is the design of the bottom.  Water drains cleanly from the glasses and they come out sparkling
great filters. The filters are replacement parts for those that came with the deep fryer when newly purchased.  They work as advertised
Great pet gate!. Received the gates on time- easy to put together, decorative- only 12" high- lovely accent- exactly what I needed
Awesome Coffee Maker. This thing is great... I've had it for about a year and no problems. Refurbished products are worth it (I got this one for half price). Very easy to use -- just put in a filter and drop in a tablespoon for each cup you plan to make, fill up the pot itself with the number of cups (see lines), and pour into the back and press on.Good ish.
Furi Rachel Ray Knife Set. These knives are well balanced and very sharp. Slicing through celery, onion, peppers is a breeze. I have arthirtis and many knives are difficult to use.
Small but powerful. We have been using this heater for over a month now, it is a powerful little heater. I wanted to get a ceramic heater because I read they are  the safest space heaters you can buy. This is important because you here a lot of horror stories of space heaters causing fires. The heater has three settings low, high and auto(ranging from 900-1500 watts of electrical power). On the low setting the heater puts out 900 watts. We usually use it on auto where you set the handy digital thermostat to a set temp. and the unit maintains that temperature, you can either set it on the unit or by using the handy included remote control. I was surprised to see how well this unit heats about a 220 square foot space. I would recommend this unit with confidence, my only issue with the unit is do not expect it to save you money over other space heaters i.e. oil filled electric radiators. My electric bill seems to have gone up using this heater over a previous oil filled electric unit by the same manufacturer. I will say, that this unit does heat the room much better then the previous unit, largely due to the fan dispersing the heat
Fantastic!. Having grown up with an old-school pressure cooker (tic-tic-tic), I was a little reluctant to make the switch to this new-fangled gadget. However, I was hooked after the first few quick and easy meals that I wouldn't have tried in the old one. In a word: BEANS. The foaming problem that can make such a mess in the old models is almost perfectly solved by the new pressure release system. Once it comes up to pressure, you can reduce the heat and keep everything going without spurting steam all over the place. The little yellow button stays up - you know when the cooker is pressurized and can adjust the heat to keep things moving along. Works like a charm
Great bowls. These bowls have been in my home for a few years now.  We have used them for cereal in the morning for warming up food in the microwave.  They are nice looking and very functional.  When we needed another bowl when one broke, we knew we would get another fiestaware bowl
A+ Seller. Item arrived just as described.  No problems at all.  Very nice transaction
I've used better but this is good. For the price, this is good for spot cleaning crumbs and small areas.  Obviously, it cannot replace a vacuum.  It does come apart a little too easy, but this happens when my sons use it
Excellent Product!. I am sure GLAD that I purchased one of these....it really comes in handy for alot of various cooking chores.... I especially enjoy Roasting Chickens with it
Works fine 7 fins total not 9 but I am satisfied with it. OK, first of all I am very satisfied with the TRR0715. It is silent and heats the room well even on the 750 watt setting.Unlike the picture , the unit I received has 5 middle fins and 2 end fins for a total of 7. I don't know if they changed the model or used the wrong picture but I am satisfied with what I got and mention it because it seems to be a big issue
Perhaps the Best Decision I have made. I researched and researched semi-automatic and automatic machines until I was so thoroughly confused that I had no idea which way to go. Alicia at Whole Latte Love steered me towards the S7 after answering many of my questions and thankfully she was very knowledgeable and listened to my needs.  The S7 is a great machine, makes near perfect espresso (I don't call anything perfect), and has no learning curve whatsoever.If you can follow directions and learn what 8 buttons mean then you can make perfect lattes, espressos, americanos, and cremas too.  Clean up is a breeze which was another one of my big concerns.  The speed of the machine is unbelievable as well.  With two boilers there is no waiting at all and 96 oz of on board water means you can make a lot of drinks between re-fillsI just can't say enough positive things about this machine but from the control you have over the mixture of water and "powder" (coffee) to the water temperature to the ease with which it works to the amount of time you get to spend enjoying your drinks vs. working on the machine; this machine is the best. I have tried cheaper machines to no avail if you are considering this whether it is your first or your last consider the S7 very seriously
Pretty Good for the Price. I'm pretty happy with this product, though I've only had it for 2 weeks so I cannot comment on the longevity. It was the lowest priced rug to rug pad I found. There is some very small movement on my high traffic rugs, but it is very small, just enough to let some of the pad peek out, there was no bunching at all. The regular traffic rugs haven't moved a bit.
Fagor Splendid 6-Quart Pressure Cooker. Recieved in great conditon. Have enjoyed using it for soups
A GODSEND FOR A HOUSEHOLD ENGINEER... Okay, so I researched products and prices for the last six weeks, searching for what I eventually discovered was THIS little beauty!  I have COPD, and am not strong, and I have a kennel of ten dogs and live rurally with all that dust.  It is imperative that my house be dirt and dust free.  I needed this to go over the kitchen floor twice a day, to pick up any hair, dust, dog toenails, whatever...IT IS MAGNIFICENT!  Hey, it's not my Oreck, but I found that I couldn't use the Oreck on the vinyl flooring, because it was causing static electricity, and the short hair would stick to the floor and not come up.  THE PRODUCT GOT IT UP, it is VERY LIGHTWEIGHT, and did a marvelous job.  WHAT A GREAT BUY!  Amazon carried it cheapest, via Allergy Be Gone  :)One drawback:  16' cord.  A 20' cord would be so much better, but I will manage  :
O.K. Product shipped in timely fashion. I knew what the product would be and am happy with it
Amazing cookware. I received a few all clad products (the paella pan, sauce pan, and a fry pan) for graduation and they are excellent.  Despite not being teflon, food doesn't seem to stick and clean up is easy.  The handles don't get hot even though they're metal too (they do get a little warmish, so be careful just in case).  I'm not sure if I'm supposed to or not, but I put them in the dishwasher and haven't had any problems.  This specific pan is great for items like pasta w/ cheese and veggies.  I love that it has a cover.  The only drawback is the price
Works great. Yes, like the other reviewers say, it works just as you'd want it to work. I do have a few nits to pick (and hence the four stars) that I don't recall anyone else mentioning:- The cord is really short. I suppose it's designed that way so it can be stored in the base, but it only extends 29" from the base. May or may not be a problem for you depending on where your outlets are.- The temperature adjustment knob feels really cheap. A friend of mine said it feels like it isn't attached to anything. I agree, but in fact it is. I just hope it's more durable than it feels.- Unlike the Waring Pro WMK300, this has no spill tray. The plastic base is just bowl-shaped to contain spills and crumbs. I didn't really have any spills, but a removable tray would be nicer (if not as attractive).- Made in China. Not that I'm opposed to China getting my money, but until China does more to protect its workers and environment I prefer my money go to countries that do better on those fronts. Just my $0.02.The description is incorrect. The waffles are 6.5" across the top and 7" across the middle.My favorite topping so far is sliced frozen strawberries (thawed, of course) and fresh real whipped cream.elena lisa:I followed the instructions to apply oil with a pastry brush and never had a stuck waffle. Personally, I hate aerosol cooking sprays. They work, but:- It's impossible to confine the fine mist they produce to the cooking surface and I rarely want to oil my stove or counter top.- According to Calphalon they use a propellant that can make cookware harder to clean.I can't confirm the latter but I know that they get an oil film on things I don't want oiled
Great Pillows  for Kids. Loved this pillow.  it is a lot of  fun
Awesome!. I bought this for work so I could eat non-microwaved food for once. It works as intended and very handy. I might buy one for home.
THE BEST!. i've used it for a year now and i cannot buy a cappuccino at starbucks or any other mediocre place now. The espresso in my home is the best you can get outside of Italy. We are even buying a second one for our summer house!!!
Good product. My husband loved European coffee and this has allowed him to brew very fresh European style coffee.  The larger press is used when he is at home, and the smaller when he is on the go. They have been proven WELL worth the cost!  (Which is a GREAT deal!!
Excellent cookware. Prior to receiving this saucier pan for Christmas, I had only associated KitchenAid with appliances. I am highly impressed with the quality of this cookware. The saucier is solid and heavy--food heats evenly and the pan  doesn't warp on your stove when using high heats. I use this pan as often  as possible and am now considering replacing my current set of pots and  pans with the entire KitchenAid set. Highly recommended
Doesn't fit perfectly in 18150, but works. The filter model I have, 18150, requires two of these with no foam spacers.  Two of these were less expesnive than the single larger filter I purchased once previously.  However, I'd say that two small ones are about a quarter inch too tall, maybe slightly less.  The cover still goes on, but not as far down as it should.As for filtering, I estimate that it filters the same as the previous.  The "permanence" of this filter makes me wonder why I've been replacing the previous style, since I can see no difference in the filter material
excellent knife for home cooks with small/medium hands. I received this knife recently as a wedding gift and I have been very pleased with its performance.Note, however, that while the edge as shipped is sharp enough to slice through onions and scallions completely, it isn't sharp enough to slice through office paper dropped from mid-air--the kind of edge that many knife enthusiasts look for--so sharpening is recommended.The Gourmet line is the lowest end of the Wusthof line that is manufactured in Germany (the Silverpoint line is made elsewhere). While Wusthof literature says that this knife is made from the same steel as their higher-end knives, the Gourmet line is made from stamped steel as opposed to forged steel.As for the knife itself, the blade tapers from the handle to the tip. The knife has good heft and its rivets are flush against the handle. There is no bolster or finger guard--a plus factor, in my opinion, because it makes proper sharpening of the edge easier. It also allows me to use the entire edge when I am slicing larger pieces of meat.On the other hand, I docked a star because the tang (the part of the blade that goes through the handle) does not go all the way--it is only a 3/4 tang (top and half of the rear of the handle only). I do not think that this factor affects the performance of the knife very significantly, but one gets a full tang from the comparable knife in the Gourmet line of Henckels for a slightly lower price.Nevertheless, it is a great value for a higher-end knife. I highly recommend it
light duty, but gets the job done. I bought this stockpot because I'd started making my own soup at home. I was hoping to get a pot that was a little more heavy duty, because this one is a bit thin. However, I used it anyway, and in true Farberware form, this pot came through for me. So, aside from being lightweight, this one does its job. Plus, a great price, too
Excellent constuction. I've bought several similar to this design but none compare to this one.Extemely pleased with this purchase and the price
Strong magnet!. This is an excellent storage bar and compares to the more expensive ones we have.  We have put knives and stainless steel utensils on it and it holds everything strongly!  I recommend this to anyone looking for a good deal
great deal microwave for reasonable price. I bought this microwave after returning a brand new, more expensive microwave that didn't work the minute I was trying to use it. Satisfied with this one, basic but does all a microwave is supposed to do. Great price too
Great Product. This product worked as well as expected and the vendor was easy to deal with.  The product shipped on time
No more leaks!. My last two shipments have come with a plastic sheet lining the bottom of the cartridge, which totally prevents any leaks at all. Before, the bottom of the cartridge would get a little soggy from unabsorbed cat pee, but now the box stays completely intact and dry. What was already a great product even with the leaking has gotten even better
It's hard being green. Although the dishes are not as green as I anticipated, they are lovely.  I ordered a "natural" set (for a mix & match look) from a catalogue store and they were not any nicer, although they were considerably more expensive, so now I am ordering a "natural" set of these.  I agree with one of the other reviewers that the antiquing is not as subtle as I would like but it's good enough for the price.  I love them!
Very Good. I was very pleased with how quickly I received the stroller. It was package well. It took a couple of minutes to assemble and it was ready to go. Plus it was affordable, very sturdy, easy to manuver, and get down stair. It is such a blessing to have one of these. My Westie is a bit overwieght (28lbs) and he loves it. He has room to stretch out, sit up. I can see him at all times because of the mesh veiwer.  I can take him on the train, in stores, where ever I want, because he's secured and enclosed. I get alot of compliments and some strange looks because it looks just like a baby stroller, even better than some of them I was told. ****The only thing I would say bad about it is that the mesh cover has a toxic smell to it....BUT once I took it outside a couple of times it did air out, and the smell is gone. ****Also to make it more comfortable I did place a cusion lining inside. Otherwise I thought it was great, I highly recommend it for anyone who wants to travel with pets, have older pets, don't own a car and would like an easier way to take your pet to vet visits, parks, or where ever
All that I expected and more at the great price. Great little gadget for heating water. I don't have to monitor it since it has an auto off. The water is steaming hot, great for a tea drinker like me. Great price too!I bought this for traveling and heating water in hotel rooms. I have been using it at home so far. I am going to give it a spin (travel) this thanksgiving. Unbeatable, for the $10 I paid for it.
THE CUTEST AND BEST PILLOW. This is a great gift because there fun,cute,and usefull so when you come home from a bad day at school or work there alaways there.To me there like a special friend that you can cuddle.So for kids and adults this is a must have
Solid Performance; Excellent Value. This is a terrific machine.  Amazon's price beat everyone, especially with their 20% promotional discount, no sales tax and no shipping charges.  The oversized feed tube makes pre-processor preparation much simpler as I don't have to try to "fit" my ingredients into a narrow tube.  Clean-up is great since everything goes in the dishwasher except the fully-sealed motor/base which wipes down easily and has no crevices to trap any misses/messes.  It's quiet and efficient.  I only wish that there were more outlets (hear me Amazon?) that sold the accessory discs and blades that fit this processor so there would be some competition to drive the price of these items to a more reasonable level.  Overall, I am highly satisfied and happy I spent a little more and got the best
Fantastic Feel at a Fantastic Price!. I received a set of these for Christmas (I'd asked for thick white towels) and was very pleased with their thickness, absorbability and feel. We've used them daily for nearly a month now, with twice-weekly washings in hot/warm and a full cycle in the dryer at high temps. They've remained fluffy, in excellent condition, and simply wonderful. Stepping out of the bath and wrapping up in one of the bathtowels makes me feel like I'm in a spa, and the oversized washcloths and hand towels feel pricey. I'm ordering another set for our upstairs bathroom
Wonderful gadget for the coffee buff. Warning! Roasting coffee produces smoke!  Definitely read up on the process thoroughly before buying.  The first batch I made with this machine I over roasted due to my ignorance.  It was darker than a French roast and had little body or flavor and smoked the house up.  After reading some more I adjusted the program and kept a closer eye on it and roasted an amazing Sumatran coffee with FAR less smoke.  I am drinking a cup of said batch right now and it is wonderfully clean and delightful.  One newbie to newbie note; coffee roasting is not a "set it and forget it" kind of process.  This is more or less like cooking.  It requires your attention or every smoke alarm in the house will be going off; no, seriously!  It does have a safety feature so that it will not run longer than 15 min and will shut off if it overheats, so fire risk is minuscule even for the most scatter brained of us.  Check out this website for details on the roasting process to get a feel if it is right for you.  [...] Sweet Maria's also has an amazing assortment of green beans of very high quality from what I can tell.  The machine does come with a vent pipe adapter if any smoke in the house bothers you.  If you have a hood that vents to the outside then smoke is a non issue.  A full city roast produces about the same amount of smoke as a cigarette, obliviously without the nasty cig smell.  It's kind of funny because the green beans don't smell particularly good nor does the roasting process.  Not bad but not good.  Yet the finished product is so, so good!  Now that you know it produces smoke ... this machine works great and produces a very even roast.  It has a commercial grade motor which is about as loud as a vacuum cleaner, certainly not enough to wake the neighbors.  The programming functionality is great and I look forward to tweaking it for that perfect roast.  The user interface could definitely be improved and is a bit cumbersome, but I did not find it to be very difficult to program at all.  Also the LCD screen is kind of cheap and angled poorly so you basically got to flip it on its side under good light to program it.  However this is one of only a few programmable machines on the market, the only one for this price.  It roasts around 6oz which is quite a bit unless you drink two pots a day.  ...  pauses to take a sip of smashingly good coffee ...  If you are a coffee buff who leans toward the creative side you will probably like this machine.  I give it 4 stars because wholesale electronic parts are cheap and they could have put better LCD screen on it and angled it so you can read it standing up.  Other than that this thing rocks
Great Quality, Great Size!. My wife and I have long been fans of Fiestaware and we have been using many of their pieces for years. Somehow it wasn't until about 2 years ago that we discovered this size. At 9" the lunch plate is perfect for many occasions - especially lunch! (smile)The quality of these plates is very good and this size is very uselul. For some reason these are seldom seen as part of a standard set. We use ours all the time...Highly Recommended!
Uniquely Useful Little Crockpot -- consider its possibilities!. This is a lovely little crockpot whose small size makes it uniquely useful for a number of purposes. I've owned larger crockpots for a couple decades (currently a 6 quart Rival Smartcooker is my mainstay for preparing family-size meals), but the larger pots take up a significant amount of counter space & aren't at all useful for heating or re-heating small quantities. This little crockpot, however, is perfect for heating or re-heating 2-4 servings of soup or stew. I originally bought it, however, because it is *absolutely perfect* for making hot cereal on cold mornings, especially those hot cereals that require more than a few minutes of cooking in the microwave or on the stovetop, such as steel-cut oatmeal (try the nutty goodness of traditional steel-cut oatmeal once (also available here at Amazon) & you're unlikely ever to return to instant or "quick cook" oatmeal again). There is nothing nicer on a cold winter morning than walking into the kitchen & knowing that a healthy, delicious hot breakfast is awaiting you. From mid-October to late-March, virtually every night I prepare my entire family's hot breakfast cereal for the next morning in this little crockpot, with no more effort than is required to make single serving of instant oatmeal or cream of wheat in the microwave.Other uses we've discovered: it's perfect for making & serving hot mulled cider; keeping hot dips, gravies & warm sauces & syrups heated on the buffet; as a substitute fondue pot; & for heating soup at times when hovering over a stovetop or near a microwave would be incovenient (how nice to come inside from raking leaves or shoveling snow to a hot bowl of soup!). For single people or couples who prefer not to cook in large quantities or apartment dwellers with limited storage space, this crockpot would be a very acceptable slow cooker, especially if used in conjunction with Rival's inexpensive SP100-PDQ Smart-Part Module (also sold on Amazon as of the date of this review), which provides the same timed-cooking controls that are integrated with many of Rival's larger, more expensive crockpots.The energy used is minimal, too -- only 80 watts -- & the stoneware bowl fits easily in the dishwasher, as does the lid, for very convenient clean-up
The BEST Cervical roll-- for me, at least. As a physical therapist who suffers from neck pain, this is the ONLY pillow that I can use without waking up to having cervical muscle spasms in the mornings. This pillow is great for people who do not have the normal curvature of the cervical spine a.k.a.-- straight necks (cervical arthritis etc).I bought one 3 years ago at CVS & have been looking for a year now for a replacement since mine cannot support my neck very well anymore.  It has been a week that I have been waking up to neck spasms & I am delighted to find that it is here at Amazon.  It was here all along, I just have been typing in the wrong name-- cervical pillow, cervical roll, neck roll etc....  I am happy that I remembered what my 5 year old son called it-- BONE, typed it, and boy was he right.
Great, durable dinnerware!. I have a "thing" for red dinnerware and have owned many different styles/brands, including Emerilware, Waechtersbach Fun Factory and Emile Henry Couleurs.  The Emile Henry doesn't chip or scratch and is SO durable!  We have 7 children who aren't the kindest to my beloved red dishes and these really stand the test more than any other brand that we've tried.  HIGHLY recommended!
Best Wedding Present. My husband and I recieved this as a wedding shower gift.  We use it all the time.  It is a great thing to have for entertaining - we've had it for two years now and it works great.  We get many compliments on it and will be giving it for gifts in the future
Does what it should. No complaints from us, we love this crock. Sometimes the butter slides out, but not a product issue or a big deal. It has happened with all the ones we've had. This one is a great size for table service
The best cat collar ever. It's thin, it's adjustable, and it's great.  My cats love the collar!  It's thin and doesn't leave a matted ring around their necks.  And because of the thin design, it's not obvious, so the "bling" they wear on their collar takes center stage.  I have all the colors and look forward to more colors being available soon
Good but expensive. Apparently 3rd in the hierarchy of 4 models in the new S5 series of Miele vacuum cleaners, the features, price, and accessories are not exactly linear in transition from lower to higher models, nor even across series.  Many of the older series models have more features and a higher price than the newer ones.  They have fancy names like Capricorn, Red Velvet, and Champagne, leading to much confusion and forcing you to compare each one similar to buying a car.  If your browser has tabbed browsing (e.g., Firefox), the best way to figure out which model is best for you is to go to Miele's website and open a tab for each model you're interested in.  Flip back and forth to see what text changes.  Callisto is the cheapest no frills model of the newest series (newest technology motor?) that still comes with an electronically powered brush (the 4th Pisces model is turbo).After 3 months of extensive use:Pros:Agility - The 10 " wide SEB217-3 electric powerbrush comes standard, and one of the reasons I chose this model.  For me, smaller is better.  While other vacuums advertise large 13" power brushes to cover more area in a single swipe, I don't have much open carpet space.  Coffee tables, chairs, weight benches, and computers, all need vacuuming around and under.  The powerbrush swivels well to get around corners.Brush duster - The most commonly used attachment (for me), the brush duster is also small (slightly larger in diameter than the hose) and the bristles are durable.  It's angled by default, but even this plastic piece swivels to straighten out.  This is not mentioned anywhere; you just have to figure this out for yourself.  On low power, I was able to vacuum places that never got vacuumed before, like over the spider web of computer cables and telephone wires.  I even vacuumed the telephone itself and other dust collecting objects on my desk.Parquet floor brush - Initially, I wondered why Miele would include this accessory when the powerbrush was included, but this "wider brush duster" actually does a better job on hard tiled floors than the powerbrush.  The powerbrush seems more designed to churn up stuff from carpets, but the paraquet brush gathers and collects dust stuck to hard surfaces better.  On the negative side, you might have to vacuum the brush itself to unstuck the dust, and I wondered why they had to inconvenience the horse for "genuine horse bristles".  There is no permanent storage on the vacuum cleaner for the parquet brush, so you have to figure out how to ensure the parts don't get separated for life (the powerbrush takes precedence).Cord rewind - The mechanical rewind sucked in the entire length of cord every single time, something like 15 for 15 times!  (The manual says to pull out the entire length of cord before use to help dissipate heat.)Cons:Price - After all, it's just a vacuum cleaner.  There also seems to be price fixing in the newer S5 series, at least when I bought this.  Everywhere I checked (maybe 10 websites), the price was exactly $799 or $799.95, with the only difference being no tax and/or free shipping.  One website even advertised "The lowest price allowed!"  What's a Diamond Dealer?  Is this Amway?Release buttons - The release buttons on the attachments and hose are counterintuitive, being on the part that "comes off" rather than on the part that "stays behind".  Therefore, you must squeeze the button with the same hand you are pulling away with.  The hose extension button is particularly confusing.  It's an oval shaped rocker button that "rocks" very little.  To extend the stainless steel hose, you have to remember which side of the button (top or bottom) to press.  There is no distinction on which side to press, and it's always a matter of trial and error as I yank and tug at the hose while pressing top and bottom of the extension button.Stiff no swivel hose - The hose rotates at the top (handle area), but does not swivel at the base where it connects to the machine.  Instead of disconnecting and reconnecting to get rid of twists, I'd rather pick up the powerhead and spin it around to get out the twists.  The flex hose diameter is larger than I'm used to, making the hose stiffer and difficult to store in the same closet where I used to store my old vacuum cleaner.  Considering the price, an electrical slip ring would have been nice.Bag full indicator - The mechanical bag full indicator is actually an indicator of how much the vacuum cleaner is straining to suck.  Put your hand over the end to block suction and it will indicate bag full.  Right out of the box on short carpet, it indicated bag full on high power.  As I turned the power down, it indicated less full sequentially.  You have to read the instructions about using the floor tool with the tool slightly off the floor to get an accurate reading from the indicator.  Even at that, there are caveats about fine dust or pet hair that can fool the indicator.Extra stuff? - The parquet brush comes attached with a short plastic extension that was difficult to plug directly into the stainless steel hose (button doesn't easily click into place).  The extension isn't needed to connect the parquet brush, so you have to remove it and keep track of where you put it.  To this day, I still haven't figured out what the extension is for, other than to connect other attachments that I might buy in the future.  This is yet another piece with no place to store on the vacuum cleaner that I must ensure does not get separated for life (along with the parquet brush, "normal" filter cage, and replacement bags).Symbol marking - The power symbol markings are not obvious at all, contrary to claims.  Other than the symbols labels "Min" and "Max", you have to read the instructions to figure out what the other power symbols mean.  At least the power seems to increase sequentially as you turn the dial clockwise.  The Quite Mode is #4 of 6 settings (with 6 being the highest), and is therefore not actually the quietest but intended to be the "normal" operating mode.  I think most people will consider "Max" the default mode.Optional filter frame - This model comes with a HEPA filter, so you don't need the filter frame unless you're going to switch to the "normal" filters, but brand-new right out of the box the frame for the normal filters came with a broken cheap plastic handle, apparently due to the way it was shipped with the handle protruding out the cardboard wrapping.  You don't even need the handle for the frame to function properly, but for the kind of money I paid, nothing should be broken out of the box.  The vendor that I bought it from (Best Vacuum) replaced it for free.So is it worth $800?  It does a good job, but only time will tell..
Great juicer. After plenty of research on the internet, I decided to go with the Omega 8005. I've used it almost every single day, especially throughout mt pregnancy, to make sure I consumed green leafy vegetables everyday. This is a great juicer and I like it better than my vitamix for making hummus. I didn't give it 5 stars because I don't like it's grinding ability with small quantities and I think it could leave drier pulp.
dirt devil vision self propelled. The dirt devil vision self propelled is the best vacuum in the world for carpets not bare floors it does a loisy job on bare floors. it is better then any dyson or any hoover or the expensive kirbyvacc. You ask why. Why indeed. First of all You probably gotsucked or suckered into believing that suction is the most important thing in a vacuum Right . No im afraid not. Its all in the beater bar brush, the faster it goes the better it will clean your carpets all the so called suction does is remove what the beater bar brush pulls out. yes the better the suction the faster it gets rid of what the brush pulls up. Mr dyson seems to think that suction is all that matters its not. dyson vacuums are poor on rugs  becausethefloatingheadon them doesnt get down far enough to get the really deep down dirt like the dirtdevil vision self propelled .Also, an important thing is having a solid line of brush on the beater bar.the others like dyson or hoover well theyvegot gaps in there brushes why, who knows maybe they think there is better air movement or something.cosumer rates that the hoover windtunnel self propelled is the best vacuuminthere tests.well i have that model too and yes it does do a good job but it doesntdeep clean like the dirt devil. the drive belts also burn outreally quick so its hard to push and pull. the cons of the dirt devil vision are this.yes its noisy yes its bad on bare floors yes you have to clean the filter ihappento clean mine with another vaccum or i use my air compressor to blow it off. i have a very big house and have tested vacuums for years i have a dyson dc14 animal a hoover windtunnel and a kirby.by the way the selfpropelled motor doesntuse a belt like hoovers windtunnel. i tell you folks for carpets its the best.Ivehad it for 3years the hoover for 3years and the dyson for 3months and the kirby for a 1year You will find that nothing pulls out more then that machine. nothing. for the money u can buy a dirtdevil vision at your local walmart for 98.00 pretty cheep the design is one of the best easy to empty dirt container the self propelled feature is much better then the hoovers windtunnel. Why these other reviewers say the belts burn out fast is beyond me i vacuum every day or everyother day because i have pets and my wife has got allergies. just to let you know the dyson is a good machine but dosnt have the power a dirt devil has you turn that dirt devil on and you can feel the floor just vibrate and you can hear that beater bar just going like crazy on the floor. If you buy one youll be in a shock as to what youll pull out of your carpets. and people, this vac like most other bagless vacs have filters of some sort. They do have to be cleaned now and then, the dirt devils suction is very good and it doesnt lose suction very fast . the only way it ever would is if you never clean the damn thing. thats the price people that you pay for bagless vacs. Clean the filter once a week or every two weeks depending on how much you use it again i use mine almost everyday and i clean the filter once a week. if you never clean the filter you know it probably would do a poor job. after seeing the other reviews im very interested in finding out how theres seem to be falling apart or not running very well. ive owned mine for 3years and never had any problems, yes ive changed the belt on it and have bought a new filter for it now and then but, im wondering why these other people are having such difficulty. folks the vac is like anything , if you take care of it, it will last. i mean the things got one belt and one filter how hard is that. i suppose if you beat the hell out of it, i suppose it could brake. dum da dum dum dumm
Best price from AMAZON. BEAUTIFUL set!!  I can't believe I researched pots and pans but I did and learned many things.  For these particular pans, reviewers brought up some good points:For the Teflon debate about cancer causing coating -- these are hard anodized aluminum, as mentioned.  The Anolon.com website has an "Earth Friendly" icon that states they use no harmful materials.  I will be washing mine by hand, to reduce wear and tear.For durability -- they offer a Lifetime Warranty.For Amazon's part -- in my experience with them, shipping is always a breeze.  Items typically arrive earlier than promised.  The manufacturer packed the pots and pans, so it arrived in its original box, inside an Amazon.com box, with a little extra packing for travel.  The glass lids were packed well, so nothing was broken.I bought these from Amazon.com because:First -- I want to start cooking more regularly and needed a GOOD set for everyday cooking, that will last for years.  A good place to look for the non-experienced cook was on Macys.com, where they gave a comparison of the different brands they offered.  It helped in deciding what type of coating (if any) would work best for me.Second -- The price and ease of purchase.  Original price for this set was $425.00.  Sales price when I went to Macy's was $299.95.  On Amazon (a couple of weeks ago) was $199.95, so already far better than Macy's.  Amazon also had the 8 piece set for the same price, which made the 10 piece set an even bigger deal.  Free shipping AND a coupon for more money off.  The grand total from Amazon was $174.95!!  For a $425.00 set, that is not bad at all!!I look forward to using these and by all accounts, expect them to hold up to their claims of durability. The fact that they are oven safe, gives me confidence in those claims.  I rate this set 4 stars for overall appearance, weight, and anticipation of good cooking and easy clean up.  If not, I promise this review will be amended.My advice -- wait for a holiday sale, when you can get the best price.  The price on this set has already gone up.  Hope this helps
Drinkwell Pet Fountain with Reservoir Plus. This is the perfect water dispenser for cats! I already have one up on my sink, where one feeding/watering area is, and I'm buying another set for the floor. I have 5 cats, 3 of them neutered males, and I've noticed that my cats drink more from running water.  Two of my cats are Bengal kittens and Bengals love water! I feel much more comfortable providing my cats with water in this manner, very similar to drinking from a running tap, because my cats drink more and I think that this cuts down on cystitis, especially in the neutered males. If one has multiple cats, then even the small reservoir is too small, in my opinion, and it has to be filled too often. The charcoal filter even filters out chlorine and other things in tap water that are bad for cats
Great value. These are well made and look and perform great.  Easily a five star product
Great Towel. The towel has served it purpose quite well. It is soft, looks great, and was well priced
great for hardwood/laminates, no more swiffing!. picks up all the pet hair, dust bunnies and cat litter on my hardwood and laminate floors, no problem.  the head also pivots very easily with a 270 degree range, which helps a lot when vacuuming around furniture.  i find i have to use the hand vac part (has a handy "crevice tool" though) to get stuff out of corners and along edges, but it is a stick vac so this seems about right to me.  a minor drawback is that it doesn't stand up on its own, so it is hard to switch between push and hand vac.  still, i'll be getting rid of my swiffer
I'm pleased with the product. I'm pleased with this grinder...like one of the other reviews I read..I had to do the extra ajusting to get the right grind for my espresso machine..but after that it's a champ...Also recieve lots of complaments on the style...Frankly all the complaints I read about in other reviews, I disagree with..
Nice weight- pouring spouts wonderful!. I have been using many months and am very pleased I purchased.  The bottoms are heavy enough to use on the smooth glass cook-tops without scorching.  The steam/ pouring spouts are great! No more boil overs or losing whatever you are trying to drain down the sink.  The lid on the largest pot is NOT a good fit for any of the skillets.  I purchased both the 10 and 12" lids and additional 2qt pan.  I have not used metal utensils except for serving from the pans.  They did pass my usual test of all nonstick surfaces- a medium pressure scrapping of a metal cooking utensil across the surface.  CAUTION- If you have a black glass cook-top, the bottoms will cause aluminum marks, but not after washed the first time. I made the mistake unpacking mine on top of my Jenn Aire black cook-top. I wouldn't change a thing, except that I do wish the open stock lids were available with the glass inserts also, as the open stock lids are not as heavy weight stainless. They are about like the traditional Revere sets. I have used the traditional Revere (all stainless) set for 20 years and was VERY pleased to find this set much heavier and more substansial. The stainless is so shiny that I do find myself being over protective so that it stays that way!
cute. I recommend this banner.  I didn't like the larinat, but it was easy to change... thanks!Recomiendo ampliamente este banner. No me gust el lazo, pero fue facil de cambiar... Gracias!
Durable and distinctive. I have purchased a couple of these liners and am satisfied with how well they hold up. The striped fabric is a nice and light alternative to the heavy plastic of standard liners. The seams are durable and keep out mildew. Plus, with Amazon's Super Saver shipping, you can always find an affordable and quick replacement
Nice little wine gadget. I will speak up for this.. I have a green color one of these and have used it for years.. convenient little opening gadget I keep handy!
I am real happy with this oven. This little toaster oven gets the job done for me. I think the quality is a little bit better, it is a little deeper making it a little bigger and the tempeture is more consistant than the other units in it's price range. I am still looking for the right setting on the tempeture and once I find it I will most likely leave it there. I think it will end up somewhere between 350 and 400. Below that takes to long and above that setting the food tends to get a little over cooked on the outside.One thing that concerned me was the safety instructions, which I always read. They do not want you to use aluminum foil or any non Proctor Silex cooking trays in this unit. I always use aluminum foil and it does not seem to cause any problem. Perhaps they are just covering for themselves in case something goes wrong because you never know what sort of crazy stuff people are going to put into their ovens. This is the only thing that concerns me. Otherwise the little oven is working out real good. I think it will last us quite a while. Usually we get rid of them because they get to dirty or get a little old looking more then it is a problem that they wear out or break. The last one cost us about $10 and lasted almost a year. This one cost a little more but I am sure it will last longer.We have had expensive confection ovens that cost well over $100 but I decided to save my money because this one gets the job done and does what we need it to do. Esp with the extra 2 inches of depth this is a nice sized little unit.
Best Washer I used! Compact. Quiet. Clean... I have been using this Haier for HLP21E 2 weeks. I live in an apartment and there is not enough room there. This machine is great!  It takes so little room. I just put it in the bathroom. It is so convenient.Before I am cooking a meal, I throw 4 or 5 clothes into it, and after I finish my lunch the clothes ready. The spin is so good that the clothes are almost dry. for some clothes like T shirts you don't even need a dryer. We have public laundry using coins, but I think this Haier small washer washes much cleaner than that. And what's more important you don't have to drive far out to the laundry.It is very quiet, at least much much more quiet than the public laundry. You can do other things like listening to music in your bedroom and the washer works in your bathroom. It doesn't interfere.And I move sometimes, so it's much better you have a smaller washer than a huge one. I just cant love this small machine more
Love this!!. Great cover to change the look of my room.  Great deal for the price
Great suction, but a bit disappointed in attachments. I have 3 indoor cats and a cat allergy.  I was excited by the Dyson in the hopes that it would help keep my allergies at bay.  After a ton of research, I chose the DC14 Complete specifically because it had the attachments I wanted (and was cheaper than the Animal despite being the same exact thing).  I wanted a low reach tool to be able to get the cat hair and God knows what else from under my bed and the mini turbine tool to clean my furniture.After receiving my Dyson (which, by the way, has a 6 mo. warranty rather than the 90-day in the listing), I did the whole "vacuum with old then vacuum with new" test.  I had a 12 amp Bissell CleanView which worked well.  But the Dyson did manage to pull out more hair and dirt from the carpet.  Not tons, but enough to convince me that my Bissell was leaving dirt behind.Next came the attachment test.  The low reach was great!  I loved that I could get under my bed easily.  HOWEVER, I am seriously disappointed in the mini-turbine head.  The brushes stop rotating when you put the attachment onto the fabric!  Well, what good does that do?  I thought I was using it wrong until I read some other reviews.  Thank God Eureka makes the Power Paw!  It does what the Turbine Tool promises but doesn't deliver.  At least the Power Paw brushes continue to spin while cleaning the fabric.  And for $20, the price was right. (Plus it fits on my Dyson)Overall I'm happy with my purchase but definitely want people to be aware that the Mini Turbine Tool is worthless as an attachment
Wonderful. I've been using this board for about a month now and I love it.  Somehow it makes my knives seem sharper... don't ask me how that's possible!  But seriously, the blades seem to be slicing through stuff like it's butter all of the sudden.  Very nice product, highly recommended!
Solid. Very rich color.  Very solid and deep... great for cereal.  May be too heavy for young kids.
Great Value. These towels are generously sized, thick and luxurious. Probably worth much more than the cost here on Amazon
Works like a charm!. I love having outdoor lights at Christmas but hate having to go outside before bed--when it's cold and frequently snowing--to unplug them.  This year, I treated myself to this Timex timer, and I couldn't be happier with the results!  Once plugged in, the timer turns the lights on automatically at dusk (which has been between 4:30 and 5 p.m. here in upstate New York) and keeps them on as long as you specify--4, 6, or 8 hours or even until dawn.  Since we began using the timer, its performance has been perfect, and no more going out in the cold for me!  Highly recommended
Bark Stop Pro Works with Big Dogs. We have large dogs who are so sweet but end up barking at noisy neighbors with children playing in the field behind our home and a neighbor next to us who is always complaining about our dogs barking so we decided the best thing would be to buy a bark curbing device.  We ordered the Bark Stop Pro and almost immediately our dogs stopped barking.  We were so tired of trying to get them to stop the nuisance barking and we love our dogs so we're very thankful that this device works.  You have to use the high frequency for the big dogs.  We would recommend this product to anyone who has a large barking dog
My ideal fry pan. I recently upgraded my range from a gas model to an electric smooth surface cooktop (which I LOVE).  I soon realized that a lot of my old (cheaper) cookware which had worked just fine on my old stove didn't work as well on my new one.  Because of the nature of the design of this type of cooktop, the heat "transfers" to the cookware instead of the "direct" heat of conventional cooking.  Bottom line is that your cookware needs to sit flat in order to perform well.  Mine didn't.  I bought this set because I wanted 4 things: 1)heavy-duty cookware to work with my new cooktop, 2)a non-stick finish in the fry pan only (but stainless steel in the pots); 3)a strainer built into the lids and 4)see-through clear lids.  This is the only cookware I've found that met ALL of my criteria.  I can tell a big difference between the new cookware and the old
So versatile. What a wonderful portable appliance.  Use it for a stockpot, pasta cooker, deepfrier or whatever.  Quick and easy to use and a snap to clean up.  I use it all the time.  Have two of them now.  You can plug it in and use it anywhere
Crazy circle........ Just got this a week or two ago and to our surprise they seem to enjoy chasing the big yellow ball around the circle. Good size and fun to watch them play.....
Very good. Item as advertised. Works well and the price is rigth. What else does one want
great for the price. The only thing about this is it's a bit smaller than what I expected.  It doesn't quite cover our ugly floral couch, but you get what you pay for.  Good for the price
Heavy duty bottle opener and stylish, too!. This is the Lexus of the bottle opener world!  Very heavy duty, lovely stainless steel business end and pretty, shiny handle in the color of your choice!  What more could you want?  This is a substantial piece of equipment- won't get lost in the crowded utensil drawer.  This is not a space-saving item! So don't get it if you are short on utensil space!This opener has considerable heft and grabs hold of bottle tops easily.  If you want your bottle top popped, this would be the one to go with
Great Soup Mugs. Product was great and was just what I ordered. Would use the site again
Funny & Functional!. Received this item a couple of weeks ago. It's hysterically funny (although my ex-husband doesn't think so). The knives are nice quality and you just can't beat the feeling of satisfaction when you shove one back in it's place! Bigger than I thought it was going to be but I'm o.k. with that.Everyone who has seen it goes nuts. For mne, this was a great buy
Makes my Global as sharp as the day I bought it. What are other people are doing to their Globals with this sharpener?Mine works extremely well and makes my G2 very sharp in a matter of a few minutes. Trust me, I am as bad a knife sharpener as anyone could be. In fact, this sharpener is part of the reason I bought my Global in the first place.I can only guess that using a light, even stroke and making sure that the knife is straight up and down in the sharpening slots is important to the sharpening technique.Also, the sharpener doesn't work on many non-global knives because of the weird bevel Global edges have so don't think it's going to work on your Wustof unless you have a professional re-cut the bevel to a Global-style.Buy one, follow the directions and you and your Globals will be very happy.
georgetown black console table. I was very pleased with this table.My daughter purchased all three pieces in this collection,and from the packaging to the product stability we are very pleased
stand mixer. This stand mixer is absolutely wonderful, everything about it has been worth it. A huge price difference from "kitchen aid" and quality is just as good as this other name brand. well worth the money, I use it all the tim
Excellent. I purchased this item for myself and when my husband saw it he wanted a set for his cook on the boat.  I use it everynight when cooking.  Good job Mario!!!!!!!!!
very much pleased with this kitchen aid hand blender. This product is great buy.Nice thing about it is it has 10 speed setting so blends fast and perfect.i blend food for my baby,really work great.but never try to clean it with your finger's while it is plugged bcoz u may cut your finger's badly as this blender has soft touch button,so always be sure to unplug it soon after u use it.It  has really powerful machine with no big noise that too just for $[...] after $[...] mail-in rebate.ofcourse rebate came on time within one month of my purchase.i am proud to have this product for just $[...].highly recommended
The largest, thickest, thirstiest bath towel I have ever seen !!!. I was never a fan of thick bath towels -- they never seemed to be very absorbent -- until I ordered Wamsutta towels for my wife. I will never use anything else (if she leaves me one)
Aluminum Pizza Peel. Very good quality for the price.  I'm very happy with my pruchase, and would buy from this company again
Love it!. My husband and I love this item!  We can fit 2 (or sometimes 3) garlic bulbs into this garlic baker that we put into our little convection oven.  It's really easy and the garlic comes out perfect
Pizzelle Pro. We enjoyed using the Prego Pizzelle Baker very much. It heats quickly and evenly. It is so much like what grandmother used
Very nice table. I am very pleased with the look of this table. It makes a great addition to my entry way as a place to stash mail, purse, keys etc. Even my furniture-snob-real-wood-only husband was impressed. Easy to put together with all the parts clearly labled. It only took me about 30 minutes to assemble using a Phillips head screwdriver. I also bought the Mission style wall rack to hang above the table. The two pieces look very nice together. I certainly will be buying more items in this collection.
Not an expert on espresso machines but I am a coffee connoisseur. This is the first espresso machine I've purchased.  Did a lot of research and was not willing to fork out the $500 for the higher rated machines.  Then again, I don't buy the higher rated european espresso blends either, because you can get a much higher grade of coffee (100% Aribica grade 1 beans) domestically for a lot less money.I've never had a better espresso on any other machine and the machine works flawlessly.  Zero learning curve.  Can start to brew as soon as you run a few cleaning trial runs.  I sip nothing but espresso/cappuccinos now.  Can't go wrong for the money and Amazon had the lowest price
Makes great waffles!. This is a reliable, easy and fun-to-use waffle maker that is light-weight and takes up very little cupboard space. Waffles were light and tasty. The gimmick of flipping the maker over, although a wee bit cumbersome, seems to add to the lightness of the resulting product. I've only tried this with the enclosed recipes and have not used it as yet with "packaged mixes", but if I were Consumer Reports, I'd give this a "Best Buy" for low-price, ease of use and quality of finished product
The best there is!. If you love pizza, then you definitely need this cutter.  It is by far, the nicest and the heaviest one that I've ever had. I have always had one of those flimsy wooden ones that cut nothing until I received this one, finally!  The blade cuts through anything, including pies and quiche.  I particularly like the fact that it comes with a blade cover.  A definite must in a household with little ones.  Great item
THE MERCEDES OF TOASTERS. I ORIGINALLY PLACED AN ORDER WITH ETRONICS THROUGH AMAZON, BUT AFTER 2 WKS. AND THE PRODUCT HAD STILL NOT BEEN SENT I CANCELLED THE ITEM... TO DATE WHICH IS 1/18/07 I STILL HAVE NOT RECEIVED A FULL REFUND.. I PURCHASED THIS ITEM AT SEARS AND IT IS THE BEST OF THE BEST IN TOASTERS.. THIS PRODUCT THAT MARKETPLACE HAS ON AMAZON IS A SORE SPOT WITH ME.. LIKE I STATED 2 WEEKS AFTER PAYMENT AND THE ITEM WAS STILL NOT EVEN SENT OUT AND THEN I AM INFORMED IT WON'T BE RECEIVED BEFORE CHRISTMAS - AND I NEVER RECEIVED MY $12.93 BACK FROM THE SELLER - ETRONICS.. SO WHEN ALL ELSE FAILS YOU GO TO A STORE AND YOU PURCHASE IT  FOR THE SAME AMOUNT AND I KNOW THAT WAS LUCK.. BUT BE LEARY OF THIS COMPANY BECAUSE THEY IGNORE ALL OF YOUR EMAILS AND THEN THEY DON'T REFUND YOUR MONEY IN FULL.. I AM STILL TRYING TO GET MY MONEY BACK.
best thing with sliced bread ;). A friend broke her butter bell and was going to order another one. We both choose this one and I bought and extra for my mom. All three of us love it. It washes up nicely in the dishwasher when it gets messy. It has a better top than the one she had before which was hard to grip. This one is great
Great!. I was looking for a crockpot that wasn't too large and wasn't too expensive. This product fit the bill.The lid is treated glass so, you can see the food cooking without lifting the lid. The lid handle stays cool during the cooking, so you won't burn your fingers if you touch it. The ceramic cooker is sturdy and alittle heavy. It can become slippery when wet, so be careful while washing it in the sink. Also be careful because the handles on the cooker and the metal base can become very hot during cooking. So keep potholders nearby.The cooker can accomodate a 3.5-4 pound whole chicken and 4 pound roasts. It's oval shape enables these foods to fit well. It comes with a small instruction manual that includes some recipes.So far, I've cooked whole grain cereal (barley and cracked wheat), stews, whole chickens, corned-beef, and turkey legs. They've turned out good. However, since I'm new to slow-cooking, the first attempts were abit off because I cooked the food too long. But now, I'm better with the timing so the food is better.Just a side note, if you like eating whole grain cereals, the slow cooker is terrific. You don't need to stand over a stove stirring the pot and worrying it will boil over. This cooking method allows the grains to fully absorb the water, which makes for a creamier end result. Plus, you can toss the grains and water into the cooker at bedtime and it's done in time for your breakfast.I do have a two very minor complaints:1. The packaging. The cooker is packaged in a way that you have to slide it out of the box. If you aren't careful, you could drop the ceramic cooker or the glass lid.2. The handle to the lid was alittle loose, and could be made tighter with 1 turn. But that might not be a design flaw, but a way to compensate for the expansion of the glass during the cooking process. So, don't mess with it, imo.Otherwise this is a great product
Best Cup of Coffee Ever!. We got this just after Christmas, and it is absolutely the best cup of coffee that we have had since we were in Italy.  I can't stand to drink drip coffee anymore.  There are several things to keep in mind for the best results.  (1) Use good filtered or spring water (2) Use a finely ground good coffee, such as Illy (3) pack it just slightly in the filter (4) Don't try to rush it by turning the heat up too high (5) NEVER put it in the dish washer.We have been using the organic espresso blend from Whole Foods, and it is almost as good as the Illy.  All in all, this is easier and faster than most coffee makers and gives us a nice two servings of espresso in the morning.  Add a little milk if you like, but it's also great straight out of the pot
Vacuuming impaired. I hate to vacuum and when my Kenmore vacuum cleaner died I had no idea what to do.  I read all of the customer reviews and the Bissell 3990 seemed impressive.  It was damaged in shipping and withing a few weeks Bissell sent a new one to me.  I am very impressed.  My first time using the Bissell 3990 was a shocker the bagless container had to be emptied twice.  My old vacuum cleaner didn't pick up much, apparently.  Now, my floors are very clean, my allergies aren't as bad, and my carpet looks great.  I would recommend this product to anyone looking in need of a really good, affordable vacuum cleaner
Very Practical. The dishes not only look good but are a good size, the complete set is really nice. Not too dark so that other colours can also be used at the same time
Awesome!. This vacuum cleaner is awesome!  Not only is it light, compared to other vacuum cleaners that I've bought in the past, but it does a fantastic job!With a brand new house and a new shoe policy, it is still amazing to see what comes up everytime.  My carpets smell and look great.  It also does a great job on hardwood floors!  I highly recommend this vacuum cleaner.  It may seem expensive at first, but once you use it for the first time you'll be glad you made the purchase
A Gem of a Fry Pan. The Swiss Diamond Fry Pan is an outstanding fry pan.  It heats very evenly and cleans up well.  We bought it having used one at my neighbor's house and were impressed with the pan
can't beat the price. I first purchased a $299 model ice shaver and wasn't happy with the output.  It was too grainy.  So I returned it.  This one puts out as good if not better quality of shaved ice for a much cheaper price.  We used this every day for two months.  My daughter can't have food dye and I was able to find syrup that was all-natural and organic, and it actually tastes good
My cats love it!!. My three cats; Max, Smokey and Charlie just love my new pet waterer.  I was a little hesitant to buy it because Max just loves to play in the water and I didn't want a mess. The first day I had it; he sat and kept putting his paw in it but after that he hasn't played in it at all. He loves to drink right from the water slide and he'll just sit and watch the water come down the slide.  Smokey and Charlie have adjusted to it as well and I think all three of them are drinking more water. I've had it for 2wks now and today I cleaned it for the first time.  It was very easy to take apart, clean and reassemble. It is so nice to not have to worry about my cats having fresh water. I would highly recommend this product to any cat lover
Exactly what I wanted. I am very pleased with my new Nordic Ware popper. I am the only one in my household who likes popcorn, so hate to make the large microwave bags or pay the inflated price for the little ones. I'm also on Weight Watchers so need to limit quantity and fat. I put in a few tablespoons, spray with Parkay spray butter, add a little salt and have a delicious low point snack in 2 minutes at the fraction of the cost of individual micro-pop bags. The bowl gets a little hot, but I read that in other reviews before I ordered it, so I always make sure I have a pot holder. Thanks for a great product.
Great product-Saved substantially from Amazon. I was able to save a great deal of money compared to the retail price. Great product and service
Great laptop desk. I bought this on Amazon back in January 2007.  I love it-use it almost every day.  Very light weight and helps my legs cool.  I have a mac book pro and got the 18"  I could fit the mouse on the space but choose not too-almost too tight to fit the laptop-(15") and a mouse.I highly recommend this product
Great product for home kitchen. This is a great pitter for your home kitchen.  It works 90% of the time for me.  The other 10% of time I have the pit remains within the cherry as it fails to get punched out.  I still give it a high rating since this is a mechanical solution which depends on several factors such as: the size of the cherry (medium size works best), the speed and amount of pressure you punch the pit (operator skill can improve the success rate).  The one negative comment I have is that the pitter get rust very easily, and it comes without instruction on how to clean it.  I found out that if  you let it sit for drying after a handwash, it will get rust. What you want to do is to take the pitter apart, wash and dry them with a towel immediately after use.  You can take the assembly apart by simply uncrew the black pitter handle.  The spring and the metal rod can now be pulled out for cleaning. Enjoy
WONDERFUL PRODUCT-GREAT VALUE. I needed another toaster for our ski lodge. I've used DUALIT chrome toaster for many, many years and just loved it.When I went to amazon.com and saw a DUALIT LITE toaster at $79.99 I was in awe of the price. Ordered it and just love it.Perfect even toasting, american style pop-up toaster and can accomodate my favorite bagels.I can't believe that you can purchase a quality DUALIT product at this pricepoint. I highly recommend that you go out and buy this item. I'm going to get several as holiday gifts!!!
Exactly what we expected. This is a great handy organizer for three different sized containers, plus the containers and covers.  The containers are in "even" metrics sizes: 250, 500, and 750 ml.  It works out to 1.1, 2.1 and 3.2 cups.  The two larger sizes take the same cover, so there are only two different size covers.The organizer takes up a tad more real estate than it needs to, but we'll live with it. Our current collection of plastic containers is just a jumble so this is SOOOO much better we're not complaining.  The dimensions of the organizer are 16 inches wide, by 10.5 inches deep, by 8.5 inches high. It fits OK in our upper shelf in the kitchen.There is enough room in the cover storage bins to add about 4 more large covers and 2 more small covers, if you want to add a couple more containers to the organizer.  The height of your cabinet is the only limit on the number of containers it will hold.The containers microwave nicely--I had some spaghetti microwaved in one container for breakfast.The containers are on the clear side of translucent, so it is relatively easy to see what is inside.  Clearer than most other containers of that kind, though we'll see if they stay clear after a few weeks of microwaving spaghetti sauce!
attractive and handy. I have two of these, one in yellow and one in a discontinued sea greeny color.  They're attractive, of course; this is Fiestaware, after all.  But they're darn functional.  They're long enough to accommodate a london broil or small roast or kebobs, and they're deep enough that any juices are not likely to spill while you're carrying or serving.  I like wish there was one slightly bigger too; then I'd get two more
Great Value. These towels are generously sized, thick and luxurious. Probably worth much more than the cost here on Amazon
Fast Service. I was impressed with the FAST efficient service when I ordered this sleeveboard.  Also, it works wonderfully well - much better than the old wooden ones.
Very basic starter kit. We gave this small tank 5 stars because of its construction, ease of handling and cleaning. However, since it holds only 2 gallons, it is not suitable for large fish or lots of fish. Keep the number and/or size of fish to a definite minimum.It comes with a small pump and air stone and utilizes an undergravel filtration system. It has a light, but does not come with a heater. It's certainly better than just a plain bowl for keeping your fish.This would be good for a beginner or child as it has a small footprint and is acrylic, not glass, and is not too heavy to handle for easy cleaning. We use it as a temporary holding tank for new fish before introducing them to our larger aquarium. And if one of our fish should get sick or need to be quarantined, this would make a suitable temporary home for him for easy observation, and is easy to clean out to avoid contaminating any other fish that may call it a temporary home in the future.Marineland. com has some good articles on keeping fish in small tanks. This tank will suit your needs if you keep its limitations in mind
Chemically sensitive? Beware the packaging for this fan!. I really like this fan: nice design (yes, it is sleazy plastic, but the only time I noticed it was during assembly); quiet and powerful operation; and the "nature" mode is a marvelous innovation.  "Nature" mode slows the fan when it faces front so that you are spared a direct blast of air. And a remote control is a luxury when you are too hot to move.IMHO the sole design fault is the LCD display which is too small to read farther than two feet away.However,when I opened the shipping box, a strong chemical smell overwhelmed me, causing a headache - and I am not chemically sensitive!  The smell disappeared after a few minutes, as did the headache.
great breadmaker. I bought this breadmaker because I wanted one that makes a normal shaped loaf.  It makes great big loaves and is relatively easy to use.  Just be sure to follow the instructions carefully and I recommend that you use the recipes created for the machine unless you are a baking pro.Nothing smells better than a homemade loaf of bread baking in the kitchen!I have not bought a loaf of bread since I've owned this fine bread making machine
satsified. I have enjoyed the factory reconditioned kitchen aid. I have put it to the test these past weeks to ensure it would stand up.so far I have not had any problems from light mixing to bread making. I have waited along time to purchase and this was in my price range. I would do it again
Excellent Fryer. I bought this Fryer to make French Fries at a small food concession I have. Wow! It did a beautiful job on the fries and with the two baskets there's no hold up on customer orders. The fries are done in about 5 minutes and the customers love them. I wish there was a more effective way to clean the elements, but with the ease of using the fryer, I'll make do with carefully wiping it down with a sudsy cloth
A Keeper. I have used many different brands of coffemakers, but this one will be my last. It easily makes the best coffee. This may be because of the use of a paper filter and more than one drip hole which slows the coffee from leaving the grounds too quickly, or it may be because the coffee filter is placed into the decanter. My other coffee makers used a plastic filter, or permanent weave type and the coffee poured through. In order to get hot coffee though you must follow the directions and heat your cup with hot water. It also helps if the water you add is not from the refrigerator. The hottest coffee I've had came from a percolator. I like the fact that the water tank can be removed to fill or left in, and the cup amounts are clearly visible when adding water. I do wish the top had been hinged to the unit though. I also think it is too expensive.
Great espresso from a mid-range machine. After conducting research for a few weeks, visiting Amazon, as well as other coffee aficionado sites, I finally purchased the Saeco Aroma espresso maker and have been using it for going on two weeks. Although this machine may not be as glitzy in appearance compared to some machines, it does make a great espresso. Say for instance, if the Francis Francis is the sexy Ferrari of espresso machines, then the Aroma would be a Volvo--boxy (perhaps considered bland in appearance to some) but solid, reliable, and a well-built machine for the price. Once I got the hang of using the pressurized portafilter, which has to be put on tightly to obtain the correct seal/pressure, I was treated to rich, flavorful espresso with lots of crema.I am pleased with the ease of using the machine, however, the instructions are not very detailed and I found technical support to be slow. Initially I placed a phone call to -- where I did not reach a live person--but left a message. Never received a call back, but called again the next day at which time I did get a live person. To be honest, she seemed ambivalent and downright unhelpful, blaming my problem on the coffee I was using (despite my best efforts to explain the problem). The issue was that after priming the machine and installing the portafilter, the pump would run and run, but no espresso would come out. I ended up tightening the three little screws on the bottom of the portafilter, which seemed to help make it fit more snugly and achieve a pressurized seal. Voila! Perfect espresso. If I had one complaint about this machine, it would be that the portafilter is not very substantial, and is made mostly of plastic.The Aroma's steam wand works REALLY well for frothing milk. Almost too well, as I ended up with a lot of foam, but the second time using it, I backed off on the pressure a bit, and got just the right balance of milk and foam. Overall I am pleased with the performance of this machine.It's hard to find a decent machine for under $300. But I would consider this machine to be a mid-level machine for an entry-level price, especially with 15 bars of pressure. (I had started out thinking I would buy the Starbucks Barista machine which was almost $400, but after seeing a live demo at a Starbucks store, realized it did not perform well at only 8-12 bars of pressure. Very little crema). A good espresso machine should offer a minimum of 14 bars.Two side notes: I urge anyone who purchases an espresso machine to consider a conical burr grinder (I bought the Capresso 560.01 Infinity Burr Grinder from Amazon). It's crucial to have a fine grind for brewing espresso. You'll know when you have just the right grind because after brewing the portafilter basket will contain a compacted "cake" of espresso, rather than a soupy mixture of water and grinds.I did not purchase my Saeco from Amazon, but opted instead to get it from Costco's website where it was $249 (for members or add 5% - or $12.45 - for nonmembers), including shipping and handling. Plus it could be returned to any Costco warehouse within 30 days, no questions asked, if not satisfied.
the best. this is the best mattress pad i have gotten.it fits well , feal's well and  i would buy it  again. thank you
Great vacuum for the price. We've had the Eureka R4870G Boss for a month or so and are very happy with how well it works on both carpet and tile. It picks up far better than our old vacuum and at $99, it was a great value. Though it is refurbished, it looks and runs like brand new. The only minor annoyance is that it's a little loud. If you're looking for a new upright vacuum, this is one you should consider.
Press your own clothes, no more dry cleaners. I have now had this product a few months and it has already paid for itself vs cleaner launder and press bills. Works very well, just wish it had a little larger surface but for the price it can't be beat. Gets extremely hot and with steam will press most clothes without the addition of spraying on starch, unless you really want that stiffness, starch is not necessary.
micro-suede duvet cover set. I just love it and it looks great on my be
Bonjur Primo Latte. I purchased this item as a gift for a friend. She was visiting and I served her a cup of Cappachino made with my Bonjur.  She was so impressed that she wanted one also.  I use mine at least once  a day.  It is so easy and I don't have to clean and work with a large machine to enjoy my latte and cappachino.
Good Coffee Quickly. I was amazed at how much I am enjoying my Flavia Fusion. I saw it at a boat show and tried some. My husband talked me out of it because he wanted to surprise me for my birthday. I really love it. I love the decaf house blend. It is hard to find really good decaf or to brew good decaf. Decaf tastes bad after it sits for 15 minutes so you waste a lot if you brew a big pot of it.The Flavia is a total solution to getting good and hot decaf coffee. I also like the regular coffee and the decaffeinated tea as well. I like the fact that there are so many choices of drinks.It surprises me that people who have bought the machine and written some reviews touting how expensive it is to use it because of having to buy the coffee on line should have done their research BEFORE buying it. It is obvious that brewing individual cups would be somewhat more expensive than making an entire pot with store bought ground coffee. The Flavia is a luxury item, not for a poor working stiff.Anyway, the Flavia is fast and simple and convenient. In fact, I'm going to make myself a nice cup of coffee right now. Enjoy it
great product. This product saves me money on expensive vet bills because it works better than treatments I had received there.  Zymox takes about a week to work, with one or two treatments a day.  It has had the same effect for my sister's dog who had had recurrent ear infections. I have also used the spray for skin infections with the same rate of success
I just love this. I first got introduced to the flip n fold while visiting my son.  He tends to be a neat freak ... in a good way.  I noticed his shirts were folded so perfectly (I know I didn't teach him that).  When I told him how nicely folded they were he told me about the flip n fold.  He got me one for christmas the next year.  I purchased this one for my dad(he is 80).  My mom had passed away a couple of years ago and he is now doing his own laundry.  He stayed with me for awhile and mentioned to me how he liked the way I folded his shirts so I purchased this for him.  He really loves it and shows it to everyone who comes to see him
WOW!!. My sister bought this for my 9 yr. old son for Christmas. It is great. Even when it doesn't get something right on the nose it's very close. The adults had just as much fun as the kids and we all fought over it. A great toy for not alot of money!!! I always like those!
simple, but  perfect. At first I didn't think I would need this piece, but after purchasing it.  I fell in love with it. Perfect for a 10" plant on top and a small candle on bottom
I thought i must be crazy, but would buy it all over again. I love rice, but never rice I made at home.It never turned out well and I hated the cleanup.The Zutto makes perfect rice every time (I make long grain, brown and short grain Sushi rice in mine and they all turn out great). It cooks a pretty mean oatmeal too !I thought I must be crazy for buying a $200 rice cooker when you can buy other models for $15. The Zutto is made better and works better than any other non-comercial cooker I have seen or had rice from though. The rice does indeed turn out better than from other cookers, and guests often comment that it is better tasting than from their own cookers.Rice turns out perfectly whether you wash it or not (I prefer to wash white rice as I like the flavor better with the starch removed).The 'keep warm' feature works well too, and you can keep the rice for hours without it drying out.I have also become addicted to McCann's Steel Cut Irish Oatmeal since buying the Zutto. I have eaten it for breakfast every day that I have been at home since the first time I tried it. McCanns is another delacacy thats time consuming to make on the stove and clean up.With the Zutto it's a snap. I use two and a half cups of water to one cup of oats in the porridge mode. I load the cooker at night and set the timer feature, and wake up to the smell of oatmeal.Oh yea, the timer feature. You can set the time you want to eat, and the Zutto will adjust it's start time so it completes cooking at that time. You can have freshly cooked rice waiting when you get home ready to go. It automaticly goes into the keep warm mode when it's done cooking, so even if your an hour or three late getting home you will arrive to perfect rice.I DO AGREE, it should cost 75 or a hundred bucks less. But if it disapeared tomorrow, I would immediately buy another one.I started out storing it in my cabinet, but have made space for it on the counter since I use it every day (modt days twice). It looks good enough that it doesn't look out of place too which is good.
Perfect to keep the "fruit flies" off. This item works exactly as described - and looks quite pretty to boot!  I use it to keep those little fruit flies you occasionally get in the kitchen off my baked goods, etc. and also outside when we eat on the patio
An elegant solution to a messy problem. I am pleased that all my plastic bags fit into this neat little holder because it has freed up a whole cabinet shelf in my kitchen.  I debated between this wall-mount unit and the larger unit that sits on a shelf; I choose this one simpley because it hangs on a wall and therefore does not use any shelf space.  I wasn't sure that this smaller unit would hold all my plastic bags, but it is actually the perfect size.  Whenever I do  a lot of shopping, it gets really crammed full, but, since I use the bags for garbage, it also regularly empties out. You can stuff the bags and remove them from either the top or from the front.  My husband hung it in the utility room adjacent to our kitchen. Neat.
Better than Prescription. My golden retriever has had ear infections since she was 8 weeks old.  Over the years we have tried allergy shots, dietary changes, and prescription ointments - all costing a fortune.  We tried Zymox and it is absolutely fantastic.  Her ear infections clear within a few days of treatment.  The itching and head shaking stop immediately after application, and if I treat her ears once or twice a week after an infection clears, I can keep her clear.  This stuff is great and at 1/2 the price of prescription and no vet charges, I'm happy to keep it on hand
OVERALL SATISFACTION WITH THIS PRODUCT. VERY POWERFUL STEAM CONCENTRATION.HIGH CAPACITY FOR ACCOMPLISHINGLONG TIME USAGE FOR THE JOB.GREAT ATTACHMENTS.VERY FAIRLY PRICED.EXCELLENT OVERALL SATISFACTION
Excellent blanket. I purchased the same blanket for my son and myself.  It was worth every penny and was as good as all the other reviewers said.  It is soft and plush and very warm, even though it is not a thick blanket.  I bought this blanket based on the other reviews and am glad I did.  I highly recommend it
Red/Gourmet Glass. Yes, the stem is short.  Yes, if you have a big nose, it may get caught.  And worst of all, they do come from France, which is a very good reason not to buy them.  BUT that being said, you will not find a more pleasant, delicate glass to hold or sip from in this price range.  More importantly, they fit into the upper level of the dishwasher, their single most important attribute.  And if you break one or two or three, no tears, throw away the pieces and buy a new ones.  Now that you cannot say about Waterford
LOVE THESE BOWLS. These are called "Fruit Bowl" but they are the perfect size for a couple of scoops of ice cream
Memory Foam Topper Without the Common Problems. I bought this as a gift for my mom, so I cannot  comment on what it is like to sleep on, however, when I began looking around for a Memory Foam Mattress Topper I encountered a huge variety of products, prices and problems associated with them: primarily, toppers which didn't fully expand when released from the rolled and squished manner in which they are shipped and toppers with an unpleasant odor that never went away and frequently caused the users headaches. I had almost decided that this type of mattress topper was just an unreliable product, but after reading the previous reviews from Amazon customers on this product I decided to give this one a try, knowing I would be able to return it if it didn't work out. It is exactly as described! It looked terrible when opened up, but had fully expanded and was perfect within two hours and has no unpleasant odor at all! If you are considering a memory foam topper, this is the one
Very nice. I've been through two other brands of cat water fountains and had the pumps give out far too quickly. I've had this fountain for several months and it works beautifully and quietly,and has the added benefit of being more attractive than the other brands
Very Good Processor. I use this to slice any fresh fruits and vegetables. I don't cut up the food with a knife any more. This is great. It's fast so it saves a lot of time. It's easy to clean and take apart. Was well worth the money. Other processors cost much more than this one. This one does the job very well
le creuset rules. We have a couple of le Creuset enameled cast iron items and they are the best we've used for stews and braises - brown meat/etc. on the stovetop and then put the whole dish in the oven.  This soup pot is a nice size; the only caveat is that the flat bottom of this one is a little bit small for folks with an electric rangetop (if you plan to brown in it).  Great for large casseroles
Holmes Twin Fan. Over all it isn't bad.  It is fairly quiet, I don't have to blast the television or radio when both are on.  I like the digital temperature display and the feature that will turn the fan either off or on when a certain temperature is reached.  The only thing that was a negative was I don't feel it is powerful enough to do much good when it comes to the exhaust feature.  Still I feel it was worth the price
Loved them. The flutes are absolutely great! Exactly what I wanted and even better than expected. I will be purchasing more of these shortly
Scooba Dooba. We were so pleased with our Roomba that we bought the Scooba.  It arrived in perfect condition, it looked brand new, I couldn't tell it was refurbished!  The scooba is my favorite helper!  I move the chairs in the kitchen and it mops and dries it all.  It does a great job, I am a meticulous house keeper, and no one wears their shoes in my house, but I run the scooba twice a week and it always picks stuff up!  We couldn't be happier with the little robots we've added to our home!  We suggest them to everyone, we practically treat them like pets
I love love love this french oven. This is one of the best items to have in your kitchen.  It means 1-pot cooking when you're making stews, soups or casseroles from scratch.  The finish is fabulous and it stays that way.  It's pretty enough to serve from at the table.  This size is great for anything up to a moderate sized chicken or pot roast.  It heats evenly and retains the heat well.  I love love love this french oven.  I'm going to aim toward filling my kitchen with Le Creuset from now on
take the course with it, prepare to shell out more $$ for tools. I just begin a Wilton cake decorating class #1 at Michael's, and this book comes FREE with the class which is $18 (instructor says these course books should retail about $3-5 at most).You should take the class in addition to read this book, the experience of live teaching by an experienced instructor is invaluable. During this class, you will learn the beginner cake decoration techniques. It's a lot of fun, and if you don't want to proceed onto course II or III, it should be fine with just decorating your average cupcake, cookies and basic cakes.  [[though most people love it so much that they do advance on..]]however, I do have to caution that the course I tool kit you can buy ($19.99 @ Michael's) is only the bare minimum, it does not have all the things you will need for the first class. so be prepared to develop this hobby and pay more (~$20-40 depending on what you want) for other tool/tips/bags....
Lovely!. I have a white stove with black burners that are such an eyesore when I want my kitchen to look 100% and I am so pleased with these burner covers.  They are just the right touch to keep my kitchen looking bright and clean
My favorite appliance... Using a Chemex requires water to be heated in a tea kettle prior to brewing, and it requires a finer ground than what auto-drip machines ask for.  After the water is brought to a boil, it's important to wait for it to cool just slightly (about 30 seconds) and then you need to wet the grounds in the filter, wait for them to drain, and then fill the pot with water.  Want more than a single cup of coffee?  You wait for your first pour to brew, and then fill the filter again.Some advantages over other forms of coffee brewing:1. Taste: I don't know how it does it, but the filter does keep your coffee from being bitter.2. Cleanability: Users can keep all necessary components clean (anyone who's brewed water and vinegar through their coffee maker to kill off a bitter taste that wasn't there when you bought it understands this plight).  Oftentimes, the most aggressive criticism of the Chemex is its ponderousness to clean because it's not possible to get your hand into the reservoir.  Some people prefer to add hot water and soap and give it a good rinse, which is fine if you clean the moment you empty the pot, but if you're like me and you let the remaining sip or two sit until a nice coffee stain is on the glass, then you need some good 'ol fashion friction to get it clean.  The best thing I've found: a baby bottle cleaner.  It's narrow enough to get into the reservoir and the angle can be adjusted to scrap the walls, too.  Brilliant!3. Electricity Free: As long as you can boil water, you can have coffee.4. Mud/Sludge: French press and stove-top espresso-style brewing always leaves a thick slime at the bottom of an otherwise rich cup of coffee.  Don't get me wrong: I think that's good (I use a French Press when I'm in the mood), but the cone on a Chemex doesn't allow that at all.5. Style/Size: the Chemex coffee pot is a relic (designed in the 40s) and the wood cuff with rawhide tie screams simplicity and elegance and it's a wonderful, minimalist sight on any kitchen counter (and unlike electric coffee makers, easy to move if you need the space).Some drawbacks any purchaser should consider:1. Time: it does take 5 - 10 minutes of labor to get the morning cup of coffee.2. Cones: you can't run over to Wal-Mart when you use the last filter; you need to find a specialty store or go online, which means you need to plan ahead.3. Cold Coffee: no electric hot plate (thank god) means coffee not poured and consumed immediately gets cold quickly.  You can buy a wire guard and a glass lid so your Chemex can be warmed on the stovetop.  I think that's more labor added to an already laborious endeavor.  Just have a warmed thermos ready and use that to store any unused coffee.4. Learning Curve: It does take some time to get the grind right, the amount right and the water level right to find a cup which caters to your tongue.5. Cleanability: I know this is in the advantages column, as well, but it's worth mentioning that a lot of people hate cleaning these things.  To  submerge it does mean pulling off the wood cuff (which is a small pain) else it will get nasty over time
Love the pillow; hate the smell. This pillow is exactly what I was looking for in a memory foam pillow.  It's supportive, regular pillow shaped, not too tall, etc.  My only complaint was the horrible smell of the latex (or whatever it is) foam.  I understand this is common with these pillows.So, I washed it in the bathtub with a small amount of mild detergent.  It took nearly a week to completely dry (no wringing the foam!).  However, once it was dry, No Smell!  Thereafter I've been pleased with my pillow.  I'll definitely purchase another one whenever this one reaches its end of life
sugar bowl. very nice product fast shipping alittle disappointed in the size of the container but overall very please
I like them, but who chose the name?. I like these dishes.  Like others have said the colors have nothing to do with pewter.  They look more like shades of tan and brown.  I like these colors much better than pewter.  I asked my sixteen year old son what color they were and he said dark lavender or brown, and tan.  I have always liked corelle because they are durable and lightweight and have been searching for a pattern that I like.  I'm very pleased with the colors.  I ordered 2 sets and now that I've seen them, I'm ordering 2 more sets
Great Clips. Love the quality, strong magnets and usefulness of these unique shaped clips ... highly recommend
Little Goofy, but great hot coffee. My wife called me complaining about the same problem the previous reviewer had with the carafe being pushed way from the machine. Once she aligned the carafe lid properly, it did not happen again. This machine produces very hot, excellent coffee.  Its a little big, the carafe system is awkward, and there is no beeper to tell you when the coffee is done.  It just shuts off after 11 minutes. However, the combination of the timer and the carafe insure an excellent hot cup of coffee every morning.  The coffee is as good as any shop and its very hot even in small 4 cup batches. No more burnt coffee taste - Yeah!  An added bonus is that this machine also looks cool on the counter.
Easiest to Use. As a server in an Italian restaurant, I have to open a plethora of wine bottles in front of customers. Based on experience with many different corkscrews, this is by far the easiest to use. It is one of the fastest and smoothest of any corkscrew I have experienced. I have, however, seen it other places for much cheaper than here
So far, so good.... We bought this to get a blender and to replace a leaky (and piece of junk) Hamilton Beach food processor. We live in a cramped apartment, so anything that saves us space by condensing or being multi-functional is highly attractive. I've already broken the blender carafe. The replacement is only $20, but note that the plastic ring at the bottom is an extra $5! It's removeable, I had no idea. Both machines have worked well, and we've had no complaints. We like to make smoothies, and this has been great at crushing ice
saved many a bottle of red. After trying vacuum pump / seals, I found this to clearly beat them.  Generally keeps our reds for a week, when otherwise I would taste a vinegar taste after a day.In reading some of the other reviewes, I can't specifically recall whether it lasts for 120 uses, but with my wife and I drinking 1-2 bottles a week, it lasts for months.  Well worth the money in my opinion
Nice lamp, but where's the white shade?. A very nice looking lamp for the money, easy assembly, but no "crisp white shade" as promised. It is definitely a beige shade with a rough fiber look and texture. You have to pull the shade open like the old fashioned collapsable tophats! They look real cozy, though, and are more substantial looking than they appear in photo. A good value; I am quite pleased
Helpful organizer. These holders have been very helpful in organizing our garage, allowing us to hang brooms, mops, shovels, rakes and paddles on the wall and out of the way
Professional quality kitchen tool!. Jaccard Tendermatic Meat TenderizerPros:1.  Professional caliber tool; strong, well engineered and manufactured.2.  Ergonomic design - handle bulges at top for good grip, it's comfortable, and no sharp edges.3.  Protective cover slides over the blade section, for storing the tool.4.  For safety, the blades are only exposed when the tool is pressed down firmly against the spring-loaded bottom plate.  Note: Those blades are sharp!5.  Stainless steel blades are replaceable.  Tool has three blade assemblies, with 16 blades in each one; see Customer Photos.  Search Google on "Jaccard Replacement Blade" if yours get damaged.6.  It actually does make steaks and other meats more tender and opens them up for marinade to soak in.Cons:1.  Takes longer to clean the tool if meat particles get between the blades.Summary:Excellent product
I love it!. I think this griddle/skillet combo is fantastic.  I use mine almost every day.  The only problems that I have encountered are: once I dropped it while putting it away, and part of the plastic base broke off.  This has made it more difficult to pick up, but it still works fine, and it was an accident.  Also, the nonstick coating has been scratching lately.  It does get a lot of use, but I was hoping that it would last longer.  I am planning to buy another one though
Worth the money. I have two of these in my home and they really help to cut down on smells and dander from our two cats.  And the filters are inexpensive enough to be able to change regularly
No drips!. These are a great hostess gift when you attach to a bottle of wine.  No drips of red wine on the table when you use them
I love it. A complete set with serving chargers and flatware. It looks absolutely beautiful on the table and well worth the price
The Problem Is Me. This tea kettle is as wonderful as everybody says it is. Unfortunately, I unintentionally fell asleep while heating water in mine and it was ruined when I woke up. I have ruined (including today) all but one pot I own by getting busy on my computer and forgetting water is on the stove or by falling asleep. I would love to have this tea kettle with a train whistle. I couldn't hear it over my central air conditioning when it came on, but I am closer to the air conditioner than to the kitchen. I was always alert to listen for it, however, until that day I dozed off. I'm not writing to discourage anyone from buying this. I'm just forewarning anyone who is like me. :-
Henckels Knife Block. Handsome and compact; will fit the decor of most kitchens. Nice to have the knives out of the drawer...
Great Wall Pot Rack!. I bought this pot rack because I live in a small apartment and needed to find a way to maximize the space.  It looks great in my kitchen, and keeps all of my pots out of the cupboards, within easy reach on the wall.  It comes with many hooks and looks stylish.  I was considering making a pot rack, but by the time you buy the hooks and what not, this rack would end up being a better value.
Good Food Processor. Likes:- Very quiet compared to our last food processor.- Powerful, no problem doing pizza dough.- Very solid construction, however this makes the base very heavy.Dislikes:- Short center shaft will leak if you have more than a few cups of liquid.Overall this food processor is so much better than our old one.  The low liquid capacity is our only gripe so far
Awesome dispenser!. I ordered 3 of the dual dispensers and they work incredibly well. They are the perfect height for the back of the counter under cabinets and look very professional. In one pair we put ground and bean coffee, rice and flour in another pair and cereals in the last pair. We tried using one for sugar, but it leaked easily and seems to work best with larger dry goods, though the flour one does fine. Will order another pair for dog food, and another for a b'day gift.
-CHOCOLATE MILK SHAKE. LOVE THIS FOR MAKING CHOCOLATE MILK SHAKES FOR THE GRANDKIDS AND ME
good quality. smooth operation, like the weight in my hand, peeling much easier than with my former grocery store model, and doesn't take off as much of the food as with my paring knife
I wish I would have bought this YEARS ago. This is an excellent product. If you are tired of lugging buckets of water back and forth while cleaning your aquarium, and making huge messes, walking in puddles, etc..and taking hours to clean even relatively small tanks, this product is for you. Don't waste your money on cheap suction devices, and buy the python today! (sorry if I sound like an infomercial, I'm just an enthusiastic user). The python attaches to your faucet, you turn the water on full blast, stick the suction tube end into your tank, and you can drain your tank in minutes, or just vacuum your gravel and do partial water changes. Then, you flick a switch and you can fill your tank back up (again, in minutes). I have 2 29 nine gallons and a 10 gallon, as well as a 15 gallon turtle tank, and what used to take me a whole day, now takes about an hour (to do all tanks). I like that I can vacuum the gravel, boy does this thing suck the waste up. This will also prolong the use of your filters and make your tank look great! I was skeptical that this product would work, but am so glad that I bought it. Now I actually enjoy maintaing my tanks instead of dreading it.The directions are easy to follow~ even for people like me, who are "direction impaired."
Good toaster!. We had been using a toaster oven which was very slow, and which had tohave the cycle repeated to get well browned toast.  The T-fal is much faster, and toasts evenly.  We had tried another toaster, but returned it because of uneven toasting. The variable setting allows good flexibility in toasting different types of bread. We are pleased with the speed and performance of the T-fa
nice with a few flaws. A good looking tea kettle and seems to be quite sturdy, though I've only had it a few weeks. Not heavy, but dense enough to make you feel it won't ever burn through. The water has to boil like crazy in order for the whistle to get going, so you might wait longer than necessary if you're listening for that sound. The only real disappointment: there's a device connected to the spout that's constructed to seem as if you can flip it and it'll keep the spout open while you pour. But you end up having to hold that open with your finger anyway. Otherwise a fine and aesthetically nifty item
Mr Coffee a Winner (Again). This machine meets all my expectations and is easy to use.  I like the 4cupsize because by the time you brush your teeth, voila, your 1st cup is ready.Sincerely said, Frank
Great nightlight alternative. Never replace a bulb. Dirt cheap to operate. Several companies sell this exact same light, included one sold at Home Depot. It's a single LED light that uses 0.3 watts. You will never need to replace the bulb. Light is slightly blue in color. It does not put off as much light as a 4-7 watt standard nightlight bulb. It does not put off as much light as the picture shows. It seems brighter when viewed from above, such as from a floor outlet.
Elegant and versatile. These glasses are a lovely elegant shape, gorgeous and appropriate for champagne, and the bit of extra width makes them suitable for white wine too. They come in a box, individually wrapped in tissue. They are reasonably priced for a set of six and make a great gift
B&D Power Mop. I thought this mop was not too bad to put together. I think that it is easy to use, with the exception that the sprayer is not powered. This is the BEST cleaning mop I have used though. Not sure what they have going on with those pads, but it cleans ten times better than Swiffer and even a regular mop head.  My floor hasnt come this clean since I laid it down. The problem is finding replacement pads. NO stores carry them. I called B&D and they advised that they have been on back order from their overseas vendor and that I would need to order on-line or through my local B&D service center. I did place an order for 5 boxes ($[...] per box of 10) and will hopefully get it within a weeks time.  They say to take Swiffer pads and wrap them around the mop.....oiy! Who wants to fight with that. I will just wait for my pads, using my Swiffer mop in the mean time
Petmate Fresh Flow. This pet fountain is great.  I am having a tough time trying to get my cat to start drinking out of it, he was use to drinking out of the sink with running water so it is going to take some time to adjust
Love my misto. I love the misto! I have had no problems with it and use it often. It is so much better than the chemical laden cans you buy. Would recommend this to anyone
This itty bitty book light is an itty bitty wonder. I am amaze of all the negative reviews on this product. I purchased the itty bitty book light containing the portable battery pack and AC adapter about 5 years ago and I am still using it. I replaced the light bulb for the first time (replacement comes in the set I bought) last year when it started flickering and died. The book light has been used a great deal and I have accidently left it on for full nights before. I am lucky that nothing has been burnt because the light bulb gets rather hot after about 30 mins of usage...This is the only down side I can think of. The battery pack has its advantages... you are free to roam with the book light but replacing batteries gets very expensive. I prefer using the AC adapter. This might be why I never had a problem with the light source getting dimmer over time. It fits perfectly on big hardback text books and slim paperbacks. You can easily adjust the light to shine wherever you want. Over the last year, my boyfriend has bought at least 3 LED booklights and has returned them all because they were never bright enough for him and he could not easily adjust the light source to shine where he needed them. He has been stealing my booklight to read with and I am force to use the poor night stand lighting. The funny thing is... I had originally bought it for him but he did not want it because it was not a LED book light. Now I am on this page again to buy another one for myself
Bright night. I used to stumble through rooms at night rather than turn on bright lights.  This compact fixture does a beautiful job illuminating corridors or rooms with white LED light. It's bright enough to cast a shadow but not too bright for dark-adjusted eyes.  There's not much difference between the "high" and "low" settings, and both LED's are illuminated on "low".  They have a polarized plug and only fit one way in the socket, aiming the light upward and outward.  They don't feel warm to the touch even when they've been on for hours.  The low power consumption is a plus too
Cuisinart Cookware. I had been looking for stainless steel and pricing all the name brands. Amazon had this with free shipping and I decided it was worth a try. My daughter in law has Capholon stainless and it looks just like my Cuisinart set.I really like my cookware and would recommend it, I use it everyday. It's pretty and functional. It evenly heats and browns the food.I also like the fact I have 12 pieces. I intend to add other pieces. P
Over all great looking lamp. lamp stem was thicker than I expected. it has brush marks sort of looks like scrached but I believe it was done on purpose as style. Wife loves it. I like how it's 3 way 50-100-150 Watts
Fiestaware 28-ounce small disk pitcher. This review assumes that you like the Fiestaware look. This small pitcher is a nice purchase. The color - Cinnabar - is a more sophisicated alternative to the usually bright Fiestaware colors, but still keeps the basic look alive
We love it!!. I got this for my husband for Christmas and he absolutely loves it.  It is so easy to clean.  It's wonderful for pancakes, eggs, sausage and bacon.  We made shrimp fried rice on it also, although some fell off while strirring.  I would definitely recommend this product
jersey sheets. These sheets are great. Super soft and the best Jersey Sheets I have owned.  Plus the prices for them are better than other jersey sheets of less quality.  Great and comfy buy
No problem with synthetic corks. I purchased this with every intention of returning it if it did not perform. Happily, it exceeded my expectations. Easy to use, fast, and attractive design. I hate to admit I'm buying more wine just because I like opening the bottles! Unlike a few reviewers, I have had NO trouble opening synthetic corks. In fairness, the instructions do mention that some synthetic corks might not come out easily. However, it has not been the case in my experience. In fact, most of the corks I've removed have been synthetic and they came out easily.
Very nice towels. Nice size, good thickness and have remained color fast through many washings. They have not puckered or pilled.An excellent value, not the best towels I've ever owned, but certainly fine quality for the price
Love Them!!. I love the house air filters but the ones for the car don't seem to work well.  I have placed one of the air purifiers in my son's room and notice a difference in the first 24 hours.  It is worth the money
Great knife holder. Great knife holder at a reasonable price.  Exactly what I was looking for
Yummy popcorn!. My family LOVES movie theater popcorn, and this makes as good, if not better, popcorn than the theater! Since we purchased it, we've had popcorn every night! LOVE IT!!
Riedel, the only  true serious choice of glassware. I first tried this Riedel Single malt glass a year ago and have not used anything else since. This glass is perfect for appreciating the flavours of a single malt. Whether you prefer Single Malts from the Highlands, Lowlands, or, Islays (my personal favourite region) you will be able to explore the multitude of tastes (both subtle and otherwise). I got this glass and first tried some Laphroaig 10 year Single Islay Malt and I honestly thought I could taste the sea breeze and the seagulls, the experience almost transported me to the Isle of Islay.10 out of 10, quite breathtaking & highly recommended
Great Product and with Free Shipping. I like the other lady ordered the Textured Leaves products.  I ordered two each of the rectangle baking dish and two sets of ramekins, and one each of the 3pc bowl set and the covered bowls/cookware.  All were shipped in perfect condition and the shipping was free via Amazon.  I plan to order more pieces.  The product itself is quite heavy and study.  I was amazed by the weight of the pieces.  I look forward to using the new additions to my Textured leaves dishes and cookware.  Thanks
It's a good one!. About the only improvements I can think of would be to make the hose longer for greater reach, and to increase the strength of the cord winder that is weak.  The replacement bags are more expensive because of the convenient design, but hopefully the cost will come down when more of them are sold.Overall it's a good machine, good design, great suction!  If you buy it, you'll be happy
Rubbermaid gets the job done. We learned about this spatula from several very good professional reviewers.  They were absolutely right about it's easy of use, firm handle feel and easy release.  I highly recommend this item
Pretty cool device... I really like this it makes great little 'cookies' that my family loved.  It is fairly easy to use but there is a learning curve on how much batter to place on the forms.  Great Item
Works Great!. I just bought a bunch of these for Christmas gifts.  I've enjoyed using my friend's.  The true test came when I went to peel a butternut squash.  It took the first layer off with no effort whatsoever, and I only had to go back once to take a little more off.  With a regular peeler, I had to do it two and three times.  Incredibly comfortable in my hand, too
Chantal 48-Ounce Tea Steep, Red. This is a great product and the color makes it elegant
Yummy toast and looks great too!. This toaster makes the best toast of any toaster I have ever owned and it looks GREAT!  I tossed my blue plastic Cuisinart, which at best made mediocre toast, and had that icky plastic worn out look.  This toaster is metal, sturdy and has a great retro look in today's colors.  Mine is red.  I also bought the matching coffeemaker and the drink mixer - a quick and cheap way to update the kitchen.  Amazon service has been great and with the $25 off I got some great buys
A quality product. I did a great deal of research on the internet before buying an automatic pasta maker.  I couldn't spend a fortune, but I wanted the best quality machine I could afford.  I read too many reports of broken plastic extrusion discs, motors that burned out, etc.  I learned that the Simac, Delonghi and Lello products were all related (so the quality of the older Simac brand seemed to be carried on in the newer Delonghi and Lello brands).  I liked their metal extrusion discs and the durability of them.  I felt a 2 lb capacity was ideal.  I bought this one.I was not disappointed.  I had read a great deal on the internet that the trickiest part is getting the dough consistency right.  Most (if not all) of the negative reviews of all pasta machines center around this problem.  When trying to decide which machine to buy, I do not recommend being influenced by reviews that focus entirely on this issue - that complaint is all about user error and has nothing to do with the quality or reliability of the machine.  (Experienced makers of home made pasta need to understand that the dough will need to be a different consistency in this machine than when done the manual way.)  I measured carefully and read the machine instructions very carefully (they bend over backwards to help you with this) and I didn't have any trouble getting pasta dough to extrude.  I found that a 2lb capacity is more than I needed for a family of 3.  I also felt that having metal extrusion discs is valuable in that when you trim the dough as it extrudes, you really run your knife against that metal a lot (in order to help get a clean cut).  I can imagine a plastic disc would wear considerably faster under those circumstances.  (You literally slice and slice hundreds of times for the smaller pastas - like elbows and such.)I would highly recommend this machine.  I was impressed by its quality and usefulness.  You will not regret your purchase with this one
Just the right size and weight. I burnt my last stockpot (an inexpensive RevereWare) and needed a replacement.  I seriously thought about buying a new full set, they're always just a tad more than a single piece.  I'm glad I didn't.  This stockpot is just the right size, and doesn't come in any prepackaged group.  What I really like is the even heating and the 18/10 stainless steel weight.  It's probably my imagination, but I swear food cooked in it tastes better than before
Just what I was looking for!. I am very pleased with the desk.  The only complaint I would have was the assembly.  The instuctions were alpha/numeric coded, however only one piece had an imprint, so it took sometime determining which piece was which.  But, once put together, I am very satisfied.  It is not too small, not too big.  just what I was looking for!
Perfect Addition. I bought this wine rack for my husband for Father's Day. It arrived in less than a week, it included extra hardware, and the assembly was EASY. I had it put together and loaded before he came home from work. It looks great with our existing dining room furniture. I would definately recommend this item. The only drawback is that it only holds 6 wine glasses from the top
Excellent for Garlic. This handle little utensil keeps your garlic nice and fresh until you are ready to use it in cooking.  Much better than placing the garlic in the refrigerator.  The garlic keeper is also attractive and looks great on a counter
Corning Creations Cookware Makes Cooking Enjoyable For Me!!!!. Corning Creations is the "bomb"!!!!!  No matter what you put in them, no matter how baked on...it comes right off.  You can soak it if you like...for a couple of seconds, but it is totally NOT necessary!  I'm just unhappy that I cannot find them anywhere but here and Kohls.  They even have a new line of funky colors according to the Corningware site, but who knows where they can be located.  I'm telling you, Corning Creations is the best thing they ever came up with and I just don't think a lot of people know how easy the clean up is.  They are nice and heavy too...sort of like some type of stone or something.  Do yourself a favor and just buy one piece to try it out, but at the low prices you should just buy a set
One Happy Puppy!. My dog Abby loves this duck.  She runs around the house with it in her mouth and she loves to make it quack.
Love the look, love the toast. The English take their toast seriously, and while I don't share their affinity for beans on toast for breakfast, I lusted after this gorgeous piece of appliance art at Williams-Sonoma for years.  About seven years ago, when the dollar was still strong versus the British pound, I bought the 2+2 combi model by mail from a restaurant supplier in the UK for about $100 less than the then-going US price.  While it's a bit dicey fitting thick-cut bagels into the slots (not a big bread item in the UK), I solve the problem by using the sandwich baskets to contain them.  The toasting is even, and I actually the enjoy the old-fashioned timer without pop-up, which keeps the toast warm while the rest of breakfast is being assembled.  Unlike others, I do not unplug it after each use.  Never had a problem.  The crumb tray is terrific, and actually does catch every bit of crumb without a mess.  I've had the $100 Krups and Cuisinart models, which burned out within two years.  This one is made for restaurant use, and I expect it to last a lifetime.  Worth every penny, if you appreciate high-end kitchen appliances and tools
Love this baker. I recently replaced my Pyrex because of safety concerns based on my experiences with a piece exploding.  I purchased several Chantal items after looking at ceramic and stoneware bakers that were much more expensive. Because of the price I decided to try a few pieces and see what happened.I am glad I did because I love all my Chantal bakeware and this baker is by far my favorite.  I like to cook on Saturdays and I usually find myself baking 3 to 4 main dishes (like chicken, pork chops, caserole,etc.) that will last a few days.  That way during the week I can alternate main dishes and only have to make sides/deserts.I purchased two of these and a couple of smaller pieces and they fit toether well for storage.  Food cooks evenly (I always check with a meat thermometer) for example chicken in the middle of the pan gets heated just as thoroughly as food on the sides.  These pans look nice enough for serving at the table and clean up like a breeze.  If you soak it the residue gets so loose that cleaning it only requires minimal effort.   I am very pleased with this purchase it was well worth the money
Mine is 20+ years young and still going strong. Have never gotten it sharpened, and just give it a quick treatment with the honing steal before and after use.  It's still sharp enough to cut a finger off, if you are not paying attention.  The blade does flex and this may be somewhat of an advantage when carving poultry.  The tip has bent so keep in mind this is a carver, rather than having the heft of a chef's knife.  I have the filet knife, paring knife and honing steel in this set.  I really have no complaints about any of the Henckels 4-star line
Polder 716204 Deluxe Bread Bin. Very nice bread bin!  I was pleasantly surprised that the stainless steel bread bin matched my Cuisinart items (coffee maker, toaster oven) perfectly.  The finish is a brushed stainless rather than "shiny" stainless.  It looks very nice on my counter top - much nicer than the old bread basket with bread hanging out everywhere.  It's also very roomy.  I also like the cutting board, as I'm forever digging under my kitchen cabits for a cutting board!
Banana Tree and Fruit Bowl - (Silver). I bought this for my boyfriend's sister as I'd broken her old banana tree.  I holds 2 bunches of bananas easily and a whole box of clementines (I think it's a 3 or 4 pound box) in the bowl!!!  It fits between the cabinetcabinets on the counter of her kitchen, and looks GREAT!  Everyone (her, her kids, her husband, my boyfriend and I) loves it
Great Leash. This is a great item for any night walker.  Blight enough for car drivers to notice you are crossing the street.  I don't recommend the blinking type.  Those are very annoying.  I highly recommend the one with solid light.  I've tried the glow in the dark leash.  The light stop glowing before I could finish the walk.  Worst part is, they are double the price of the much better Atomic leash.  5 stars
A "Must Have" For Your Puppy. This washable cedar bedding fits in the Pet Gear Home 'N Go soft sided pet crate, and the manufacturers really should have included it with the crate. Don't buy the crate without also purchasing this necessary padding. The combo makes a great "starter home" for your new puppy
Dont Pay More. This is a great cheap decanter.  Don't waste your money on a more expensive brand/model
Absolutely the BEST. Simply put, an awesome churn for home-made ice cream.  I have an old hand-crank that I had always used to make the best ice cream, but it was a lot of work - churning fast at the beginning and then slowing down as the cream transformed.  With this churn, the motor is variable in its speed and churns at an excellent fast speed to begin; then, as the cream solidifies and freezes, the motor changes pitch and slows down to give you a wonderfully whipped and smooth cream.  I even made ice cream using just whole milk and peppermint sticks and it still turned out great.  Highly recommended and much better than any other electric churn you can buy.  I've had two other electric churns - neither of them could hold a candle to the White Mountain
Classy and Delicate. I love the reidel line of wine glasses, both stemless and with stems.  They are delicate though so not for the clumsy (although maybe stemless is better for the klutz since it has less opportunity to fall over).  They make great gifts
A Nice Simple Design. Nice, retro design- really great colors (I opted for the apple green). My only wish is that it were a bit more powerful. It is perfect for making smoothies, which was why I bought it
EXCELLENT QUALITY. I was pleasantly surprised at the quality of this roaster, considering the price. It's also larger than I had imagined and will easily hold a good-sized turkey.  The first meal I made in it was roast beef with vegetables and it tasted great and cleaned up easily.Don't let the word "aluminum" deceive you; this roaster is "cast aluminum" and is therefore VERY heavy. I'd guess it's pretty much indestructible
Nice set. I really enjoy the size, weight, and form of this silverware set ... The main fork is a little big ... but the salad forks more than suffice ..
Great sheets. I was very pleased with these sheets - in fact they are on my bed right now.  They do come out of the dryer a little wrinkled, but once they are are the bed, it does not afect the way they feel at all. I love comfortable and that is the way these sheets feel to me. I bought the queen size sheets and the fit was great. I would happily purchase these again
Good Quality. This is a very nice cotton balnket and I have been very pleased with it
It works perfectly. Among many scales that I looked at before I got this one, Cuisinart was one of the smallest, and it fits on our counter without taking too much space. The weighting tray is removable, and easy to clean. So far so good.
Fabulous Espresso, Lattes, Cappucinos for a Great Price. I bought the DeLonghi Bar 85 (?) a little over a year ago. While a nice little machine that made excellent espresso, you do get what you pay for. The plastic frother attachment would wear down and become ineffective.  Finally, a little over a year after purchase, the boiler died.   So, I decided to bite the bullet and get a higher-priced version.  I was not disappointed!  The stainless frother attachment is super quiet and easy to clean.  I love Illy e.s.e. pods and looked for a machine that would accommodate these - no mess, no fuss on busy work days!  Great crema, quiet machine, and overall nice look.  It is a little big, and the water tank is a little difficult to pull up (especially if it is stored under the cabinets on the counter, like mine), but it is not a big deal.  My good friends have a $1300 machine, and I have to say this produces the same quality espresso, takes up less counter space, and is a better value.  Buy it - you won't be disappointed
A great buy. I wanted a big frying pan for the dozen or so times a year I  make a lot of potstickers, latkes, or even French toast.  We had something like this when I was a kid and it saw an awful lot of use. Surely, I reasoned, Grandma would not have overpaid for a frying pan, and I didn't want to, either.This pan has a nonstick surface which I initially thought would preclude getting a nice crispy finish.  I found that with an adequate amount of oil you get beautifully browned, crisp edges.It's deep enough for frying chicken.The controls are easy to read and use. There is a totally coherent instruction booklet. The pan is dishwasher-safe. The  lid fits securely. The plastic legs/handles, although reasonably sturdy, are likely the weak spot; but if they break the Presto company sells replacements.I plan to use mine whenever an extra-large fry pan is called for. This is a very nice item; one's grandmother would not think is frivolous but, instead, very practical. I recommend this simple and useful pan
Love the remote hygrometer. I've had other humidifiers, but this is my favorite.  The digital hygrometer prevents over-humidifying (I've ruined the paint on my bedroom wall several times when other humidifiers over-humidified the room overnight).  Also like the easy to clean heating element.  Finally, I had the reset problem that other reviewers discussed, but when I read the owner's manual more closely, I realized that the reason for my problem was that I was not waiting for the water to filter through the system before starting it (the owner's manual recommends waiting 5 minutes between filling and running the machine).  Don't know if the problem other reviewers had was different than this; if so I haven't had the problem they've had.  I love that I can leave this humidifier running "unattended" and not worry that I'm going to have to get out the paint rollers again
Good product. Gave this salt crock as a gift and it met all of my expectations.  It was a nice size for the kitchen unlike some of the larger ones.  Overall I am satified with this purchase
Happy with purchase. Received ontime and in like new condition, works well and we like it alot
Malfunctioned within a year. While i loved the features of this timer, especially the ability to run multiple countdowns at once (i bake a lot and varying baking times require concurrent timers to prevent errors), my unit started freezing (apparently a common problem with this model) after about 6 months of use.  The buttons are indeed flimsy and pressing them a little to hard often would cause the unit to reset itself, losing any and all countdowns already in progress.this unit was not inexpensive... i'd rather have separate 'single' timers next time, especially a model not know for freezing up.I dot NOT recommend this time
Good, Bad & Ugly. It works REALLY WELL.Downside?Consumes a lot of electricity - so use on the really cold nights.  Not for full-time, sole heating use, in my opinion, but still cheap as a spot heater, when needed.Noise? Not too bad, and not nearly as loud as other reviews have noted.  Acceptable.We looked and looked, comparing numerous products, and frankly, we're very satisfied.Quality?  Good.  Well made and a bargain at this price when compared to more expensive, feature-deprived competitors.Oh, it's NOT ugly.  :-)  Fits most rooms' decor
This is the best deal - love it love it. We have researched and researched and finally took the plunge on this 10-cup neuro fuzzy cooker.  And we absolutley love it.  We eat rice at least twice a week and it is soooo easy to use and clean.  It is easy to cook 2 cup of rice on this even  though we bought the larger model for when we entertain.  My hubbie loves it and he used to be the 'minute rice' man.... and now loves the taste of the jasmine rice cooked proper.  He is a convert as he was harder to convince than me.I guarantee that if you love to cook rice and have hated the experiences of cleaning and under/over cooked rice .. you will not regret buying this appliance.  The rice comes out perfectly everytime from jasmine, basmati and brown rice.  This is the best out there... though dont go for the cheaper alternatives ,, you get what you pay for that is what my dad taught me and he has never been wrong.
I love this spatula - won't melt. Nothing quite like a melted spatula you left in chocolate or caramel a bit too long.  This one won't melt - it's very sturdy but be warned &quot;large&quot; means LARGE.  You can't stick it into a can of evaporated milk or tomato paste very well to scrape out the sides.  I'd recommend buying both small and large - trust me you'll love both
good vacuum for the money. I've bought 3 or 4 vacuums during the last 10 years.  They've all worked okay, but there was always something that could be improved upon.  This one had features that appealed to my personal needs.  Number one was the suction power.  I've had vacuums that had more power, but wouldn't pick up a feather if it wasn't stuck just right.  This one picks up everything.  Number two was I prefer bags rather than emptying a container.  No mess.  This model had something I'd never had before which I find great, and that is the dirt indicator.  I have a motorhome which I thought I thoroughly clean every time. It took me 45 minutes the first time to clean that small area to the point the indicator light stayed green. I'm happy with it now and if it lasts for a few years, I'll have considered it a good deal
Just what I had been searching for. The first order for this arrived damaged and had to be sent back and replaced.  The second shipment arrived in better shape and is exactly what I was searching for.  However, it had a broken shelf which was replaced.  I am a very satisfied customer as the cabinet was exactly what I wanted, however I was disatisifed with the packaging and shippment process due to the damage ... although I must admit, the company was very responsive to my return and replacement needs
Very practical!. These may not be a cute as the tabletop salt and pepper shakers (the smaller round ones) but let me tell you that having the handles makes a world of difference when it comes to cooking.  You know the moment that I am talking about....your hands are covered in whatever you are making (flour, butter,chicken juice, ect.) or they are already pre-occupied by the spoon, oven-mitt, pot, or pan you might be tending to but you still need a little more salt.  What do you do?  You grab the handle...thats what it's there for, and you need not worry about it slipping out of your hands and onto the floor or into your food
Wonderful design, and it works well. The design itself is what made me purchase this item. I like the fact that it had a wider bottem than others which causes it to look much nicer when the wine poors down the sides. I highly reccomend this product for wine enthusiasts, and for non-wine enthusiasts it's still a nice purchase for you're table. I guarantee you will get many comments on it
Great pan!. Yes, it's a REALLY big pan!  A perfect cookware addition for the serious cook.  Surprisingly, the pan isn't as heavy as I expected and is a manageable size.  It will easily saute 6 to 8 chicken breasts at once without crowding and is perfect for large batches.  It heats evenly and lives up to the All-Clad quality I expected.  Easy cleanup, too!  Highly recommended
A great training tool. I have a stubborn dog and this worked great.  I tried it on my self and it didn't really hurt as much as it was just startling and there were no after effects from the shock (no lasting pain of any kind).  I am ordering another one for my second dog
My clothes are saved. I am very pleased with this product. My dress shirts and pants are finally saved from touching the floor in my closet (huge pet peeve of mine). I also didn't realize how much more space I created in my closet, now I don't have to take up the extra closet space in the guest room
Really Great Measuring Spoons. I really bought these measuring spoons to match the Michael Graves measuring cups that I was planning to buy, and I am sure glad that I did.  The are the easiest to use measuring spoons that I have ever used.  The unique handles seem just right.  You can use them equally well with either hand.  It seemed with the dipper type spoons that I previously used I was always changing hands, and the spoon was always in th wrong hand.  With these you can forget that.  You can tell the size of each of them just by looking at them, but I wish that they would have embossed the sizes all a little larger and painted them white.  Black on black is hard to see, especially when the numbers are so small
A very sharp Knife. This is a great little knife.  It if very sharp from the factory and has kept its edge nicely.  The handle has a ridge that runs the length.  This makes it a little more comfortable than a completely cylindrical handle.  This is my girlfriend's favorite knife.  She reaches for it when doing small chopping jobs like herbs and onions.  It is very maneuverable and has a good heft for a small knife.  The blade is thick and makes such a small knife deceivingly useful.  I am a bigger guy and I usually use a 6" knife, but I find myself reaching for this knife more often.A disadvantage to it being so think a blade is that it cannot double as a paring knife.  More delicate cuts, like thinly slicing tomatoes, are difficult because the thick blade pushes the tomato slices out.Overall, this is a very fine knife for the price.  Ergonomics on the handle are hit or miss.  I like the handle and so does my girlfriend but a few people have said it didn't fit right in their hand.  I would say those are the minority of people who have used this knife.  If you like to choke up on your knives this may be less comfortable on this knife than others as the round, blunt ending where the shaft meets the handle is not easily pinched when gripped in this way.
Great littke heater!!. If you want a heater for a small space this is the one you want. I have a back pantry and laundry area, about 12'x 12', that gets quite cold in the winter. This little heater does the trick. The first time I put it out, I cranked it on high and after a few hours I had to lower the temperature and put it on a lower setting.Be warned, that there is a slight odor when you first plug this unit in. The directions will warn you if you read them. It dissipates after a few hours.This is natural with ALL heating elements. It is very similar to what happens when you buy your first slow cooker.This is the first unit I have owned for the house. I have a second unit in my barn. I like the feel of radiator heat. There is no dry air or ozone smell that occurs like when you purchase a ceramic heater. I highly recomend this unit
Pressure Canner does its job. My wife has used this canner several times since purchase and it works just great.  We already have an older model but she wanted two as she does a lot of canning.  This item should last forever
Z Garment Rack Commercial Grade. This rack was very easy to assemble. The unit is very stable and moves very easy with the wheels. It will hold lots of clothes and is not under any strain to do so. I would recommend this to anyone needing additional hanging space
Works great. Compared to other siphons, I like this one because of the pump. The material it is made of is not the most durable when compared to the other siphons. Since I only use it every other week, I don't think that durabilty will be an issue. I saw this item at some of the big chain stores for a much cheaper price.
The best quick bread loaf pans ever!. This pan is a must have if you make quick bread (banana bread, pumpkin bread, etc.). It bakes MUCH more evenly than a non-stick pan. The loaves are spaced evenly apart to allow for even cooking. You will get nice, evenly moist loaves of bread with no hard, dry crust. Lightly grease the pans to prevent sticking and cleanup is a breeze. This pan is the best. Seriously. I have two and I love them.
Best cup ever!. Best cup ever! Keeps your drinks warm for hours. Fits in my drink holder in my truck. Brews a good cup of coffee
Bladed Steel Cheese Slicer. I have purchased nearly a dozen cheese slicers in the past, all with wire cutters on them, and every one has failed within a year because the wire breaks or corrodes. This is the first cheese slicer I've found with a solid blade in place of the wire for cutting. It cuts nearly as well as a wire does and has the distinct advantage of being nearly indestructible. It can also be cleaned in the dish washer and is easy to clean by hand. I bought three - one for me and one for each of my grown children, all of whom love to slice block cheese for various snacks. Thanks, Amazon, for stocking this great cheese slicer
Great Product!!  Works for me!!!. Wow!!! When I saw this light and simple design, I was not sure what to expect. I used this for an entire day, working on a paper with my laptop. It really did keep my lap totally cool! It's light and comfortable! I also set the Lapinator Plus on the couch with my laptop on it. That worked like a charm, too! The underside of the Lapinator never felt hot to the touch.  My laptop doesn't shift at all, whether it's on my lap, the couch or the bed.  This is a great product, and worth the price, in my humble opinion! It's plenty sturdy without being heavy, yet it is not flimsy at all.  What an achievement in design and construction!
Works Perfectly. I didn't realize that I had ordered the unseasoned pan until after it had been shipped. No matter! It arrived midmorning today, and it took all of 90 minutes to season the thing according to Lodge's intstructions.I then cooked a batch of cornbread according to recipe on the back of the Alber's cornmeal box. I left the pan in the oven to preheat, and when the oven reached 400 I removed the pan, shot it with cooking spray, poured in the batter and sat back for 20 minutes. The result was perfect cornbread: the wedges popped right out of the pan without sticking at all. The hot set-up would be to have 2 of these pans- that would equal one standard cornbread recipe.  Excellent! And for only 10 bucks!
Good coffee pot, but... I have owned this coffee pot for a few years now.  Overall it is good.  The biggest problem is that the grinding is so loud, that it will wake the dead.  If you live in an apartment, condo or townhome, you probably do not want to get one of these.  It will wake up your neighbor
Soft with a good fit. We are verry satisfied with our Pinzon sheets, we had pruchased other more expensive sheets in the past and these were just as good if not better than the fancy name brand.  The two things that were a deciding factor in my purchase were the free shipping and the depth of the pockets, when the sheets arrived I was more than happy as they fit our pillow top matrice quite well and were ever so soft, I was looking for deep pocket sheets and these didn't say that in the description so I was not sure how they would fit. I have since purchased several more sets from Pinzion, including many of their plad ones.  Here in Alaska there is nothing better than a set of soft, warm, flannel sheets on a cold winter night. They are nice in the summer as well
Great Icecream maker!. I have owned this icecream maker for a few months now. Its great way to prepare homemade delicious icecreams.... Its available at Costco for $50. Its noisy but it makes great icecream in less than 30 minutes. Just like other icecream makers from Cuisinart, the consistency of the icecream is like a soft serve. So, if you like you can keep the prepared batch  in the freezer for few hours. This item is definitely a great gift for icecream lovers!! Enjo
Riedel. These glasses make a world of difference in the taste of your wine.  Compared to retail department stores, Amazon offers a very nice price for them
Great...but not for soft cereals. I love this item, it looks great in my kitchen. Very sturdy! My only complaint is even though the rubber that turns inside to move the food is very soft it will still make a mess of cereals such as apple jacks. Looks awesome with coffee beans though
Love This Griddle. I absolutely love this griddle.  Pancakes come out perfect.  I grilled boneless chicken on it;  it came out very tender and didn't dry out.  It's so easy to clean.  Definitely worth the money I spent
Can't Stop Makin' Tarts!. This is a great tart pan if you like to make deep dish quiches, etc.  The false bottom comes in handy for  easy removal of the tart, but be careful when loading it into the oven!  While the sides of the pan are non-stick,  the bottom is not.  The sides and bottom should be buttered well.  I would  reccomend this pan to anybody who has always wanted to made tarts
Fuctional and easy to use. I bought this item over a year ago, and I use it almost everyday to make sugar free sodas. It has never failed, and is quite easy to use. I am planning on buying another one soon, just so that I can have a different color
not a bad find. Since it was a gift I did not mind spending the money on this set. Even though I may have found it somewhere else for a bit less. It is the exact color scheme I was looking for.  They were shipped almost immediately. They are cotton and fairly absorbent, so definately functional as well as pretty
Great Cookware. This cookware is nice and heavy and sturdy. It heats much faster than the cheaper cookware we had before. It also heats very evenly. The only negative thing I have to say is that the food sticks to these pans quite a bit more than it would in teflon. However I think that one negative is greatly outweighed by the positive and a little oil or Pam fixes the problem
Great!. This contact grill-panini grill is great!  We moved into a 3rd floor condo without a place for outside cooking but since we bought this grill I can't say we miss it. This grill heats up extremely well, something my several George Foreman grills didn't do.  We like it for steaks and hamburgers, my husband says the ones I do are as good as he did on the grill.  It is also very fast; we grill thin steaks in 2-3 minutes; it took 10 minutes on our gas grill. We also like it for grilled sandwiches like Reubens; the bread comes out crisp and the center is completely heated through.  We like the temperature choices.  It doesn't have removeable plates - nothing to break!  They wash off easily; I put wet paper towels in it and let it sit while we eat.  I would recommend it to anyone - look for it in the warehouse stores as well.
Very Nice Pans. Very Nice Quality Pans.  I got these pans and have yet to use them. They are nice quality and I will be excited to use them with my christmas baking next year. They don't recommend dishwasher use which is a disappointment to me but other than that they appear great.  Will work great for regular cookies and bars as well
NIce But Deadly!. We opened these little bundles of joy early for a Christmas party. My 62 year old room mate was delighted with the thought of having her own cocktail shaker....and a pretty one too! Moments later the joy was shattered (which it often is) by the slicing of flesh and an ensuing bloodbath followed. Laughing hysterically at this funny but painful folly, i decided to put the top on her cocktail shaker myself. To my utter amazement and sheer surprise i too sliced my finger open! thank goodness our trusty manservant was on hand to administer bandages and comforting words! So let this be a warning to you. BE CARFUL THE LIDS ARE SHARP!! A special thank you to Brabinger, the butler. (There IS a reason why people should not be mixing their own drinks and should rely on a trained professional!
Great shakers. The stove top salt and pepper shakers are exactly what I wanted.  I am using them to cook with.  They are big enough to hold a lot and so convenient.  I was tired of having to open the cabinet and look for the big salt and pepper boxes.  They look so nice in my kitchen.  The plastic covers are a bonus. I haven't used the plastic covers yet, but have them put away in a cabinet in case I need them for storage reasons. Smart move by the makers of these.  I am 100% pleased and highly recommend these salt and pepper shakers to others
Great Bowls. These bowls are really great. I have been watching and learning about Fiesta for a long time. This was my first Fiestaware purchase. I will be getting more!!
Mini Loaf Pans. These pans are the right size for baking individual items to take to work during the holidays
THE BEST PILLOW EVER!!. Really, this pillow is perfect in every way.  I have had neck pain so long i lost track. I found this on amazon, ordered 2 and what a great idea. If you have any type of neck pain YOU NEED THIS PILLOW
Superb ice crusher. This ice crusher is just EXACTLY what I wanted for my home bar. I positively did NOT want an ice shaver, which seems to be all the rage today. The size of the crushed ice pieces are much larger than shaved ice and perfect for drinks. The only limitation I have found is that you must not feed the cubes in too rapidly, which is not a problem. I am EXTREMELY pleased with this crusher and recommend it highly for drinks, shrimp cocktails, etc.
Doggie Gate. The quality of this product is very nice.  It's not as high as we thought it would be, but it will satisfy our needs for keeping our pet enclosed in our kitchen area, when we are gone.  Our neighbor will be tending to our dog (while on vacation)and we needed a gate for a wide doorway
pretty alright. This little scale does the trick. Nothing fancy just simple to the point weighing of the goods. Its nice to have the storage container but I never really use it. I just like to know its an opption
REMOVED SMOKE FROM BEDROOM. THE PEOPLE NEXT DOOR AND ABOVE ME IN MY APARTMENT BUILDING SMOKE.  I TRIED EVERYTHING FROM LIGHTING INSCENCE, BUYING 2 FILTER PRODUCTS. THEY WORKED A LITTLE WHILE, BUT I HAD TO KEEP CHANGING THE FILTERS.  EXPENSIVE?  I DECIDED TO BUY SOMETHING TO BLOW THE SMOKE OUTDOORS.  I WAS READY TO MOVE. THANK GOD FOR THIS FAN. IT BLOWS SMOKE AND ALL OTHER ODERS OUTSIDE. THE MINUTE I TURN IT OFF THE SMOKE INSTANTLY RETURNS.  THIS IS A GREAT PRODUCT.
Aerolatte review. It works great.  The travel one is all you really need, forget those other self-standing more expensive models
Super price for a super pot. Calphalon is always one of my favorite cooking pots.  This pot is great for chili but any stew or just cooking pasta or pierogies.  Great siz
Great convienence. Got this a couple of days ago and I couldn't be happier. Its quite and does a great job. It will only do small loads, so don't think your putting 5 pairs of jeans in. Make sure you install the bottom plate correctly otherwise it will sound like a jackhammer. The plate should stick out, not go into the bottom. Also if you need to move it, i recommend buying the rolling art from Lowe's for 25 bucks
Couldn't be happier with Global knives!. I muddled along for years with a collection of mismatched and mostly blunt kitchen knives before I found Global knives.  They are very, very good.  They hold an edge beautifully, are well balanced and with the solid handle and blade construction are hygienic and a breeze to clean.  Incredible value being in the medium price range.  I have a good collection of these now and expect to get many years of service out of them. I bought the Mina sharpener device too.  Works perfectly
Beautiful but........ Definitely focuses the flavor and aroma of the finest Hermitage, shiraz , etc......but the the glasses do not feel as delicate, and refined as my other sommelier series do. Maybe because they are hand made? I compared the ones I bought on amazon to another set at a local store. The glasses at the store felt lighter . Otherwise, the glasses are excellent!  Go figure? Oh, and there was a small bubble on one of the glasses. Not a distraction after filled with wine, but ..............$60.00 a glass !!
Great Frozen Pizza Plate. My husband and I fight over this plate when we have frozen pizza. A Tombstone pizza fits great on this plate
Finally!. Finally, a coffeemaker that works and is easy to operate.  It's clean too, no nooks and crannies to gunk up with coffee residue.  The blue light is nice at night, it alluminates the kitchen just enough, so that i won't run into anything.  But most of all the coffee is brewed to perfection everytime.  I have used it at least 20 times and it's a breeze to clean.  I love this machine.  thank you.Denis
Excellent Knife Sharpener. We have 1 expensive knife and several cheaper knives.  This sharpener does an excellent job of sharpening all our knives
buy from Witbecks. Miele makes a great vacuum and this is one for sure.  But I want to recommend the seller WItbecks--wonderfully personalized and caring service from someone whose last name is actually Witbecks.  When DHL screwed up their delivery (an immensely crappy organization, but that's another story), he stepped in and sent another unit without delay.  Terrific guy, terrific price, terrific service
Choose your sweeper wisely. This sweeper is exactly what one would expect for $24.  It does a fairly good job of picking up pieces of things, though isn't a choice option for things like pet hair (unless you really want a workout.)  Also, it's best for smoother rug textures.Why do I own this?  My toddler is scared of the vacuum, yet scatters Cheerios liberally across the carpet.  This lets me get the worst of the mess while she's awake so less gets ground in.  Also, the handle comes in 4 slide-together sections.  We're currently using only 2 sections so that my daughter can "help" as the mood hits.  So far, so good!  I give this 4 stars because, like most things, it works ~slightly~ less well than one might wish
Best trash can Ive ever had. I love this trash can. It works perfectly. All you have to do when it arrives is pull it out of the box, put the batteries in, put a trash bag in and yoy are ready to go. There is a ring inside the trash can that holds your liner in place. Just simply wave your hand over the front and the lid comes open and closes by itself. It is a little noisy but I have teenagers so if the lid is opening then I know they have eaten something. lol..... Anyway enjoy the trashcan. Well worth the money!
Disney Cars Microbead Pillow. I ordered this for my son for Christmas. He loves it! The service is great, and the quality is also
Jerky Lover's Treat. It is excellent for making jerkies from ground up meat.  I am a vegetarian but I bought this tool to make "dog treats."  It is very easy to use and it really makes good jerky (that's what my dogs tell me)
I don't use them for canning... ...I use them with my FoodSaver vacuum sealer!  These jars are perfect for anything from grated cheese, flour, sugar, nuts, oats, cereal, chips - anything you can think of that is bulky.They work exceptionally well with grated cheese - I like to buy 2lb blocks of Tillamook cheddar, get out the food processor and grate the whole block.  Then store in the jars in the fridge.  Vacuum sealed, the grated cheese will keep for over a month easy, without drying out or molding.  Cheaper than the pre-grated, and less preservatives too.Love my wide-mouth jar attachment in conjunction with these Ball canning jars..
Wonderful Set- I love it!!!. You wont find corelle sets easily in stores. But Amazon is selling almost all varieties of sets at reasonable price!! I bought mixing bowls and the 16 piece set along with this 7 piece set!! Its wonderful even for gift!! I loved my set very much
lenox holiday china. I am so thrilled with this purchase that I still have a place setting out to look at! The price was fantastic and the delivery excellent. Amazon came through again! I am now hoping to buy other pieces
Great knife!!. So sharp I almost cut my cutting board in half!!  Love it!
Results about my 1st internet shopping experience. The merchandise purchased was to be a wedding shower gift.  When I received it I found minor damage and contacted the shipper who requested it's return.  The replacement merchandise was in perfect condition and I happily gift wrapped it and forwarded it to the future bride.  I have not had an acknowledgement to date and hope that it arrived in good condition.  I am totally satisfied with service I received
Snow Cone Accessory Kit. It is everyhting I expected it to be and I appreciate the promptness in shipping it I received it yesterday 8/
good. It's the first slow cooker I've owned and I have cooked one meal with it only, today, but I like it already.  It's $20 and it's basic (no power light for example, which feels odd for any kitchen device) but it has a good quality internal white ceramic pot and glass lid.  Three settings - keep warm, low, and high - and nothing else (no timer, no automatic way to switch from cook to keep warm).  I had read that some slow cooker lids rattle while they're cooking, but happily that problem did not show up, on low cooking anyway.  I cooked a meal for eight hours, and it did not show any signs of drying out, so I think it will be fine for leaving on low heat during the work day.   The internal pot lifts out for serving, and it cleaned up immediately I put it in hot soapy water.  Size is fine for two or three servings.  I'm now kind of glad I could not get the Breville slow cooker (good reviews but much bigger, and out of production) and opted for this because it's small and simple but it does the job!
Excellent Economical Pizza Peel. I bought this pizza peel for my son who is really getting serious about making Pizzas, from scratch, at home.  And I can say that it is serving him [and us] very well. The aluminum blade is sturdy, and well sized for a 16" pizza. The handle is just about the perfect length for working in a home kitchen.  The materials in its construction are not exotic, but the peel is very well made with the blade firmly riveted to the ferrule, and the handle firmly and well crimped into the other end of the ferrule.  Delivery was very prompt.  An excellent value and a welcome addition to our kitchen
Amazing Brew. This machine made the best coffee I have had in the States, the layer on top that is produced is reminiscent of the coffee I had in Italy.  I would recommend this machine to any and everyone
Quick shipping. Shipping was quick.  The product was great.  It was a gift for my sister and she loved it
Very pleased!. I read the reviews here before I purchased this and they were right on.  I placed this under a 8X10 in my living room which sees a lot of foot traffic.  This was an area rug on Berber carpet. Before this, the rug moved constantly and we were always pulling it back to where it should have been.  Since placing this, we may only make a slight adjustment every now and then.  So, the product is well worth it.  Footnote:  I now have a thick pile nylon carpet and it moves even less
Cheese Knife. This cheese knife is very good quality, and every bit as good (if not better than) as our Cutco cheese knife, which cost many times more.  The design is similar to the Cutco knife in that it has holes in the blade to keep resistance down while cutting the cheese.  It cuts smoothly and effortlessly, and there are no wires that keep working loose (as in wire cheese cutters).  I bought extra ones to give as gifts, and everyone loves them
Has worked very well for me... I realize some other reviewers have had problems, but I haven't. This is my go-to turner, and it has held up very well. Strong enough for weighty items, but thin enough to easily slip under pretty much anything. The nylon has served me well with my non-stick pans
Durable but perhaps too heavy. As the description describes, this salt and pepper shaker set is stable and durable especially in the dishwasher. However, if one fills each shaker to capacity they become quite heavy, perhaps too heavy to be passed comfortably at dinner. The shakers are not demarcated and the head design is such that they would look substantially similar. One shaker has four holes and the other has three thus it become confusing as to which condiment is in which container. Still though, I will take durability over the other drawbacks
Great Water - lousy fit. I've changed out shower heads all by my little lonesome uncountable times over the years. I cannot get this attached without it leaking at the connection to the pipe and what appears to be a leak where the housing screws on on the unit itself. That said, I still have reasonable water pressure and here's the amazing thing, my relatively coarse hair is no longer coarse without putting any number of silicone products on it. Who knew that for all my life, it was the water, not my hair. My skin is not as dried out...if I could work out the little glitches, it would be perfect. I own the counter top unit in the kitchen and it's fab for the price!
Excellent Value. I want to start off by saying that any review is relative to the consumers past experience.  Before getting this knife I was working from a cheap knife set so I won't profess that my opinion is going to be relevant when compared to other high quality knives.  For me the price was great and after using it I really appreciate how crappy the knives in my old set are.  It's amazing how much more enjoyable cooking is when you have quality tools.  So, if you're upgrading from a crappy set of knives you won't be disappointed.  If you already have a good set of knives and you're looking to replace one of them with this please read another review
Use for casseroles, cakes, or roasting. Le Creuset manufactures porcelain enameled cast iron cooking vessels as well as other quality products. These cooking vessels are cast from molten iron poured in sand moulds which are used only once. For this reason, one pan may look like another, but each is unique in its own way.Cast iron is a highly efficient material which absorbs and distributes heat. Due to this efficiency, it is recommended that cooking with cast iron is done on low to medium heat.  Remove cast iron from the heat and it does not cool off quickly. This helps your food stay warm while serving. Beware; iron tends to be heavy so these cooking vessels tend to be heavier than other pans made from alternate materials.Cast iron is an effective material for cooking so why cover it with enamel? Iron tends to rust; iron oxide (rust) doesn't add any complimentary flavors to your food. If your cast iron cooking vessel was not enameled, you would have to season and maintain its cooking surface. Adding the porcelain enamel not only looks good, but has multiple benefits. The enamel, being a solid coating, is one of the most hygienic surfaces to cook on, does not stain, absorb odors, retain flavors, and is easy to clean. The enamel can be damaged, so limit contact to wood or plastic utensils to eliminate the scratching and scoring the porcelain.The benefits of cooking with Le Creuset cast iron are many, but lets get down to the roasting pan specifically. This pan holds 2 1/2 quarts of food, measures 7 3/4 x 11 1/2 inches internally, and weighs 6 1/2 pounds. 2 1/2 quarts is not a lot of space when it comes to casseroles, so consider your recipes when determining the size you need. This may be the pan for families from 2-4. Except for roasts, the roasting pan tends to do best if at least 3/4 full. Any less and you may overwhelm your food with heat evenly dispersed in the pot.I find that the cast iron adds a crispy texture to food that may be desirable with a dish like mac-n-cheese, while not so desirable for other dishes.  Add the Le Creuset 7 1/2 x 9 inch roasting rack for roasting chickens and pork loins keeping them out of the grease.  Some other possibilities for this pan include casseroles, pork chops covered with cornbread dressing, dinner rolls, baked squash, scalloped potatoes, cobblers, pineapple upside down cake, or bread pudding. The possibilities almost seem endless to your imagination.One feature that people tend to complain about is the cost. The cost does seem steep compared to other pans made from other materials. Heck, cast iron doesn't seem like it should be expensive when comparing to that old cast iron pan past generations have used for cornbread and camping. However the manufacturing process requires making a mould for each and every pan produced. They then go through the enameling process before shipping these heavy pans. If you take what goes into making and distributing these high quality cast iron products, the cost tends to make sense. Then consider that this pan will easily last a lifetime when taken care of.PROS:Extremely versatileEfficient absorption and distribution of heatHygienic enamel cooking surfaceDoes not stain, absorb odors, or retain flavorsEasy to clean when not abused or misusedCan be transferred from stove top to the oven to the tableCan easily last a lifetimeCONS:Its heavy, as cast iron tends to be weighing in at about 6 1/2 pounds
So far, so good!. It's still brand new, so everything's working great.  I really love the color; I bought it to match my yellow standmixer.
Good product; good price. In comparison with other goose down king size pillows, this was a good price.  Product came quickly
Delightful. This beautiful suger bowl looks lovely when setting out your tea or coffee~ You can use it for sugar or for lemon wedges if you take your tea with lemon :
Great Quality backed by a Great Name. I got these as part of our wedding registry here on Amazon.I chose them because of the price, the name, and the number of pieces.  I recently opened it after the wedding and ... wow ... so many pieces in the box.  There's the 8 place settings, 5 serving pieces. Each place setting consists of: knife; fork; soup spoon; salad fork; teaspoon. Hostess set consists of: 6-inch sugar spoon; 7-inch butter knife; 8-1/2-inch serving fork; 8-1/4-inch solid serving spoon; 8-1/4-inch pierced serving spoon. 45 pieces total!  It was wonderful and handy when we had guests over and our regular place setting set didn't cut it.  After wash and use, when I put it next to my comparible-in-price-but-not-in-quality mikasa set I can really see the differece.  They have remained very shiny and no water marks or rust so far.I'm very happy with the selection
I love it!. We received one of these for Christmas and we can't stop using it.  This skillet heats up fast, is a great size for anything and absolutely nothing sticks to it!  It is perfect for making breakfasts which is why we are registering for another one for our upcoming wedding, that way everything we're making is all ready at the same time.  It also doubles as a buffet server which is always handy for entertaining.  I highly recommend one of these
Bathroom Wall Shelf. Well, considering that I was shipped the wrong item, this piece has worked out OK. The construction is solid, stable, sturdy and attractive. It was not difficult to assemble. I would have returned the item, but the price on this item was terrific...it would have cost more to return it than I paid for the shelf
Ionic Breeze - The Best. I originally spent the substantial amount to purchase two Ionic Breeze air purifiers given my allergies and I am a smoker. They were so effective I purchased a third along with another product claiming the same performance results.  The Ionic Breeze products far out perform the other products so I will continue to replace existing Ionic Breezes with the same, should the originals become non performing.  cmf, Happy Use
Good item -- but read the manual. For the poor folks who are complaining about the "EEE" display, I haven't had the same problems.  Customer support for this has been really professional and prompt at the 800 number.  The "EEE" problem is a result of people not reading the instructions about not immersing the control panel in water.  Don't do it.  The panel is electronic and electronics don't work when they're filled with water.This unit is a good, solid fryer which I've had no problems with.The pros:Easy to use, easy to clean up.  Nothing has baked to my frier or my friends friers (death by EEE).  Even when frying "trouble" items like pastry or breaded items, the basket comes clean easilly.  The controls have positive engagement and are hard to accidentally push.  The unit makes a loud beeping when buttons are pushed and has a distinctive alarm.  You shouldn't leave the frier unattended, but you have enough peace-of-mind that you can work on other things in the kitchen while the fryer is working.  Another bonus is that suggested cooking tempetures are printed right on the unit so when the manual gets lost, you have some idea what did what.  The window is also a lifesaver as it lets you see what the oil is doing just in case anything goes wrong.The cons:The power chord is the most annoying bit and can be plugged in upside down.  Don't do it.  It says "This side up" clearly on the chord, but if you are absent minded or have limited eyesight, this might be an issue.  The only other problem is that the controls (the power button) faces the frying basket.  This is more of a pet-peeve then anything but if you need to get control of the unit in a hurry, you do not want to be reaching through hot oil splatter.  My suggestion:  Keep it on it's own power strip so you have yet another button in case of emergency.  Sadly, this gripe applies to almost all friers.  I also wish the lid was a bit better designed, the lid drops the inevitable condensation from the water into the oil until you get used to tipping it out (towards the basket handle).  Once you get the hang of it, the condensation dropping into the oil can be avoided.This frier, despite a few minor shortcomings, is excellent.  One of the nice features is that it heats up quickly and can maintain that heat even when adding and pulling out food.  The caution to that is that when the oil is disagreeable, it heats up quickly.  Be sure to supervise the frier.  I managed to do the boneheaded thing of chopping up mushrooms, washing them, and tossing them in without thinking about it and managed to cause quite a show in the kitchen.  Had I actually read the manual, there's a blurb in there to make sure food is completely thawed and dried which I did not heed.If you respect the power here, it's a great unit
Great!!. I bought this Raclette grill to add to an existing collection.  I was a bit hesitant because I typically do not purchase Hamilton Beach products.  I have to say, I like this machine better than my other more expensive European models.  It certainly is great value for money and easy to use.  I highly recommend it!
Dogsitter extraordinaire!. I paid way more for this than the current sale price at my local pet store ($26).  My bull terrier puppy had surgery yesterday and we were struggling to find something to turn his attention away from the stitches.  I put treats through the other side and only put one of the treat balls on the one end, saving the second for later.  He did manage to finally dislodge the treat, but even eating that took longer than his Booda Bimples.  So overall I'm very happy.  After he finished the treat on the outside, he had to find a way to get the other treats on the inside.  He's a 50# bull terrier puppy, and the large suited him well.  I did not notice any issues with him being able to handle it.  The material is durable and dishwasher safe, so it will provide plenty of hours of fun and the quick convenience of the dishwasher.  Highly recommended
table top wine chiller. a great alternative to sticking a wine bottle in the freezer and then forgetting about it
Great Bowls. We are very particular about bowls, but I have to say these are fantastic.  They actually hold a lot and look great.  The only downside is that they are a little heavy.I am VERY happy with my purchase and plan on buying more
Cute, comfortable and lovable. I received my Mogu about 5 months ago and I've gone to sleep holding it ever since!They really are nice to hold.Would reccomend 100%
Great Table!. I have had this console table for about 2 years.  It was very easy to assemble, I just added a little wood glue while assembling the screws in.  It is very sturdy if you follow the instructions and add a little wood glue (inexpensive at any hardware store).  I preferred adding the wood glue because I did want it be sturdy.  It is a very nice neutral color that matches anything.  So far in the 2 years I have had it, nothing has gone wrong, it still is very nice
Macho Cheese Slicer. This is a hefty kitchen tool--large, heavy, chrome.  It fits comfortably in the hand and is easy to guide.  I'm not sure why there are three "thickness" settings, since I've always been able to cut both thin and thick slices with a grocery-store-type cheese slicer by simply changing the angle of my hand as I slice:  upright for thick slices, flatter for thin ones.  This slicer works very well for me, and I had no trouble removing and replacing the wire.  One slight inconvenience:  when I hand-wash the slicer, the roller (the "adjustable" part of it) always falls out and has to be put back in.  The slicer comes with a spare wire, and if you can remember where you store it, this unit should last for a long time.  I'd recommend it
this was a gift. I had this shipped to my mother.  She had no complaints
Great So Far. I bought this locally to replace an old Rival deep fryer that just quit. The first one I brought home had a broken brace on the heating element. It was exchanged with no problem and the second has no apparent defects. After reading all the negative reviews I wanted to use it at least once before the 14 day exchange period was up. Like others I went looking for this model because it was one Alton Brown liked. The features he liked were the large oil capacity, immersion element with high wattage, thermostat, filter, ease of cleanup, and stainless construction. All make it a desirable machine. Euro-Pro's iffy quality control makes it something of a gamble. I put 5 liters of oil in it and fried up some vegetables as an appetizer for dinner last night. So far this is a great fryer. I have had the Presto Fry Daddy's and the Rival this replaced. This unit is much closer to a professional fryer you would find in a restaurant kitchen. It heats up the oil fast and returns it to temperature very fast. Food comes out crispy and not greasy. I am very pleased with the unit but will withold final judgement until it has proven itself durable
happy with it!. works, looks good, fits in the fridge well enough....i'm happy with it :
Evaluation of order. The merchandise was received in excellent condition, well packed for shipment, and sent quickly after my order was placed.
WHISK. Good quality product.  Twirl whisks are much better than regular whisks for making puddings, soups, etc. that don't have "chunks" in the food
Satisfied user. The Hoover S3639 Wind Tunnel performed as expected. The longer hose and lock/unlock lever makes use easier. The cover over the attachments keeps them out of site and clean. I did not like the suction on the small beater bar attachment for carpeted stairs, better off just using the large one.
Great For A Wet Bar. This is a great small refrigerator.  The platinum and black finish add a touch of class.  I am currently using this refrigerator as an accessory to a wet bar that I just installed.  It fits perfect and keeps the beverages and other items very cold.  It is also very quiet which is a plus.  The only downfall is the spacing of the racks.  It was very difficult to stack anything vertically.  However, the door rack and can rack made up for it.  For the price, this is a great, classy, little refrigerator
Great skillet!. We were somewhat skeptical about buying a dual purpose skillet/griddle but after using found it to be the best!  We use the griddle all the time and like the deep skillet that provides for cooking large roasts
Grrreat!. This is a great dealk and I am very happy with the performance of this set.  Would certainly purchase from Pinzon again
It definately helped. Each year we board my mother's cat while she is on vacation, and each year so far she has gotten a urinary tract infection from holding in her urine for the first few days.  We also get issues with one of my own cats scent marking clean laundry and bedding.  This year my mother's cat never got a UTI, and we haven't had one single scent mark from the other cat.  It hasn't eliminated all the tension that exists between the cats but it definately makes the visit easier to bear
Magnetic knife holder. I purchased this knife holder for a commercial application in an upscale restaurant where the kitchen is visibile to my customers. I like it becuase: it works well (strong magnet will hold large blades including my 12" cleaver)it looks cool (leave it to the french) and my health dept. inspector liked it too because it is a cleanable (stainless steel) unit. It mounted easily and all shipping, etc. went smooth
EVERYTHING GOOD YOU HAVE HEARD ABOUT THIS CAN OPENER IS INVARIABLY TRUE! -- WOW!,. IN A NUTSHELL: THE GOLD STANDARD FOR THE PRICE OF TINAs can openers go - there are none better, but the fact that these are available for around $10. and last literally forever seems too good to be true. Nevertheless, it is true. Like many other people, we have tried a lot of different can openers, some electric some hand held, but we always come back to the one that has always been in our kitchen -- 'SWING-A-WAY'.WHAT MAKES THE 'SWING-A-WAY CAN OPENER' SUPERIOR TO OTHER CAN OPENERS?3 components contribute synergistically to Swing-A-Way's success;1]- Very durable Tempered Steel gears with a cutting edge that stays sharp literally forever.2]- Ample leverage provided by a large chrome-plated steel turn-key to assure enough torque into the gears to open any can simply by hand turning.3]- Plastic coated Steel handles that facilitate penetration of the can by the cutting edges with just ordinary hand pressure.WHY ARE THESE LONG LASTING SUPER CAN OPENERS SO INEXPENSIVE?With only several moving parts made of easily manufactured components that are sold on a huge scale worldwide, it costs very little to make this product despite its excellence.[I AM NOT AFFILIATED WITH ANY PRODUCT OR COMPANY BUT WE HAVE USED 'SWING-A-WAY' LITERALLY FOREVER WITH UNIFORMLY EXCELLENT RESULT
Very Good. I was looking for a air pot that would keep coffe hot in our office for 3 to 4 hours and and not have a glass liner, this has surpassed my expectations. I would recomend this air pot to anyone looking to have a hot cup of coffee
Great combo product. Makes a good cup of coffee and the espresso machine part is easy to use and does a good job.  I really like the built in milk frother.  As long as you rinse it right away it is easy to clean and makes perfectly frothed milk everytime!  The 1/5 feature allows you to make a half a pot of coffee that still tastes good
a very good sturdy choice. This step stool is very acceptable.  The only reason I gave it 4 stars is because I had to get used to it- when you step down the steps are not as staggered as you might expect.  However, it is very stable and locks in place
Egg poacher/ scrambled  eggs. This is exactly what I wanted. I use it to cook scrambled eggs that are round and fit on biscuits. My husband loves sausage, egg biscuits and when you use egg rings they are flat and you have to use oil. You fill this up half way,(no oil, so no fat) microwave for 1min 15 sec, wait 1 min. and you're ready. I put a paper towel inside and turn over. The eggs will stay warm for 10 to 15 min.  Easy to clean. Grea
Convenient, Tight lock. The container is easy to open and close but has a very secure seal to keep out any problem areas. We have seen containers fare less-than-well going through hurricanes and the aftermath (mold, bug infestations) but this comes through with a shining star
Wouldn't give it up for the world!. I've had my KitchenAid Pro series for about 4 years or so now, and use it at least once a week.  In culinary school I developed a bad habit of walking off to do some other project and forgetting about the machine, or putting too much in at once.  The pro series motor handles it all.  It's really a kitchen workhorse, whether your kitchen is a home or a professional one
Perfect  Can Opener. I wish I had one of these years ago. I could have saved a lot of money on all of those electrics that never really worked all that well and the handhelds that are just too ez to spill the contents of the can. Any one that can pick up a can will be able to use this thing, it doesnt require any superhuman strentgh and it will hold up even large cans, needs a good mounting surface, I have mine screwed to the side of my cabinet next to my sink. I think it is very well built and should last me my lifetime and then some. Sometimes the original is the best this is one of them
very good. I have both the "Black & Decker PKS150 Powered Kitchen Scrubber" and the other version that is not by Black & Decker, I'm referring to "Ultimate Scrubber".I find B&D scrubber much stronger and better then the ultimate scrubber.Pros = works great, strong.cons = takes 4 AA batteries that die out pretty quick, does not come with all the attachment it has, and the attachments are hard to find
excellent addition!. I love this butter dish!  I have looked at several and found this one to be the best quality and such a wonderful match to the naturewood collection.  It's a must have
Nice. This towels are probably what most would expect. They look nice and have become my preferred kitchen towel - I cook alot. I would look elsewhere if they were used primarily for drying dishes as they aren't extremely absorbant
Krups is always good!. Customer below wrote that the tea pot gave toxic smell. It says in the instructions that you have to boil the water twice before you use it to get rid of the new plastic smell. Most of the electic tea kettles require it. I boiled the water twice, and when I made myself a cup of tea there was no smell what so ever. This tea kettle is very comfortable, easy to clean, and it boils water very fast. This is my 3rd item from Krups. I just bought the Convectional Toaster Oven from them and I like  it a LOT! Much better then microwave
Absolutely Wonderful!!. Being physically challenged with severe RA has made this cleaner indispensable for me!  I can't bend over to clean up spills & messes so I keep this "flip It" right near my kitchen which has a bamboo floor and it always looks fabulous.  Its lite weight makes it usable by someone with limited strength.  I love it.Initially it was a bit difficult to get used to.  I tried vacuuming with the wet side & couldn't imagine why it was so hard to push--duh!  I also had to learn that when washing the floor you need to release enough water to wet the pad at the start or else it is too difficult to push.  My bathrooms have ceramic tile floors and they have never looked so clean.  I always use the heater for tile.I highly recommend this item.
good for the price. These pillows are pretty good for the price.  Yes, they do get flattened, but I have a few of them together in different colors on the couch and they are decorative and comfortable.  They are very soft and look great together.  I may get more because of the great price.  So far I have not had any come apart at the seams.  My cat tends to be rough on pillows by chewing and scratching and so far my similar pillows with the fringe are his favorite, but these ones have lasted nicely
Best Buy. This unit performs as well as those costing twice the price. Can't imagine why anyone would want to spend more
ELITE, the BEST!!!!!!. If you want to own the BEST, buy THIS one!  I have 10" bananas hanging on it now and they curve out so it does not touch any fruit in the bowl. The bowl is 9 1/2" round.  This is an impressive piece
Knife Expert Approved; Multi-Functional and Durable. I am a stage performer as well as a chef. I specialize in contortion and throwing knives (often with my feet). I use the Wusthof so much in the kitchen, that I thought I would incorporate it into my act. I throw the knives at flying fruit and vegis and perform flips with knives between my toes and fling them at my assistants. Throwing knives are usually smaller, perfectly balanced, and forged from one solid piece. They require perfect tang as well and incredible strength. Wusthof is the ONLY high-end kitchen knife that meets these requirements.Although I have several chef's knives (global, henckel, wusthof, etc) I prefer the Wusthof both in the Kitchen and on Stage. I would never bring the Henckel or any other brand. Wusthof has absolutely perfect balance and tang. The difference from throwing knives is that kitchen knives usually have handles added to the forged steel. Unlike any other high-end brand, Wusthof's handle is extremely durable. In practice, I broke all other brands of knife, both handle and blade. I was surprised that my Henckels did not last very long (the 6" 4-star pro's blade snapped in half and 8"'s handle came apart on one side). The quality of a Wusthof really shows when you use it for something it's not meant for and is still extremely reliable.And as you can read in all the other reviews, it is very sharp. In case you're wondering, I've never injured an assistant, but I did slit my foot open one time. I also stuck a head of lettuce to a vaulted ceiling
Cooks Illustrated loved it. I just put in an order for one based on Cooks Illustrated ranking this the #1 blender.I hope I have a better experience than that other reviewer who gave hers 1 star.
dishes. The dishes came really wrapped securely and nicely.  I appreciated the sender and the carefulness... no broken dishes!!!  The product was sent quickly.  Great service
Good knife. I like this knife.  It is very sharp and cuts thru vegetables easily.   I find that the 5 inch blade is too short for some slicing jobs, such as cutting large onions or potatoes, but still gets the job done.
A Real Slow Cooker. Unlike most of the other little crockpots, this one is the real deal in miniature, not a dip-heater. When I have to take a dish to a party I drag out the monster crockpot, but for just the two of us this is perfect! I can throw in a meal early in the day whenever I am not busy and it will be sitting there ready to eat when my husband rolls in that evening. In his job it's hard to tell when he'll get home so I really appreciate crock pots. No rushing around cooking at the end of a long day... trying to put something on the table when you are ready to blob out on the sofa. This one cooks a small meal and the removable little crock fits easily in the dishwasher, or in the fridge if there are leftovers or for cook-ahead items. It does a great job on small quantities of dried beans, too, giving about the equivalent of a canful the first day and then coming back out of the fridge the next day for the chili. I haven't tried pinhead oats overnight in this yet but that is something I will do, since I love oatmeal and my husband hates it. It'll make just enough for me. This is exactly what I was hoping for: crock pot convenience without the gallons of leftovers
off to good start. A few years ago I tried stir frying and liked it, except that I used a Joyce Chen nonstick wok that peeled after two uses.  After that I got a  Lodge cast iron wok that was way too heavy and got discouraged and gave it away.  Then I tried I a no-name carbon steel wok but was very ignorant about how to season it and could not understand why it kept rusting.  Recently I have had the urge to try stir frying  again and this time did my homework.  I chose this wok because it was carbon steel, and this time learned ahead of time how to season it properly.  This wok is also very sturdily made; you cannot easily bend the wok if you push on it; the handles are not loose; it is 2 mm thick; it has phenolic plastic handles that stay cool.I have properly seasoned and been using the wok with no rust or stickiness.  Learning how to season and clean made all the difference.  A good education and a well-made wok are an unbeatable combination!!See some of ther other wok posts for good seasoning tips.  I followed the directions that came with the wok and had good results.
Works just fine. I got this to pick up cat litter, and that it does plus more.  The handle stays on just fine if you bother to read the instructions that come with it.  As a bonus, I love the way it picks up all sorts of crumbs and stuff off my kitchen floor.  Seems to work well on low pile carpeting also.  I find it very easy to empty the bins. It's a quick and quiet way to clean up.  I do feel like I'm turning into my Grandma though
The main selling point is inaccurate, misleading. I am a huge tea drinker and as you know, there are two key temperatures in the tea world: less than boiling (180F) and boiling (212). As far as I know, there are only two readily available variable temperature electric kettles on the market - the T-Fal Vitesse and one from Adagio Teas. I chose the former and have been using it for about 7 months.I assumed that since water can't get hotter than 212F, the highest (most right) setting would correspond to that. So the middle had to be roughly 180.  I've brewed dozens of cups of tea, some for guests, some very expensive with this assumption.Today I brought in a thermometer and found the following:Low - 175 FMedium - 212 FHigh - 212 FThis is outrageous! Why make a product that is not truly variable or accurate and sell it as such?
Catit Replacement Cartridges. Item was shipped very quickly and transaction completed in a timely fashion
Works well for bedrooms. My son has allergies and this seems to help.  It has a nice quiet humming sound which even helps him get to sleep faster!  I can't say it cures allergies but it does help purify the air, especially where you may be sleeping.
Gourmet knives are stamped blades. In reading the comments on these knives I noticed that there was a different type of metal in the Gourmet vs the Classic.  I checked my knives and then contacted a friend of mine that is into knives. He said that Molybdenum is put into the steel for forging purposes only thus it has no effect on the sharpness or finish.  Because Gourmet is a stamped knife it does not require this type of material.  I have the knives and they are great.  They are not the quality of the Classic but they don't carry that price either
Vary comfortable. These pillows are excellent...It gives me a perfact neck support. Although, size is little smaller but it serves the purpose.
loved it. My best purchase -greatr price, nice features.  My friend I bought it for loves it.  Do yourself a favor and purchase it
Perfect knife. This is one fine knife.Prior to this my favorite knife was a Gerber Balance plus  10 inch chefs knife I bought over 20 years ago. This is a much better knife. The balance and grip feel is much more natural
Perfect for travellers. The smallest iron I've ever seen, but it works as well as the big ones. I travel a lot for work and this is a life saver
THIS COAT RACK IS AWESOME!!!!. I LOVE THIS ITEM I BOUGHT AND IT ARRIVED IN A TIMELY FASHION.THANK
if you love cookies. I purchased this pan through a different company. Cookies cook evenly with good color. Can be used with parchment paper, Silpat but also used with cooking spray. Worked great with all. Much better than other cookies sheets on the market. Definitely a must have if you love cookies.
Finest piece of cookware I own. I've always liked the Calphalon products, but I lost my whole set a few years ago. When I found this piece on sale at such a reasonable price, I snapped it up. I've never enjoyed cooking so much in my life. The copper heats the pot evenly and quickly. It's a dream to keep clean. The lid fits perfectly.The only thing I don't like about this piece is that the weight distribution on the handle is awkward. I have RMI which weakens my wrists and makes lifting and pouring off liquid difficult. A more ergonomic design to the handle would have been better.However the ease of cleanup, the perfect heat conduction, and the outright beauty of the piece make up for any awkwardness. I love it so much I'm asking for the rest of the set for Christmas
Great saucepan, excellent price. I bought one as a wedding present and when I saw the quality, I bought one for myself.  I love it
Pfaltzgraff Empire Covered Butter Dish. Excellent product. I especially like the roominess of the cover...no more butter crawling up the sides! Yea
scissor set only ok. this scissor set is not as sturdy as i was expecting from a henckels product. the all purpose scissors work well but the  pruning shears are very light weight and the open /close mechanism is very cheap. i dont htink they will last too long. probably why they were less expnsive for same set in other mags
No Kitchen is Complete Without These!. I love these dishes!  The proportions, color vibrance, surface wearability and chip-resistance can't be beat for the price!  I suggest buying a few colors to mix and match, these dishes come in so many great colors!  If you're considering a lesser-priced set (I was), spend a little bit more, the extra quality and classic style are definitely worth it
Nice kids pillow. My son loves it very nice. It is a nice gift for ages below 5. It got a good shape, nice grip to hold
Bunn Best Ever. I don't normally review a item after owning it just over a week, but today I decided I should review the Bunn BX.  Like I said, I have only owned it just over a week.  No problems setting it up, just follow the instructions.  It has made good coffee from day one.  I love getting it ready to brew and then going out to get the paper.  It's ready before I can get out the door.  With my old brewer, I still was waiting after I started reading the paper.This morning put the icing on the cake for me.  I had just put coffee in the basket when the electric went out.  I thought - No coffee.  There was a cup left from yesterday, maybe I could heat it in the microwave, but could not even do that.  Then it hit me, there was heated water in the tank.  All I need to do was pour the cold water in to push that hot water out.  So five minutes into a power outage, I was brewing a nice hot "5 star" cup of coffee.  I would think one could brew coffee even a half hour into a power outage.The only down side to the Bunn is that it is not a 12 cup.  But I can put up with that after this morning
best popcorn popper microwave or normal. makes the best popcorn I found.  Use peanut oil and any junk popcorn and it pops up light and fluffy.  Clean-up is not bad cause it's just a removeable bowl that gets messy.  I get about 6 bowls out of a concentrator before it needs to be replaced.  So a pack of 8 gets you about 50 bowls of popcorn.  The pack sell on amazon "Presto 09964 PowerCup Concentrators" for $0.99, so not a big deal.  I'm using a pretty small unpowerful microwave and have no problems.  I'm not sure why the previous negative reviews cause I think it works great.  It says dishwasher safe but I would not recommend it.  Like all plastic it will become brittle over time in the dishwasher.  I would love to have a glass version of this
Amazing Glasses. These glasses are amazing!  They don't just loom good - they are extremely functional as well.  You coffee can be extremely hot, yet you can't feel it on the outside of the glass due to the double wall.  I highly recommend these for any coffe or tea drinker
Goose Down. Love this comforter...It is just the right weight for what we needed..and fits the duvet cover perfectly...came faster than I expected, which of course thrilled me..
Wonderful, Healthy, Cookware. I was looking for good solid cookware that would allow me to bake salmon & vegetables (instead of wrapping in aluminum foil).  The deep dish washes out clean, and, when covered, keep the food moist and delicious.  I sometimes use a lid from another piece of Le Creuset cookware to cover this pan and turn it into a clay oven of sorts.  I am very pleased..
External Hard Drive Case. Excellent product for protecting/storing external HD.  Amazaon had best price for this product
Picture is Misleading. I agree with the other reviewer--the picture *is* misleading.  Bissell does actually sell the pad/brush combination.  Amazon should strive to make sure the picture does represent the product or give a clearly seen disclaimer.  Conversely, I was not unhappy at all with the product received as I can use the pads a lot more than the brush attachment
Great Deal and Very Handy. I bought one set of these and was so impressed I bought a second set.  The quality of the ramekins is great and the price is terrific.  I use them in the kitchen and also for sorting my beading supplies.  You really can't have too many of these as they are so handy
Cute Cuisinart. This little Cuisinart hardly takes up any room on the counter.  It is very powerful and you must be careful so you don't turn your chopped veggies into puree
Good for its price. I was initially going to purchase the Eureka 169B Quick Up Vacuum (not cordless) because my boyfriend had the exact same thing, but then I found this cordless model and decided to give it a try. I have now been using it for 2 months without a problem. Good battery life - I can vacuum the living room, dining room and 2 bedrooms before recharging. No cord - no hassle! Easy to clean filter and dirt cup. Obviously this light- weight vacuum cannot replace my bigger vacuum, but it's convenient and easy to use for quick clean-ups. Really good for its price
The Best!. These are a purchase to go with Wamsutta sheets. My daughter likes extra pillows.These wash very well and are nice and heavy duty.  Pillow cases are usually expensive. For $2.99 at the closeout price, I got a bargain!
just beautiful dinnerware. The color, detail, and quality of this set is just perfect. I love it and have receieve many compliments on it.  I intend to purchase another set.  Very happy with set,and the manner it was packed and shipped
better than expected. I expected the typical dog toy, which lives about half as long as it normally does thanks to my dog trying to tear it apart. I'm surprised that it not only has lasted as long as it has, but doesn't have any loose stitchings yet
great for kids toys. I put all of my kids stuffed animals in these,  my kids can open them all alone and i can lift them up and toss them out of the way when more room is needed.  i'm thinking of getting more for the extra comforters and sleeping bag
Great Product. We've had this product now for about 3 weeks and use it everyday.  We just put in hardwood floors and needed something that wouldn't damage the floors, but picked up the dirt, dust, and our pets hair.  This product is extremely light, easy to push around (my 3 year-old loves playing with it), and has great suction.  There's been nothing so far that it hasn't been able to pick up.  After each use, it's simple to open up and dump out the debris.  It also has a charger unit that conveniently stores the vacuum until next use.  Well worth it
The largest version of Presto's gold standard in basic deepfry. THis is the family size edition of presto's popular Fry Daddy line of fryers.  I have had my own fry daddy for 6 years now, and my grandmother has had hers for over 20. Still the same basic quality fryer. Simple heat and fry. It has no lid or filter to filter the smell and prevent splatterlike some of the fancy models, this is just plain frying. Best rules, If frozen don't just drop the item in fast, and I tend to use this more in the warmer weather, when I can have my windows open. If you have a good Hood above your stove, that can be helpful as well. Otherwise, tasty food quickly, I still love my fry daddy. Its affordable and reliable.
Wustof Classic... worth the money. As a home user, I must say that I'm quite pleased with my purchase of this knife in the Classic line.  Had a few opportunities to use this prepping chicken already, and I've gotta say that it's loads easier to work with than the garbage knives I had at my disposal previous.
Love them!!. These end tables are very easy to asseble and look great. A great buy for the money. The bases were slightly scratched on one side, but I was able to flip the piece over so the scrath is underneath. No one will ever know
Great product. Great knife.  Love the Unibody and is very sharp
tastes great, but too brown. This pan is very functional--makes wonderful mini-madeleines that are almost perfect--spongy, delicate, comes off in one piece easily thanks to the nonstick coating, heats evenly, etc.  My only complaint is that the shell-surface is too brown, instead of that nice yellow-golden appearance.  This seems to be a problem with nonstick pans in general.  Other than this, excellent pan.
Best Home Deep Fryer Ever. This is the best Deep Fryer for the home that we have every had.  Usually you have to have a fryer that is on 220 in order to get good crisp French Fries, Onion Rings, Tempura, etc.  But this baby does it on regular home 110 (I use the frozen fries and rings).  It is also easy to clean. I highly recommend it
Stanton. not just ice tea. These are my coffe mug stirers and mayo jar extractors too. We reach for them all the time. Stanton has a nice weight good quality, no dishwasher discoloration. arrived perfectly packaged
For the price works moderately well. I have a 3 1/2 year old Boxer that barks, cries, whines, and howls when I go to work...ALL DAY...I know, I recorded it.  I went to Petsmart and picked up this gadget.  Brought it home and it the manual correct button.  She bolted.  She hates the ultrasonic noise that it makes.  It reduced the amount of noise that my dog makes but only in a certain area and I don't crate my dog when I'm going to be away for more than 8 hours.So if I'm just running out for a few hours I stick her in her crate with this right in front of her but if I'm going to work I use it in conjunction with the petsafe electric shock bark collar.My girlfriends dog does not really notice it if he's otherwise engaged but my dog hates it.  Worth the price in my opinion.  Best advice is to take it home and try it.  Some dogs react to it.  Others don't
Works as it is intended. I purchased this to keep our cats off of the dining room table.  We've used it for a few weeks now and they no longer go on the table.  The only thing now, which is a credit to the product, is that I no longer have a use for it for the time being.  I'm sure my cats will find something else to climb on before long that will warrant its use again
Good, Solid Product!. This is my first food processor and overall, I'm very satisfied with it.  The mini bowl is very useful for making small quantities of pesto, sauce etc.  The processor runs quietly and efficiently.  The only negative I found was that it can be a pain to clean
Handy cordless blender!. I love my Cuisinart Cordless Blender.  No cords to get in the way and easy to use when traveling by car--no power cord needed.  Charges quickly and can easily be taken apart for storage or transport.  This is my second CSB-44N--keep one at work and one at home! I should note that I have had my first Blender for 3 years and it still works great.  I run the blender until the battery is discharged before recharging it to avoid battery problems.
yes, goo gone works fine... I got these figuring that goo gone would work, and yes, it works fine (peel off the label, squirt on goo gone, wait a few minutes, scrape off with a plastic spatula (metal will scratch)), I can wash these in the dish washer without worry of rusting that plagues all other teflon covered cookie sheets I have owned... plus they have a mirror finish and hopefully will never need replacing, unlike teflon coated cookie sheets...
Great pot. My mother has one of these and really likes it so I purchased one and I too love it.  It is so easy to use and I have experienced no problems.  Bought one for my sister and her husband for Christmas and they also love it.  I would have to say the other reviewers were unlucky, there are always some lemons
Very Sturdy. Excellent quality and rich color.   I tried it as a skillet, takes a while to heat up . . . I think this would be best oven roasting or to saute onions,  followed by stove-top roasting.   Very heavy, of course, and the lid, too, is heavy enough to hold in juicy steam.This is a large piece.  You could prepare a meal for four.   You want to be smart in how much you move this around.  With hand trouble, I've learned to use straight wrists to carry it close to me (when cool, of course).   Then I take the water or food to the piece, cook and serve from it right off the stove . . . cool down, and "hug" it to the sink.   I used smaller pieces of a similar brand for smaller meals.  With care, this should serve you for a life-time.
great tray. The ice cubes come out intact - not chipped or cracked.  To get them out, push each cube from the bottom with your finger.For fastest and easiest results, wait for 5 minutes after taking the tray out of the freezer. This way, the ice cubes will pop right out. If you don't wait, your fingertip will be freezing while trying to push them out
great collar. this collar doesn't feel as rough as most--its soft and looks comfy. but it is totally durable. i have a jack russell & my little guy pulls & tugs and is pretty harsh on everything.  i would buy this again.  plus, it's super cute!
Great deal. These sheets are a great deal. They are very soft and comfy. They are oversized a little, therefore they fit very nicely
Great Blanket, very comfortable. I've had this for a few months now, I've found it to be perfect except on very cold nights, but then I add a comforter.  Also, it's machine washable, and came out very well which was a bit of a surprise considering it's filled.  Very please
Great yet not sound free. excellent although the plastic is not sound free while the child tosses and turns in bed.
Great sewing machine value. I highly recommend this sewing machine.  I purchased it in January, but wanted to use it awhile before writing a review.  Since then, I've used it to make 5 large drapery panels and it's been a wonderful machine.  Several of the panels I made were lined and made of heavy fabric and the machine handled it well.  I experienced a couple jams on the really thick folded over portions, but nothing that wasn't easily fixed.This is the first computerized machine I've used.  I was accustomed to an old heavy duty Singer.  It felt very light at first, but I've grown to like that aspect -- it's much easier to put it away when not in use.  The machine was easy to learn; it had a very clear instruction manual.  My favorite features so far are the blind hem stitch and the self-threading needle
Sturdy!. These cups are larger than they appear!  And very strong and sturdy - a thick ceramic.  I use them every day to microwave eggs, etc.
popcorn maker. This item is wonderful though a bit too small. It makes good popcorn and is very easy to use. It is worth the price and a good buy
godinger glasses. Just as promised, all arrived in perfect condition due to exceptional packing.  The weight is really nice.  I liked them so much that I ordered a second set for everyday.
the best dog bed. My dogs love this bed.  And so do I.I have two chihuahuas, although this bed would fit a dog up to at least 15-20 pounds.  My dogs always go straight into this bed, and love to cuddle underneath the covers.  One even prefers it to sleeping in our big human bed!  Every time my dogs are tired, they retire straight to this bed.The bed is machine-washable, which is really nice because the dogs stay smelling good after you bathe them.  In fact, when the bed is in the wash, they miss it!I do not think the person who gave the bed one star gave it a chance.  She said it tipped too much.  The bed is very fluffy when it first arrives, and after it is washed.  But it flattens out very quickly, and you can speed that up in under five second by hand
Good price for solid, warm flannel duvet cover. I bought this a few weeks ago on amazon and loved it within the first minute of snuggling underneath. For this price you can't beat - super soft and super warm. Highly recommend
Rachel Ray Furi Knife. I have used this knife for everything since it arrived. It is perfect for everyday use, great product for the price
Best floor cleaner yet!. I have several rooms including my kitchen that have white shiny ceramic tile floors with white grout.  No matter what I used to clean the floor I had to dry it as I cleaned and most often within a day or two it looked hazy or smeary.  Since using this steam vac I can go well over a week between cleanings and the floor never looked better.  The steamer removes surface dirt from the grout, so if you're buying it primarily to clean grout expect to still have to use elbow grease or chemicals.  It is too messy to be practical for cleaning windows and it didn't do very well cleaning soap film off the shower door.  It did, however, do very well on mold.  I also love it for cleaning my jewelry and the silk plants in my freshwater aquarium!  No more brown spots on the silk plants.  Best part of all the things I've mentioned--NO CHEMICALS to inhale or contaminate the environment.  The unit is sturdy, heats up quickly and includes a lot of handy attachments.
not a gimmick---the real deal. The Riedel "O" concept glasses may take a short while to accept, but once one realizes that a quality wine glass does not require a stem the rewards are many.  The "O" glass line of products have made legendary glass maker Riedel's products affordable for the masses, while injecting an element of practicality for daily use.  As a current owner of both traditional higher- priced Riedel stemware and these newer products, I find our "O" glasses are getting much higher use.  They truly do enhance the flavors of good quality wines, while helping the wine drinker collect multiple glass ware designs at reasonable prices. I now have five different "O" styles on the shelf, yet these wide mouth Chardonnay glasses seem to get the biggest workout:  they somehow do have the capability of bringing out the nuances of a wine, even for us less sophisticated buyers.  Plus, my wife loves popping them in the dishwasher!
Black Pitcher. It does function well, hmmmmm... kinda like a pitcher, and looks great as an accent with my black appliances
Neat 'n Dry   perfect for my needs. It took a little while to receive them but once I started using them I was very surprised at how well they worked. They hold quite a lot before changing and they don't tear apart as some other brands have done.  I am Very satisfied with the quality & the size is perfect for my needs.   They work so well that this is my second order.   A very very good product.Thank you,~~Trish~
Attractive set. these were great for the money. I had similar items break after awhile and I order these, exact replica, to match the set I had. Surprising great quality and have held up the 1st month so far
Our cats are spoiled - perfect for indoor cats!. This is the best - snaps on easily, cleans easily & works just great. Our cats love to pull out the grass just like they were outside.  They love it and it is a great conversation piece just like the Drinkwell.  Our cats are truly spoiled!
Darn good little vac. I have had every kind of vacuum you can think of. Even a Kerby, I am embarrassed to say. I have 4 dogs and therefore A LOT of hair and dirt. The first time i used this vac, I had just had my carpets cleaned the week prior and vacuumed the day before. I was amazed/appalled at the amount of hair and dirt one pass over my carpets made. I, too, have a lot of tile and find it works well on hard surfaces as well. For the price, you can't beat this vac!! Take this coming form what my ex once called a vacuum addict. I LOVE to vacuum:-) If the noise bothers you, pop in your Ipod
Perfect Grapefruit spoon. it's a set of grapefruit spoons - how can you mess that up?  The spoons are sturdy smooth and very comfortable in your hand
Best Grill I've Ever Owned. This grill was recommended by Alton Brown of Good Eats (FoodTV).  The grill came with explicit care instructions for seasoning the cast iron grills.  I have used it a half dozen times now, including adding an after market rotisserie.  Fantastic temperature control by raising or lowering the coals, or banking the coals away from the food in the multiple compartments.  More surface area than I've ever had before.  Very easy ash removal.I recommend getting a vegetable oil spray and coating the cooking surface after each use.  Easy to keep seasoned
Great Bag Holder. This product just greatly reduced the space that bags were taking up under my counter.  Great organizing product
We really like this sugar dispenser. We were given one of these sugar dispenser for a gift and now we just bought two more to give out as gifts.  We love it, however, I couldn't give it an actual five stars as we do have some problems with the sugar leaking out a little and being somewhat messy.  However, it is great to keep the children from using too much sugar.  I would recommend it
If you only buy one toy for your dog... This is absolutely, hands down, the best toy we've gotten for our dogs. We own three sets of these in varying sizes. Because the balls are plush, they will wear out- this is not for your destructive chewers. Our dog plays with the colored balls at least 3 hours a day. Before leaving for work, pop a couple of treats inside and you're out the door with less anxiety while they nose out the snacks.
In love with Bobo. My mini-doxie just loves his Bobo. Like others, we saw the Loofa dog on the Petsmart commercials. Remi loves any plushie that squeaks, so we decided to get one. He loves it! I've had to re-sew a few of the seams because he is a vigorous chewer, but it is worth every penny
So easy to make perfect rice!. Whether it has been Basmati, Jasmin, or Brown rice, it comes out perfectly every time! Very easy to make, even the more complex pilafs. Very easy to clean
Our cat barely leaves her mat... We adopted a feral cat and bought this thermal mat because it can get cold in the garage (which is where she lives). It makes a tiny bit of crinkling noise when stepped on, but she wasn't bothered by the sound at all (even though she is feral and still a bit skittish). The mat is made of plush, cozy fabric and is machine washable. Our cat loves the mat and hardly leaves it on days that are a bit chilly. It seems to really work because she also has a pet bed and a bed made out of blankets in the garage and she seems to prefer her mat. Definitely worth the price
Works great. I put this on our wedding registry 2 years ago and was delighted when we received it as a gift. It has worked perfectly from day one! Easy to clean (if cleaned right away) and feels very sturdy. Our only problem is that the litle cleaning brush it comes with found it's way into our garbage disposal and was pretty chewed up. It's going to be difficult to replace this small part
Windowbox-Gardenia. Sent to my daughter in CA for her birthday. She loves the gardenia. The service was excellent. Thanks to Frances, Emily and My-An
Best Cheap Crystal. These are my standbys for entertaining. Look like Waterford, have a nice heft to them, don't break easily--when they do you don't cry!I have been using these for years, but needed replacements. The price online including shipping was less than I could buy them for here.
nicely made. This is an simple contraption that makes our bathroom space more organised, neat looks great also. glad i'd purchased this
Really makes a difference!. We just added this topper to our already cozy mattress and WOW - it made it EVEN more comfortable - it gives a great "squish" factor to the bed.  It also helps to buffer you from the movements of your sleeping partner- it sort of absorbs their movements and keeps you perfectly unaffected.  The only thing that i have to say is that there is a "new foam" smell - that WILL take over the bed - it says to allow a little "air-out" time - but who can resist immediately putting on the bed ?!  I would definitely suggest this product!!! :
Nice Heater, Love the Remote!. I really like this heater, has lots of functions and the remote is awesome.  I use it under my desk at work, it's great because I can place it further back and don't have to get on my hands and knees to turn it on and off.  I also really like the Oscillating feature.
great kettle. I really like this kettle. It heats water very quickly and shuts itself off if the water is too low or is boiling. The only thing I don't like is the silver matte finish. When I ordered it I thought the top was a brushed metal and its not. Its plastic made to look like satin nickel  finish - but really doesn't in person. The glass carafe does look great sitting on the counter and compliments my contemporary kitchen. Its also offered in the shiny finish which looks much better in person, but is still only plastic
Great sheets for a great price! & deep pockets!. I got these at a great price so my expectations were very low.  I usually spend as much as $90 for a pair of high thread count Cal king sheets.  But it seems they wear very quickly so I started shopping for an alternative & I ran across these.  I really thought they were going to be cheap & scratchy but they are not.  Not only are they plenty soft, they are beautiful!  The embroidery is a lovely touch.  My only complaint is that they have sold out or I would have bought at least another 4 sets for future use!  I love the mint color, it is very pretty!I was also afraid they would not fit over my deep mattress & featherbed on top but there is ample room for both. They fit much better than the expensive sheets I have bought in the past & I don't have to work up a sweat to make the bed anymore by pulling & tugging until I get the fitted sheet on the bed.I would definately recommend these, you will be pleasantly surprised!
Previous version has worked for 10+ years, no mold. I think some people are distorting reality on this product based on another problem in their refrigerator and blaming it on the Brita.  I've used the previous generation of this product in all different parts of the USA in various refrigerators, and I've never experienced mold.  I can't see why this design is fundamentally going to be different.  My guess is people have a mold problem in their house/refrigerator and like any mold, it is seeking the moisture.  CLEAN YOUR FRIDGE... ;)I don't wash this once a week, more like once a month.  The water doesn't pick up weird tastes or smells, but then again, my refrigerator is clean.  I find it convenient to use, not so much to fill, but it still works as intended.  The version currently for sale may have a leak problem, I can't say yes or no, but the one I have has not leaked in all the time I've had it other then once when I determined the spigot needed to be tightened.All in all, if you are tired of filling up pitchers constantly, and find the full pitcher heavy and spill prone when you use it, this product is for you.  Also, because you don't have to tip it, you can fill it with water and get a glass almost immediately even as the rest of the water is still filtering.  In a Brita pitcher, you must wait for all the water to filter before you can even have a glass.  This feature has come in handy when doing things like filling pet water bowls, fish tanks, etc.I'd give it five stars, but I find it a bit cumbersome to fill
makes jerky fun. This makes jerky making fun and easy.  Simple to use and easy to clean when you're done
Great Gift for Everyone. I bought this exact same slicer 20 years ago for my mom and it has lasted.  It's a unique item that guests love and it's easy to clean up as well
Made in India. As with all my red dishtowels, these are made in India.  This is my first time using dishtowels.  I chose red so I wouldn't hesitate to wipe up colored fluids.  I washed these super hot and dried them in the dryer first thing.  They are fine and lovely so if you have 1970s bad experiences with textiles from India, be assured that things have changed for the better.  This is the cheapest price I have found for dishtowels so far.   I'm trying to cut down on paper towel usage especially for drying my hands so this purchase alleviates a small degree of dismay at my pollution of the planet.I use these all the time
Great Knives!. We got this as a wedding present...what a great gift!  I use these knives constantly, but especially for cutting up meat or vegetables.  They are so sharp but even cut up baby tomatoes with ease.  The wood block is small enough to be stored on a counter top and not take up much space at all.  I'm so happy we got these!
Great Product but Poor Shipping!. My only complaint is that Amazon does not properly pack their products.  It took 3 attempts to get them here with out any damage!  The canisters are pretty and are able to hold a large amount of product
Deep Fryer. Given as a Christmas gift to my daughter. She was very happy with the product stating it was better with cooking times than her last fryer. The "well" was deep enough to cook a family of five enough chicken at one time.
Nautica Crew Classic Blanket is a GREAT blanket. I couldn't be happier with this blanket.  The quality is top notch.  The style and look are wonderful.  The sizing is generous and it's incredibly comfortable.  I love it
TOASTMASTER SANDWICH MAKER. The end result was ok, but I felt the sandwiches were too 'squashed' but edibl
Excellent little heater. Though not a large heater it heats up a room as good or better than the space heater I use more than twice as big. The one touch button operation takes a little time to get used to,but all in all I consider this to be an Excellent Little Heater
Best Dustbuster yet. This machine is way superior to the original and some suceeding versions. There is no bulky cradle to fit the vacuum into for recharging, just a simple plug-in point.  The suction is powerful -  I have had no problem "picking" up dust, hair, Christmas tree needles and other small debris. With no bag to replace, the machine is easy to clean. The only caveat I have is that when using the Dustbuster for the first time after you have emptied the receptacle, try to keep it away from anything that might be blown away, as some residual dust (albeit a very small amount) and air is emitted from the side vents
Eureka Boss upright. Only used once so far and seems to work fine.  The lever to switch from carpet to bare floor was a little stiff doesn't seem to stay in place, but it did turn off the brush
Happy, but used a drill. The desk is beautiful. I chose it for the solid wood (rather than laminate) and the wide keyboard tray (also holds the mouse). My mom and I had fun putting the desk together in a couple of hours. We couldn't finish the drawer because on one side panel the metal guide sticks out too far so the drawer won't fit together. I'm waiting for a replacement part, but I'm enjoying the desk with no drawer. We later almost finished putting the hutch together in a couple of hours, but it was missing about 15 pre-drilled starter holes, so we came back to it with a drill. The drilling was easy once we 'marked' the spots with a screwdriver
good support. This neck pillow offers considerable support under the neck---bought it to replace an old one that had become thread-bare...husband uses it all the time.
Gas Burner Covers. This is what I was looking for to cover my other burners while I cook, but the depth of the covers do not reach down to the stoves surface.  You can tell that they don't fit the burners, but it is covering them and I will deal with that for the price that they cost
Some Tips From an Owner. I've had this coffee maker for several weeks now, so if you're considering it for your home or office, please read on for some important tips I learned first-hand that you may want to consider prior to your purchase.First, the drawbacks (they are all surmountable, as I will explain later)...(1) This sucker is quite large.  And as mentioned in the other reviews, the typical kitchen cabinet clearance means you will not be able to use the top burner unless you pull the unit out or keep it somewhere that is clear of overhead obstructions.(2) You must keep the reservoir filled with water to brew coffee.  Depending upon how often you use the machine, this means water will sit in the coffeemaker and may become "stale" between uses.(3) The machine takes 13 minutes to warm up before it can brew.  That means if you want the coffee maker to be ready at all times, you need to leave it on.  That means it's drawing electricity throughout the day, 24/7.(4) You can brew no fewer than 4 cups of coffee at a time, or it will not displace water from the reservoir properly.Now to the strengths...This machine brews a good, hot cup of coffee.  Go to any coffee shop or restarant and see what they use.  It's usually a Bunn or other large-size commercial maker that brews quickly and uses an incoming water line and drip filter basket. That's basically what the Waring is (without the water line) and it's MUCH better built than the home-use Bunns.I did a lot of research before buying this coffeemaker.  One of the best resources I found was a coffee issue of Wine Spectator that had all of the ins and outs of coffee, including recommendations for coffee makers.  According to WS, you need at least 1200 watts of power to get good extraction from the grinds. The Waring puts out 1475, so you've got plenty of power.  The machine also brews quite fast - an entire pot in approximately 4 minutes.  Here again, this is another advantage of this machine.  To brew a good cup, you want the hot water to come into contact with the grind long enough to extract flavor, but not too long, or it will also extract the bitter components of the coffee.  Because of its fast brew time and high power output, the Waring is well up to the task.  The brew is hot, with good flavor extraction and no bitterness or burned aftertaste.Still interested? Then first, order the coffeemaker from Costco online.  I picked mine up for $100.  I then went to the Waring web site and downloaded a $30 rebate form (you'll need to check if the rebate offer is still active).  The end result?  I got a $269 coffeemaker for $69!Next, purchase a gold filter basket.  I found one for about $10 at my local Wegman's.  You'll need one that fits an 8-10 cup basket.  You can also order Swiss Gold coffee filters from Sweet Maria's that will fit the Waring, but they'll set you back about twice that.Third, if you're worried about stale water, turn it on and run 3 full pots through it.  The machine displaces a portion of water equal to what you pour in, so you can flush the entire coffeemaker this way.  Remember, it takes less than 5 minutes to brew a whole pot, so flushing the system will not take that long.  (That said, the water issue is the sole reason I withheld the 5th star.)Fourth, DON'T LET THE COFFEE POT SIT ON THE WARMING BURNERS!  As soon as your pot has brewed, transfer the coffee to a preheated thermal carafe.  You can pick these up at a Ross or Marshall's for about $6-$8.    If you leave the coffee on the heated burner, it will burn the coffee!  This is especially true as you get down to that last cup in the pot. Get in the habit of using a carafe.  Believe me, this is one of the best things you can do to ensure your last cup is as good as the first.  In my opinion, this makes the point about the upper burner moot - you shouldn't use it anyway.If you don't want to leave the machine on 24/7 but don't want to wait 13 minutes to brew every morning, I've got a simple solution for you: buy an appliance timer.  Just set it to turn the machine on when you wake up and off when you leave the house.  Problem solved.Lastly, if you usually brew less than 4 cups and/or do not want a big machine, save yourself the expense and buy a French press.  They're a bit of a pain to clean, but they do make the best tasting coffee (in my opinion).  If on the other hand, you want a workhorse machine for a great price (read Costco section) that brews up a pot of coffee for guests / parties in no time flat, I recommend the Waring Pro.
Just the thing for my vintage recipe. When I received this item, I was surprised how small it looked! There is a big difference between my 9" pie plates and this 8" one. However, it was just what my grandmother's vintage pecan pie recipe called for. For years, I had compromised by using my 9" baker, as it is pretty hard to find 8" ones today. This baker was ideal for my needs, as well as a compliment to my varied line of Fiestaware. I love it
Good value and powerful. I purchased this unit just over a month ago. It arrived in less than a week. I've had no problems with it yet. It is truly all metal except for the splash guard/ingredient chute. To address some other reviews that had me concerned. The head doesn't slap around. That is a warranty issue for her. It does walk with big stiff dough recipes such as a two loaf all wheat. Simple physics, considering size and weight, tells you at medium to high speeds it will. Kinda lets you know it is a powerful electronic speed controlled mixer. I can easily steady the base for the few seconds to finish mixing. All other mixing jobs are done with ease. I, personally, like the tilt head. All stand mixers will require side scraping with some recipes, even the expensive KitchenAids. Although I made a five bar cheesecake yesterday and as I was watching the eggs, dropped in at the side one at a time, they were all fully captured and mixed in. I usually scrape once at the beginning and it spins into a dough ball at the end anyway. There is a dimple at the bottom of the bowl to help pick up added flour during the mix. Speaking of KitchenAid, have you read the reviews of those "attachments"? Besides being expensive they say all of them suck. It seems you can buy better and cheaper items to do the same thing taking up the same amount of space.So far I've made 4 loaves of baguettes, 4 loaves of wheat, 2 loaves of sourdough, numerous cakes, batches of cookies, and of course a large cheesecake since I've had it with no problems. (Now you can see why I needed a strong stand mixer! My church loves me now too!) The key is to read the instructions more than once to ensure you understand how to operate this model. It has some cool recipes in there too! And yes, it is very easy to clean as well.If you want a mixer to crank out mega-loaves of all wheat bread daily, (commercial), then this is not it. If you want to make great bread, dishes and pastries for your family then this can't be beat at this price range with this much power. After all, as one consumer already stated, this is a "Consumer Reports best buy". I've had a Sunbeam Heritage, (like the one shown on the Cookin In Brooklyn show), and contrary to popular belief there is NOT a motor under the bottom pedestal. It's great for everything else but gluttonous bread dough's. A white loaf every once in a while, maybe. But, I wanted to be more artisan and organic with my breads so I upgraded.Note: the short time I've had it is the only reason I've given it 4 stars. For me, longevity counts as one star.Hobby Baker
the garlic twist. I purchased 2 of the above as stocking stuffers for the Christmas HolidaysMy daughter has just yesterday raved about this product-saying how greatand simple it was to use - I'm sorry I didnt get one for myselfI actually forgot the site where I purchased it - if this can be givento me, I would certainly appreciate i
Treated Myself Today! and a Question!. Well, I did it.  Went out and bought the 5 1/2 qt in cherry red.  I'm still sitting here looking at it!  I already own one piece of Le Creuset, which, together with everyone's comments, enticed me to buy this.  Absolutely amazing stuff!At the risk of sounding like a total moron, does anyone out there have a tip on how to remove the Le Creuset banner sticker on the side of the pot?  With my last piece, I soaked the darn thing for a couple hours, but it still lingered on.  What do they use, SuperGlue with these things
Raclette grill. This was a gift for my parents who wanted to entertain using this
Good Product. This is a sturdy and attractive product.  I have very limited space so this totally fit the bill
Great Frozen Pizza Plate. My husband and I fight over this plate when we have frozen pizza. A Tombstone pizza fits great on this plate
Wonderful sheets. These sheets feel great.  I just love sleeping on them.  I have never had sheets this great for the price I paid.  The only drawback is that they wrinkle
Best knives!. I loved my Shun Classic 6.5" Santoku knife, so I purchased a 6-piece set (except my set came with a 9" serrated bread knife instead of the utility knife).  Shun is the best!  For the most control and best grip, I was told to hold the knife close to the blade with my index finger on the metal ridge.  It seemed a little awkward at first, but it's very comfortable once you get used to it!  I love the weight of the knives, the wooden handles, and the sharpness of the blades.  They do, however, need to be sharpened occasionally (I judge this by how well they cut through a tomato).  I was told that you should use the boning steel every time you use a knife, but I have never used it.  Instead I've been using the MinoSharp Plus sharpener, which sharpens the knives extremely well.  If I could only have one knife I'd get the 6.5" Santoku (not in this set) because I use it far more often than any other knife.  However, the large chef's knife is much better for cutting large, hard foods like squashes and melons.  I love the multi-functional scissors (they come apart so you can sharpen them and clean them well), and I like being able to protect my knives and keep them together in the wooden block.
Best decision I've ever made.. except marrying my husband.. This is a wonderful wondeful little machine. It's small enough to fit, but large enough to do a good size load!Warning though... human error can occur... don't forget to put drain tube INTO SINK.. floods may occur *grins sheepishly*If I could rate 20/5 stars, I would
Handy. These shakers hold a large amount of salt and pepper.  The plastic covers are great for keeping dust and moisture off of them.  The fact that you can take the wide lids off makes them easy to fill and easy to use when measuring for recipes.  I really like them
LOVE IT! LOVE IT! LOVE IT!. Very sturdy construction.  Much better than I expected.  I made whole wheat bread the other day and it didn't even hesitate to blast through the dough.  My wife has used it several times and loves it too.  I origonally wanted to get her a KitchenAid, but I did a lot of research on the best mixers and I agree that this is the best value for your money
Good value for the money. The response time of this thermometer is pretty decent in its price range: it goes from freezing to boiling (or back) in about 15 seconds.The measurement range is OK -- at a maximum of 302 F you won't be able to use it for deep frying or melting sugar, but it's more than sufficient for measuring meat/pastry doneness.All in all it's a decent choice if you just want a basic unit for everyday tasks. If you need auto-off or a Celsius mode, look at similar Taylor models for a little bit more.The next significant step-up is the Thermoworks really-instant Thermapen at a whopping $80 (sold under the name "Digital thermometer" on Amazon - see B0001VWRCC)
Excellent product, care and feeding needed. I have owned this for about 9 months and gotten nearly 1000 uses out of it (it counts for you). It can equal most coffeehouse product you are likely to find, but as others point out, it is far short of what an enthusiast can create from more traditional equipment. You may also find the crema coffee settings to be something of an acquired taste (but you can make an Americano in just one more step, which is always great).Also, we went through a brief episode in which it would refuse to brew anything (as if it didn't have the power to punch the water through the puck of coffee). I remedied this with a descaling cycle as well as wiping out the parts above the removable tray thoroughly. (I use filtered water in the machine, but the descaling seems to be a more serious cleaning than the normal automatic cleaning.)Given this, I would recommend keeping large stock of cleaning supplies and at least doing the normal cleaning every couple of weeks, rather than awaiting the machine's automated recommendation to clean. My understanding is that there are no dirt sensors driving these messages. It is just a function of the amount of use.Overall, I would buy this again for certain, and if/when it dies I will be looking at one of its more expensive siblings, not at other brands.
Kneato Knife. This knife is a most valued asset to any cooks collections.  I normally try all of Rachel Ray's products, and this one meets with high marks.  Its sharp edge and petite handle make it a prefect tool for someone with a small hand.  I love it!@!
GREAT yogurt. I recently bought an Euro Cuisine yogurt maker and resumed making my own yogurt.  There is no comparison - homemade is MUCH better.  Starter matters.  I tried Dannon plain yogurt as my starter.  It worked, but the yogurt wasn't nearly as good.  The Euro Cuisine yogurt starter tastes much better, and after the first batch, it "brews" up in only three hours.  I think the bacteria are really lively, which is probably a bonus for our gut, too
Wonderful little dish with a million uses. I bought this to use for "brown bagging" but have used it for so much more. THis little dish is great for storing leftovers or taking small portions to potlucks, all without having to change the contents to a "dressier" dish. French White is attractive enough to go with your best china and a much better value for the money
A Good Machine... I bought this vacuum strictly for the basement(where our Home Theatre is set up).  It was a pain in the *ss carrying our canister up and down all the time, so I happened upon this cleaner on sale at Home Depot for a mere $70.00...  I was initially skeptical at first, I mean a $70 vacuum?  However, I purchased it anyway, knowing that I would be able to return it if I wasn't happy.  The setup and assembly was fairly quick. The instructions were easy to follow and featured step-by-step illustrations.  When I had everything ready to go, I decided to give it a "test run", and I was impressed.  I was amazed at the junk our Sears Canister was leaving behind, as I watched the cat hair and dust swirling around in the collection bin.  My only complaint-and this is common with bagless vacs in general-is that you MUST clean the filter off after every use, otherwise they tend to plug up and overheat the motor.  This is especially true if you have multiple pets, or longhaired cats.  In conclusion, this is a good machine.  Strong suction too.  The attachments include an extension wand for above floor cleaning, crevice tool, and dusting brush.  The dustbin simply snaps off in a jiffy, and the filter is washable/replaceable.  This is what I like to refer to as a "second vac", when you simply want a machine on another level in your home, without having to lug your main vacuum all over the place.  I've owned it for about 5 months now, and so far, no complaints.  Just keep it clean and you'll be set.  Also, pay no attention to that one review below.  This is obviously referring to a totally separate model.  I'm happy.
Swiss Diamond C28 Replacement Cover. I am very happy with the product. It fits the fry pan perfectly
Wonderful product!!. This krumkaka baker is wonderful!!  I have a stove-top krumkaka maker and always had trouble with it, took a long time to bake krumkaka and such.  Made a batch of krumkaka right away after receiving the new electric baker and match a full batch in less than an hour and they were delish!!  I would highly recommend this baker to anyone that has ever considered buying one, it is a wonderful machine!!  Love the non-stick surface!!
water cap solution. I had this iron for over a year and I'm pretty satisfied with it. It's great for silk and other thin fabric ( - it doesn't replace a regular iron). I also had the water cap problem at first. If you leave water in it, the lid will expand and later the cap will fall out or will not screw on again. The solution is to empty the tank after using it and let the tank and cap dry. Don't screw it on too tightly afterwards- the lid might shrink afterwards and be hard to open again (happened once). I also drain the leftover water over the sink after using it. It's a little bit of work, but worth doing to prevent any further mess.
$39.99 gold box for the bedskirt. The bedskirt is the bonus in this set that makes this worth looking at.  If you have furnished rental property and don't use platform beds, stock up.
the best juicer available. I highly recommend this juicer. I live in Florida and have a huge pink grapefriut tree as well as an orange, lemon and lime tree in my back yard. As you would expect my juicer has to be heavy duty and easy to use and clean. I have purchased and discarded most other juicers due to 1.t ook up too much counter space, 2. too flimsy, 3. too hard to clean, 4. too noisy, or 5. totally ineffective, etc. This juicer is elegant, the rack and pinion compressor will take all the juice out of medium to large fruit (small fruit you need to stack 2 high, but that's more efficient anyway). It's heavy, but not more than most juicers, and it gives you the leverage you need. I never move mine off the counter so I don't mind the weight. the easily removable cup rinses out in the sink so it's ready to reuse in a flash. It doesn't need a plug and it's quiet unlike electric models. You can fit a pint (lager) glass or a 2 cup cup measure under the spout. I must use it 3 to 4 times a day and i've had mine now for over 2 years. Big thumbs up from me
I would love it more if... If it hadn't been damaged in shipping (like most of the items I get shipped from Target), it would be perfect.  The item itself is great for my garage.  I love it because I can keep everything organized in there.  Bottled water and other storm supplies stay together.  I also keep my deep fryer and tea kettle with extra mugs in there too.  I need a few more for holiday decorations as well as gardening supplies.  Honestly, the crack and dent are not causing any problems because they cannot be seen when it was all put together.  It just annoys me that they don't take better care of the items during delivery.  The price is great and it's exactly what I wanted (and needed).  I will probably get a few more, but maybe in-store next time
Great for Tea, too!. I've had one of these cups for about three years and it works great.
Excellant Water Filter system. Now I can drink water and make Tea & Coffee without the clorine tast
a fan FURever!. This is one amazing tool. We went from vacuuming 3 times a week to once a week. We simply can't believe the difference. The dog seems to love it, too. I don't have to work on him as long or hard or often as I did with the standard rake. I am a fan FURever
AMAZINGLY SOFT!. I bought this item not knowing whether it would be fit for a gift for my mother. Upon her opening the gift, she wrapped it around herself, and she just loves it! She keeps it near the couch so she can curl up with it on a daily basis.For some reason, the blanket just jumped out at me when i saw it online, and I am glad it did, because it was great for a gift, and now i want one for my own
Suck up the wetness!. Light and non-cotton, these are like spounges and they work far better than any dish towel I've used previously.  I haven't washed these, but if there's a problem, I'll update
Surprisingly effective and easy. I've rented carpet cleaners.  They work OK.  When I realized that I could buy something that worked and not have to worry about the 24-hour rental period I decided to give it a try.The machine arrived in good shape.  I put it together, filled the soap and water dispensers and started to use it.  The results are at least as good as with the rental machines, and WOW is it so much easier to use.I haven't had it a long time, nor have I used it heavily so I can't offer any comments on durability.What I don't like:  The plastic hose / tool carrier on the upright portion doesn't do a good job of holding the hose, power cord and/or tools.What I do like:  The aptly named Dirt Devil does a great job.  The dirt gets sucked away.  The two dispensers for soap and water are very convenient to use.  I like the clear plastic parts so I can see what's going on.  Since I don't have to worry about return deadlines I can do parts of the house at my convenience.  The price is right.What you should know:  Buy some soap.  The bottle that comes with it will get you started but not much more.Bottom line:If you have a closet or basement to store it and especially if you've rented a carpet cleaner more than twice, I can highly recommend a system like this.  I haven't compared this brand / model with others but I've had a great experience with this one
Love it!. I'm not much for blankets but I love this one.  The touch is just wonderful.  It is light weight and provides just the right amount of warmth.  Lovely quality.
replacement pitchers. wonderful--just like the ones that came with the Mr. Iced Tea maker- shippment was fast and prompt--I ordered 2 so I'd have a spare now I wished that I'd ordered
Great cookware!. Really have enjoyed using this Saucepan.  Cooks evenly, does not stick, cleans up good.  Thinking of purchasing more of this product
Best $2 I ever spent. My kitties are 5 years old, and I wish I had discovered this years ago.  They absolutely LOVE it!  For almost an hour they were trying to catch it, and I only stopped because I got tired.  I would highly recommend this to any cat owner
Nice idea. I definitely like the idea of my cats drinking clean water.  This Freshflow works well - although it is taking my cats some time to get used to the constant flow !  They don't seem to have much of a preference between this and the regular, unfiltered water though.  I think you would have to replace all water bowls with these for it to fit the purpose.
Best knife set there is. This is the best set of knives you will ever own. Very sharp and handles well. Great looking too. Gift box is a joke though
Mickey Wafflemaker. Acquired this item as a Christmas gift and the recipient was very pleased with it.  The wafflemaker works fine and makes a waffle that is just the right size for a child or anyone for that matter.  wished that it had a little more detail but that is a small matter if the finished product is good eating
Great Crate. In the past I have used the old stand by wire crates for my dogs. I recently got a new puppy (a Maltipoo) who is smaller than the dogs I have had in the past, so I was looking for a smaller wire crate, when I found this.  I love it!  This crate is easy to take up and down.  When visiting relatives, it is very easy to pack up and take with us.  With soft sides, I frequently find the puppy leaning against the sides as he is sleeping.  The "walls" on top and around the sides and front make it really easy to see what is going on inside the crate.  I bought the small, which gives him plenty of room to move around.  At night I have him sleeping in a small airline crate.  He is getting too big for that, so I am thinking of getting the extra small for night time use.
Bacon - Fast & Easy. Bacon has always been a family treat for breakfast on the weekends, due to the time it takes to cook and clean-up. However, with this bacon cooker we can have bacon any day of the week in just a few minutes with no mess! The cooker works great, but avoid trying to cook too much bacon  at one time otherwise it will cook unevenly. 12 pieces as pictured on the box is too much. I recommend only cooking 6 pieces at a time (one per row), but try it for yourself
reasonable. this product does a good job of removing chlorine from shower water at a reasonable price
Better than described !. Highly recommended. As good as you could ask for. It DOES have a front light, although some desciptions say it doesn't. Easy to use, push and manuver, even though not "self-propelled." The spinning front brush moves the vac forward. So, you don't a need self pro-pel for this EUREKA. It's just a gimmick, since it will wear out anyhow (it did on my previous Hoover). Not that heavy as described in some other reviews. Weight is NOT a concern at all. My old Hoover, although about the same weight, felt much heavier.  I would recommend this EUREKA to anyone looking for an upright, for a bargin price. You will NOT be disappointed
Shamrock rocks!. These mugs were gorgeous... nice and big to fill up with cocoa after being out in the snow!  The color is beautiful - a little darker than the retired chartreuse - but they look wonderful with the cobalt, sunflower, plum, &amp; turquoise I already have
Comfy and Cost-efficient. these bar stools are stylish, well-built, comfortable, and inexpensive... a perfect combination when I was looking for the perfect addition to a small eat-in-kitchen.
Absolutely gorgeous, stunning set!. I love this Pfaltzgraff dinnerware set.  I had purchased another 16-piece design set from another site, and I was very pleased with the quality of them.  I bought these when Amazon had an amazing sale on them, and they are just really stunning.  Worth every single penny I paid for them.  If you can get this for under fifty bucks, buy it, you won't regret it
Great buy!. I was hesitant to purchase these over the internet, but went ahead anyway. They shipped really fast and they are nice blinds. I was very pleased. I gave them four stars because although they are packaged pretty well, when I took them out of the boxes, the little plastic clips that attach the single piece over the top of the blinds had a broken clip in both packages. I used the pieces from my old blinds I was replacing, but for those who are buying them for bare windows, it would be a disadvantage
Grrrreat jar opener. This jar opener has never failed. I LOVE not having to ask my husband for help! He likes it too. I am ordering several for Christmas "little" gifts
Good speakers, great warranty. Short and sweat.... speakers sound very good. As with any pair of Bose speakers not the most bass or treble, but lots of mids. I'm sure there are better/less exspensive  speakers for outside, but I've not found any with a 5 year warrany. And that's the only reason I bought them
Polder LDR-6103 3-Step Designer Step Stool with Rail. Easy to use and store. Very stable and strong.
I bought 16 sets of these twin sheets!. Great Quality!I bought 16 sets of these for our family condo that has 8 twin beds.  They feel rich and think and seem to be well stitched.  At $10 a set, for 300 count is a great deal.  This quality goes for between $30-$50 elsewhere.I've only washed them twice so far, so I don't have much more to say.Good luck!And
great product. I bought this product cause i wanted something that was different and take up less space. It works great and looks very updated in my kitchen. I dont have to worry about more cords being plugged in on my counter. Its small and opens up my cans wonderfully. I can get it started and walk off to do something really quick and it shuts off automatically when the can is opened. It walks right around my can while it sits on my counter so dont have to worry about standing there and holding the can waiting for it to be finished. I use my opener everday and have only had to plug it in once to recharge its battery and the lenght to recharge the battery was only about 2 hours. Its a very good product and well worth the price. Im sure it wont let it down.
Good Buy. I love this banana/fruit holder :) It looks tiny on the picture but it is really good size. It is chrome finish and very elegant. Good price too
Funny gift to give :). It's soft and medium-sized.  Didn't pay too much for them so didn't feel too bad when friends would come over and ask if they could take one. Now I don't have any left, but they're an interseting little soft "stuffed animal" kind of thing.  No real practical purpose probably - and I heard it's a horror if it ever opens/spills its contents.  And it's kind of funny - the thing itself is soft - but it comes in a huge box with TONS of air pillows (when you order it from amazon at least).  So if you're moving and need packing material, then here's a 2-for-1 special.
TITLE should read 20-Piece Set. We ordered the 16 piece set hoping to receive service for four, with 3 pieces and 4 serving pieces, just like the one shown in blue. Instead we received the 20 piece set which includes service for 4, with the 5 pieces pictured, I called customer service told them that we did not receive the four serving pieces that we expected; they said the computers were down, could you call back later? instead I emailed customer service told them that we were missing the 4 serving pieces as well as the problem I had with calling customer service.Customer service sent out another 16 piece set, (as stated on the shipping slip) but, we do not have the heart to tell them, again, that they sent out another 20 piece dinnerware set. UPDATED 1/27/0
Tea Rose Oval Vegetable Bowl. This bowl is absolutely beautiful.  I also like the size of the bowl and the beautiful tea rose pattern.  I highly recommend it
Agree that smaller would be better. I have 4 cats and find that if I fill this more than halfway the water gets discolored before it's time to refill.  My cats like to play in it getting scum and food in the water so it needs to be cleaned at least once a week.  It's a great product, and I don't mind filling it halfway, however it would have probably made more sense to get the smaller one.  I would also suggest that the food and water are kept a good distance from each other to help keep the water clean.  It is not fun to clean it while it's still full.  As for the 'gurgleing' it is not a major problem with cat's since they don't drink as much as dogs it rarely happens while they are standing there.  When it does they either run off and come back later or they try to play with it.
Better than the new-fangled things. I've been using NeckBones for more than 10 years, always buying a spare in case my old one wears out.  My local store no longer carries them, so I decided to look on-line.  I was given one of those new, squishy pillows as a gift, and I tried it, but there's no comparison.  I use my NeckBone for traveling and sleeping due to a neck problem, and I would never go anywhere without it
Do-it-yourself... Love it!  Bought it for my 3-year old who is in the "I want to do it myself" stage.  Put her two favorite cereals in the dispenser and now she can get a bowl, fill it with cereal and grab a spoon all by herself in the morning.  She still has to wait until Mommy pours the milk - but we're working on that!
Excellent relatively low tech & cheap way to do CO2. This product works well, producing CO2 relatively easily and cheaply - compared to having a pressurized CO2 canister and regulator (etc.) high-tech set-up.  Be sure to educate yourself about CO2 in fish tanks.  It's good for plants, but too much could be bad for fish.  For example, I operate an airstone when lights are out at night only.  This diffuses the CO2, which is not needed by plants in the dark, and plants are not producing oxygen in the dark.  (Put air pump and airstone on a timer.)  You need to learn the basics of CO2 injection, even for this simple system.  If you do, you will have no problems, only great plants.I have only small fish (under 3 inches) in my 55 gal planted tank.  Not one fish has ever suffered as a result of CO-2 fertilization, but the plants grow much, much better!I see no reason why a DIY yeast+baking powder solution would not work -- will be going to this.  For the price, you get all you need to get started, to make your plants look great!
Excellent!  Lives up to its name. I was looking for a more conveniently disposable litter since I live on the top floor of my apartment building and making a trip to the dumpster every day to dispose of his duty was very annoying.  I looked into automatic cat boxes and litter lockers, but they were too bulky and expensive.  When I discovered WBCL at the pet store, I was skeptical of its effectiveness since it's all-natural.  It was nothing but great!  I put my cat on it cold-turkey and he had no problem with it.  It clumps well and truly is flushable, I've had no problems.  The odor control is good as long as you scoop regularly, which you have no excuse not to do.  All litters track, but a tracking pad will take care of that.  I feel so much better that it's environmentally friendly and healthier for my cat and myself.  Highly recommended!!!
This is a great knife!. I bought this knife after it was recommended in the book Kitchen Confidential. The knife is razor sharp, well balanced and it's very comfortable in the hand. Also, I accidently nicked myself with it -- I was shocked both by my own stupidity and how flawlessly the cut healed because the knife was so sharp
Sensational Soap Pump!. While searching for the perfect kitchen soap dispenser on Amazon, I came across two which looked identical at first. In reading the reviews of both I noticed a huge difference in customer satisfaction. Looking closer at the photos of each there was a slight difference between the two. DON'T BE FOOLED! The Progressive International Soap Dispenser is the best! Beautiful AND durable. My husband hasn't broken it yet...AMAZING
Pop-Up hamper. This hamper can easily hold a week's worth of clothing and bedding for two people.  The casters makes it easy to roll to the laundry room.
Nice Alternative to Aerosol Sprays. I like my Misto very much and cook with it frequently.  From spraying the bottom of a pan for stir-fry or misting a salad, it works perfectly everytime.Make sure you read the directions, though.  I didn't and filled mine to the top and found that it would spray for two or three seconds and then squirt in a stream.  The box said it should mist for 15 seconds, so I went back to the directions to see what I'd done wrong and sure enough, you're only supposed to fill it halfway so that there's enough room for pressure to build.If you cook with oil frequently and want a healthy alternative to those off-the-shelf cooking sprays, this is the way to go
Works Great. I bought this to replace an earlier version that had just plain worn out.  This new model is much improved.  Nice size, sturdy plastic and it does well at trapping the grounds.  Good product if you are looking for a travelling coffee press
A Lot of Fun - for a Short While. This was a lot of fun. Its big and different from my Golden's other toys and it makes a really unusual sound, not a squeak but a honk, if you will.The problem came when my Golden took to destroying it and eventually ripped out the honker. This is of course inevitable with these toys so be prepared to supervise your dog's short playtimes with this toy and to mend it several times to extend its lifespan.
Unbreakable and well made. This coffee press is light weight and easy to use.  It cleans up easily and takes up little space in the cupboard.  It works as well as the more expensive ones and it won't break if it gets dropped in the sink
Love this vacuum. This is a great vacuum. I bought my first windtunnel several years ago and just recently needed to replace it. The vacuum is still going strong but I've run over the cord a few too many times and the cord is starting to fray. Aside from that I'm sure it would be good for a few more years. Anyway I liked my windtunnel so much that after shopping around I decided to replace it with the exact same vacuum. It's powerful and reliable. The only negative I can think of is that the hose is a little short, the vacuum will tip over if you stretch it too far
How to make the perfect cup of Cuban coffee. I have used this model of Bialetti 3-cup coffee maker for years; this is the exact model my Dad used when he showed me how to make Cuban coffee.  Cuban-style coffee is very similar to Italian espresso (both are made from finely-ground espresso beans) but is sweeter and stronger.  The manufacturer includes an instruction booklet but if you've never made coffee before it could be a little confusing at first.  Buy yourself a stainless steel creamer and a set of espresso cups.  Add four heaping teaspoons of sugar to the creamer.  Follow the instructions in the booklet to make the coffee.  When the coffee finishes brewing, add two teaspoons of coffee to the creamer.  Stir the coffee and sugar together until it forms a consistency similar to mousse (it will be dark at first but will lighten as you mix it).  Now add the rest of your coffee to the creamer and stir until all the sugar dissolves.  Pour immediately into the cups and serve (you should have enough to fill two cups).  The coffee will form a nice, thick head on it just like a pint of Guinness.  Enjoy!
Excellent...and very attractive!. First, this is more accurately called a sauce POT rather than a saucepan--it's about 8.5 inches at the bottom and gradually flares to 10 inches at the top; it's 5 inches tall (w/o cover); and it has two loop handles, which are easy to grasp. The pot is not too heavy, but it heats very evenly, and the nonstick works well and looks perfect after 6 months of heavy use (I don't use metal utensils). The curved bottom makes stirring and scraping easier, and I find the domed glass cover helpful. Clean-up is a cinch--I do handwash.  I've found this pot to be very versatile--for sauces, risotto, chili, rice, pastas, soups, stews (start on the stovetop and finish in the oven), and even smaller batches of stock (because you can fill it almost to the top). Last but not least, this pot is nicely compact for its capacity, and is attractive enough to put on the table--nice, sleek lines!  I recommend this without reservation
If you follow the directions this is an excelent roaster. Cooks quickly and evenly.  Not as good at being a slow cooker as my slow cooker but it is wonderful as it was intended
17 inch model good for small cats. My Burmese kitten loves her little black Petmate Burrow Bed - it's relatively "flat" and hooded, so she can stretch out of the opening, or curl up against the hooded area as she pleases.  At first I was a little concerned about the construction of the bed, because when she would cuddle into a corner of the bed, the bed would "tilt" and leave her in a bizarre angle (as the mattress area is fluffy and round)!  But the more she sleeps on it, the more the padding compresses down, and now this is no longer a problem.  Furthermore - the entire lining (hood and cushion cover) is removable and washable.  Very nicely constructed, and highly recommended
For Agressive Chewers. Still the best item out there for agressive chewers.  That doesn't mean your dog won't eventually manage to get it ripped apart, but it does take longer than anything else out there.  Much better than the Orca toys which only take minutes to destroy
I don't want to get out of bed!. I love this duvet cover.  I didn't think my down comforter could be any more comfortable, and I bought the cover simply to keep it clean.  I didn't realize that it could make my bed so much more comfortable!  It is very soft and a great addition
Beautiful Hamper. This hamper is beautiful, with lively colors.  It also has a fairly large capacity.  However, it is not extremely sturdy.  I wouldn't move it with the clothes in it or put it in a room with a child who is hard on her possessions.  That said, it is a great addition to my 2 1/2 year old's butterfly themed room, and she loves the antenna, wings and face on the hamper
Great Buy. Love the table.  Arrived in excellant condition and I put together in 1 hour.  I have had a lot of experience in assembly of this type of DIY furniture though. The hardware kit comes with 1 extra piece of key hardware just in case.  Nice touch
excellent product, highly recommend. I absolutely love these potholders!!!! I have four sets of them. They are great as potholders but they also have other uses. I place them under cutting boards to keep them from sliding on the counter when I am chopping. I also use them to keep bowls firmly on the counter if I am whipping cream. I also use them as trivets when placing hot pans on my counter top.My only caution regarding this product is that you need to be aware of the location of the hole in one corner of the potholder. I didn't pay attention one day and got a nasty burn pulling a very hot pan out of the oven. If you are a bit of a klutz, like me, best to keep 100% aloe in the house just in case you do what I did. Repeated applications of aloe took the burn out of the fingertip in a few hours. I was very fortunate. I hope this doesn't happen to you.I highly recommend this product
The Best Soup Mug. I love this mug. It is the absolute best. I searched all over for a mug that would hold my soup (one can of Campbell's Chunky), has a handle, is understated and elegant, and has a lid to prevent splatter and spills. This is a great mug
a very good garlic keeper. This was even nicer than I had expected, about 3 inches high at the shoulder and 4 inches across, it is big enough to hold six full heads of garlic.  It came through the dishwasher okay and is more pleasant to look at than a clay keeper
Great Chair!. This chair is very comfotable and attractive. I'm happy with it. The price is awsome
Kudo's to Oster's Engineers!!. This is the best blender I have ever owned! They have done away with the awful rubber gear and replaced it with a much more stable metal connection. Plus it has several handy attachments. GOOD JOB OSTER!!
Best Cat Litter. This litter is the best. It absorbs odors, lasts longer than regular brands and my cats love it!!
Excellent Fan. We purchased this fan during the heat wave this past summer and it was a great buy.  Not only was it priced well but it has been an excellent fan for our small home expecially during the warm nights.  We love the fact that it has an automatic shut off feature and also an exhaust for when you need to reverse the air flow. This fan helped to cut our air conditioning bills significantly and even our friend asked me to orderd her one too
Toasty turkey!. We bought this to use this Thanksgiving for our 20 lb turkey...but couldn't wait.  We have used several times to raost chicken and it is great.  The chicken cooked faster than our cookbooks had suggested and it cooked very evenly.  Clean up was nice too...just a little hot soapy water was enough to remove the cooked on drippings.  We did a lot of comparison pricing before we purchased this item...the price was right in line with many of the cheaper and no name brands that I had seen on sale
An excellent product!. At less then $5 I have never seen a product that performed better! I cooked two eggs in my 600w microwave on 50% power for 4 minutes. (The instructions didn't have a chart for a 600w microwave so I did a little experimenting). I would have given the item five stars but the eggs did stick a little (the instructions said they wouldn't) but it was very minor stickage. Nothing a paper towl and some hot water wouldn't fix. Buy this product! I'm going to get me another one (or two)
Just lovely... The flowers not only arrived in good time, they were also so lovely.  My friend, who loves roses, was very impressed.  Definitely a great purchase
going back for more. As the spokesperson from the kitchen of a family of five(which includes boys and their friends that use flatware to fix paintball guns, play extreme outdoor games, and use spoons to open locked doors, etc.), I have to say this has been great tableware for us.  No dings, dents, or rust.  I've had this set for over four years, and it still looks great.  It's time to fill in lost pieces that are somewhere out in the yard . .
Nice soft towels. These towels are soft and maintain the same color after several washes.  Will buy them agai
Helpful for Arthritis. These treats have been great for our large-breed, older dog who has developed arthritis in his hips. They're also one of the few Glucosamine treats that don't make him sick
Finally, nice soft butter!!!. I have been using this butter keeper for 3 months now and it is definitely one of my favorite kitchen products!!! I hate rock hard butter so I love the fact that I can have nice spreadable butter any time I want. Furthermore, I can modulate the softness of my butter by placing the keeper in different parts of my kitchen (by the somewhat drafty, cold window for firmer butter or on the counter for softer butter). I have not had any problems with it and I am going to be ordering another one for my mother
Great toy for hyper kitties!. If your cat wakes you up in the morning not just to eat but to play, this toy will help!  I have four cats and they all love it.  The only negative factor is that they wear the battery out fast!  The carpeting at the base can also be used as a scratching mat.  This toy doesn't weigh that much but it doesn't topple easy.
Such a cute kitchen gadget!. I have to admit from the beginning that I am a sucker for cute kitchen items.  Wedgey definitely fits into that category, although it works great as an egg slicer as well.  It makes a nice gift, too
Delicate but very nice. We have had these glasses for a while now and are very pleased with them. True they are very delicate but they are made from borosilicate glass which is quite sturdy. We clean them in the dishwasher and have not had any problems with that, although you should make sure they don't touch other glass or metal in the dishwasher. These wine glasses have quickly become our favourites
Beautiful BIA !. BIA makes many dishes and bakeware items.  I have this oval baker as well as several others in this collection.  It is simple in design yet has flair about it - the gentle waves around the tops of the "cordon bleu wavy" collection make it a beautiful piece to go from oven to table.  The handles make it easy to transfer from countertop to oven to table.  It has a nice weight to it, bakes evenly and cleans up nicely.  I wish there were more pieces to this collection. An elegant piece to bake in and set on the table.
Hamilton Beach 04163. Amazon asked me to review the replacement filter so I thought I'd go ahead and make some comments about the Air Cleaner itself.  Prior to buying the air cleaner (must have been almost 3 years ago) I'd wake up most mornings with a runny nose.  Since running this overnight for the past 3 years I very rarely ever have any stuffiness or runniness in the mornings.  In fact, if someone shuts it off during the night my wife and I both notice the difference in the air in the house. I recommend this any time someone tells me about their allergies - it is one of the highest value purchases I have made - eve
Very Nice. I bought this set for a recent camping/rv trip.  Worked out great.  Attractive, unbreakable and practical
Nothing more solid than a Bunn. I've seen other Bunn brewers run years under constant use and never wink out. If you are looking for a constant use brewer, especially for an office setting, this is it. Don't skimp on a cheap, plastic Braun, Krups, or Mr. Coffee. This is an investment that will take the abuse of multiple office patrons
Wonderful chocolate. A friend provided the fountain for a wedding reception, and was unaware that fountain chocolate was available. He had previously mixed his chocolate through trial and error, adding oil, then chocolate, then more oil.... I had read about Sephra's chocolate and liked that it was pre-blended with the right amount of oil to use in any chocolate fountain.We gave it a try and it was a hit! We went through three bags of chocolate in as many hours. The dark chocolate provided a nice counterpoint to the sweetness of the fruit without being overly sweet. Being able to microwave the chocolate, pour it into the fountain and walk away was wonderful
Great Everyday China. I got married last year and registered for this set. It is inexpensive and can work for everyday meals or if you have company. If you are looking for a flexible set on a budget this is it.
Highly recommended. As mentioned by other reviewers, the reviewer who stated that this isn't cast iron is mistaken.  This is a traditional, old fashioned, authentic Chinese wok.  If you want a modern stainless steel wok, don't buy this one. If you want the type of wok used in Chinese restaurants, this is it.  The deal offered by the Wok Shop is a really good one and you'll be hard pressed to find this good of a deal on an authentic wok anywhere else.  To learn more about The Wok Shop, the store selling this wok, and Tane Chan, the store's owner, you should read Gourmet Magazine's Dec. 2004 article on the shop. [...
fiesta periwinkle 494 7-inch covered butter dish. I received my butter dish in a very timely fashion & very well packaged too.  The product is wonderful & it's being used on a daily basis.  I am extremely happy with the product & the shipper
Perfect all-around serving dish!. This dish is my favorite serving piece in my fiestaware! I already have it in seafoam. It is the perfect size, for Thanksgiving-size side dishes, everyday main courses, chips, rolls, or even desserts. I especially like the shape, it fits into tight spaces on the table. And, the price is right, compare and you'll see it's the best bargain in fiestaware! I bought this for my daughter who just moved out of the house, started her off with a small collection of Rose, her favorite color
The BEST Vacuum I Have Ever Owned. Even though I vacuumed my carpeting with my old vacuum on a regular basis, my carpets were still filthy. I just never realized it. When I first got my Eureka 5902BVZ, the dirt cup was filled with cat hair and other debris in no time! Someone else said they could make another cat out of the cat hair their vacuum picked up. With all the cat fur from my three kitties my vacuum picked up I could make a whole family of cats and have enough left over to knit a sweater. If I could knit that is. My furniture, carpeting and rugs look so much nicer. I have asthma and find that I am actually able to breathe better and not use my emergancy inhaler nearly as often as I had been. The Power Paw works very well on my furniture and throw pillows. The money I spent on this vacuum will certainly be made up by not having to buy sweeper bags all the time. Maybe I am a bit warped but, I enjoy seeing how much the vacuum has picked up when I remove the dust cup to empty it. I get a real sense of accomplishment. Because I'm disabled, I was concerned that this vacuum might be difficult to handle and am pleased to say it is easier for me to operate than my old vacuum. This is the best vacuum I've ever owned. I was so pleased with this vacuum after first using it I left it out to show off to all my friends when they came to visit. I have never before, in all my years, been excited about a vacuum cleaner let alone enjoy using one. Believe it or not, I am actually happy my old vacuum cleaner stopped working and I had to buy a new one...and the Eureka 5902BVZ was the one I chose
Tea-for-One. I bought this as a gift for a tea-lover, along with a few other tea-accessories. She loved it. It's got a classic look. It's not gaudily painted like something you'd find at Starbucks. It gets the job done. The semi-gloss finish gives it a sort of home-made feel which contrasts the robotic perfection of the curves. It sits comfortably in the kitchen both modern and rustic
Great Pillows  for Kids. Loved this pillow.  it is a lot of  fun
Timing & Quality Met Expectations. I received the item within the expected time period and in good condition
Cannot be happier!. I cannot say enough good things about this dehydrator.  I've used it for almost a year now, and I'm churning out jerky and fruit leather in huge batches a few times a year, and we always have healthy snacks on hand.I've added trays so I'm up to 8, and even with a full load, drying times are very quick.  Ground beef jerky sticks dry in 4 or 5 hours, jerky strips in less than that, and fruit leather takes 6 to 8 hours depending on what I'm drying and how thick I want it.I can dry 10 pounds of jerky sticks at one time, so it lasts for awhile.  I tend to make several flavors all at one time so everyone is happy.The fan is a little loud, but it's pushing a LOT of air, and it doesn't interfere with our TV watching in the living room next to the kitchen.Anyone who is serious about drying food should give this serious consideration.  Yes, it's pricier, but you can expand to a ridiculous number of trays and get the same results, so it really does amortize well when you look how much you can make at one time.Stock up on the mesh screens and leather trays when you expand the number of shelves, and you can be in jerky and leather all year long
NordicWare 10 Inch Micro Go Round. If your microwave oven does not have a built-in turntable, the NordicWare Micro Go Round is the perfect solution
sooo yummy. If you love garlic you HAVE to have one of these! It's so easy, you just cut off the top of a big clove and put it in upside-down with a bit of EVOO and it smells - and tastes - DELICIOUS! Use the cloves for just about any dish - mashed potatoes, vegetables, even steak.
Great garlic keeper. I was not disappointed in this item. It is attractive and looks just like the picture. It's a nice size: not too small, not too large
very good but not perfect. it is very useful, but it doesn't hold heat "almost 24 hours" like some people discribed. overall it is very good that we can carry hot coffee around the house instead of stationary coffee maker pot (so we don't have to walk to kitchen to refill coffee). i will recomend it to other people
Easy clean-up!. I just love this cookware dish - it's functional and pretty. It cleans so easily. I now plan to buy more Le Creuset Poterie cookware
I love it!. I love this dish.  It is slightly bigger than a 9x13. It is great for casseroles. It is so colorful and washes easily. It is a great accent for the table
Light wedge saves marriages. I LOVE the light wedge! It will save marriages if one spouse cannot sleep with the light on while the other reads! The light wedge does not shine anywhere other than within the book. It is a great and easy shape to pack as well
Chef,s Choice 300W Diamond Hone Knife Sharpener. We have one of the knife sharpeners and wanted two of them for Christmas presents. But after finding them we decided they we too expensive till we looked on Amazon. We ordered two of them at a much lower price and the shipping was very quick.
Lasts as long as advertised. I have one cat and get about 3 to 4 weeks out of a cartridge before it needs to be replaced.  It does a very good job at odor control as well.  I would say the only downside is that they are a little pricey
Great for back or side sleepers!. I've owned two of these pillows.  Although the first one got flatter before as many years as it said it should last for me, they've been the best pillows I've had.  I have problems with my neck, head, etc. with normal pillows.  They are just too high.  My old Simmon's Beautyrest pillow is being used by a family member, and two other family members also have this kind of pillow!  They are apparently fine for side sleepers as well!  I would definitely recommend them for people who have trouble with other types of pillows
good quality. I own an original piece 1962 and there is no difference in quality whatsoever
Presto keeps improving with time. This pressure cooker replaced a thirty year old Presto.  The new cooker works flawlessly, is easy to clean and store, and seems sturdy enough to last for thirty years.
Best knife I've ever used. I bought this knife for my daughter for her birthday.  I'm sure she's going to enjoy using it.  I had the occasion to use it at her house after she unwrapped it and found it to be amazing.  It was so well balanced and weighted that when slicing a potato very little pressure had to be applied. Now I just have to get one for myself.  Well, my birthday is coming up in February
Absolutely Cutting Edge!. Henckels is definetelyone of the finest Knives made in the world today, it's name stands for durability and quality, I use their knives in my kitchen daily, and they never fail to come thru any situation I put in front of them.  I highly recommend these knives for the pro, or the home kitchen
SHOULD HAVE WAITED !. ..........I PAID TOO MUCH FOR THESE KNIVES, THOUGH THEY WORK WELL.  I SHOULD HAVE SHOPPED AROUND
Great deal on a great vacuum!. The Dyson DC 14 Full-Kit out-performed my Oreck XL in ways I could not have imagined. Thanks to the transparent collection cup, one can immediately see what has been collected.  I was stunned at what my Oreck had left behind.  I highly recommend the Dyson to anyone considering a new vacuum purchase.  I am as satisfied as one can be with my purchase of a remanufactured unit from Amazon.com
GREAT little scissors!. I used these scissors for cutting off the fins and tail of Tilapia(sp?),  and these worked wonderfully on cutting through those needle-like bones!  My last pair of cooking scissors broke while in the process of cutting!  These are really great for any purpose!  SHARP too
Super Practico. El dise?o es genial, el material tambien. El chupon se ajusta muy bien. Lo coloque dentro del fregadero desde hace una semana y ni se a movido
Great value for great product. I'm extremely pleased with the Spiegelau glass collection--Amazon prices make it an even better buy.  Elegant, but not over-styled, make these glases a great addition to any table.  Thus far, no negatives.  I'm not the most gentle of folks, and thus far these have proved very durable
Great product and great service. Most people I showed this wok set to could not believe the price I paid for it.  This kit contains everything you need to start wok'n except the food.I seasoned it using the instructions sent to me in an email by the shop owner and what had looked like a dull, lifeless hunk of metal took on an almost sculptural look of bronze patterned metal.  It was almost a shame to cook on it, but now that I have a few meals on the surface, water beads up and rolls off and nothing sticks to the shiny surface.  I did need to take a metal file to the outside edges before seasoning, as they were quite sharp, but otherwise everything is just what I was looking for.  I have already placed my next order from The Wok Shop.
vacuum cleaner bags. i was pleased to get exactly what i wanted in a few clicks and a few days
Great nip. Just got it as a add on to an order and found that my cats really liked it. All you have to do is open the bag and they come a runnin
Makes an amatuer cook feel like a pro. I have tried to make rice many times with different methods and my rice is always horrible, and after giving up I found this rice cooker and decided to give it a try. The very first time I used it, I achieved perfect rice, not just great rice but to my opinion it seems like restaurant quality every time and its very simple to make with this cooker. You don't even have to keep an eye on it, it figures out how long its going to take to cook on its own and when the rice is done it beeps and switches into the warming function. It also steams food, makes cakes, soup, and a slow cook function
beautiful machine. very happy with the proformance of the processor.made the pizza recipe with it and the dough was done great.the pizza still needs to be worked on lol.all-in-all,fantastic product
Rachel Ray's 5QT Oval Pot. This is a GREAT product.  It really holds a lot and is great for stoups (thicker than soup but thinner than stews) and can hold meats like a pork tenderloin quite easily
Nail clipper for Large Dogs. This is the best nail clipper for large dogs and the only one that's been easy to use for my dog with minimal stress to him.  It's sharp and able to achieve a clean smooth cut
Cuts bagels like butter. I first saw this being used in a hotel breakfast establishment in Sedona, AZ. The server gave me the name of the product and I ordered it from Amazon. This cuts bagels (right from the refrigerator also) with ease. You can even cut one using only one hand!!! It is totally safe because the blade is encased in hardened plastic. I just love it. Use it all the time. I highly recommend it
This Baby Is Incredible!!. I would certainly highly recommend this juicer to anyone! It is stylish, sleek,easy to clean, and has plenty of power to handle anything. I feel sorry for michigan, mix 3 apples and a handful of baby carrots for a great drink! Awesome! Awesome The first negative credit for this must be a lazy ol' prune who wouldn't be happy with anything! Get it now!
Wonderful Spot Remover. I had no idea how good this product is.  It came with the vacuum cleaner so I figured I would use it on a mess my cat left after coughing up a hairball.  The Dyzolv completely removed the stain.  This was not the first haiball the cat had coughed up.  Previously I used some other spot remover I had.  It didn't do as good a job as the Dyzolv. Since then the cat has coughed up more hairballs and everytime the Dyson Dyzolv removes the stain.  That is why I purchased two more bottles
Great towel!. My husband and I have really enjoyed this product. They are very soft and a good sized towel
Wow Factor!. My twin boys just had their 3rd birthday and I did their room in Thomas the Tank as a surprise.  When they walked in and saw the huge Thomas on their full size bed, it as really a WOW factor!  Great colors
Great size, quality and colors!. This plate is the perfect size for general use. The colors are great, the quality is amazing, and they stand up well in the dishwasher and microwave. Plus, they are made in the USA.
Excellent dishware. You just can't go wrong with Fiestaware.  It's sturdy, durable, attractive, cleans up easily (from table to dishwasher to cabinet).  And if my rough-on-dishes family can't break it, no one can
Wonderful and Reasonable. I was sick of all of my mismatched flatware (some dating back to the 70's!), so I browsed the reviews and saw that this set was well-liked. I am very pleased with it! The pieces have a nice weighty feel to them, and I really like the pattern - it looks like a much more expensive set. They washed up in the dishwasher beautifully, too. I liked this set so much, I ordered a second one. Great flatware at a very reasonable price.
Saved our cat from drowning in our toilet!. Didn't take too long to put together, way cheaper than the pet stores and now we don't have to keep putting the toilet lid down, as our cat loves fresh flowing water
Panasonic MC-4620 Bagless Straight-Suction Canister Vacuum. I very much like this vacuum cleaner.  It is small enough to manuver around the areas that I need to clean in my home.I really like how it is not so big, heavy, and cumbersome to move around.  Just not having any bags to empty or try to find and stock up on is also a real plus for me.I highly recommend this small, easy to use, not too noisey vacuum.Thanks.L.GoodFront Royal, VA
I always come back to Farberware. For a stockpot there's no brand like Farberware. It's the workhorse of the industry. I love the covers as the edges drop into the pot so water or soup or anything in it ever seeps over the top. The cover keeps everything locked in. You can scrub and use the most abrasive pads to clean the pot and never worry.  They don't even scratch from use. Not that anything sticks that much you just don't have to worry. I loved Farberware stockpots 40years ago and I'm still faithful.I have one 3 quart for over 25 years and there is nothing wrong with it today. They seem to last forever.  Don't judge a stockpot by it's price, still can't get better than Farberware.
Great smushy pillows. I bought two of these pillows. I just love feather pillows. The last set I bought were to crunchy and not soft enough for me.These pillows are just right. Some support and softness. I like the pillow to envelope my head when I lay on them. These do. I will certainly buy more. The the pillow case is just so elegant
Make bacon in your microwave. I've used one of these for years. It is so easy, and the fat winds up in the tray, eliminating much of the unhealthy aspect of eating bacon. You can make up to eight pieces at a time, or you can remove one or two T's and hang only a couple of strips if you like. I remove it after two minutes and pull the bacon apart if the ends are sticking together. It can also be repositioned if the slices are not cooking uniformly. Then I return it to the oven and cook a minute or two more, depending on how many strips are on the T's and how crisp I want it to be. I wrap the finished bacon in a paper towel while my eggs are frying. The Mak'n Bacon washes easily, unlike one of those Microwave bacon trays with the ridges
makes fantastic toast but doesn't match my stand mixer. This toaster makes the most evenly cooked toast I have ever seen. Even better than my 4 slot Cuisinart toaster. My only issue with this toaster is that the "pineapple" color I purchased this month does not match the "pineapple" stand mixer I bought last summer. This toaster has a green hue to it where my mixer is solidly yellow. I purchased the toaster, coffee maker and blender together in December and they all have a green hue to the pineapple color. Its so bad they actully clash if you put them side by side with the stand mixer. Maybe if you are buying the whole set at the same time you won't have this problem? My mixer broke after 6 months so I am sending it back. I hope they send me one that matches this toaster
Frother Review. I had a rechargable frother that I purchased from Williams and Sonoma (W&S) and am quite pleased with it.   My friend (since 1956) who lives in Hartford CT liked it so I offered to send her $30 so she could buy one at W&S for her birthday.  W&S no longer carries it.  I purchased it on Amazon for her and had it mailed to her.  She is delighted with it.My only displeasure was that I could not get free shipping for an item costing over $25 because a seller other than Amazon
The perfect little bowl... I have recently become a Fiestaware addict!  I started with these cute little bowls, which I thought would be perfect for my three small children to use.  For my two year old, it is the perfect size for cereal.  We also use these little fruit bowls to serve, well, fruit at the dinner table.  I also like using these bowls for quick candy or nuts dishes when guests arrive--they really are so veratile.  They stack up nicely in the cupboard.  And the Cinnabar color is unbelievably rich and pretty.  I just ordered several new pieces in other colors too, and the Cinnabar coordinates wonderfully with the Plum, Cobalt, and Periwinkle.
Great mixer for the price. Very nice unit. I've wanted to get one of these for a long time, but just didn't get around to it. At the price I paid, this was a no brainer. It would be nice if it came with the funnel attachment for pouring ingredients into the bowl
Works for me!. The product came in a timely manner.  It was easy to set up and suits my needs perfectly.  I'm glad I purchased it
Lenox butterfly meadow creamer. This is a beautiful piece, the porcelain is thin and appears delicate but is heavy duty enough for the dishwasher
Great product. The six cartriges I recieved will last me about a year. They make your razor smwll good, and also do a great job of lubricating the blades. The trick is to clean your razor every other shave.
Great trash can for the price. The second one I've purchased.  Wish they didn't use so much glue on the front label.  A real chore to remove.
SPRAYING ended - LOVE this product. My home is home to four cats.  They mostly get along with each other and with the dogs.  However, my cat China, while sweet to humans, is nasty to the other four-legged inhabitants.  He began a spraying spree - I would come home after work to find as many as half a dozen spots sprayed. Since using the Feliway diffuser, in conjunction with an additional cat box in a cat-convenient location, and thorough cleaning and treating (with Feliway spray) of the sprayed areas, I can happily say that in the last 9 months I've only had one or two spraying incidents.  China, while still ornery, is overall much nicer to the other cats and 2 of 3 of the dogs.  I can tell when it's time to replace the diffuser because he becomes a demon again
wonderful towels. These towels are my most favorite.  They are baby soft, very absorbent and wash like a dream
What do you do with a ton of ground meat?. You buy the Jerky Works.  It worked great.  I didnt' realize that you could make jerky from ground meat.  The flavor is fabulous.  It stores well.  It is easy to use.  I would highly recommend it for anyone who hunts or who butchers their own meat.  When you have all that meat you don't have room for in the freezer, it makes fabulous jerky.  I was surprised at how easy and efficient it worked and very pleased with the outcome.  I highly recommend the product
a great, great knife. I really love this knife, especially the handle. It form fits into my palm and has a decent satisfying heft to it that some of my larger chef's knives just don't have. When I'm looking for a knife, I'm looking for this one every time. It's also managed to keep a good edge for quite a long time. I think you'll be happy if you buy this one, and if you're like me, you may even want to replace all of your knives with this line. Can't recommend it highly enough
Elegant Highball Glasses. It looks very elegant with 4/5 full of iced beverage in the sunny afternoon kitchen. It feels so good while holding the glass and chatting with friends. The distinguish quality has captured every guest in the house. The size is just right for such occasions
Glad we bought the Krups XP1500. I tried buying this item on line from a major dept store 3 days before Christmas. After they processed the order (which included tax) they told me it would ship on February 8th.  I cancelled the order and went to Amazon.com.  I had the item the day after Christmas and we have used it daily ever since.  We are very happy with the purchase and are very glad to have it in our home.  We are also very glad that we bought it through Amazon.com.
Attractive unit. I like unit because it doesn't look like other typical media storage units and can also function as non-media storage.  You do need to be careful when sliding the drawers out because they slide out fully and you don't want it dropped on your foot.  The drawers also need to be slid in carefully or it won't close fully.  The fiberboard sides aren't that attractive but it's not a horribly looking piece of furniture either and I'll probably paint it at some point
New customer. Bought this product with a gift certificate from my children.  I am very satisfied with the bowls.  I give this product a high recommendation
Exellent Value. The Pinzon 10-Piece Cookware Set that I recently purchased is an excellent value for anyone who is in the market for a new set of cookware
Excellent product. The only drawback is that the directions don't make it clear that the shelf supports need to go on the uprights with the slanted edge up
Definitely worth the money. I love mine!  I use another item with rotating brushes for my deep mopping, but we use this little thing for daily clean-ups and have had no problems with things spilling.  I've washed the pads and have found them to come out of the wash clean.  I really only have two complaints.  One, sometimes a little(I'm talking about drops here, definitely not a lot) of the mopping solution leaks out during the vacuum cycle.  This is not a problem for me because I plan to mop after I vacuum anyway.  The other complaint is that you need to remember to change the pad after vacuuming if you plan to mop.  Otherwise, you mop with a dirty pad.  Anyway, we love ours and are thrilled to have found it.
STUNNING!. A stunning `pride of place' plate to present all sorts of goodies on, hot or cold.Endless uses, but looks particularly superb with a selection of breads, along with the matching `bean pots`, full of steaming soup, on colder days.Equally stunning with a selection of cold meats or cheeses at the BBQ, on a warm, summer's evening.Friends use theirs for roast chicken on Sundays.Guaranteed to be a talking point whatever you use it for!Easy to clean and dishwasher safe it is hard to beat such a durable item which looks the part as well.At an excellent price, On Amazon, today.Check out the other colours, too - there is bound to be one for you!`Manufactured using the highest quality materials and techniques, Le Creuset Stoneware offers much greater resistance to extreme temperature changes, chipping and crazing.The tough, craze-free glaze is totally hygienic - it will not absorb food or flavours and is stain and scratch resistant.'
300 Count Sateen. Excellent. They are what they are. I am very pleased with them. How do you write up sheets? I am a guy. Twice a year they get washed. ha h
Great stir fry!. My girlfriend and I absolutely love a good stir-fry. Beef, chicken, seafood, it doesn't matter. We eat it all. This pan does a great job at cooking and browning the vegetables perfectly
Love it so far!. I have gotten three hand me down machines in the last 2 months or so. The first my aunt couldnt get to work, the second she said it wasnt even worth the attempt and the third was an absolute nightmare. I was told on that one id have to take it to to a repair shop , I said i would just buy a new one. This is the one I chose.The manual is pretty easy to follow, and there are arrows on the machine on how to thread it.Im a beginner at sewing, and compared to the other machines I looked at , this one looks durable and just all around solid.If I can figure this out, SO CAN YOU
Very Good Product, Not Perfect. The Zevro Easy Morning Dual Dry Food Dispenser is a very good product.  My five year old loves being able to easily get her own cereal.Cereal does "leak" out of the bottom of the mechanism if there is any left over in the mechanism after the bowel is removed.  This is not a real problem in the suburbs.In a city apartment the cereal leakage from the bottom, and the lack of an airtight seal on the top, could be a problem for bugs (roachs).The unit is stable and sturdy.  It is attractive on the counter.
Chrome Microwave Cart. I found this item to be very useful.  Although I do not have a microwave sitting on the top shelf, I still find it very sturdy for holding other items.  I did not have a problem putting it together even though I am not mechnically inclined.I like the idea of being able to adjust the shelves to fit whatever size item you put on it.I would recommend this cart to other people for their storage needs
THE BEST. I think this is the best waffle maker for four on the market
VERY PLEASED. After having read the positive comments, I purchased the F5914 from Amazon and it was delivered this week.  I tried it today and I'm very pleased with the results.  Even though my den just needed to be "refreshed", I was amazed to see how dirty the water was.  I had brought home a Bissell with a lot of bells and whistles but the Amazon comments were very negative so I returned it.  The only negative comment would be that the writeup in Amazon is not correct.  There was no bare floor attachment in the box.  I had to order one from the Hoover Store. But that has nothing to do with the performance of the machine.
Stainless Steel paper towel holder. Excellent product, just as described.  It is a very sturdy holder
We love this french oven!. We were reluctant to spend the money on this french oven but it was worth every penny.  It heats up evenly and browns meat beautifully.  We use this 5qt. french oven to make great one pot meals (4 servings).  Just last night we made braised short ribs that were mouthwatering.  We often use this pan on the stove for browning or searing and then transfer the dish to the oven for further cooking.  Other times we use it for slow cooking on the stove.  Clean up with the pan is super easy.  Everything just wipes right out.  The pan is really heavy but that's what makes it cook so well.  My wife used to hate to cook (I used to be the only cooking enthusiast in the family) but she loves this french oven because all her recipes come out tasting so good
Great Pet Gate. Easy to install and fits in any door in my house.  Perfect for my Chihuahua to go in and out of while the other dogs stay out.
Great pan. One of the best frying pan I've ever owned.  It cooks evenly, cleans easily and looks classy.
Why not?. --If you have tried french press before and are looking for a good one, there is no reason to look elsewhere.  I have not tried any other models but Bodum has a great reputation and it works as advertised.  I have had mine a year and never broken anything and it works great.  My understanding is that the only other real option is with a thermal carafe that keeps the coffee hot longer but you don't want this as far as I understand.  The reason is that in a french press, the coffee (if not poured right away) keeps on getting extracted as it sits there.  There should be nothing needed to keep warm if you are serving right away.--If you have not yet tried french press and this is the reason you are scanning reviews, please note that you trade off a little more time (compared to drip) for an explosion of flavor and complexity.  The oils that are filtered out in a drip machine (less so with a gold filter) are left in the coffee with french press so you get much more thickness and flavor with this method.  There is more tweaking and you need a burr grinder to do it right but that's fun if you like to play around a little.  The reason you shouldn't use a blade grinder is that there is much more variation in the size of the coffee grinds so some of the coffee will end up extracted unevenly introducing bitter flavors in coffee that should not be there.  A burr grinder needn't be expensive and I found one on Amazon for around $30 that I am happy with (Arielo).NOTE: It all boils down (pun intended) to how important coffee flavor is to you and preference.  I have tried drip coffee after french press and really can't go back-it is that big of a difference.  Please note that the freshness of coffee and quality (personally, I go with Peet's) is so important.  Please don't buy SB's and for the most part expect a "blow me away" coffee experience.  It is fun to try single origin coffees and taste the differences.  On the other hand, it's just coffee...
GREAT Price 4 an EXCELLENT Pan. i brought this and it is worth every penny of it ...i use it to fry chicken breast for chicken marsala, and it can fit up to 8 breast, beats the old way of frying 4 at a time.i loved it so much and show it to a friend and she had me order 2 for her & her mom. paid $[...] for it and now it is $[...] even sweeter
The best DVD tower. For quite a while I had been looking for a certain type of DVD rack/tower...then one day in Target I was looking at the Mission collection and saw the box (no display). It is exactly what I had been looking for. Slapped on the two foot ends and done! Perfect fit for DVDs, 20 fit across and if you have a lot of the cheapy DVD cases, like the ones New Line Cinema puts out, you can fit more. I don't have the hassle like some wire racks where you can only fit one DVD per slot. I have many oversized ones. The hardwood is great too, just a few felt pads on the backs to not scratch the wall. If you can wait for them to go on sale every now and then...it is worth it. I am almost ready to buy a third one soon
Excellent Quality and Value. I have enjoyed wine served in Spiegelau stemware at several of my favorite restaurants, so I decided to give them a try.  For the price, these are really amazing.  The glass is nice and thin and the bowls are well-shaped.I now own several dozen of the Bordeaux and Burgundy in addition to the Chardonnay.  One glass in one shipment had a broken stem, but Amazon sent me a replacement set via second-day air immediately, before I even had a chance to get to the post office and return the broken one.Pottery Barrel sells glasses of significantly inferior quality for a lot more money
Great machine - but buy it reconditioned. I've had my eye on this for a long time, but couldn't justify over one and half thousand dollars for it.  But great news - Amazon is now selling "factory reconditioned" machines for a thousand less than the original price, and I just received mine..It was immaculate, shipped in an original KitchenAid box with a new manual, an unopened and sealed DVD, and replacement seals.  The only apparent difference is that manual has the 2 year warranty crossed out - replaced with a 6 month hassle free warranty.The machine looks like it is built like a tank, and my 4 year old pro-line waffle baker is still going perfectly, so it's up to you, but I can't see the benefit of buying the full price model versus the reconditioned one.So search for "kitchenaid factory-reconditioned frozen dessert maker" and enjoy the opportunity while it lasts..
Ecellent cookware. The Le Creuset 3-1/2 quart buffet casserole is the best piece of cookware I have ever purchased.  The quality is apparent as soon as you grab it out of the box.  Cooking with it is extremely easy. Dill salmon in 30 minutes: Salmon, cream, dill, salt, veggies of choice (potatoes, squash, mushrooms, carrots, etc.  Dump it in, cover, bake at 350 for 3O min.  Delicious.  This is a case of you get what you pay for and this piece of cookware is worth every penny
Very Satisfied. I love this tea pot. I have been using it for about 2 months now. It is  innovative and user friendly. What's so great about this pot is the fact that the handle automatically opens the spout when you take it off the stove, which makes it incredibly easy to pour your cup of tea without messing with levers and whatnot. The handle never gets hot to the touch either, which is important. It has a nice whistle to it, which starts out slow and builds to a full whistle when it's ready. Overall, this exceeded my expectations and I am very satisfied.
Excellent Buy. I was skeptical to buy this product because of the bad review I saw on it however I was never one to trust the views of other people as my own, so I purchased it. Needless to say, I am very happy with it. I have a black stove and it sits perfect on it. It is very sheek looking and the inside is much larger than I thought it would be. It was really a good buy! I would definitely recommend it
All-Clad Pots are tops!. All clad pots are wonderful. The shorter pans with thick-cored bottoms make excellent jam pots as they deliver very good heat distribution. Good heat distribution is necessary for cooking full-flavored jams, preserves, or butters. Without good heat distribution you run the risk of burn spots on the pan's surface. These burn spots may/will impart an unwanted flavor to your product. If you've ever tried to disguise burned jam-- you know it's a losing battle. While some cooks may consider All-Clad pots or pan to be too expensive, I believe they are well worth the cost as you are less likely to burn your product. One good pan is worth more than six cheapies. Besides, quality equipment instills confidence and makes you feel like a seasoned chef.
Excellent cutlery from a respected maker. I bought this set for my wife for Christmas, mainly because I was stuck on ideas as to what to get her.  She spends a lot of time in the kitchen and she had been using an old set of Chicago Cutlery and several unbranded cheap giveaway knives for several years. None of those knives were that great or that sharp and I hated trying to put an edge on them even though I'm pretty good at sharpening knives.Essentially, knives are just sharpened pieces of steel that appear to be pretty simple, straightforward instruments that shouldn't be difficult to produce.  But a little experience with some poor examples prove this to not be the case.  Like most seemingly simple things, the simplicity is an illusion.My experience has not been with kitchen knives but it has been with "working" knives.  Pocket knives and fixed blade knives designed for hard use in the nasty jobs I have to do daily from removing staples in papers at the office to chopping down woody weeds in the backyard to cutting up boxes, rope, cording and thin pieces of aluminum.  I know the value of a blade that can take a good edge and hold it through a lot of abuse.I did a little research and found several brands of kitchen knives that had universal respect.  Wusthof always was at or near the top of everyone's list.  More often than not, it was number one in the reviews and surveys I came across.My wife was a little apprehensive about the sharpness of the knives out of the box.  She quickly realized the value of a really sharp kitchen knife and, in no time, she was commenting on how much easier it was to work with the Wusthof's than the cheapo knives she had been using.  She has really been making good use of the paring knife and the chef's knife in the days since Christmas. My own limited use of the chef's knife from this set confirms how well it handles and cuts compared to the clunky Chicago Cutlery chef's knife.After looking over more reviews, I've ordered the Wusthof 7" hollow edge santoku to go with this set.  Designed for thin cuts, it will fit in well with the other knives.  I'll probably also get a serrated edge bread knife in the not-too-distant future to round out the Wusthof set.  This is likely to be a lifetime purchase for our household and that makes the high price more of an investment.  I'm well pleased and so is my wife.
Great little heater even if not perfect. I inherited this heater and admit that I wanted it for sentimental value but I love it now! Having the ability to target a particular temperature is great, I wouldn't want a heater without that feature. What I would like is the ability to point the airstream up or down in addition to swiveling on the base. It is wonderfully light and compact and feels very safe. Though looks aren't important to me this little unit is more attractive than many others I've seen
Flour power. it is a little loud but gets the job done without making your arm tired like old school sifters
Getting the most from your favorite bourbon. I did some research on these glasses before deciding to purchase them.  The Riedel company has an outstanding reputation for creating elegant glassware which brings out the best in specific spirits. The shapes and designs vary according the type of wine or alcohol. They definitely have a winner with their bourbon glasses.  After receiving the glasses, I invited some friends to do a little taste test, having them sample bourbon from a variety of glasses.  Without exception the clear winner was the Riedel bourbon glass.  The taste enhancement was exceptional.  These glasses would make a great gift and conversation piece for anyone with a pallet for Kentucky's finest!   -WR
My Dog fights the cat for this toy!!!. Let me tell you this toy is not only great for cats but also dogs. The crackle factor is what they both love. My dog and cat both fight over it. I had to get more fat cat toys for both of them. They also have dog toys made of the same crackle but bigger.FYI...the cat beats up the much larger dog.
Know your water. Love the unit itself, however after 3 days of running it only 8 hours a night, I noticed the filter guage was saying "Replace Filter"So I called the company to say, "hey .. it's only been 3 days. I think the filter guage is broken"  and they had me check the filter (it was yellow and crusty) and they said, "no .. it's your water.  you need to replace your filter or use distilled water."  Then she laughed and said they had customers that replace their filters several times a week because of their waterSo of course I'm not going to replace my filter every 3 days and I'm not going to use a couple gallons of distilled water every night before I go to bed in this thing ...so if you have hard water .. this may not be the unit for you.  Buyer Beware
Fun soup bowls save my lunch when the phone rings. These bowls are ideal for spaghetti or soup and so many things. I like the wide lip that helps prevent spilling and drippng. I also appreciate being able to reheat in the microwave. So often when I am having a nice bowl of soup on a cold day the phone rings and my meal gets cold. I don't like having to pour it out of the dish and reheat it then pour it back. Now I just pop it in the microwave and I'm back on track with lunch. I chose the periwinkle color but think I should try other colors too. They are fun to have around and easy to clean afterwards in the dishwasher
Seems to work great!. My cat has always been high strung and just plain mean.  She growled, hissed, slapped, bit - you name it.  So when someone recommended Feliway to calm her down, I decided to try it, but I didn't hold out much hope.  I plugged it in in the master bedroom - her domain and saw an immediate difference.  Oh, she still growls sometimes, but she is much more loving and affectionate and seems calmer.  Great product!!
Not like an outdoor grill, but quick & easy.  We like it !. Very easy to use and easy to clean, especially if I remember to spray the grill (as recommended) before preheating.  I usually just  soaked the grills briefly in hot, soapy water and they cleaned easily. They will go in the dishwasher, but I prefer to do them by hand since it's so simple.  I found that I do need to clean the edges of the "cut out" oval where the grease runs into the drip pan, which I was not expecting.  But, still easy enough.  The hamburgers, turkey burgers and chicken breasts were cooked quickly and were very good, even though not the same as on an outdoor grill.  For turkey burgers & chicken, a sprinkle of paprika improves the color of the finished dish. I also plan to cook a few extra burgers next time for a quick reheat in the microwave with no clean up
Great 'upgrade' from a mop. Having a whole house (1600 sq ft) of tiled floor with area rugs we spent a lot of time mopping.  This little cleaner makes it so much easier and cleans so much better!  The first time it was kind of eye-opening seeing the improvement in appearance of the tile and the dirt on the head covers used. It pulls easily and has a fairly long electrical cord.Be sure to get additional terry cloth covers for the head if you have a large area to cleans or have kids and pets running across your floors.  Or it is easy to make head covers from old towels cut to the same size.The only problem we have had is the button you push to get continuous steam seems to pop out too easily, making it necessary to keep your finger on the switch to keep the steam coming.
Drinkwell filters. Quick delivery. Reasonable price.  Item could not be found elsewhere for this price.
Best Buy for Every Day  Wine Use. I was impressed by this new arrival because of the Brand name "Reidel" and was looking for a glasss for "drop in" guests and summer cookouts and these four glasses fit the bill perfectly! This way if I break one on my tile floor I won't "burst into tears" at the loss knowing I got a great deal on Amazon. Com and if "someone" breaks one, I'll order another 4 for backup! These will be great for lunches, packing in a picnic basket for summer outings and simple but nice for casual entertaining
Great Quality and Value. I bought the first set because they seemed well priced compared to the terrycloth style we usually use. They are of high quality, good color and do hold their shape. I have to remember not to use a dryer sheet so they have increased absorbtion rate. Very pleased.
Salton Tea Maker. This tea maker makes delicous tea. The unit is light-weight and the price was great. Our only complaint with it is the security of the basket (filter/teabag holder). Even though I lock it as it says, if I don't position the pitcher just right under the basket where the spring is, the basket can fill with tea and overflow. I usually have to check it and move it as necessary and even re-lock the basket to prevent this from happening.
No. 1 Choice. Have used Corelle Dishes for over 30 years.  It is easy to wash, stack, and dry.  Corelle nests in relatively little space in your cupboards.  My entire family uses Corelle for everyday living.  The designs are beautiful and numerous.  The Urban Black design compliments your black/white kitchen appliances.
Great addition to my collection. I just got this lovely lasagna baker FREE by buying another 4 place settings to add to the 12 I already own in the Gold Dust Green pattern.I was really happy to find it and several other companion pieces here at amazon because I have had trouble finding them in the regular stores.The pan is very large but not bulky or overly heavy. The Gold Dust Green finish is beautiful on this piece and it will look really great on the table with my other pieces. A company size Lasagna will fit in this pan and I also think I could squeeze a couple of chickens in it.The pan and the set of dishes were packed very carefully and I had no breakage whatsoever
Wonderful product!. I have 3 cats and have owned the other brand named pet fountain with the filtration system. I gave up on it after the constant cleanings, and the cat hair in the water and filter. The motor burned out I think because the water level was low.The bubbler took my cats getting used to. It makes more noise than the prior fountain but after 3 days they have adapted and enjoy it. One cat sleeps right next to it. I think he enjoys the sound of it (like a brook running water). I highly recommend this product. It was easy to set up, the water tank needs filling about once per week, and it's easy to clean
Good blades, nice feel. I was surprised at the quality of these knives for the price.  I was not prepared to spend a rediculous amount of money on a knife set with a blade for every plausible occasion.  This set has the perfect number of knives and each one feels natural in the hand.Although this set comes with a sharpener, I recommend getting the Wsthof 2904 Knife-Life knife and scissor sharpener.  You will not need to sharpen these knives much, but that sharpener will make your life much easier and will renew every single pair of scissors in your house.I also recommend, as others have, to never place these knives in the dishwasher.  Also be sure to washt hem by hand and thoroughly dry them immediately after use.  This will drastically increase their longevity.If you purchase these, and I propose you do so, then get a travel roll bag for knives.  This is because you will want to take them to friends' and family's homes to "show them off"
Gorgeous Print. The best rooster print I've seen yet.  While they could be made out of a more durable material (stoneware would be nice) they are absolutely gorgeous.  After I received my first set, I ordered a second set just to have in case they break.
Hours of Enjoyment. This toy has provided countless hours of enjoyment for our dog.  We have a 65lb labrador greyhound mix.  She eats most toys and is not fond of kongs once the stuffing is out (but she is not able to eat the kongs beyond the soft puppy one).  This toy is great because the hole is small, yet there are little prongs you can cut to make the toy less challenging.  I think she enjoys the noise the treats make inside the balls. Larger treats of course take her longer to get out, but stuffing it with her food works just fine most of the time.  She realyl enjoys all of the Busy Buddy products - Squirel Dude is great but the saucer got old quickly for her
Beautiful!. I can not begin to express how pleased I am with my new tray. It arrived in perfect condition. It's both beautiful and well made. My husband's already requested breakfast-in-bed. I can't wait to serve tea to my friends and family
Bam!  What a pan.... I added this sauce pan to my cookware collection recently.  I was looking for stainless steel because I feel that for a saucepan this is the best option for making soups, sauces, etc.  Non-sticks just don't do it for me.  This pan looks and performs wonderfully.  It heats evenly and cooks sauces without any hot spots.  The pan has a triple bottom, aluminum, stainless steel and a small strip of copper which gives it a stylish look. The glass lid is also a nice feature because it allows you to view your food without haveing to remove the lid.  This comes in handy when you are preparing rices or any other type of dishes that require the lid be kept on at all times.  Clean up is also a breeze. The pan is made by all-clad, but does not come with their steep price.  You can't beat the value.  Emeril's cookware is top notch quality and is my favorite because it performs well and is reasonably priced
Hard to Clean. Le Creuset cast-iron products really conduct the heat and are great products to have in the kitchen. One drawback, they can be difficult to clean. If you sear meat or fry, burnt remnants cannot be removed. Overnight soaking will help but you cannot use soft scrub or hard scrubbers on the enamel. The product still functions well, it just does not look as nice as an expensive piece of cooking gear should be! Would buy it again
Great size, quality and colors!. This plate is the perfect size for general use. The colors are great, the quality is amazing, and they stand up well in the dishwasher and microwave. Plus, they are made in the USA.
Does it do everything?  No, but close. Can you believe a microwave that will brown chicken?  I've cooked things in this that makes me seem like a gourmet chef, but I'm not even quite an average cook.  Chicken breast that practically melt in your mouth, but the outside has a tantalizing crispiness that's sure to please the taste buds.  Most recent to this review, I cooked several rounds of New York strip steak.  A nice steak rub, a bit of non-stick spray for the rack and turntable tray (makes for an easy cleanup), and a steak-lover's dream was created.  I do the typical hot-dog heating in the microwave...but you can't really place them directly on the metal tray if you want them to heat quickly.  They are slightly below where the microwaves really concentrate and take a few seconds longer to heat.  I place a microwave-safe plate on the turntable upside down to elevate it slightly and it works much better.  This also works for microwave popcorn.  I had trouble getting it to pop in the 3 minutes allocated to the popcorn button (large bag), it took more like 5.  Put it on the upside down plate, it pops in 2 minutes and 45 seconds (yes, I've done enough of them to remember :-)Buy this one, I doubt if you'll be sorry.  I got it originally because I was a full-timer in an RV and was looking to replace a failed microwave oven.  After owning this for about a month, I got rid of my toaster oven, my rotisserie, my jetstream oven, and I can't remember what else.  It doesn't do toast that fast, so I kept my toaster.  It is rather heavy and deep for a microwave, but it takes a lot less space than all of the other appliances it replaces
Love Our Lodge. We love to cook and we have all the expensive stuff - we love nothing more than our cast iron and Lodge makes great ones at decent prices.
Fabulous!. I love these knives.  I have spent the last year or so looking at knive sets.  There are some very expensive ones out on the market!  I was so-so about purchasing any as there was always something that I just didn't like such as the design, or the grip, shape, the set itself or even the price.  When I found this set, it all just popped.  I have given them a workout and they exceed all of the expectations I had for them.  I love the grips, the design, the price and most important, the function. It is a perfect set for the everyday cook. I highly recommend these knives
sink strainer. We like using our sink strainer, it is very handy.It is a good size to fit most things we need to getrinsed. Plus it has an adjustable feature that it willfit most sinks
Best Amazon purchase EVER!  Best vacuum EVER!. I've had all types of vacuums from the dirt devils to bissel to beam to electrolux to kirby.  This by far is my favorite!  My only complaint is that the dirt cup is too small.  Granted, I should vacuum more often.Don't buy this vacuum if . . . you don't like emptying dirt cups of bagless vacuums . . . you want to vacuum hardwood . . . you want to vacuum throw rugs.What I love about it . . . the suction control - very powerful . . . good for steps & car - medium weight . . . great on longer carpet fibers . . . cord recoil is easy . . . just does a great job!Some say it is heavy.  It isn't a super light weight.  Nor, is it very heavy.  I carry it as I vacuum the steps.  And, I ordered it on a Friday, which I received a great bargain!  Check it out
What happened to the other color?. I have one in a dark color.  I can't find anymore anywhere.  Anyone know if they stopped making the other color
Great iced tea pitcher BUT... The &quot;BUT&quot; stands for my sincere wish that the pitcher was about 50% larger and that the plastic of which it is made was just a little heavier.  Otherwise, love it.  Going to drink a lot of great iced tea this summer
Love my Whirley-Pop. I use my Whirley Pop every day. I bought a 50 lb bag of popcorn from Sams as my niece suggested.  I go to Weight Watchers so this method of making popcorn works very well for my diet.  The popcorn tastes so much better than air-popped
I bought another!!!. I don't have a Dualit toaster, but I do have a single wide slot Cusinart toaster so I thought I'd take a chance on this item.  ItIt works really well and I don't have a problem with regular bread getting squished like the other reviewer mentioned.Take care when removing your sandwich as its easy to forget that the metal is quite hot when taken from the toaster
Great Deal. This knives are great. I got a Great deal on them and they are good quality.
great products. used vet's RX to treat my dog's ear and it didnt seem to work. After reading reviews I decided to try this . After only 1 week I noticed a considerable amount of change in her ears for the better. would recommend to others
Dude. You gotta get these sheets!. I've never bought sheets in my life...till now.  What I had in my closet were the assorted Christmas gifts, etc, thru the years. Had to learn about things like Thread-Count, etc. What I had was an approximate 30 thread-count. Felt like Freddie Kruger was clawing my back whenever I turned over!1200 T.C.! Like Butter!  Yes. They are heavy, but very soft. The difference is night and day. They fit my bed well, and my friends couldn't believe the price. (They immediately ordered same on line!) shipping was very quick. What a Great Gift idea for the man who knows nothing about sheets! Order Yours TODAY
Typhoon Professional Cook's Wire Skimmer. This item is very well made and will last a lifetime. Easy to handle to get food out of hot oil without hands being close to the heat.Great to have around if you ever deep fry food
Chef Recommends! Great professional quality knives at a reasonable cost. Okay, so I'm not a chef, but more of a Seinfeld fan.  I am an amatuer who wanted to have a decent set of knives and I picked these out after quite a bit of searching.A real chef will tell you to get the knife that "feels right" to you.  Alton Brown recommends that you handle the knives before you buy, since you won't use an uncomfortable unergonomic one even if it looked awesome before you bought.These have a very solid handle riveted to a full tang of high quality steel.  The top of the blades are all thicker than many of the other brands (and even other models from the Henckels brand).  They felt good to me, they are perfectly balanced and heavy in the hand.  They feel substantial when you pick them up.They didn't seem to be as sharp as I expected from such a set of knives, but regular use of the included sharpening steel improved on my impression of this.  One detractor is that most burgeoning young chefs have never used a steel or hone and they don't include instructions in the set for this.  BAD IDEA!  I have since found instructions on the web, from Henckels themselves, even.  When I do it properly and take my time, they are simply amazing.  Leaving out instructions was bad form.  Maybe mine was missing?Dishwashers are not recommended as bouncing around can nick the blade.  I have a plastic basket and I keep planning on putting them in there to see how fare.  But I can't bring myself to do it.  Handwashing is a pain, but I know they will last that way.I'm going to chalk up the sharpness to my own unskilled hands (and I'm pretty sure that goes for many others).  Even the German made ones would get dull without proper steel use.  They are absolutely top notch quality at an amazing price.  They hold their edge very well when you use the steel.  Avoid bone and glass-surface cutting boards.  The only thing I wish is that I could toss them in the dishwasher.  But like quality stainless pans, you don't want to subject them to the heat, caustic detergent and banging.Don't hesitate to buy these knives.  Maybe you could use them to whip up some "Clams Casino"!  Hmmm... tastes funky
Richell one-touch adjustable gate. I really am truly satisfied  with this product.  The dimmension where it set up is different at top and bottom due to the base boards.  The gate can adjust for this and is just as secure.  I also like the fact that I found less expensive then ordering it from the manufacturer
A really good canister. I love Fiestaware and these canisters go perfectly in my kitchen. I like that they are large enough to get a decent amount of flour and sugar in them.  The seal seems really airtight, but I did accidently splash some water on the top of them, and the water did get into the canister.  They are easy to clean and look very classic
what a great bet-sitting pillow. I am often writing 12-18 hours some days.  I learnt long ago that sitting at a PC was killing me.  Legs often had swelling, worse I suffered bad tendinitis in my neck, elbow and wrist.  I mean painful to where I would have to stop using the PC.  Then I switched to laptops and WOW.  No more pain in my neck elbow or wrist.  But it's often a pain to keep the pillows pushed up in the proper comfort and and the one behind my neck is forever slipping.Here it the perfect solution.  I use a pillow under my knees and this wonderful creation.  It's not like the old-fashioned bed-sitting pillow, that just propped your back.  His is so comfortable.  Leaning against it is like learning on a cloud of feathers.  There is has strong arms that give you support.  But the best thing is the neck rest.  Sort of like the whiplash cushion in a car, it has a special pillow insert (it's removable) that cradles your neck.So if you watch telly in bed sitting up, or read books or use a laptop, this is worth every penny to have complete comfort!  It comes is several shades even denim to match your decor.I highly recommend this for anyone who sits in bed
Sango Nova Blue Ceramic Spoon Rest. Great!  I love it!!  Goes great with my kitchen
Excellent Specialty Knife. When I began collecting Wsthof-Trident Classic knives twenty years ago, I chose the basics first: cook's knives, parers, slicers, utility knives, steak knives, boning &amp; filet knives. I acquired them one or two at a time, always on sale, because this cutlery has been an expensive investment. When Wsthof added a tomato knife to this line, I bought it even though I wasn't sure if I would like it or use it a lot. Now I recommend this 5-inch tomato knife to everyone. Its serrated edge hasn't needed sharpening ever, and it cuts, slices, dices, and chops fresh tomatoes so quickly. The forked tip is great for taking out the stem ends of tomatoes. I've never used my tomato knife on anything other than tomatoes, which is why I think it has stayed so sharp. I use my 8-inch serrated bread knife for slicing bagels and breads, and my 5-inch serrated utility knife for cutting citrus and other fruit. Also, I hand-wash and dry this knife and keep it stored in a wooden block
Great Little Heater. I bought this heater to put it under my desk at work. Heats really well, and worths the money. The only problem that I have observed is that it starts working really silent but after sometime it gets a little bit noisier but that's all bad about it. It cools down pretty fast too.
Luxury features I never expected for this price, never. Power-level settings of 100%, 90%, and right on down--I am amazed. I think the very-low settings are for drying food; can you imagine being able to do dried foods yourself? Then quick-buttons for nearly everything. It'll take a while to learn all the features but even right out of the box it was just so easy to use! All I wanted was a small simple one that wouldn't take much counterspace and never dreamed it would have all this, not for this price. My old microwave had just given out--after 23 years of daily use--and the one thing I wanted was defrost, that's all. I'd always used the microwave, on defrost, to simmer foods that needs long, slow cooking--with no pot-watching and no chance of burning. You ought to try that! Much better than on the stove--and this does have defrost, of course of course--but so many other settings that will be even better for slow cooking. Then you can choose to defrost meat according to how much the chunk of meat actually weighs, of all things--there's a setting for that too! Never heard of that! One more feature I especially wanted was for the light to go out when the door is open and here's why: The way to make a microwave last simply forever is to leave the door open a while after each use and let it dry out. Then it will last for decades--like my old one did. But wouldn't want to leave it open if the light stayed on, no; so another highly desirable feature right there. I just don't think a better microwave could be bought at any price, period--many more features aren't even listed here. The more expensive ones seem to only have features I'd never use anyway--a built-in toaster or something--so why pay for that! No, if it's microwaving you're after, this is just IT. Also, if you're wondering about size, it says compact but holds a regular-size Pyrex loaf pan with room to spare as it turns, or a big mixing bowl with a pretty big hen or whatever in it, so that's plenty big for most people.  It's the design--there are scooped-out places in the inner walls that allow space for the rim of a bowl or a pan to turn. That's why it holds so much. And hey, it looks nice too--and is light enough that I can easily move it to clean under it yet it does feel as heavy and solid as can be.  My hat is certainly off to the designers! (And as always, to Amazon! It got here in no time with Amazon's free SuperSaver shipping--days before I was told it would arrive!) I don't have a single negative to say after a week's use and every day am still discovering yet more wonderful things about it that save a busy person's time and energy--as well as money. Thought I'd let other shoppers know
Great filters. The filter for my Hoover Floormate was getting dirtier and dirtier. I had washed them many times but it was time to get a new one. Imagine my surprise that the stores did not carry that particular filter. After numerous phone calls I decided to check the net. I found them here at Amazon, great price, fast service!Thanks so much!
Better than Expected performance with this Table Cloth. At the last minute before Thanksgiving 06, My Mom decided she had to have a brand new Table cloth.  She ordered two from one of those junk mail catalog that arrive monthly.  Those cloths came in and were the wrong sizes.  She returned those cloths and I went online to hunt down a replacement.  I stumbled upon the Reflections 70 Inch Round Tablecloth.  We had a tough time choosing a color!  We settled on the Stone Blue.  We placed the order but when it came down to selecting shipping, we didn't want to pay for overnight service.  We know it would not be here if we did regular shipping but we took our chances.  Here's what happened, I placed the order late and the Table cloth should have been processed the next day.  For some reason it was processed that same day.  Amazon got this cloth to us within 3 days (not the 7 to 10 days they told us it would take).  Amazon did an outstanding thing by getting this item out and shipped to us so it was in our hands so we didn't have to worry about what we were going to do about a TableCloth.  Thanksgiving day were put this beautiful blue table cloth on our table for thankgiving dinner.  Mom was to happy that we found suck a nice cloth that did not cost an arm and a leg.  She was very happy she didn't have to spend a ton of money getting it here.   Our Thanksgiving Dinner was terrific!!  Nothing stained or damaged this cloth!  It is easy to clean up if something does get dropped or spilled on it.  We will be buying more of these but in different colors.
lupine collars are the best we've found!. This collar is bright and pretty, but more importantly, it is strong.A year ago I had my dog break out of a similar collar by another manufacturer. She suddenly pulled on her leash to chase a squirrel, the plastic latch released, and she was off in a busy city street. It was a frightening experience that made me realize that I needed to find a stronger collar.The lupine collar we got her is the strongest I've found, and the lifetime guarantee lets me know that they are confident that the collar won't deteriorate. This collar is cute, lightweight, and very safe. I highly recommend it.
Simply amazing cookware. I was so excited to receive my new cookware. After reading others reviews and how much they recommended this set, I must fully agree with them. It is beautiful, quality and easy to clean cookware! I am very pleased with it and hope it lasts for a long time. Also, the price can't be beat
WOW!. I read the reviews on this item, and everyone loved it except one person.  Still, I decided to try it. I love it!!  It really makes the room.  First off, delivery was very quick, and assembly was very easy. Second, all the pre-drilled holes did line up. The color is great with just one small scratch, but I zapped it with some wood cleaner, and it's barely noticeable. Definitely a wonderful addition to my dining set.
THE AWESOME Euro Cuisine YM80 Yogurt Maker. This yogurt maker is wonderful! Easy to follow directions and all the yogurt I've made has been sooooooo much better than store bought.I use organic milk and the yogurt starter that Euro recommended and it turns out perfectly every time. I cant keep enough made!!You definitely wont regret buying this machine. Get some extra jars so you can do a batch when the other is halfway used so you dont run out. :
A Great Saut Pan for Those Large Portions. I got my 6 quart All Clad Stainless saut pan about a month ago and I've been using it frequently.  I cook large batches of meatballs with it and I'm impressed with how the meat does not stick, how well the meat browns, and how well the pan reaches temperature and returns to temperature, even as I place all the meatballs at once instead of in batches like with my old Calphalon 5 quart saut pan.My only suggestion to All Clad to improve this pan is to replace the long handle (the handle they use with the stainless line) with the longer handle they use with their Copper Core line (when the pan is 6 quarts).  I notice that it is easier to handle my heavier Copper Core pieces than my stainless and LTD pieces when the pan is full.  And the longer handle should also make it easier to remove the pan from the cache rack when the lid is stored through the handle.  All Clad should also think about putting the longer handle on the larger pieces.This pan is a keeper
Sturdy and hassle free. This is an excellent egg slicer.  The metal is sharp and eggs are sliced cleanly all the way through, it's easy to clean and quite sturdy.  Other egg slicers I've used don't seem as solidly built.  I recommend this one
After two weeks, I'm learning to roast coffee with I-Roast 2. After a few hours on the Internet reading reviews and learning about roasting, I purchased the I-Roast 2.  I've done at least 15 batches so far.  The machine is functioning fine, but I'm learning something with each new batch.  I'll tell you my impressions so far.1.  The machine is attractive and quite easy to learn how to use.2.  It is a bit noisy, but I knew that before I bought it.3.  It has a round wire ring above it which makes it quite easy to vent off any smoke.  I got a metal 90 degree "elbow" made for clothes dryers and vent right out a window by attaching this elbow to the top of the machine.4.  I've learned the key to roasting is watching the beans while roasting.  Look for the color you want.  This machine is glass-sided, so it's easy to see the beans.  If you can't monitor the color, each batch would be a guess at the product.  You'll learn which color beans you like the most.5.  There's a button you push to see the roasting temp at any given time.  It seemed to read low for what I had set.  I've since read on the Net that this machine's inner temps might be hotter than the number reads.  It's not too important if you're getting the roast you like, but you have to watch it and guage results.6.  Cleaning the chaf afterwords only takes a few seconds.  It's really easy and no work at all.7.  As I get the roasts I like, the programable option is really nice.  I can repeat it later if I want to.8.  The I-Roast 2 cooling cycle is automatic and easy.  From what I've read, this is really important.  After this 4 minutes cycle, the beans are almost room temperature and easy to remove from the glass drum.  I put the beans into an open glass container for breathing for a day before grinding.9.  Overall performance is great.  I can't comment on long term durability, but so far I'm really pleased.  I'd recommend this machine to others.W.B
Great Set. This set has worked out very well for my needs.  It is a nice collection.  The various sizes with lids is really nice.  They have held up well
gravy strainer. this is the best grease remover I have every used.  It is very easy to clean
Happy. I was very happy to receive the flutes in such a timely manner. They were safely packaged and sent very quickly.I had been shopping for these flutes to match my crystal wine and water glasses for a long time a a major department store. While they were advertised, they were never in stock.Thank you
Excellent cutting board. I was pleasantly surprised. The craftmanship of this board is better than I thought it would be. I was skeptical about the "harder than maple" claim, but we've used it a lot and it still looks brand new. It's definitely a cut above our maple board.It looks as good as the picture, but the colors are a little more muted. It measures 12" x 15" x 1.44" and weighs in at about 6.6 lbs.Nice quality board. I highly recommend it.
hey, they work!. I was alittle skeptical buying these.  But they seem to be working great
great. love it! rechargeable, seems to last better than battery operated ones. The design has improved too. I have had two of them. I love how you can dismantle this one so it won't break if packed away.makes good froth too.
Decent set for the right price. This set of knives is beautifull. They are sturdy and very well made. The price is well worth the product and I think it's a great value for the money. Let's face it most of the time you get what you pay for, These on the other hand defy that logic not by alot but defy it none the less. I would encourage anyone looking for a decent set of steak knives and arent willing to pay the big $$$, to pick these up. You won't be dissappointed
Perfect for My Office Desk. I purchased this little machine to be used on my office desk.  After a week of daily work day use, I have no major complaints.  The only thing missing that would make it over the top is a thermal stainless carafe.  I have not had any problems with leaking from around the top or poor, metallic taste which might be more attributable to one's water source.  We have bottled water here, and I am quite devoted to my Starbuck's coffee. I had considered buying a permanent filter, but I find the paper ones much easier to simply toss for clean up, and they aren't that expensive.  The 30 minute automatic off can be a blessing and a curse; it keeps me from forgetting to turn the machine off, but sometimes it turns itself off before I've finished the pot, but that's not a big deal as I just hit the switch to turn it on again to fire up the heat.  A full pot makes at least 2 good mug servings for me, and that's really all I need in the morning.  I am very pleased with this machine; I use an old 4 cup Mr. Coffee machine at home which works well, but I like the more straight up, compact design of this one for my desk top
A most convenient appliance. This appliance is a little marvel: elegant design, barely audible, much more discrete than a ceiling fan and very efficient to recuperate the hot air trapped under our 14 feet roof
Analon Rocks!. I've had the eight piece set for a year and a half now, and this pan (sold without the lid) for about two years. They're all good quality, heavyweight cookware, and the non-stick works like a charm.  I've not had a single problem with sticking, and the interior remains scratch-free.I wonder if the people who complain about scratches are storing their pans stacked inside of each other.  This can lead to scratching.  One easy solution is to place a paper towel between pans when stacking.No, it's not dishwasher safe, but you really don't need to put it in the dishwasher!  It doesn't fit in my sink, either, but you don't need to soak it.  The food slides right off, and it takes less than two minutes to wash the pan.I highly recommend any of the Analon Classic cookware
great pillow. If you've ever been to any normal store that has pillows, you'll know that finding a body pillow that wont die in 5 seconds is hard.  I've had this for a few weeks now and it shows no signs of loosing its fluff, of which it is very fluffy, but not so much that it will smother you.  If it lasts longer than my other failed attemps, I may have to stock up
Great Product. I am very pleased with these sheets. They are deep fitting sheets, so they never came loose from the mattresss. I gave them a 4 of 5 because I have bought other 300-count sheets that are softer and silker than these, but they are still much better than any lower count sheet, and cheaper than what I could find at Wal-Mart. I highly recommended them.
Solid!. These bowls are nice. Perfect for soup, dessert, salad, or whatever. Well, I like big salads, so they're a little small for MY salads. But they're great for a lot of things, and I SWEAR you could drop them on the floor and they probably wouldn't break. They fit nicely on the small Fiestaware plates so you don't spill a full bowl of soup. They go in the fridge to store leftovers, in the dishwasher (I've washed these things hundreds of times and they're still in great shape), and probably in the freezer, too. If only Fiestaware would make tupperware-like lids so I'd feel more comfortable putting these in the freezer for storing things. As they are, I have to use plastic wrap, which always lets in yucky freezer smells
I love this bowl!. I love this serving bowl. I used it to store my various fruit when I was single. Now, spending my first holiday with my new husband, I am using it for casseroles, meat dishes and all sorts of uses! I highly recommend it and would buy more if my budget allowed.
A good value!. I purchased one of these yesterday and I am very happy with it. It moves a lot of air, and it is fairly quiet. Anything with a motor will make some noise -- it is very quiet on low speed, and as you increase the speed to super it gets a little louder. Most of the noise is not from the motor (which IS very quiet)-- it is from the moving air. AND DOES IT MOVE! This cooled off a 14x16' room better (and more quietly) than an air conditioner. It fits in your window, so it does not take up floor or counter space, AND you don't need to worry about pets or children knocking it over. I like this better than the floor fan I bought. So much so that I am returning the floor fan and getting another Honeywell window fan. There is a more expensive model with a remote, but I didn't think the extra [money] was worth it. BOTTOM LINE: A well made product from a name you trust, and a GOOD VALUE FOR THE PRICE
I Wish I'd Bought Feliway A Long Time Ago... To the Feliway product description information above, I would also add, "Aids in calming cats...who manage stressful chronic health conditions."My 4yr. old neutered male cat manages several chronic health conditions, which at times create seemingly unrelated behavioral issues, when flare ups occur that jangle his nerves.  When his IBD is not well controlled, my otherwise angelic cat becomes stressed out & does deadly things - chewing through power cords, consuming inedible objects, eating plants untouched for years, climbing to & jumping/falling from extremely high places aggravating his arthritis, & more.  When he's not feeling well, acting-out is his way of externalizing his bad nerves & telling me, "I don't feel well, help me".So I bought a Feliway Diffuser for him for his birthday a few weeks ago, & the change in my cat's behavior was noticeable within the first few hours after plugging it in.  Initially, I noticed a personality change - sort of a mellowing effect, reflecting a more leveled out & increased general sense of well-being.  I see less lethargy, & more interest in social interaction, his environment, & play.  It's a subtle overall field effect, but his happiness & joy somehow seem happier.  I've noticed I've had an easier time with giving him his regular medications & brushing his teeth.  It's a synthetic feline facial pheromone, but I call it "the airborne feline prozac"...  And without putting more chemicals into his system that don't belong in the body, & their problematic side effects.  My cat seems to appreciate the general change in the overall atmosphere of his home, & occasionally, he even sleeps underneath the diffuser.The benefits my cat experiences also pass on to me - because if he is less stressed & upset, & doing fewer life threatening things in reaction to his nerves - then I'm less stressed out as well.  I'd rather buy him Feliway, than spend money on veterinary visits & additional medication to deal with new problems he creates when he's stressed.  And there have been a lot of them.Feliway contains an odorless oil by human standards, & it does not upset my cat's severe asthma or allergies, nor my own more moderate conditions.  In fact, I am wondering that if he's less stressed out psychologically - & in turn physiologically - if there might even be less asthma & less digestive upset due to a reduction in the cycle of internalized stress.  And if it improves his overall quality of life, I'd much rather buy him peace instead of more doctors...I live in a small 1 person unit, & 1 diffuser does seem to cover the entire place.  I unplug ours when the window is open, & plug it back in when it's closed, while I sleep or am away, & any time I think he might benefit from it.  The plastic bottle can be unscrewed from the plug-in unit & recapped to preserve it until your next use.  This may help to extend the 6 week life span recommended in the packaging information, we'll find out.  I would also add that the diffuser gets warm, but not hot to the touch, & certaintly not hot enough to burn a hand or singe a whisker or fur.  I have handled the diffuser many times during use, & I have no fear of allowing my cat to be directly near it.The only negative aspect of this product so far as I can determine is how much you'll want to kick yourself for waiting to buy it for long as you did...  As a pet store employee recently told me, "It is one of the few behavior mod products for cats on the market that actually does work."  While there is no substitute for building & maintaining a solid, trusting relationship with your pet - or for seeking competent veterinary care - Feliway does seem like it could be a great adjunct to it.Feliway gets 2 Thumbs & Paws Up from kitty & me.  =^..^
Very nice, but sorta SMALL... This is a neat little filter, and I mean LITTLE!  The cone-part hangs down 2.5" into the cup, and is 1.75" around at the top, tapering down to 1.5" at the bottom.  Perfect for a nice little cup of tea; an 8oz cup of tea.  My tea drinking is done, I guess, in "mug-size" amounts of +20oz, so this is a bit bitty for me.  I bought a TF 500, now THAT'S more my size.  Gonna return this mini one and get another 500!!!  Great filters, you bet
well above 5 stars.  The best interactive toy available.   10 stars. My pug loves this toy better than all the rest of this kind.  He jumps to pull the beas out of the hive.  He squeaks the beas.  Perhaps it is the contrast of the black band and the shape of the bea head.  He went crazy for this toy and got exercise with it.  It is better to play with you dog and hold the hive and have them pull the beas out by their heads.  He likes the wing detail for chewing on.  This toy gives exercise.  I am so glad I tried it.  He plays with the hegehog on his own.  Those are the 2 best toys.  The squirels from the hide a squirel are fun, but the game holder is not something he was really excited about.  These interactive toys are great.  I have never seen such excitement and tail wagging.  He hardly ever wags his tail and he did with this toy and the jumping is great exercise.  This one is the best.  It is well worth $10 for a dog who loves to play.  I get him to stop destroying the house as much with these toys
Waterproof Pad. I'm sure this waterproof pad would be exceptional for most instances.  It just couldn't handle the demands placed on it by our thirteen year old son.  Thank goodness for hospital mattresses!That said, it should be fine for most other applications.  It just wasn't made to handle the abuses this child can put things through.
Great Slicer. I think this is a great slicer for the price. I am a cook by occupation and I bought one of these for my small restaurant.  I liked it so much I also bought one for home use. I have sliced everything from a 20lb roast beef to bread. I love it
in accurate picture / comfortable loveseat. two points that have me disappointed with this item are: the color of this loveseat is actually a lot darker in person than depicted in the picture.  also, i recieved this loveseat without any of the required hardware or tools to put it together.  it was left out of the package so i had to go to the hardware store and figure out and buy my own to get this thing together.  aside from those two problems, the loveseat is actually very solid and comfortable to lounge in.  i like the nice suede-like fabric
Very elegant. This decanter brings style to the table! One star deduction for difficult to clean. The design is simple but elegant - good german quality
Rockies Imperial Goose Down 700-750. Excellent comforter and really nice and warm. Sorry I did not buy it last winter
Best Decemberween present EVER!. I can't believe someone thinks these gorgeous glasses are ugly! Oh my god...I opened these and I *cried* they are so beautiful. Each glass has its own little personality, it's own pretty curve. Hold one of these and it practically talks to you. They are so incredibly big and gorgeous! Even though they are primarily designed to present each type of wine at optimum bouquet & flavor , the size and shape of the glasses also displays the color very well, too. These are the crown jewels of my glassware collection. I am incredibly happy with them
Incredible piece of kitchen luxury. I have oogled Le Creuset dutch ovens since I first became a fan of Ina Garten, and I was spoiled enough to receive one as an Easter gift, the 5.5 quart in black.  I love the look of this pot, and the heft.  It is a solid quality piece.  I roasted chicken in it tonight and it came out beautifully.  Technically this pot isn't nonstick but I could have wiped the pot clean with a paper towel!  It was *so* easy to clean.  I couldn't justify buying myself one pot worth two hundred dollars, but I see now that I will use this until I'm old and grey.  I can't wait to make soup in it tomorrow.  Such a fabulous investment!  If I had known about them when I got married I would have registered for one (and a KitchenAid Artisan mixmaster too - but that's another story :) )!  Don't make the same mistake I did
A pillow for pregnant women. I bought this pillow for one reason...headaches. I recently became pregnant with my second child and was advised to sleep on my left side.Which would be perfectly fine except Im a belly sleeper and have the flat pillow that goes with it.I literally had the same headache for 2 weeks after I began sleeping on my side. I chose this pillow because my also pregnant sister recommended it. After using it for afew months it works great. No more headaches (from  my neck anyway). The reason I give it only 4 stars is for two reasons...IT IS HEAVY...you cant grab it off the bed to lay on the couch when your sick or prop it behind your back to read in bed. After our baby comes and Im well healed (and back to sleeping on my stomach) Ill probably pass this on to my husband (who is even now trying to steal it)and get a water pillow so I can have a little flatter pillow(this one is nice and thick
Great organizing tool. I got this out of frustration of trying to find places to charge all of our gadgets. We had cords and gadgets everywhere! (Two PDAs, two cell phones, an ipod, and a bluetooth earpiece.)This item has helped us get organized tremedously.Pros: Nice sturdy wood and velvet trim. Has a door in the back with holes on each end for you to choose which side you want the power strip cord to come out. Two extra slots in the door allow for cords to come through as well. Also comes with two plug extenders that allow you to plug in those chunky transformer-type chargers.Cons: Almost all of my chargers have those chunky transformer-type chargers, so I have to plug one charger into a regular outlet and run the cord through the slots. I could have used probably 3 more of those plug extenders b/c the transformers cover up the plugs on the power strip. Maybe you can find some at an electronic store to solve this problem.It is also a little cumbersome to set up, but in the long run it pays off to have everything hidden and organized.I would highly recommend this product
very satisfied. This is a replacement for the same model I had before. I've had the old one for about 5 years and the only problem I had was the cord coming out of the machine loosened up and my husband had to fix it.I totally recommend this
A nice set - lids are fairly tight and they're nice and heavy. I liked them alot and I think they're good for the sale price I paid ($90).  The lids were very tight-fitting, which was a suprise.  It was almost too tight on the 8" pan, but it does work out okay.  The handles are definitely plastic, so if you're looking for a nice rubber handle, this isn't for you.  Overall, a quality set for a pretty good price - this set isn't for experienced chefs, however
It works!. Perfect light for a night-time light.  The light covers the entire room but is not so bright that it over-powers your night-time eyes
Best Alarm I Ever Had. I don't know what the person with the one star was talking about but was so wrong. This alarm is very loud.  Not only is it loud when it goes off but the light flashes on the one that is going off.  I am actually gonna order another one. Best one I had ever since I already had tried several!  Its a must to get
Not diswaher safe. Works swell. Put it in the dishwasher and the plunger ballooned out so I couldn't use it. Cleaning is a hassel. It takes 10 minutes to make juice and clean the machine
replacement filter. This was hard to find at stores and easy to get at Amazon.  Thank
Loved by cat, very quiet, easy to refill. This is the first fountain I'd bought, but our 17 year-old cat kept making a mess in the old water dish by pawing at the water with her front paws.  While this was cute, it made a mess.Got the fountain, she immediately abandoned the old water dish and now drinks much more water (good!) and doesn't splash in the water at all, just drinks right where the water flows out.She loves it so much - yelling and following me around the whole time I refill or clean it until it is back.The reservoir can be removed with water still in it without spilling water.Yeah, you might spill a little when putting it back, but it is okay with me.It is pricey, but highly recommended if you really love your cat!
very handy - I want TWO sets. These canisters are great.  I intend to buy a second set.  They keep food fresh, convenient, and much tidier than the packages you buy it in.  The lids are secure and easy to use, and they stack well.  I also like the fact that they're opaque because I use the smallest one for coffee, which keeps better if stored away from light
Great product. This product is great.  It helped me organize my closet space and my shoes fit perfectly in the slots
Cost and Performance. For a cost like that, you got really nice performance and functionality
Love Seat Throw. For the price, this is a good buy.  Note:  It is a "throw" and not a cover
Missing Link Plus. My breeder recommended Missing Link many years ago for my dogs, who were fairly young at the time, and I began using it.  My dogs' coats were always healthy and shiny with Missing Link.  As they got older, and had signs of arthritis, I changed to Missing Link Plus with glucosamine.  It was a big help in maintaining reasonable mobility as they aged.  My oldest Belgian died two years ago at age 15+; my remaining one will be 12 soon.  While the old dogs are slower and stiffer, they get around pretty well with the help of Missing Link  Plus with glucosamine.  We just got an active two year old, and she gets Missing Link Plus, too.  I have bought it in one pound bags when I have had only one dog, but when I am giving it to two or more I get the 5 pound bag for cost savings.  I will put it in a one pound bag, and freeze or refrigerate the rest until needed
Great bowls. These bowls have been in my home for a few years now.  We have used them for cereal in the morning for warming up food in the microwave.  They are nice looking and very functional.  When we needed another bowl when one broke, we knew we would get another fiestaware bowl
I bought two more after liking the first so well. I've read the various reviews.  I can't comment on the experience of other people, but here's mine.  I have a bathroom that can be quite chilly, and I thought I'd see if a Vornado would help.  It did.  In fact, I liked it so well, that I bought one for my elderly parents, who tend to be cold almost all the time.  They use it regularly, both in their TV room, and in the bathroom.  It's quite light and easy to transport, so they do.  THEN I decided to take my bathroom Vornado to work, since we had some "thermostat wars" going on and my office would suddenly turn frigid because someone else was too warm.  It worked again.  So I bought a third for the bathroom.   Nary a problem.  It's quiet.  It heats smoothly and circulates the heat as claimed.   As a result the room gets gently warmer, not the three feet of space in front of the heater.  With three units purchased at different times, I would think I would have come across one of the defective ones that others have complained about, but I have not had that happen to me.   I am very pleased
Good, but nothing like a commercial cleaning. This machine is probably one of the best for household cleaning, but don't expect it to turn out like a professional job. It's definitely better than renting a Rug Doctor though
My two cats love this. We had the older (smaller) version and one cat liked it and the other didn't. But they both like this one.Why? I think it's because the water comes out higher and it reminds them of the bathtub faucet (which they love to drink from.
Great Electric Kettle. I have owned this kettle for several days, and it is somewhat quiet.  The water boils relatively fast.  I like the lid, which makes it easy to put water in from the faucet.  I have not had any problems with the kettle yet.  I would recommend this kettle
Great Dog Bed!. Our German Shepherd LOVES this big comfy corner bed.  It is big enough for her to stretch out and fluffs up easily to make a very soft spot to curl up in.  The bolster is firm enough to support her if she lays against it or props her head up on it. It does not show her white hair that stands out on every other piece of furniture in the house and it washes well. The neutral color that we picked also does not draw attention to it in our bedroom.  I would definitely purchase this bed again if I ever need one.
Yogurt Maker. I got this as a gift because I have always wanted to make my own yogurt.  What a great gift.  Since I got it almost a month ago I have make almost 5 gallons of yogurt.  I make at least 1 batch a day and sometimes 2 batches a day.  We like to go for the longest setting and it has never gotten too tart or bitter like I have heard some say yogurt can get.  We have nice thick, creamy, yummy yogurt.  Thanks so much for offering such a great product
Great for on the go. I bought this a few months ago and have not stopped using it since. I get up real early in the morning to go to work and I just put the coffee in the maker at night and turn it on in the morning. As long as you follow the plastic indicators on the side so you won't overflow the mug, it's great! Very easy to clean since it's plastic, keeps the coffee pretty warm. I don't drink scolding coffee and the mugs cool it off fast enough where I can start perking up a lot sooner. The only complaint I have is the tops to the mugs. They don't seem to want to stay on so you have to hold it on with your finger and your mouth so it doesn't overflow. Other than that, it's great
Garlic Obsessed~!. I put this in the microwave for 1 minute and out comes the most delicious cooked garlic! You don't have to add anything to it! Cooked garlic, just by itself is very sweet- even my 2 year old enjoys it.
Better Than Five Stars!!!. I believe if you're serious about cooking, you should own great cookware and excellent knives.  I finally stepped up and got excellent knives.  For those who haven't heard the hype, Shun is one of the most respected knife brands in the world.  Check them out on the Web at kershawknives.com.Great features of the entire line include these cool "D" shaped handles that fit your hand better.  Every Shun Classic knife is made in a right- and left-handed version (chefsresource.com for lefties).  The handles are made of wood and are specially treated so they are diswasher safe!! The steel used for the blades is harder than what you would find in most other knives.  The knives are EXTREMELY sharp.   One thing to note about Asian knives is that they must be sharpened at a different angle, 16-18 degrees vs. 20 degrees for German knives.  The Shun steel takes the guesswork out of getting the angle correct because of the flat edge on one side of the metal disc below the handle.9-Inch Slicing -- This is an impressive knife. It's sleek and sharp like the rest of its siblings.  I know the granton edge is supposed to reduce drag, but I'm not certain this is a necessity for a knife I use three times a year. There is a version without the grantons that's a few dollars cheaper.This is an expensive, but lifetime investment.  I encourage you to visit stores and feel the knives in your hand to make sure you are comfortable with them. For more info on Shun, check out Alton Brown's website.  For ratings on various brands and types of knives, check out cooksillustrated.coms' equipment ratings.Shun is probably the best kitchen purchase I've made and the one I'm most proud of.
OK for NYC water. NYC water clogs faucet filters fast. I've tried a few  systems and so far this one has lasted the longest.  It'll go for a month+ before it needs replacement. Not the full four months Brita claims but the other brands I tried lasted less than two weeks.  I've had the system for 6 months
love the prompt and secured service from Amazon. Though I have not tried the juicer yet, but i could not pass off the price
Amazing. This little gadget is the best thing to come on the market since widgets. It doesn't look like much but the spoon fits easily in it and all the drippings fall right back in the pot rather than on a spoon holder on the stove.  For anything without lids it is amazing
Dachshund Delight!. Wonderful!  Made wiener dog cookies for Christmas and they were a BIG hit [even for a small dog].  Even our real dachshund, Bailey, wanted to try these adorable cookies!
Sensible and easy to clean. This is the perfect size for most uses in the kitchen, especially for crushing spices or herbs.  The mortar's non-porous surface is also great since it will not absorb odors or flavors like stones or wood might.  The pestle has a rougher end (unglazed) that makes it easy to use and best for even crushing with little slippage
Outstanding Value. For the low price, these are top notch! The color is rich, the weight & feel of the fabric is very rich. I have had mine since January 2007, so they have been washed many times without any fading or obvious wear issues
High End Quality at a Great Price. I was pleasantly surprised to find this on Amazon.   I had seen these in high-end retailers for $150 and more, plus shipping.   On Amazon, it's even set up as Prime!As for the gate itself, it's perfect.  We have a 12" high, 13 lb. Cavalier King Charles Spaniel, and the height is perfect for us.  It's high enough to keep her in, and low enough to let us walk over it without a problem.  The wood matches our house(a coincidence for us perhaps), but it's nicely put together and the wood is very high-end looking.  The freestanding part of it works very well -- it's very secure and solid
WORKS PERFECTLY. I use it OVER my bedsheets to keep them clean and dry when my slobbery lab uses my bed as hers.  Works just great, stays put even over a quilt, and washes well
Well Worth the price. Have used pressure cookers for years and this is one of the best. All parts easily washed, even cooking, very heavy stainless steel construction. 2.5 is small but perfect for 2-4 people and large  enough for vegtables. I recommend this to NEW pressure cooker users as it is much less intimadating than many others
I love it!. I really like this product, the time it takes to make homemade french fries is cut more than half.  I have also used it for veggie and cheese platters.  Well worth the price! and easy to clean
Great shakers!. What a nice addition to your table!  They're quite pretty and very easy to grab, especially for those with arthritis and for toddlers, without them spilling all over the place.  They look really "retro" and can start quite a conversation at the table.  I've found them to be just fine, size-wise, but you do have to refill them quite often.  Great product though - goes from the table to the dishwasher (top rack) without problems
Fantastic sharpener. We bought this particular sharpener because it was rated the best electric knife sharpener by Cook's Illustrated magazine.  We are extremely happy with the product and what it has done for our knives
Good quality. I got this at a very good price and I recommend it highly. I had another one before but dropped it and broke it. i use it all the time
Absolutely beautiful. This wedding cake topper is absolutely beautiful and stands alone as a wonderful keepsake.  My daughter was so surprised when her father and I presented to her.
Great price, nice to be able to buy single bowl. I cook and freeze a lot of meals for my husband, who often works late.  I won't use Tupperware or other plastic because I believe plastic can leach into food while microwaving, but Pyrex bowls of this size are hard to find in stores -- most stores have Pyrex baking sets with several containers that are too large or too small.Finally, I can buy just these bowls, as many as I want, without getting stuck with other sizes I don't need.  This is a great price for them, too -- on ebay, people want more, plus shipping
Napkin holder that works. No matter the number of napkins, this holder adjusts to hold them neatly. And you can even fold down one side so that it becomes an L shape to hold a large stack.It looks nice on the table, too
Fantastic Reading Light. I love this light!  I spend hours reading in bed each week and this light is just perfect since it shines a perfect amount of light over the book w/o disturbing my husband.  It's also a real treat never having to worry about replacing lightbulbs (like most other reading lights).  Couple it with the electric adapter and you have a reading light with no maintenance
Dirt Devil M08245 Power Reach. This is the best vacuum on the market for removing cat hair from your furniture and bedspread. It is far above using a pet hair remover (tape). It is great for the quick cleanups of tracked litter as well. I love it.
Simply the best. Here I have a refurbished Palinato X3; textured, very hardy stainless; and a good bargain with no cosmetic flaws, -170 to start (6 mo warranty).But let me correct one point made in these reviews, the drip grill below is made of chromed plastic, a rather new trend that works quite well, the steam nob as well seems to be this material.All around this is quite an improvement on the X1: more boiler pressure plus a more heat efficient design makes the whole machine heat in less than half the time as the X1. Cups warm quicker also.It also seems to handle ground coffee a little better. Still it's important to use a grind as fine as can be without becoming powder, and the milk should properly be low or no fat for steaming, fat content just makes more fat, not true foamed milk.
Loved the flute glasses. I am so pleased at the Waterford glasses I ordered for my daughter.  I was worried about the shipping but they were packed in 4 layers and arrived in one beautiful piece.
Perfect in Every Way. If you're a coffee lover but the ONLY one in your house, this coffee maker is perfect for you.  I use mine every day.  It allows you to quickly brew one fresh cup of coffee at a time, and the availability of coffee pods in varying strengths and flavors is only improving.  For the money, this is a wise purchase, and it will meet your needs as a single coffee drinker in your home
No More Rug Doctor. After years of renting Rug Doctors, we decided to buy our own carpet cleaner.  We were also motivated by having two dogs who bring too much of the yard with them on our off-white carpets when they come in from playing.  Also one of them is a puppy, who thought it convenient to pee on the carpet a few times.   After reading other reviews, we selected the Hoover F5914-900.  We wash the living area carpets about once a month and have already spent less on the Hoover then we would have by renting a cleaner.  The carpets are as clean as with a bigger Rug Doctor.  We have found that going over an area with just hot water after cleaning it with the detergent helps keep the carpet clean for a longer period of time.  We are very happy with our Hoover.  It is fairly light, easy to fill and empty, and easy to clean both the tanks and the brushes.  As other people have commented, the attachment hose tends to fall off, so we just leave it off.   Otherwise, it's a heck of a deal!
Famous Maker Towel Set. I'm impressed with the quality of these towels.  I purchased them because I needed hunter green and could not find that color locally.  They are large, soft absorbent towels
Excellent Price Plus Bonus!. How did this arrive so quickly?  It was shipped yesterday and was on my doorstep today.  This was a great deal--for some reason the blue was $30 less than other colors.  A 7 piece spatula set worth $69 was an added bonue.  Yay!
Great. These storage bowls have been a nice addition to my dish collection. They came in great shape and have been useful. They go from firdge to microwave to the table and everything matches the dishes
Worked great for us!. We have four dogs, and they're pretty good at working each other into a frenzy of barking. One of our neighbors "strongly suggested" this product as a possible remedy. I did some investigation before purchasing, including talking to the manufacturer. Their sense was that it works for about 50% of dogs, which is in line with what I saw in other on-line reviews at the time (this was about a year and a half ago).Anyway, because they had a good return policy I went ahead and made the purchase, and it worked wonderfully. The barking dropped substantially in the corner of the yard where we put it, and in fact we wished we had bought more (we have a very big yard). That led to our downfall: we were moving it around frequently, and during one of the moves it got dropped into our irrigation ditch. Oops.Needless to say, it didn't work after that. But, remarkably, the corner of the yard where we initially installed it stayed pretty quiet for several months. Now the grass is green, the buds are blooming, and the dogs are chasing squirrels and barking at phantoms that only they can perceive, so it's time to replace the unit. This time I'm buying two, and anticipating a peaceful spring and summer.
So far, so good!. I just got my Flip It yesterday and after a trial run I am very pleased! I have Pergo laminate floors and I have tried everything out there from different mops to steamers and every cleaner under the sun and no matter what I have to wipe them with a towel or they are streaked with water marks. Even my ceramic tile in the bathrooms needs to be wiped or I get water marks. Well, NO MORE!!! I can tell that it takes some trial and error to use the machine correctly but after testing it yesterday my floors were shining! No streaks or water marks! The vacuum part is not the best so I will continue to use my regular vacuum beforehand. Not a big deal I think, since you have to vacuum using a conventional mop anyway. But washing the floor was just like "vacuuming" it to a shine! Finally, I don't dread washing the floors!
Great. Great size which stores several loaves of bread or bagels. Cutting board gets stuck sometimes
SPECIAL GIFT. Bought these for our son-in-law for Chrismas and he loved them.  I wished I had ordered two sets !!!  Maybe next time
Fantastic Can Opener 2 Years and Going Strong. We're coming up on two years of steady use with this little jewel and very happy with it. It takes a little practice at first learning the proper way to position it, but I'm able to do it with one hand (No I'm not Hercules). My wife also gives it 5 stars and wants me to buy an extra one in case they discontinue it. She's not very strong and has never had any problem puncturing the can to get it started. It's very compact and comes apart easily to clean. This is one of our favorite kitchen tools. Highly recommend
Toastylicious. As much as a toaster can, this one makes me happy :)It toasts evenly, and seems to be very well made in a tres cute-sturdy-classy way. The crumb tray is very convenient, and I think the slanted top of the toaster makes it even easier to get the toast out.  This toaster toasts slower than some of the other models that I've tried, but I think it's worth the minimal extra wait. The Amazon price is decent too, especially if you purchase it with other items so that you get the $25.00 off, and of course, who doesn't love free shipping
A good product. The quality is pretty good. But the actual color is much brighter than it is shown on the website
Wonderful -- and VERY LARGE. These glasses are really wonderful for enjoying red wine.  Their very large bowls really help the air exposure that brings out the flavors in a good red.  The rims were thin and the stems delicate enough, but they didn't feel terribly fragile.  Also, I thought the packaging was just fine.  There was nothing wrong with this set in any way.However, I wouldn't recommend these glasses to anyone who is a very casual wine drinker and wants to stay that way -- or anyone with very limited cupboard space.  When I have wine enthusiasts over, they think these glasses are very appropriate.  When I have others over, they think these are weird.  The bowls are MUCH larger than your average red wine glasses.  Expect to hear "Well, I know the red wine glasses are larger, but isn't this a little overboard?"  Of course, these people don't realize that no -- the size of these bowls is great.  But expect to have to explain.So overall, in sum:  Perfect for enjoying your red wine -- much larger than the standard size for reds, which helps you enjoy what you are drinking!  If you don't want to have to explain the "weird" size to guests who don't understand red wine reasonably well, or want to save cupboard space, then perhaps avoid these and go for a more standard size red wine glass
Unbelievable!!. I've been an amazon customer for about a decade now, but this is the first time I've written a review.  I feel I just have to.  This toy is so amazing.  I bought the cat track months ago, but my cat has not lost interest.  She plays with this thing all day and even lets me sit and hit the ball with her.  This is by far the best toy I've purchased for my cat
Great laundry basket!. Each of the 3 compartments holds almost a full load of laundry.  The unit is skinny enough for a small laundry room.  It was easy to put together and slides around the room effortlessly.  I recommend this -- great price and great product
simple. This product is a real convience for someone who uses alot of hard or soft boiled eggs. Easy to clean. I never have to worry about not hearing the buzzer when the eggs are done, it is very loud and VERY annoying
The ULTIMATE pillow. This is the only pillow I have ever found, regardless of price, that gives me complete sleeping comfort. This pillow and I go back many, many years and I could not find it again in retail stores.  Today I received only two (what was I thinking?) from Amazon and immediately ordered two more for our cabin.  This is a "No Brainer Buy."  Sweet dreams
Good value. I am fairly pleased with this end table.  I purchased two end tables for our family room to match the coffee table.  I very much like the style, but wish the table was an inch or so taller.  The quality is only ok... I did notice minor scratches on one table after only a month of use.  But considering the price, and in comparison to other end tables in this lower price range, it is a good deal.  If possible, I would have graded it as 3 1/2 stars
Very good use. It is nice and pretty good to use. Food and liquid it is very easy to take it off. I am satisfied with the product
Wonderful Gift Lazy Susan. I recently got married and for one of my wedding gifts I got a pretty expensive 17 inch solid wood lazy susan. Well when I moved into my house with my husband my mother saw it and fell in love. She went on on and on about how she would love to have one for parties to put cheeses and crackers and for different things. Well they are usually pretty expensive and I was not able to find one cheap. My mom's birthday came up and I was able to find one using amazon.com not as big but as nice. I was able to send it to my mom and she loves it she uses it all the time and it stays out on the table so the grandkids can use it to choose treats. Great gift idea. This item is awesome and is better then mine it came already treated. I had to pre-treat mine since it being wood. My mom just adores it
Compact, Sturdy and Easy to use. Best deal for the money.  Folds up easy.  We use it in the kitchen to reach high places, it folds up and slides easily in next to the refrigerator.  Stool is sturdy, and does not slip on the floor when opened up.Great Product
great cutting board. when this cutting board arrived i took it out of its box, placed it over my stove top, laid my head on it and laughed from sheer joy.it covers the top of my stove exactly.  the wood is beautiful and warm.i got mine late november early december, and i use if everyday at least once, and it still looks new.  it is easy to clean, even if i left cut tomatoe and avocado or something, the stains wipe right off.p.s.  i only use mine to cut fruit and veggies....we are vegetarian.
Form proceeds function with this set of dishes. I fell in love with the graceful lines and understated elegance of this set.  But when the pieces were delivered it quickly became apparent that this oversized set is not designed for everyday use.  The pieces are difficult to fit into my dishwasher as well as the dishracks purchased to help organize my cupboards.  The mugs are huge and would require many pots of coffee when entertaining guest unless you want to fill them only part way.  The "bowls" which can be ordered separately are designed to gorge if one was to actually fill them to capapcity.Not to mention, from what I have discovered during my research on the net, apparently they are quite easy to chip and are limited in thier safeness in the dishwasher and microwave (both on low heat settings) I love the look of them, but it is probably not one of my wiser investments.
Filter for hard water. Still allows some dust deposits. Live in AZ and don't have water softener. Need to change more often than recommended
Great vacuum.  Cleans like crazy. Pros:Easy to use.  Very adaptable system.  Tools and manual cleaning system are at your fingertips.  Very long power cord and attachment hose.  Incredible suction.  Emptying the bin is trivial, and essentially a clean process.  Contrary to competitor claims, Dyson vacs do *not* spew dust into the house.  In fact, the lifetime filter is user cleanable making the whole unit basically cost free--again, a trivially simple process.Cons:This thing sucks so hard that it's difficult to push on deep pile carpet.  I called Dyson about this and they had me remove two very thin seals from the beater-bar head.  The result completely fixed the issue.  There was no apparent loss of cleaning capability.  The power cord is exceptionally long.  Unfortunately, it does not automagically retract.  The long cord can get in ones way, however one does not have to move it from plug to plug as much.  Yes, it's plastic.  But other reviews have indicated reliability and good support from Dyson.Both my wife and I find the Dyson to be an excellent purchase. We've had lots of problems with vacuums because of three dogs and long haired humans.  This machine does a much better job of things and is much easier to use.Worth the money?  Time will tell.  The reason why we selected Dyson is because of all the good reviews all over the Net.   So far, it has exceeded our expectations
Nice pillow. Just like it's rated this pillow is worth the cost. It does take a few days to get use to but when you do it's great
Emma, the chocolate lab, can't play with this enough. Can a retriever have too much fun with a toy??
Beautiful addition to collection. I purchased this for my mother after she bought the set of dishes at the Lenox outlet store.  It is just adorable!  This is a great accent if you have the Butterfly Meadow Dishes.  Also a great price compared to other retailers.  Thanks Amazon
I'm cookin' fer a livin and... Picked up 2 of deez bad lil' sauce pans for work and they perform as well as my solid copper Mauviel. Quick heat transition and holding...easy and quick to clean. I must add that this adonized finish requires extra care...not as much as copper but more than MC2 or Stainless AllClad...but I don't mind... I like LTD and I have 27 pieces at work now.I'm shoppin' for a full set at home now!!!4+ mojo*z for these rugged performers only because the finish requires extra car
A great product!. My son desperately loves anything Star Wars, but being as he is only 5, we limit him on what he can have.  The Galactic Heroes collection is wonderful.  The comforter is soft, washes up nice, and really cute!  I wish I had had this stuff when I was a kid
Great little piece at a "teaser" price!. I have to say that I am very happy with my All-Clad Ltd pieces, including this little fry pan.  Because of the price, I picked up this one and the 1 qt. sauce pan to give them a try.  My family used to cook with the all ss line so I knew that these would be quality and I was not let down.  Yes, stainless is more difficult to cook with, but have you tried hard anodised pots? impossible.  That's why my equally beautiful (IMO) Calphalon professional pots are looking great as kitchen decorations and not much else.  Your food will only burn if you are not paying attention to it.  If you are having this problem, try non-stick, so you can go do whatever else it is you want to do other than paying attention to your food.  If you are looking for top quality cookware that is oven safe, lasts a lifetime, and demands a little more care from the chef......this is it
Couldn't live without it. I have had my tea maker for 6 years and use it all the time.  I have used other tea makers at my Mom's and she has went through 3 to my one.  I rec'd it as a wedding gift so I have been looking for one for my Mom.  I only wish they made it in a larger size.  I usually make it strong enough for 4 quarts and just pour it over into my larger pitcher.  Love, Love, Love it
It's worth every penny... If you love crepes and enjoy making all kinds of recipes with them, you absolutely should invest in this pan.  I say "invest" because it's pricey, but All-Clad is worth every penny.  I'm slowly upgrading all my cookware to All-Clad and I'm very pleased with everything.  I must say that delicate crepes are hard to make because the paper-thin crepe is hard to flip.  Always adding tons of butter or Crisco to the pan each time you pour the crepe batter adds too many additional calories.  The non-stick surface on this pan is the best I've ever used and you can use this pan for any number of recipes besides crepes.  I'm very very pleased and satisfied with my purchase
Plates Are Good, thats about it. I bought these during an amazon one day sale for $35, me and my girlfriend are soon looking to get our own place and wanted to buy something that is decent but not two expensive.  I'll try to give good descriptions of everything to give the buyer a good idea of what to expect.  When amazon says 35lbs they are not kidding, it is a VERY heavy box.  Towle silversmiths are the actual company that makes the set.  They are made in China.  According to the box IT IS dishwasher safe, but IS NOT microwave safe.  That would be due to the metal band around the edges of the plates.This review is for the platinum set, amazon didn't have it listed on the website when i was going to review them so this is close enough.  All the items appear very nice the bands are all uniform and matching.  It looks like tableware you would expect to find in a NICE new england bed and breakfast.  Very timeless, and classic, but modern in a sense as well.The plates, bowl's, and coffee cups are nice and heavy and look quite elegant.  They are of good weight and don't feel flimsy at all. They come with decorative plates for underneath the main plate however i wouldn't ever consider using them, the only they they are useful for is target shooting or playing frisbee.The flatware is ok, they are on the light side and somewhat bland.  The forks and spoons flex but also appear as if they would bend under normal use, the knifes feel ok but again all the flatware is on the flimsy side, I would recommend getting an additional set somewhere else.  They are not so thin that they would bend right away like the usual 'college' first set that most people would buy at either Linens and Things or Bed Bath and Beyond or Target.  But i've had better.The wine glasses are the same way, they are a medium thickness glass, they are by no means high quality but they are not the cheapo ones you would expect to find at target or the cheap ones at LNT or BBB.  One of mine had an air bubble in it, im gonna request a new one from amazon.  They are ok tall stems and good base, they feel very sure footed on the table and accompany the dishes nicely in design.  They are a large bowl Red Wine glass design.If you need the dishes buy it, they are well worth what i paid for it for the dishes alone, i plan on buying new flatware.  The glasses I'll use till they break.  Overall for $35 i am very pleased and wish i had bought a second set for the plates alone
Great Product at a Great Price. I am very pleased with this purchase and would recommend it to anyone who enjoys quality cookware
Gorgeous, well-made, but. . . Only 4 stars because the side holes are so large that smaller apples and tangerines fall right through.  It is an incredible value for the money, though
Easy to use, I reach for these first. I've been using these for a couple of months and every nasty, gloppy mess I throw in it, including shortening, butter, cream cheese, sour cream and others have slid right out and cleaned up perfectly fine. I spend less time cleaning up then I would have with glass as more is pushed out. I haven't had any problems with them sticking and have yet to find a complaint with one and have gone so far as to aquire a 1 cup version. They both sit out and are never put away as my glass measuring cups are
Simply the best!. Le Creuset has one of the best reputations out there, coming from professional chefs to the everyday at home chef.  Le Creuset has quality, durability and beauty.  Based on collected articles and other positive feedback, I purchased my first piece ever from Le Creuset on another web site and I love it.  I agree with it all.  As a matter of fact, it is this same oval platter that I purchased from another web site and when I wanted another one, they were sold out.  Amazon had it and I just had to purchase it.  It's a multi purpose serving platter that looks great on any table setting.  It's durable, I've banged it a few times (quite by accident may I add) and there is not even a scratch on it.  All Le Creuset products are expensive, but very well worth it.  I see these platters lasting a very, very long time.
Pretty good. I really like this product.  My only complaint with it is that it doesn't quite fit my faucet.  But I like the space it allows for and it really has helped keep my granite countertops water-free.  I recommend it as long as you can fit it around your faucet
Yet another wonderful knife from Henckels... Henckels knives are quality - you can tell just by the feel of their knives. This line is also weighty, and balance just right in you hands. While I like Henckels Pro line SLIGHTLY better because of the fit of those  handles in my hands, you can't go wrong with this knife
Good functional furniture for the price. Vietnamese rubberwood filing cabinet and printer stand. Not bad to look at, easy to assemble, all parts fit, drawer opens easily and closes square. Recommend for home use, won't make an heirloom, but functional and sturdy.
Good deal. This product was shipped promptly and was very easy to assemble. It is  economical for students and is everything the website described.
This is a great mulyi-purpose knife. We have many of fine German knives in our kitchen but this one is our all time favorite.  We grab this little gem any time we need a handy knife to do a quicky job.  When you want to slice a few radiches for a salad, make a sandwich or whatever small job you have, this is the knife you will go to time and time again.We also use our 8" Chef's knife when we are getting dinner ready, but a lot of times it is just too big for what you need. That's when this knife shines through.And of course it's from Wusthof so you know it is the best.We love it
Buy a Bigger size. I really love these sheets. After I bought the sheets I read other peoples reviews, because I was new to amazon and didnt realize there were reviews. So I was worried when they were on there way to me, that they wouldnt fit. So I recieved them and put them on my bed and they were huge, so I felt a little better about them not fitting. I washed them and dried them, and went to put them on my bed and it was a tight fit, but it fit, and I was very pleased. But then I realized that I bought a Cal King and I have a regular King. So my suggeston would be if you want these sheets buy a bigger size. But as to the sheets, they are not soft but not hard, my husband and I love them, and we want to buy more. One more suggestion if you buy them is to line dry them, I did that the second time I washed just to make sure they wouldnt shrink anymore
I agree. I agree with the previous 5 reviews. I do want to add a "liddle" aggravation to me, in that it is made in China. Arrggh! Don't we make anything in this country anymore? Brand names do not seem to mean much. Country of origin might be nice in the official review. That's the only reason I reduced my rating by one sta
Supercute & cooks a mean pot roast!. LOVE it. Nice design. Keeps the meat tender & juicy. Comes with a tupperware-like lid that seals up your left-overs for easy storage in the frig.Very happy with the purchase.
Excellent. Item was as described and arrived flawless. Krups directions are a little hard/fague to understand
It does what it's supposed to. Does it look and feel cheap? Yes! Does it do exactly what I expect it to? (Make coffee automatically at a pre-programmed time in the morning) Yes! I've used it to make coffee before I wake up every morning for almost a month, though the design of the pot itself is pretty bad (I kinda expect it to break or otherwise fail sooner or later) it's done the job so far and I can't complain.
Groovy!. Kitchenaid makes the best kitchen stuff!  I have had this for about a year and it is still as sharp as ever!  My family eats pizza a lot and this is by far the best pizza cutter yet
This Is The Heater. I'll try and make a long story short.My 3 year old son sleeps in a cold part of the house but he refuses to put covers on himself. Instead, he comes to mom and dads room and wakes us up to tell us he's cold. Well, that didn't take me long to figure out we had to do something.I bought 3 or 4 different heaters and they all burned out because we run them all night every night. This heater is the only one that has kept up for the last two years. It's quiet and it works, what more do you want. Don't buy any other heater!
Great Little Sweeper. Just read the reviews of the Bissell 2800B Sweeper.  I've had mine, now, for a year and a half, and I think it does a great job.  True, it is not a vacuum, but it does do the in-between job of picking up debris from carpets and hard surfaces.  With 9 cats and a dog--plus living in the woods--we get a ton of pet hair and dirt, twigs, etc., tracked into the house.  It helps to keep the house tidied up, until we do a regular vacuuming
Awesome Reading Light. This has been the best reading light we have seen so far! We have purchased several trying to find one that was durable and met our needs, and this one surpasses that. The neck has smooth action and the clip is very easy to use.I highly recommend this item
Great Pet Fountain Filter. It was a delight to order this item and it was handled very fast and efficentially!!!  Thanks for the prompt attention to the order
Mine's in 1 piece and works great. I'm with Amalfi girl. I have this pan and it works great- most importantly, the lid is heavy enough to weigh down the sandwiches. (The trick to these panini pans is that you must heat them thoroughly with the lid on before placing the sandwich inside. That way the top gets toasted at the same time.) As for those other two,I can't even imagine a cast iron pan breaking in shipment! The ones that did must have been from a defective lot. Wow! They have my sympathies
Finally, a handle fit for human beings!. If you've bought Fiestaware place settings in the past, you've surely noticed the awkward shape of the coffee mugs of yore. The old ones had a little ring of a handle that few adults could use comfortably. While the art deco design is lovely, using the old mugs was miserable and not the comforting "morning coffee" experience we've come to expect from no-nonsense diner mugs.Anyway, Fiestaware has finally taken note and given us a proper mug with a proper handle... and it's a realistic size, too, not like the cartoonishly oversized jumbo mug which is more suited for soup or cereal than coffee. Yay for the Java Mug
Carry your Dutch Oven in style. This tote bag is made to carry and protect your beloved dutch oven.Why a tote bag you may ask? It not only protects your valuable $50 or antique dutch oven, but it keeps your otehr items clean if your oven has soot on the outside.  These come in different sizes just like the ovens themselves. This particular one will fit a dutch oven up to 8 quarts or 12" in diameter which is the standard size used by scouts and other groups. It has a padded bottom to protect the legs, a heavy duty zipper closure, and carrying straps.
Great set but the picture made these appear bigger then the reality, still worth it!. Even though the sizes are listed I missed that and from the picture thought they were bigger. After I got over the initial disappointment in size I realized they were really great to have for prep. I am going back to school to be a chef and am really trying to practice Mise En Place in my own kitchen (I think that is how you spell it, I better learn before my final). This set is great for the prep because it has two measuring amounts in one (like 3/4 cup and 1.5 in the same cup), which I came to realize has helped. I bought these and the OXO 4-piece prep bowl set with lids assuming I would try both and give one away, I ended up keeping and using both
Great new Gaggia Super!!. I just purchased the Gaggia Titanium, and boy, what a machine!  This thing is idiot-proof, not to mention it looks great on my counter top!  I was so impressed by the styling, that I didn't pay attention to the actual "function" of the machine at first, but when I did, I was in awe!  Never having used a super auto, I was used to an old Krups I had purchased at a flea market that actually worked once every other blue moon!  So using the Gaggia every morning for my cup of joe made me feel like I was in heaven!  The speed of making a latte in the wee morning hours is unbelievable, and the machine's ability to automatically froth my milk for me really makes it a breeze!  I highly recommend this machine to anyone who is looking for an easy to use super automatic machine.
Shower Filter that works. I never knew the difference in water by location, until I visited LA. After showering down there, my skin became very dry. I did some research and found that this product was at the top of the list when it came to shower filter experiences. There are other ones out there, but this one was well documented. I ended up purchasing the unit to see if it would help a skin condition. I haven't used the unit long enough to notice, but I can say that there is a noticeable difference in the way my skin and hair feels.My skin is more moist and softer to the touch than without the filter. The steam that forms smells fresher and the shower head provides a nice stable stream. Overall a great product and I hope to report back with my long term results.
Kind of big!. I love this plate, and it's good for serving something like roast chicken, but it's too big for everyday use, so it sits in my cupboard the rest of the time. Just know that this plate is BIG! If you do a lot of serving, it's probably good for you, but I only bring it out at Thanksgiving, holidays, and large dinners with friends
Chef's Choice M130 knife sharpener. I cook all the dinners here at home, and sharp knives are an asset in the kitchen.  A word of warning from the manufacturer is very true:  "WARNING  Knives sharpened on the Chef's Choice will be sharper than you expect.  Use them with great care."  I taped their warning to our knife rack as a reminder.  In short, the manufacturer's instructions are very easy to follow, and the knife sharpener is very easy to use as well.  It's a little pricey, but if you want really sharp knives you won't be disappointed.  You can sharpen all your kitchen knives, serrated knives, and pocket knives, too.  My knives are sharper than when I bought them.  Good Luck
One Size Wont Fit All. A fabulous wok by appearances but for us it has yet to be seasoned inasmuch as we are researching alternative wok rings for our 30" gas cooktop.  A word of caution that may be obvious to some -- wok rings are not universally sized to fit.  Recognizing that the one that came with the wok might not work, we were prepared to search for one that would but were not prepared for how difficult that would be.  Meanwhile, the local Chinese restaurant and my cast iron skillet are getting too much use. The search goes on.
coffee in a fun cup. What people don't think about is how hot chocolate works just as well as coffee in a coffee mug.  I'm not a coffee drinker but if this mug brings you great coffee joy you should also pour hot chocolate in it.  I have to take a point off because after you pour coffee in this mug enough times a permanent smell is left there, which means using this cup for anything other than coffee or hot chocolate is gross.  Especially water.  Who wants to take a sip of water only to smell coffee every time you put the mug to your face?  Not me.  Not that the smell of coffee is horrible or anything.  It smells good and I can't imagine not smelling it every morning when other people in my home are making some.A great mug you should buy.
2006 Xmas. Salton's "Hot Spot" warmers were a hit with both of the adult computer users who received them. Consistently hot beverages at your elbow? These gifts earned sincere thanks and were put into use promptly. The switch on the hotplate (as opposed to on the cord) and On/Off light were cited as winning features. Hotplate housing allows fit of average mugs. Operational cons? Nothing beyond common sense... contents of cup gets warmer as the level drops, don't let the mess on your desk avalanche over it during operation, etc. Salton "Hot Spot" earns 5 stars from my corner of the world :)
If  you have an army to feed, this is the one. This pot is HUGE. You could probobly cook 6-8 lobsters or have an awsome clam bake with it. It's beautiful, heavy and unbelievably priced
SCOOBA. Amazed at how clean and polished my new wood floors looked. I have been a Roomba fan for years, and this is a wonderful addition to my robotic clan
The Best. It is just like having a diaper genie for babies, makes it much cleaner
A great pan. I have quite a few pieces of cast iron and this pan is one of my favorites.  It works great for thin crispy crust pizza but it also works well as a griddle.  Although I have another Lodge griddle, this works better because it only takes up 1 burner and its width allows more freedom in where you place things.  The only minor problem is that if you cut your pizzas on the pan you'll wind up cutting through the seasoning
Economical - great for a crowd. If you don't care about show, these industrial looking butter warmers are great. Slight problem is the flame may be a little too close to the bowls, so fill bowls well, a little instead of a lot will turn your butter to ghee.
Good basic coffee maker. If you're looking for a good basic coffee maker with a timer this is it! Not expensive, not fancy but works and makes a decent cup of coffee. I was attracted to the price and the B&D brand name. I have several other B&D appliances as well as tools and I'm happy with them all
49erbabe. Don't hesitate to buy this light weight blanket.  It is wonderfully made; the reason I'm giving it a 5 rating is that it fits my California King bed.  I've looked high and low to find a blanket that fits....this one does!  Buy this blanket with confidence.  Deffinately a great find on Amazon, and the price wasn't bad either
Great rice cooker. I had used a Panasonic rice cooker that is similar to this one. It worked great for nearly 10 years and finally the non-sticky layer was worn out, so I bought this SR-G18FG 10 Cup Rice Cooker/Steamer. It works great so far just as I'd expect. I would definitely recommend this one to others
Great experience, solid product. Received exactly what I ordered when I expected it.  This is a good quality vinyl and pretty print
Much better than the usual Target furniture. It was a joy not to have to hassle with those stupid cams and parts than don't fit (although the bottom feet, which you do have to assemble, had to be forced in order to fit). It's also quite attractive. I should pay more attention to the dimensions of products than to their pictures, because in my mind the picture makes it look wider than it is. It's nice to see real wood, but I am under the impression that the pressed wood like the stuff Ikea sells is more environmentally friendly. Finally, you can't beat the price.
EXCELLENT AND COMFORTABLE.. ONE OF A KIND READING PILLOW.. The BedLounge has so many useful features. I especially like the movable lumbar pillow, adjustable headrest and the longer arms that make getting in and out easy. And I love the ability to remove and wash the cover. A truly outstanding product. I DID EXTENSIVE RESEARCH AND REALIZED THE BEDLOUNGE IS THE BEST IN THE READING PILLOW MARKET WITH THE QUALITY, PRICE AND EXCELLENT CUSTOMER SERVICE. GREAT HOLIDAY AND BIRTHDAY GIFT..
greatest Sharpening System. I've owned many sharpening devices and I have, before the FURI knife sharpening system, used a steel to keep my Chicago Cutlery honed.  I have a set of FURI knives and my old (22 years Chicago set).  This system completely renewed the old Chicago knives and keeps the FURIs razor sharp.  Well worth the money
Say Cheese!. This is a great product, especially for starting a dinner party or a  cheese &amp; wine gathering.  The recessed well has plenty of room for  crackers or fruit, &amp; the slicer slices cheese smoothly &amp;  efficiently.  Plus, when the evening is over, you only have to wash one  item
Wonderful little dish with a million uses. I bought this to use for "brown bagging" but have used it for so much more. THis little dish is great for storing leftovers or taking small portions to potlucks, all without having to change the contents to a "dressier" dish. French White is attractive enough to go with your best china and a much better value for the money
Just Right. Makes short work of much grating. The best with which I've ever worked
For the money, you can't beat it!. I have to agree with everyone else, save one reviewer.  I LOVE this piece of furniture.  It's a lovely piece, and for the money, you really can't beat it...and I even got it 15% off!  I'm no help when it comes to the ease of putting it together - my fiance handled that for me.  However, the one reason I gave it four stars instead of five is because the predrilled holes on first buffet that was shipped did not line up correctly, and we had to get a replacement one shipped to us.  This was taken care of by Target in a very accomodating, expedient manner.  As one other reviewer pointed out, it is petite...take careful note of the measurements.  All in all, I love it.  The coloring of the wood is beautiful and it's a perfect addition to our dining room
They DO bend after a while. I've used these for months to protect tile countertops and they basically work except they start bending after a while on the edges and something light (like an empty glass)tends to fall over.  They are heavy duty and I put hot items on them with no problems
Top Notch. Works just great. A plus is that the gray frame surrounding the toasting slots is metal rather than plastic. I also like its appearance/style so much better then those forever Retro-look toasters on the market today. Boy, am I tired of that look.So, if it keeps on toasting, I am very happy with it
Great Product. This filtration system has changed the taste of my tap water into something worth drinking. I am happy with it, and recommend it highly
Super Easy to install. Gets all the magazine off the back of the toilet and looks grea
So useful for food *and* item storage!. I bought this pair - initially - for salad storage (we make a week's worth at a time) but I've decided these are a *perfect* size for hobby storage, etc. So am going to buy two more
Loaf Pans. If you are serious about baking bread, then this is the loaf pan for you. They are slighly larger than the normal glass loaf pan. Although you may find a less expensive glass loaf pan, this perform very well and will hold those recipes that tend to go over the top of a small loaf pan. They are more expensive that other glass pans, but nothing  beats a hot loaf of bread coming out of the oven, done to perfection, and these loaf pans are great
A Pan I Use All the Time. Although called a stir-fry pan by the manufacturer, this is actually a good general-use pan for tasks like making risotto and cooking various sauces, in addition to stir-frying. The bottom may be a little flat for stir-frying purists, but this what makes the pan good for other tasks. I already had a pan like this one that was about four years old and going strong, when the glass top slipped and shattered on our tiled kitchen floor. The top is an important part of the pan for some uses, so I had to order a new one.I use this pan nearly every evening for cooking something. It heats evenly, retains heat well, and is very good value for the cost. The only reason it got four stars instead of five is its size--it is a bit large for an ordinary stove like ours--but its versatility makes up for this one problem
Pretty "cool" and efficient humidifier... I've owned this humidifier for a couple of months now.  The features that I like best about it are: it regulates the ambient humidity (i.e. the unit has a humidity sensor for the room) when it reaches the desired level it automatically stops the mist; also it gives you an indication when the unit needs to be cleaned (pretty simple process); and most important the unit stops when there's not enough water (again a little indicator flashes for your attention) - furthermore, the unit is very well designed and has a very contemporary look - highly recommended
The Garbage Disposal is NOT Your Friend. Oh, little piece of metal and rubber!  You make my morning latte yummy and frothy.  How I love you so.  If only you could stay far, far, away from the black abyss ... the destructive force that chews you up and spits you out!  If you need to purchase this replacement part and you have a disposal, then buy a hundred.  This part inevitably ends up twisted and broken
great filter. it works as advertised, does a very good job and is worth the money
This is the way cast iron was meant to be. Yeah, I tried seasoning a cast iron frying pan, never washed it just scrubbed it out with salt.  It was much more work than any other gadget I have and it wasn't worth it.  This is the perfect solution.  The frying pan is perfect for searing rib eyes or filets and then popping them in the oven to roast which gives you a far better result than broiling them.  The nonstick interior cleans up with paper towels and water and you don't need to put it in the dishwasher which is forbidden anyway.  The pan is so heavy that when you preheat it to sear you are able to completely sear a couple of steaks at a time.  It's so heavy you could stop a whole band of coyotes with this thing no matter what they'd purchased from the Acme Corporation.  It works very well with an induction cooking top too.  The handle is bare porcelain enamel and it gets warm so consider buying a silicone handle cover especially if you have a gas range.  Last but not least it has spouts for pouring off deglazing liquids to make those great reduction sauces
Great Quality and Value. I bought the first set because they seemed well priced compared to the terrycloth style we usually use. They are of high quality, good color and do hold their shape. I have to remember not to use a dryer sheet so they have increased absorbtion rate. Very pleased.
Great little pig!. I use this alot and enjoy it. I also use it for grill cheese sandwhiches and it works great.It cleans up nicely.
Bean Bag Chair. Fantastic!! Great product and great customer service.  My daughter just loves it
First Fondue set A++++. As this is my first Fondue set and never had owned one before. It was easy to set-up an clean-up was not bad. I tried a cheese recpie that I found on [...]. It turned out great and would make again. I would only advice I could offer is keep the box as most people don't have storage for like this, I plan on using this here and there so I wouldn't leave this on a counter top year round. It is attractive enough to do so if one wished I guess
Georgetown End Tables. I purchased two of these last Saturday.  I LOVE THEM!!  The  first table only took 30 min and the second 10 minutes!!  Would have given a 5 star review however, there was an excessive amount of grease on the screws and hardware included to put it together.  Although sealed excellently, it was hard to put it together without getting grease on the table.  &#60;br /&#62;&#60;br /&#62;
2001 model still going strong! Great espresso. Having worn out a Capresso machine after daily brewing 4-6 shots of espresso in making lattes/cappuccinos, etc. I went looking for a more durable machine.I bought an X1 in 2001/2 when it was a brand new model (in stainless) and it is great:1. It heats up quickly.2. It brews VERY consistently.3. The ESE thing is the best mess-preventer ever.4. Separate steam-temperature setting is great. Heats milk much faster than other, cheaper consumer models.5. Machine has capacity to steam enough milk for at least 3 tall lattes before needing a quick "refill" of water from the pump switch.6. I like the simplicity and total manual operation. The switches aren't labeled, but there's only 3. Kind of a morning meditation for me.The most important, non-obvious things:1. Don't leave a pod in the holder and move temperature to steam setting. When you unhook the pod holder, steam will instantly blow apart the ESE pod, which, given that it is more than boiling hot, will hurt, plus will dry instantly on the wall.2. Use INDIVIDUALLY WRAPPED ESE pods, unless you use them all within 2-3 hours of opening the tin. They sour very quickly, even in the freezer. I am partial to Starbucks pods, given my household's addiction to that brand, but I think that is more of a preference than a quality issue. Illy tastes fine, but you have to use them all quickly.3. If you serve a lot of guests, the double unit (X3?) might be better. With the dual-temperature settings, you'll spend a lot of time running water through the unit to cool the steam setting back down to brew the next batch of espresso. Lots of refills of the water container, which is a bit of a pain to remove from the back of the machine.Overall, a great performer after 4 years of daily, multiple use. This thing is a great machine
Swiss Diamond Cast-Aluminum Nonstick 12-1/2-Inch Fry Pan. WOW!  What a terrific skillet!  I have stayed away from nonstick cookware for many years; because in time, the finish always starts to come away from the metal.  Who knows then how much of that finish has gotten to your food.  This skillet comes with a limited lifetime warranty and it can be put in the dishwasher.  It is so easy to clean, that I have not found the need to put it in the dishwasher.  I would definitely recommend this skillet to anyone.
Old way still the best. Some may wonder why bother when seltzer water comes in bottles.1. Makes excellent, high-quality carbonated water. For a TRUE diet soda without chemicals, or add it to cocktails.2. It's fun and easy to make. Just screw in the chargers and shake.3. Great design. A conversation piece. Nostalgic and Retro. Just like the bars in the old movies.4. Economical. Less than 70 cents per soda charger for one liter.5. Great gift idea.Drawbacks:1. The CO2 soda charges can be tough to find. Amazon had them, then they didn't. They may again. Buy in bulk.2. The one liter dispenses quickl
barbie vacume cleaner. My daughter loves it.  She is 8 and now she vacumes all the time.  I works really well.  You do have to charge it quite a bit.  It does not stay charged for a long time.  But I feel it is well worth the money
The BEST measuring cup. If you like a product that is light weight, sturdy and aesthetically pleasing, then this is the measuring cup for you.The difference in use between this item and the normal pyrex is is quite pronounced; it pours better,and handles better because it is so lightweight. You also won't spill things as readily, because there is enough'slosh'room allowed after you fill it to the top, about another 1/4 cup. Just don't bang it around, it won't take as much abuse as the pyrex, but that is a small price to pay
Great for fruits. This item is great for high acid foods (fruits), but as a beginner I wasn't aware that you can't use it to put up meats or most veggies.  You have to use a Pressure Cooker Style Canner to do them, according to the Ball Cook Book that came with it.  I've made a couple cases of Fig Preserves, Strawberry Preserves, and Canned Tomatoes.  Very easy to use.  The cook book has several recipes that I plan on using
Great Juicer. This is my second juicer. I had a waring pro before this, and thought that one was good. But after getting this one, I am pleasantly surprised with the amount of juice we get out of it. Its fast and efficient because of the "big mouth". If you follow the instructions and place a plastic bag in the pulp container, it makes it that much easier to clean up afterwards. It is relatively easy to clean - but as with any product, it is easier to clean it as soon as you are done
Love it. This thing is great...its big, it's metal and its red! What can you really say about a coffee maker. It works and it looks great in my kitchen. No problems whatsoever
Easy Assembling, Excellent Materials..... It was easy for me to assemble it.It looks like luxury outdoor furniture in my house.
Cat loves them - I'm getting more!. My cat is obsessed with these mice and I find them in piles under the couch and tv stand. I'm actually buying more today b/c he gets so sad when he can't find them
If yours needs fixing... I bought 2 for friends for Christmas and neither worked... the problem is the plastic tube inside the pump handle gets a memory kink in it that's SUPER easy to fix.To fix it, remove the one phillips screw.  Then remove the cap at the hose end, the cap end (this one is a bit tough to get off) and the one on the nozzle.  The handle will then open like a clam shell.  Pull the handle back and remove the plastic hose...you will immediately see the crimp in the hose.  Massage it a bit and work it out.  Put it back in by lifting the handle and try to get the hose in a different spot than the original kink... you don't have to go very far.  Put it back together with a bit of finessing in reverse order...tada... Easy Breezy.jc3
49erbabe. Don't hesitate to buy this light weight blanket.  It is wonderfully made; the reason I'm giving it a 5 rating is that it fits my California King bed.  I've looked high and low to find a blanket that fits....this one does!  Buy this blanket with confidence.  Deffinately a great find on Amazon, and the price wasn't bad either
WORKS PERFECTLY. I use it OVER my bedsheets to keep them clean and dry when my slobbery lab uses my bed as hers.  Works just great, stays put even over a quilt, and washes well
Outstanding Product. My fiance can't sleep without noise, so he's always used a desk fan to help him sleep. I'm not overly fond of a fan blowing on us all winter long, so I looked into white noise machines, etc. This already had the best review on Amazon, and having had it since Christmas, it's worth every penny. I love the different sounds, and truly sleep the night through using the celestial setting once I adjusted to it (about one night). The white noise is great, as are many of the other sounds. I turn it on any time I'm in the bedroom now, since it has settings for relaxation and focus sounds besides sleep. It's also very lightweight and easily portable, so we can take it with us when we travel, making for much better sleep on the road. We love it and I would definitely give it as a gift.
Agree with 5* rating. I've been looking for a good insulated 20 oz. mug for a few years and never could find what I wanted in "stainless steel" in this size.  I'd never heard of Timolino, but after reading the reviews of other Amazon users, decided to order a mug.Once again, the reviewers at Amazon called it right.  The mug keeps the coffee hot for hours, and I particularly like the shape since I don't need a mug to fit in a cup holder.My husband has his eye on it and something tells me I'll have to order one for him soon
Better Than Anticipated. I thought, 5 towels for 10 bucks? How nice could they be?Well, surprisingly enough, quite nice. They are high quality and oversized. Unlike many kitchen towels that shrink down to the size of a postage stamp once washed, these did not shrink much.Be sure to take them out of the dryer immediately to avoid excessive wrinkling, but that would be true of any linen.I have been using them about 3 months now and the colors are holding up well and I find myself reaching for them first before my other towels, so I'm going to buy another set now.
biscuit cutters. these were exactly what I was looking for. The are tin and sturdy... I also cook eggs in them to make them round for the biscuits! Thanks!
Nice Kittle. The kittle looks good and I tried, it was not very fast but was accepted.
Great product, incredible packaging. Please read the review I just sent for the Turquoise set.  I am thrilled about the packaging and so happy that you didn't use styrofoam.  If it was sent by the vendor, please contact them and give them an "atta boy".  I'm happy about everything I recieved.  Fiesta ware is wonderful, I wish I'd ordered cobalt or purple.  Oh well, my problem,not yours....Please spread the word out to your vendors that eco-packaging is cheaper and uses less oil...Thank you, Daryl Bergman (and Mother Earth)...dary
Brilliant!. This knife tray is a brilliant concept.  We happen to have more drawer space than needed, so to have a knife block that safely stores our steak/santoku knives in a drawer fit our needs perfectly.  It solved the problem of having extraneous stuff on the counter while also solving the problem of having mismatched knives openly in a knife block on the counter.I read the reviews before I purchased it, and noted comments about the knife block not accommodating some knives.  We have Henckel knives, but not steak knives, which are some other brand.  The steak knives fit perfectly in the allotted slots.  My only complaint is that there aren't enough steak knife slots
Excellent!. This product was in perfect, safe packaging and was delivered promptly. THank you! Jennife
Great item!. Having problems hanging your family photos?  This is the perfect product and inexpensive.  Sooooooo easy...
Rachael Rocks! So do her knives!. These are my second set of Rachael Ray knives and I could'nt be happier.They are super sharp and they cut through everything really easily. They make cutting so much fun
Nice blanket. My son loves it. It's not as soft as I would have hoped for, but it works just fine.
Fulcrum Multi Flex Book Light. Light works great...easy to use, clips on back of book.
Floormate. Works great-you can use soap (a drop) and water with it but for best results use the hoover cleane
Very comfortable!. Feels great! Never thought a sheet would make me sleep so much better.
A fabulous burrow bed!. I'm EXTREMELY pleased with this bed, so much so that we ordered a second one (as we have a large house).  We have a little three-pound chihuahua, Pip.  The minute he saw this bed, he climbed in and made himself at home.  He loves to go inside to rest and just have a little sanctuary away from the "busy world."  The bed is very light weight and easy to tote around from room to room.  The top is very soft and collapses down to serve as a cover for your pet.  It's so snuggly and warm.  My only regret is that I'm not small enough or I'd crawl in and burrow down with Pip, too
Homemaker. This is the best mixer I have ever owned and I have been a Homemaker for 40 years.  I love the many different speeds.  It has a build in timer so you know how long you have been using it at that speed.  It has a retractable cord so it doesn't get all twisted and tangled when stored.  It whips up great mashed potatoes.  You can tell I really love it
Great product!. This Cuisinart Griddler is great! I've had it for about 3 months now and I use it almost every day. As a single man I need to be able to make quick and easy meals. I use my Griddler primarily as a Panini press. Now, every sandwich I make is grilled on my press. It makes a world of difference. It's a GREAT buy
Like the festive colors.. Enjoy the different colors, able to mix and match to suit moods or food being served. They seem to wear well and be chip resistant. The only downside for me is that one of the Cinnabar plates came with an "etched" scratch mark on it. Not sure if it was from manufacturing. It is only slightly visible. They are "standard size" dinner plates. At times, wish they were just a little bit bigger. Otherwise, so far quite happy with them and they can always be replaced..
Great transaction!. Smooth transaction!  I got my order very quickly!  I would buy from again
so simple it's ridiculous. I have owned several different espresso makers from krups to capresso to nespresso. I have also had a capresso frother which I had to return because it didn't work. While I have enjoyed the coffee, I have always been "frothingly" challenged- except on the lower end krups- a fact  I find mildly interesting. Anyway, this aeroccino is so simple as to make you wonder and the froth is perfect, as is the steamed milk. So far I have not run into the problems of it shorting out and neither has a friend who has also purchased one, but I am glad to know they will replace it. The greatest thing since sliced bread for the  consumer who likes gadgets and is willing to pay for the
Oops... Bleach apparently does not ruin these as I found out this week when I was washing other sheets and this happened to get mixed up in a white sheet.Instead, my Haze sham turned the most beautiful "pink." That is OK, but now I have to order additional shams. So, if you want to redecorate for Spring, you can always bleach the Haze color.These do take slightly longer to dry and I ended up putting them back in the dryer for a few minutes even when the dryer cycle was complete. That is if you dry them along withthe duvet or sheets.The softness of this product takes you to new levels of comforting warmth. The preshrunk cotton has been brushed to maximum softness. The quality seems superior for the price.The Wamsutta Flannel is velvety and brushed on both sides for comfort.~The Rebecca Revie
IT'S THE CATS MEOW!!. We have 14  wonderful felines, only two are strictly inside, and two are inside outside, the rest like to stay outside. The inside and inside out cats love their gym and so does thier "Mom" the cats have a full size condo/gym inside (and the outside cats have a  full size cat condo/gym in the garage) . I bought the cat gym because of the size, I wanted something smaller to have down stairs and this worked perfectly. I have had to reassemble a few times due to thier  playing  quite vigorously, knocking it over and just plain  knocking things apart, but it is  simple to put together .They have a  ball on this little gym and have brought us much entertainment with thier antics.  For the price I feel it is wise purchase, especially for inside only cats.It appears to be made of a PVC type of tubing, very strong one would have to  hit it pretty hard to break the parts. after playing they curl up inside and  on top of the gym and take naps. It comes with two toys that you attach and I added a couple more of my own. Overall I think it is a great  form of exercise and the cats really have fun.The veternarians I work with have purchased these also
Sharp R-820JS .9-Cubic Foot Grill 2 Convection Microwave, Silver. Great all around microwave for singles. The only thing it does not do well is microwave popcorn
Fabulous. I really love this whole line.  I made Cuban Sandwiches with mine and was really pleased with how they turnes out.  I am also big on the aesthetic look of my cookware along with functionality, and this line offers both aspects at an incredibly reasonable price
1100 WATT MICROWAVE OVEN. SO FAR THIS PRODUCT IS WORKING FINE, HAS PLENTY OF POWER. HEATS FOOD IN A FLASH. VERY GOOD QUALITY FOR THE PRICE I PAID FOR I
Amazon rules!. I am very happy with my new Hamilton Beach Blender.  The price was attractive, and your service is great!  I received my product in a couple days, it was well packaged, and I am very pleased with it.  Thank you, Amazon.com!  Keep up the good work
Happy Time for Families. The waffler works great. Effective for those who multi-task. The bell reminds me when to add batter or when I must remove a waffle.  The box mixes come out o.k. but more tough. The yeast recipe tastes "yeasty". I recommend a recipe with whipped whites, lemon juice and cornstarch for lightness. Freeze well.....Add a little more sugar and vanilla for kid friendly waffles. A great way to wake up kids in the morning on a busy day
Great item..... This item is a "must have" !!  It's light weight, and cleans well. I love it
PERFECTING FOR PERFECTIONIST IN HER PERFECT BED ROOM. I just got mine today, loved it, bought 5 more in different sized. What I loved about was the sense of freshness and cleanness in the fact this covers up ENTIRE pillow in easy slip, then seal it tight with a zipper. When you rest your head on the pillows. (I have Standard, Queen, King, sizes, plus Memory Foam pillow), not only it fits, but also its soooo comfortable unlike any other Allergen Barrier cover that is noisy, and bulky. I am not set for the ENTIRE house bed rooms. PERFECT cover! Are you a Perfectionist? I am not.
Vaccum Review. Overall, it was a good choice.   It 's got great suction and I like the fact that there are no bags.  The only negative is that it is rather heavy and difficult to carry up and down stairs.  Otherwise, it's a great choice
"More than adequate for the price". I was downsizing when I purchased this microwave--both in size and in heat content. My biggest satisfaction with this product was that it fit the small space that had been created in my kitchen cabinet design for a microwave. My second goal had been to have an all-white product, which is hard to find in today's black or stainless appliance kitchens. I have no complaints about the heating quality or the control choices. My only reminder of a lesser-product is that the door makes the sound a metal door will make, when it is opened or closed. But this product is more than adequate for the price
Cosco jumbo stool. This is a sturdy and attractive stool, excellent for seating while working in the kitchen, as well as for getting to the out of reach cabinet shelves.
Nice!. It's great for the price.  So far so good.  Heats water fast, light weight
For Kittens of All Ages. Do you have a kitten?  Or perhaps a cat that THINKS he's a kitten even though his whiskers are turning gray?This IS the toy for you!  I not only own it, I have given it as a gift.I have seven cats and not only do they play on this Tree, they sleep on it and most importantly, they sharpen their claws on it, thereby saving me the hassle of clawed furniture.The one I own is now three years old and has held up well.  It looks like a well-beloved baby blanket, but it is still intact.The price is very reasonable, compared to other cat climbing/playing structures I've seen and if you need to store it, it is easily moved from one room to another.But don't be surprised when Kitty sees it in the new room and starts actinglike it's a brand new toy!Oh, are you wondering about any negative aspects to the Claw Pals Cat Tree? There is only one.My 24-pound cat tips it over.  :
Nice looking but not rugged. A nice looking product,great for cutting soft foods like bananas but for serious kitchen use this board falls short- it's prone to slipping down under heavier use
Nice dish. Works great and the handle on top is a much needed feature.  My old butter dish (not fiestaware)did not have one of these and that is how it broke by being dropped
Was skeptical, but not anymore!. I was worried that these collars would somehow allow them to choke because they don't "break away", they open. I thought that maybe they wouldn't open or maybe the ring would get caught, but so far they haven't. With other break away collars, my cats would maybe have them on for 1-2 days and then they would be lost to the woods never to be found again. They have had these for almost a week and they have not lost them yet nor have they snagged or loosened at all. Plus the cats can't get them off like they could the other break away collars and it's so small in width that it hasn't matted there hair. A wonderful product and I would definitely reccommend to anyone who has a problem keeping collars on their cats. At a couple of bucks a piece, you can't beat it.
Large,  Big, or huge Pot?. Make sure you really understand the size of this pot before ordering, I mean this thing is huge. Said that, I like it all arround, heats even, handles maintain reasonably warm (not hot), nice the see through lid, and overall it looks very professional
So far, so good!. I've got two little ones, a 2 year old boy, and a 3 year old girl.  My first worry after reading many of the reviews was that most who seemed to be having success had cats under a year old.  Well I'm about 3 weeks in, and so far they are adapting nicely.The instructions in the kit stated to put the litterbox by the toilet for a week, then just take it away and put the Citikitty kit on the toilet.  Well after a day of some panicked looks and panicked meowing, I decided to take a step back.  I put the thing on the floor and started raising it a few inches every few days.  I'm happy to say that we just graduated to putting it straight on the toilet!  I'm taking much longer than the kit recommends at each step, as I am very determined to make this work, so I'm sure they appreciate that as well.Downside: My bathroom has never looked worse...there is litter flung and tracked EVERYWHERE.  But I would go through that for a year if I had to in order to ensure the next 15 years would be litter free!  Another downside is, as others have stated, there is no going back in steps ones the holes are punched.  I think I will be cutting my own much more gradually than the perforated ones.I think the holepunching process is what will make or break this deal!  But as I said, I'll go as slow as I have to.  I'll check back in a few weeks with an update
77 stitches?. I received my new sewing machine and love the way it works.  I am not in love with the confusing directions on the sewing stitch functions.  To the best of my knowledge I really only have 35 stitches possible.  There is no customer service number on my manual to talk to someone live and has led to frustration.  Ultimately, I still love the way the machine performs, with or without the other 30+ stitches
I love this little salt server!. When I was looking, I found it hard to find something that was small and attractive.  Most are way too large for my kitchen and my needs.  This one looks great and holds just a small amount of my course sea salt; it is perfect
Perfect toast!!! What more could you ask for?. This toaster is everything I was hoping for. It was well priced for a dualit product, looks great in my kitchen and makes perfect toast every time, in a timely manner
An excellent  lightweight  vacuum. I didn't expect this vacuum to be as economical as it turned out.It's lightweight and has a powerful motor.  Picks up dog hair well and cleans carpets deeply.  I have combination wood floors with area rugs and the floor or carpet settings are easy to switch back and forth.  The cup holder for dirt and dust cleans without fuss and so does the filter. This nicely designed appliance makes vacuuming easy
Best money I've spent for the kitchen in years. I have owned a variety of cookware from cast-iron skillets to fancy-name porcelain pots.  Almost all have frustrated me to some extent, but to be fair, I am not a "light-handed" chef in the kitchen.  I thought long and hard about how to get the best value for replacements out of a limited budget.  I dreamed of big-dollar brands made from stainless or copper, but I had to be reasonable.  One day in desperate need for a new Teflon skillet, I noticed a Farberware Millennium non-stick on sale at a local shop, and I liked the feel of it.  I took it home and liked it enough to buy an omelet pan a few weeks later.  A year-plus on, I needed a more comprehensive rennovation of my cookware, and my experience and research led me to this stainless Millenium set.  I couldn't be happier with my purchase.  The feel is substantial but not too heavy for slinging around the kitchen.  Soft-Touch eases the burden, too.  It heats extremely well -- quickly and evenly -- on my electric stove.  I handwash the new set, but even my Teflon Millennium pans look pretty darned good after repeated dishwasher cycles in hard water.  For new and experienced cooks on a budget, I strongly recommend the Millennium stainless
Chopped ice and a conversation piece. Since we do not have a through the door ice dispenser with an automatic ice crusher, yet had a "pressing" need for crushed ice for our Mojitos I began a quest for a sturdy and effective ice crusher.  After trying several of the plastic ones out there I found this one and am happy with it.The price was right, it looks good sitting on my bar shelf and, most importantly, it chops ice well.  It is a little smaller than I expected but the hopper holds enough of my freezer's "half moon" cubes to fill a drink glass.If you are looking to crush ice for a food platter this is not your machine due to volume.  It does require a bit of strength but jams are easily overcome by turning the crank in the opposite direction.One warning, the handle comes very close to the base so you do have to be careful not to catch a knuckle at the bottom of a turn
Fantastic dishes!. Love these dishes - my family has them at our summer cottage (original ones of course) and that I can buy the reissues for my house, and at such a great price, is fantastic.Great prices - and no problems with the shipping
Great Knives. These knives have a good feel to them.  They are very sharp and I expect they will last a long time.  Okay the packaging was a little cheep looking, but that has already been thrown away.I give the knife set 5 Stars
Good product, Good Value. This is a significant improvement over the 750 model. The 750 model was not very well designed. The first one we purchased broke within 3 days because the blade came up and hit the plastic. We returned this. We got the 760 to replace that. The 760 has been redesigned to avoid this problem. For the same price as the 750, the 760 comes with one extra bowl,  juicer and egg whisk. Compared with others like the Cuisinart and we determined that this was much better constructed.
Great Sleep. These pillows are the best. They are so soft, give great head support. For the first time in years I did not wake up with neck pain from lack of support.
Excellent-. I have owned a cuisinart stock pot for several years and use it all the time. One can not beat the sear that a stainless pot provides.  The new set is just as good. I have been using the stainless more and more and the hard anodized that it replaces less and less.  (There is a reason that the cooking show chefs all use stainless).  Just remember to use a lower heat than you normally do since these pans seem to heat up faster and hotter
Very Pleased. I was very pleased with this product. I gave them as a present. The only reason I did not give a five star is because I ordered three sets and one set was chipped and scratched up. However, the return process was excellent. It was just aggrevating that I was giving it as a gift and had to go through the return process. But the product itself was perfect for what I was looking for
Hoover FloorMate. Overall, the unit is very good.  However, the newer model has spinning brushes which makes cleaning a breeze.  This one takes a little elbow grease but definitely does the job
It works!. I used the Zorb in high traffic area. It removes dirt and the carpet looks new after Zorb cleaning. I applies twice a year on the high traffic area like the stair and it keeps the high traffic area as good as the rest of the carpet.
Stoneware Casserole. This is a high-fired stoneware casserole. Its non-porous enamel is same as on iron cast pots by Le Creuset and it looks great.  Because it is stoneware, it can be put in a freezer and then microwaved. Though it's excellent for baking and can be brought to the table for serving as well, I give it only four stars because it's not unique in its baking qualities and I can get same results in Corning casserole for a fraction of a price.  As for cast iron Dutch ovens, I didn't find substitutes so far
Powerful fan!. This fan is so powerful. Even on low, it is impressive. Easy assembly, feels sturdy, and I love the remote and timer. The only cons are that you can't control the oscillation by remote and it is loud. I would recommend this fan to anyone.
good. I wish they were a little bigger, but i like that they are stackable and come with the organizer.  it was worth the money
For the Price - Great. I used it with a duvet, and find it very light and comfy.Others complain about its crinkly noise.I find the crinkly noise very pleasant.For $20 you can't go wrong
The DTC 975 is the best coffee maker we ever owned!. Read this if you are a serious coffee drinker like us! We have been buying, using and tossing out coffee makers for the past 45 years. We have used every type known; percolaters, presses, Melita gravity cones, and etc. This coffee maker is the best! This Cuisinart is a cinch to use and the coffee tastes great. This is my second one. the first one is still cranking out good coffee after over five years of daily use. We purchased the new Cuisinart so that we could put the old Cuisinart on our motorhome permanently for use whenever we travel.The thermal carafe keeps the coffee hot and tasty for hours. The carafe is rugged stainless steel in and out. I thought that it may not keep the coffee hot long enough because of the thermal transmission of steel vs. glass. (our old one has a glass vacuum bottle inside.) Not so! It works great. We always pre-heat by rinsing the carafe with a little hot water before we start. Some people commented that the carafe lid is difficult to screw on. This takes a little gentle technique development. After about two patient attemps it becomes second nature. We run a little warm water over the lid. That helps the threads to slip into place. Be sure to turn the lid until it stops at its limit. Its easy. The gravity actuated "ball check" valve in the lid is ingenious. It automatically closes when you stop pouring and set the carafe down. When you want to pour, you just tilt the carafe. Gravity works on the ball check. The valve opens instantly and automatically. How clever is that? Nothing to twist, no clumsy levers to push as in the abominable Mr. Coffee thermal unit. The Cuisinart simply works great!Regarding one reviewer's comment about the possibility of overflow, the subsequent mess and bail valve clogging with grounds: I experienced this only once. I think the cause was that (1). I  overfilled the bail with too much coffee. (2). I used a very heavy paper filter. (3). I had ground the coffee too finely in our home grinder. As a result of all three factors, the coffee could not drip through as fast as the boiler was feeding hot water into the bail. 'Nuff said.Controls are simple. The front control and viewing screen location is more convenient than our old one which has a side mounted switch. The clock is a handy feature but, we have never used the pre-setting timer. The water fill measuring tube works perfectly. We use reverse osmosis purified water so we do not need to clean the unit very often and of course, the coffee tastes better.The black color with the stainless carafe and trim is a handsome combination. However, more importantly, the carafe lid does not show coffee colored staining over time as the white colored unit does.I recommend this coffeemaker to everyone who loves good coffee!
wonderful product. I purchased this for my little yorkshire terrier to stay in when we all leave the house to go to work.  Its wonderful.  It is the perfect size and doesnt take up alot of room. My little dog likes to jump up and stand against the walls of this product and they dont fall or shake so it is very sturdy yet very light.  It took me a minute to assemble the product and the little door makes it so great we leave it open and my little dog goes in and comes out when he wants.  This is a great buy and cheap too
A little linty, but nice overall. Very good deal on the pair of towels.  They shed after the first couple of washes, but I'm still glad I bought them.
Refurbished Eureka R5892A Boss Upright Vacuum. I took a chance on purchasing a "refurb", and I'm glad I did. I had read the reviews for this particular vacuum cleaner, and decided that I wanted it to replace my old upright Shark that died. I'm extremely pleased with this product. It is by far the best cleaning tool I've ever owned
A gift of Chicago Cutlery. I actually purchased the Chicago Cutlery set for my daughter who had a set of knives (serrated edges) that were never sharp and couldn't easily be sharpened.  I was given Chicago Cutlery and the wooden block with sharpener as a gift and have been using them and sharpening them successfully for 18 years. They still look as good as new also
Good espresso. Had the machine for 1 month now. Will be back in 6 months to rate any reliability aspects.It makes great espresso , all Crema. Works equally well with pods and powder. Coffee powder container has a locking feature to help dispose of used powder without loosing the powder cup.Water container needs to go under pump hose so attention needed when placing it on the machine, not bad though.Temperature meter works well. I have not tried cappucino drinks, but looks straightforward.This machine is beautiful, form and function all the way
Superrrrrrrrrrr!!!!!!!. This was a great price and a great quality product I put these in the back yard just under the overhang of the porch roof and you would be amazed on how much light you get its perfect I bought two and it puts out plenty on light a real nice mood and atmosphere around the pool area.  From a Very Happy Customer
Best foil cutter ever!. This is a nifty little gadget. Is a magnet on the fridge so is always easy to find. Cuts foil off instantly
Works for me!. I have 2 cats and they are 8 months now. I started them on the citty kitty about 2 months prior and so far its great. I was fortunate to have already placed their litter boxes in the bathroom so drawing them from that to the toilet was easy. For my cats it seems they follow the litter. They also love to [...] on fresh litter especially after I cleaned and replaced it =-). I bought 2 training cats for the 2 toilets I have in my house and they use both of them well. Once I placed the kits on the toilets and poured fresh litter on it they were ready to use it. I am on the last 3 rings and am confident they will have no problems. It looks like now they are working their aim (into the actual toilet) and scraping as much litter in the hole.The only thing I suggest is if your cat likes a clean litter ensure you clean the kit daily. My male cat got pist one time and pee'd in the corner of the bathroom. Thats the only time any of them made "mistakes".Punching holes can be a mess too. Suggest getting disposable gloves. Also sometimes your cat may miss or splatter or what have you. I bought a bunch of those cleaning wipes for the bathroom so that before anyone uses the toilet they can wipe off any excess litter or splashes and toss it in the toilet. Lastly learn your kitty's bathroom routine. Last thing you need is both of you showing up at the bathroom ready to go
Very good but one big flaw. I like this spatula I do, but if you are working with dough it is useless. The spatula end is detachable--which I recommend when washing because bits of food can get stuck in the seam and inside the spatula tip. I use it all the time.However with doughy mixes it is useless and I go back to the old wooden one. The spatula tip just comes off and gets stuck in dough. If it was one solid mold with no chance of detaching I would give it five stars.
nice cup. This is a nice cup. The top was easy to get off once I figured out it unscrews. I'd give it 5 stars if it was dishwasher safe, but it keeps coffee nice and hot and isn't tippy, so I am darn happy with it
Really Works!. I have to admit, I didn't think this thing would work, but I bought it for my Mother who has smokers living next door and it was smelling up her condo.  After plugging this thing in, the odor went away.  AMAZING!  After three weeks of operating it, the blades were black.  When I wiped them clean the towel smelled of smoke amongst other things.  I'd definitely refer others to it
Allows my razor to perform as good as new. This product is an exact replacement for the cell pack in my Norelco 6885XL electric razor.  Replacement was a breeze and once charged, the new cell pack has provided excellent performance and long life between charges, just like when the razor was new
Yum, Yum... I had purchased an ice cream maker some years ago and was disappointed in the quality of the plastic parts on the machine. In fact, the lid broke after only 3 uses.  This model has very sturdy plastic parts that are easy to clean and with proper care I anticipate will last a lifetime.Be sure to completely dry the freezer bowl after using and then pop it right back into the freezer wrapped in an airtight plastic bag.  That way you'll have the bowl ready for those times you just have to have ice cream.  I've made many lower-fat versions using skim milk and fat-free half and half and my family loves it
Good Value. Heats well and quiet.  Does not blow heat very forcefully but certainly warms sufficiently given enough time using the oscillation function.  Appears solidly built with good warranty
10-inch Skillet Lid. I am completely satisfied with this quality product and the prompt delivery
Crispy Cheesy Pizza!. My husband bought this pizza stone and a peeler about 6 months ago and we have had pizza almost once a week ever since.  The pizza has been crispy and cheesy and delicious.  In the neighborhood that we live in the pizza is excellent, but homemade is really the best.  I strongly recommend this pizza stone to anyone who loves pizza.
Great. I love this heater.  It has several safety and convenience features.  I actually couldn't figure out how to get it working though, a co-worker helped.  The instructions weren't well written.  However, there is an 800 number on the bottom for customer serice.  I would strongly recommend.  It's a great value.
Amazing knives!. I bought theese knifves to start out my first kitchen, I can't belive how amazing they are. Usally i struggled with my parents old knives just to cut things like tomatoes. With theese knives I am able to slice tomatoes effortlessly. Dicing things like garlic and onions is a task I usued to leave for the food processor, but belive me you feel like a professional chef they way you can run these knifes through foods. WARNING: They will make you want to cook more than you do now!
Totally silent!. I love this filter! It keeps the water pristine and more importantly it is easy to assemble and clean thanks to the included double tap valves and media basket.Silence was a key buying point for me as it was purchased for an aquarium in my bedroom. This filter is absolutely silent. So silent that I can now hear the hum of my fluorescent aquarium lights
Cool. This is a excellent product..  as described very easy to incert and position...  haven't checked the weight capability.. not disappointed
Really nice pizza cutter. This cutter is good and heavy, cuts cleanly without dragging, and washes easily in the dishwasher
simple for one. Bought as a gift for my Mom who is not tecnically blessed.  She found it simple to use.  For her liking the water did not get hot enough so we found starting with hot tap water and the cup of coffee was steaming hot to her complete satisfaction
Nice Item. Overall this is a very nice item. I have been using it to make Mojitos and it works wonderfully. The only negative thing I have to say about it is the handle could be longer.
Wish I bought this years ago!!. Because of the expense I thought about whether or not I should buy the Steampress or just use the old-fashioned method of ironing.  I've had the Steampress about 1-1/2 months now and it's great.  I can iron men's shirts inless than a minute, pants in 30 seconds with beautiful creases.  I also leave it set up in our den so it's easy to get to and turn on and off.  I never have to use the old-fashioned ironing board, iron, etc.
Richell 94118 Richell One-Touch Adjustable Pet Gate with Wood Finish. Good gate and the wood finish looks well with house decor. Easy to use with one hand. A little hard to install in doorway and the piece at the bottom can cause a tripping hazard. Would be better if the bottom rail was lower profile or if the bottom was wider and angled on both sides as a ramp so that you don't trip over it. We have all hit our toes and tripped going through this door. You will trip or hit your foot if you do not go slow and raise your feet
Thank you, Bionaire.... Our house has a very damp basement and to combat that we purchased a Bionaire BDQ 24 about a year and a half ago and it worked just dandy until a little over a week ago when all of a sudden it simply stopped pulling in any moisture. Just like that. Fan still spins when you power it up, but no moisture collects in the reservoir. From what I've gleaned in the past week about the workings of dehumidifiers over the internet, the 'compressor' on the unit must have bugged out.Well...I phoned Bionaire's customer service line and they offered to immediately replace my defective BDQ 24 with this model the BDQ 25 as the BDQ 24 was out of stock and wouldn't be available until November. November?!A few days later, the UPS trcuk arrives with our new dehumidifier.This model looks a lot like the model 24 only it's bigger--it is very elegantly designed (for a dehumidifier) and so far it seems to work just great, pulling in pint after pint of H-2-O.Here's the rub: I must dock this product ONE STAR because it is Extremely NOISY!! By 'noisy' I don't mean refrigerator noisy. I am talking jumbo jet taking off in your living room noisy. It is one LOUD MUTHA!I have no idea how Bionaire feels they can get away with referring to this machine as 'Quie-tech'. But it works.I just hope they fixed the bugs with the faulty compressor in this model. Time will tell with regard to that issue. Anyway it does have a 2 year warranty.Oh. And that wireless indicator is junk. Synched it up with the unit and then all it did was beep. Wife made me yank out the batteries. Very annoying.--Bil
very functional even for the rice-challenged. I bought a rice cooker because I have never been able to make decent rice in a pot (yes, I know it's been done for centuries and is supposed to be so easy).  This rice cooker is exactly what I expected (perfection) in all but two ways:  1)you can make up to 10 cups of rice, but not less than 3.  I didn't realize that when I bought it.  I have occasionally made a lot more rice than I needed.  2) depending on the rice, sometimes the bottom layer of rice gets a little too much heat (i.e. crispy).  This doesn't happen with Japanese rice, which is my favorite.  It does happen with cheap rice.  It hasn't been that big of a deal -- compared to undercooked or overcooked rice, these are minor things
Best purchase ever. This vacuum has exceeded my hopes and all at a great price!
VillaWare V3200 Classic Belgian Waffler - Round. Great product, the tone of the beep is a bit annoying but it is very functional - lets you know when to pour the batter & when the waffle is ready to be served.  We have found a mix called Krusteaz is very easy & tasty.
Makes a nice gift. Very good quality blown glass.  Although I found out that the ball top that's shown in the picture didn't come with the decanter.  Either false advertisement or Amazon messed up
Chef's Choice M130 Knife Sharpener. This item was rated tops by Cooks Illustrated.  My 10 year old Henckel Knives are now the way there were the first day I bought them and the edges hold use after use.  They are razor sharp. I love the result
great!. I bought these to replace an old pair that had lost their "edge" and was pleasantly suprised at how sharp these were.  Nice to handle and fit perfectly into the Henckels knife block I already own
Fantastic!. Bought this item to keep the neighbors cats out of my garden-it works great. Those little felines take one step in my flower bed and are blasted with water.  Never see more than 2 sets of footprints-one in-one out.  I am thinking about buying another one for another part of my garden
Don't buy this poster if you want to sleep at night. O.K., buy this poster if you like spooky things but don't say you were not warned. You are in luck this is a two sided poster so you can always turn it around.This is a good poster for both movie poster collectors and those familiar with the books. The movie encompasses several of the first books of the series. And the poster is indicative of both.You will need room to display this 27 x 40 poster. I suggest getting a side panel from a refrigerator delivery box. Placing it in a poster frame will prevent it from getting any bite marks.
Great press and slicer. I bought this same press from Williams and Sonoma. I really love the slicer part of it, had never seen that before. Great to have options with how fine/course you want your garlic. And the brush that attaches right into the handle makes for an easier cleanup. It is a heavy weight and I think will be around for quite a while. Good product
New religious collar!. What can I say about this collar? That it works, miracles.It's one piece, instead of a box that hangs off of a regular nylon collar, ensuring contact. It also has a right fit test to make sure it's doing it's job. It's waterproof, even allowing the dog to swim with it on. No, on/off buttons on the collar itself, it turns on/off like a tv remote. Using the remote, which comes with a lanyard, you can be far from your dog, which is let's face it, when they tend to misbehave anyway.There is 9 levels, and a boost that let's you up it by 2 for that moment. There is also a timeout safety feature in case you hold the button down for 10 seconds or longer. The best part is the tone button. The manual says you can use it for a reward or warning, just not the two. That would just confuse Fido. My dog learned quickly that the tone means a warning. That way, if I press that button, she acknowledges it, and stops the behavior straight away. This also means there's no correction after awhile, since the dog learns what comes after the tone. Unless you use it for a reward sound. Then I guess it's more like clicker training.So, why is it the new religious collar?Because it makes a believer out of the dog. And, since the dog sees the behavior as getting a correction, and not you giving it, it seems to make training quicker. Because of course you don't want your dog afraid of you.Now, I know there are people who think it's inhumane to use a collar like this. Personally we tried the citronella collar, and I wish I'd saved my money. It didn't do squat for our Doberman. I think this collar is more humane than having a dog put down, which is exactly what people do when they find they can't handle their unruly, aggressive dogs
Love my BROTHER!. I have been sold on Brother for years and this machine is no exception!  I purchased this machine just before Christmas 2006 and have been having a ball with it.  It is SO easy to use.  I know I will want to eventually 'upgrade' to an even nicer machine with even more bells and whistles some day....by Brother, of course!
Bold, large and beautiful!. These bowls were everything I hoped they would be...they are a beautiful, bold red colorThe bowls are about 4 1/2 inches across the top and almost 3 1/2 inches deep - so they hold a large serving of soup or chili.I love the shape of the bowls - not too wide, but deep - something you can hold in one hand (easy to drink out of also!
The last knife block you will need to buy!!. This is the biggest knife block I could find and I love it.  It is very well made, stable, and well designed (knife positions).  Many other large blocks have the cleaver slot at the very top, even thought most cleavers are only 6 inches long while chef's knives are up to 14 inches.  This block also fits many knives into a relatively small space.  I have had blocks that only hold 10 or so knives and this one is not that much bigger.  The only competition for this block is the Henckel 22 slot-block (with the cleaver on top) and the chef knife slots are not wide enough to hold serious chef knives (read the reviews for yourself).My only complaint for this block (so really a 4.5 rating) is that it has slots for 5 paring knives.  Who needs 5 little knives?  This is a serious block for serious cooks who generally use larger knives, so I feel that 3 little slots would be sufficient.  After all, a little knife can fit in a large slot, but not the other way around.  I have modified mine a bit to hold more large knives, but everyone likes different knives.The only thing better than this block is finding the knives to fill it with
peace of mind. i dont do a lot of bread making but i am an avid meat smoker and griller. the taylor classic roast-yeast thermometer has taken the stress out of preparing a feast for my guests. i have tried more expensive thermometers but some read out an obvious wrong temperature and others are very difficult to read. the taylor thermometer solves both problems! whether you do most of your cooking outdoors or in your kitchen this thermometer will give you peace of mind. well worth the price and ships fast
Great Starter Yanagiba!. I recently began working in a Sushi Bar, where I was required to invest in my own knives.  I wanted a good knife but didn't want to pay an exorbitant amount.  Some Yanagiba and other sushi knives can cost upwards of $1000 a piece! I purchased this 10.5" Bunmei Yanagiba Knife and have found it exceeded my expectations.  The blade is constantly exposed to moisture from fish, vegetables, fruit, and cleaning, and is rust free thus far.  It's easy to care for, and holds a great edge.I use this yanagiba mainly for slicing sashimi and sushi rolls.  It cuts effortlessly through most things and the grip is comfortable, even when my hands are wet.   As a bonus it arrived with a mean factory edge!  I didn't even have to pre-sharpen it and haven't had to sharpen it once after a week of moderate to heavy use.  Highly recommended for starters who've never worked with Japanese cutlery before
works wonders. This product truly works wonders... No it doesn't harm your animal in any way.. The only slight down-side is, at least my dog does this, the animal learns to bark soft enough that the collar won't spray.
Great heavy lasagna pan. This is a great looking 9x13 pan with good proportions.  It is really deep and makes a great tall lasagna.  It is extremely heavy when fully loaded with a lasagna.  Its bulk gives it even cooking in the oven, but can be difficult to get out of the oven after your lasagna is done.  I have made many other things in this pan with great results.  It is fairly non-stick and has not stained even after several lasagnas.  The enamel is fairly bulletproof.Overall I really like this pan, with its only weakness being heft.  However, that heft is put to good use in very even cooking and keeping the lasagna warm at the table.You won't be disappointed
Great design, compact and handy. It seems I've spent years trying to find the "perfect" teakettle. Something that would give an good honest, audible whistle when boiling, then allow one to pour the steaming hot water without having to put a hand anywhere near the spout.That didn't seem like much to ask, but we had a heck of a time finding such a thing. We found some that were close, but which you can fill only through the spout. It seems to me that one should have a lid on a pot like this, to be able to get inside and clean it, inspect for damage or wear, or whatever.And suddenly, we came across this one. On Amazon there was a 4-cup version, and two 8-cup versions. There is one with a copper bottom to resemble the traditional Revereware look, but after looking at the pictures, we bought the one that is pure stainless steel top to bottom.The entire top of the pot is a non-shiny plastic of some kind -- one of those new space-age materials that does not get as hot as metal or some other materials. The designers at Revere should be commended for making a total break with tradition so they could create a pot that is so practical. The lid on top is not centered beneath the handle, which means you can reach inside, or fill it, more easily than in the typical pot where the handle gets in the way.The handle is very well balanced and the "trigger" to open the spout is well-positioned. You can hold the spout partly open, or pull it completely open, at which point the trigger "locks" it in the open position. This saves a lot of finger fatigue when pouring multiple cups of tea, or whatever.To close it, one simply pushes forward on the back of the trigger. You don't need the instructions, although they are included. When you pick this thing up to pour with it, it feels totally natural in your hand, and you figure it out instinctively. It's great.The spout has a slight diagonal "crease" in its tip for drip-free pouring, which is just another thoughtful feature in an overall thoughtful and original design.We chose the larger size mostly to be able to serve more than a couple of people at a time if we should have company. And we're glad we made that choice, because honestly the 8-cup version looks small compared to our old kettle. The other one was more rounded and perhaps a larger capacity. I haven't measured the capacity of the Revere model, as I'm not that obsessed with it, and I'm sure it will suit our needs. I suspect that the compact appearance is most likely a function of efficient design.This is one of those purchases that, in its own small way, makes every day better by improving a small task that one does frequently. Of course it's far too early to tell how it will stand up to long use, but we're quite satisfied with ours and expect it to be a pleasure for a long time
These HEPA replacement filters also fit the Hamilton Beach Air Cleaner Model 04150. Although it doesn't mention it, these HEPA replacement filters also fit the Hamilton Beach Air Cleaner Model 04150. I had to email Hamilton Beach to find out, but they were very helpful and responded right away. When the filters arrived from Amazon, I saw that on the box it says "Fits Models 04160, 04161 & 04150."With our cat and houseful of antiques, we always seem to have dust bunnies floating around. I run this model in our office, under the table which holds the computer. Since placing it there I have noticed the buildup of dust around the modem is almost entirely eliminated. I placed the larger model in our living room and it certainly is doing its job. The regular settings can be louder than expected, but I leave them on the "whisper quiet" setting when we're in that room and I don't even notice them being on. I would definitley recommend the Hamilton Beach air cleaners
great tray. The ice cubes come out intact - not chipped or cracked.  To get them out, push each cube from the bottom with your finger.For fastest and easiest results, wait for 5 minutes after taking the tray out of the freezer. This way, the ice cubes will pop right out. If you don't wait, your fingertip will be freezing while trying to push them out
wine glasses. product came in great shape, flawless and factory new,  and in less shipping time than anticipated
An excellent knife for everyday use. I received this Henckels Santoku knife as a graduation present, along with a full set of Pro S knives, when I graduated from Culinary School. I had done a lot of research about different brands of knives and felt that the Henckels Pro S series was the best for me. The grip is not cheap and I love the weight of the knife in my hand. And the santoku knife is excellent. I have been using it almost everyday for 4 years. It has replaced my chef's knife as my primary knife and I now use it for simple tasks like cutting up vegetables such as onions and potatoes. And I also use it for more difficult tasks such as cutting up a chicken. This is a great knife that with proper care and sharpening will last for many years
Melita black manual cofeemaker. No muss no fuss no noise in the time it takes to boil the water I can have a perfect great tasting cup of cofee! Nothing to break down easy to clean
The Best. I received this Le Creuset 4-1/2-Quart Round French Oven as a birthday gift and it is perfect in every way. I cannot recommend enough the overall quality of le Creuset products. They are also very attractive and add enjoyment to all forms of cooking. This particular 4-1/2-Quart Round French Oven is a great size and shape and can be used for a variety of things. It also fits perfectly upon the le Creuset trivet. Other products of similar quality you might try are Global knives and Cuisinart appliances. You won't be disappointed
Why spend Hundreds of Dollars???. I admit I'm a vacuum cleaner fanatic, if there is such thing. But we have  a cat and my wife has asthma. We have had two Dirt Devil bagless vacs for several years. They did a good job but I couldn't stand having to bang the filters to clean them.I did a bit of "window" shopping and decided to try this Bissell. It didn't take long to convince me this is a super buy. The amount of material this picked up, even though I had used the Dirt Devils within the past few days, was amazing. I was even motivated to used the attachments and vacuum under the bed!!Emptying is a snap and the dirt cup can then be rinsed off. Great!I can't imagine that a Dyson, for 4-5 times the price, can do any better!I was also surprised at how easy this machine is to maneuver. It just glides around the carpets
Love it!. Granted, it is a bit noisy at first (more like a shocking sound, not so much noisy), but you get used to it.  The mixing and matching of different drinks takes some skill, especially if you've never used any of the larger office machines.  This was a complete first for me.  I mixed a few, watered a few too many in my attempts at different mug sizes, but I got the hang of it and love it.  I commute to work and no longer stop to get my coffe each moring at $2 to $3 a cup, so there's a huge savings in this product.  And the tea is the best I've ever had.  They actually add juice concentrates in the pack (some selections), so the tea is very flavorable.  The machine itself was a little odd as far as trying to place it on the counter, but I think that is the case with just about any new appliance you bring into your home.  It will always stick out at first.  I bought black and it looks great.  There really isn't any cleanup at all.  Other machines I looked at in the store seemed a little trickier to use or had sharp needles poking out to pop packages and stange buttons.  This really is so simple.  Finding a place to store the coffee is a differnet matter.  Because the packs are bigger than most pods, it is a challenge.  I ended up with mine in a basket in my pantry.  The round display rack that Flavia offers looks pretty neat.  I will definately buy that.  Over all, it's a perfect product in my opinion
Not a great serving platter. I purchased this item because the description said it would make a great serving platter as well as a casserole.  However, when I received it the sides were definitely too high to make this a platter - it would have looked exactly like I was serving food in a casserole.  It's very durable and looks sharp and might make a great casserole, but I don't recommend it for a serving tray at all
Great Pans, Awful Lids. I bought this set to replace my 17 year old Farberware set because altho' still perfectly fine after all these years, I thought that thicker pans would cook better on my new gas stove. And they do, no doubt about it! Way less splattering and burning, which is what I was hoping for. HOWEVER ... my old pans had domed lids which allowed you to confine the condensation inside by quickly turning them upside down as you lifted them and you could even set them down on the counter this way. The KitchenAid pans have almost flat lids and the liquid usually ends up on the stove. There is no way you can set the lid down anywhere without making a mess. Very nice pans for the money, but I'm not sure I would buy them again
Once you use a Miele, you will never use another. This canister vacuum is perfect for multitasking quickly and easily. I have carpeting, wood, and vinyl floors in my house and used two different vacuums for it. When I bought the Miele, I was able to get rid of the other two cleaners and use this one throughout.It does an incredible job of getting up everything: pet hair, dust, crumbs, little bits of "stuff", those nasty dust bunnies and illusive corner cob webs which seem to appear overnight as if by magic (or maybe time to get new glasses!).In one room during a Spring clean, I started at the top - literally! Went from the ceiling and the molding down to the walls - curtains - floors - lamp shades - and everything else in between. All I had to do was change the cleaning head and adjust the suction amount. All simply and quickly done.The fact that it is also fairly quiet was a real bonus. I could actually vacuum while little one was taking his nap ... now THAT is a major plus for any appliance!I know the price is high but you are paying for the quality of the vacuum - an investment if you will. It is very well made and will last for many, many years. I recommend this vacuum highly
Very Pleased With Sugar Please. It took a little getting use to, but once I realized that a teaspoon took three presses instead of two, I was very satisfied with this little gadget.  I had purchased two, one for sugar and one for Splenda.  It would be nice if they could make these in different colors.
Miracleware Popcorn Popper (Purchased on 10/26/2006). The product was delivered per the terms promised.  It works.My only problem is that it did not come with directions - how much popcorn to use, how long to set the timer on the microwave.  My issue is probably with the manufacturer, not the store that sold it
Awesome Travel Mug. It's a nice size cup that does a great job insulating.  Cool sliding lid design that is convenient.  My only complaint would be that it's not spill proof, but the lid holds well enough to "stir" my coffee by shaking, and hey, they never said it was spill proof.The handle is comfy, and it still fits in my cup holders. (Audi)  It's has a nice lip to drink from, and even the owner of the gourmet coffee store I frequent asked me what kind it was with a Jealous look in her eye.  Very sharp looking.  The lid screws on for both lefty and righty use.  You can pour coffee right up to the top threads.  I usually take the lid off when I get to work, and the smooth metal lip is still very comfy.  (However, you get dribbles on the metal...)I found mine on closeout at Target for $4, and now I'm going to pay $20 for another one.  Yeah, I like it alot.  As an older seasoned caffeine addict, I have gone through my share of various travel mugs, and I'm getting a second one of these before they stop making them.  (Eh, maybe the wife can borrow it.)  Friends don't let friends go to Starbucks
Works like a champ. I would recommend this to anyone. It works as advertised. I use it on my laminate floors that until now I could not get as clean as I wante
A pretty good canister. I love Fiestaware and these canisters go perfectly in my kitchen. I like that they are large enough to get a decent amount of flour and sugar in them.  The seal seems really airtight, but I did accidently splash some water on the top of them, and the water did get into the canister.  They are easy to clean and look very classic
Not an expert, but very pleased anyway!. Reading some of the other reviews makes me believe that I'm probably the least experienced in sharpening tools.  I'm just a home cook; not a professional or expert.  But I found this product extremely easy to use and I have to say, it took my most damaged knife and put it razor sharp in no time at all.  The instructions are easy to follow.  If I have one (very minor) concern, it would be the plastic handle.  It catches when I try to rotate it open and I'm afraid it might break fairly easy.  I just leave it open all the time.  Other than that - I would recommend this sharpener absolutely
Better Than Sliced Bread!. We were given Ove Gloves for Christmas last year, and absolutely love them!  They're so much better than traditional potholders and oven mitts.  The only thing to watch out for is that they're not waterproof, so don't dip your thumb in the soup
handy and versatile. I received this as a Christmas gift.  I've used it to carry wine to parties and even onto an airplane.  I had a tote large enough for this to fit into when it contained two bottles.  I found that it is just enough protection to keep the bottles fron clinking without adding extra weight when you're flying. It's the best way I've ever known for carrying wine bottles anywhere
Best set ever. These pans are great, they are very sturdy and good quality. don't buy anything else! trust me
Great wine is just a button away!!!!. This wine opener is the greatest thing invented. I love it almost more than I love the wine. Try it---you won't be dissapointed. It is so easy to use
What an amazing price for such a great rug! WOW!!. This is an excellent quality bamboo rug.  It far exceeded my expectations considering the low price. I look at it and can't believe it was so inexpensive.  Even with the shipping its an excellent deal!  If you are considering this rug, BUY IT!  YOU WILL LOVE IT!P.S.  It looks fabulous in my tropical bathroom:
Best one out there. If you are a serious cook this is the tenderizer you have been looking for.  My first tenderizer was the "hammer" type tenderizer.  It did an honest job tenderizing the meat along with your knuckles!  For obvious reasons, I did not enjoy working with this particular model.My second tenderizer was the "stamper" style.  Again, it did an honest job but my hand would slip down on the handle and I would begin tenderizing my hand.My last attempt at procuring a tenderizer I could live with is this particular model.  I love the offset handle....no more sore knuckles or hand.   The weight is fantastic!  Basically, you just let the weight of the tenderizer do most of the work for you.  Your job is just guide the plate to it's intended target.  The surface of the tenderizing plate lets you cover a wider area than the "hammer or stamper" style.  Thus reducing your time in half.Clean up is easy, either wash by hand or place in the dish washer.  So, what's not to like?
sturdy and useful for bagel lovers. Perhaps I appreciate this invention because several years ago I had to go to the emergency room because I had cut myself while cutting a bagel.  It turns out that ER-via-bagel is one of the more common occurrences.  The thing is sturdy and would easily work for a small bagel/bakery stand.  Kudos to its inventor(s)
Food Seems To Cut Itself. I think this knife doesn't actually cut the food, so much as it intimidates it. The food looks up, sees this massive, wickedly sharp blade approaching, and leaps out of the way at the last possible moment. That's my best guess as to how this knife cuts so effortlessly.Or I guess it could be the fact that blade takes and holds an edge like a dream, allowing the significant weight of this very large knife to just drop the blade through whatever you happen to put under it. Whatever. The bottom line is you don't have to exert any effort to cut - you basically just steer, and the knife does all the work. Which is exactly as it should be.I've had this knife for about 6 months, and use it almost daily, primarily for cutting up fruits such as pineapple, watermelon, large papayas, peaches, etc. Cutting the rind off a pineapple does require a tiny bit of effort, but otherwise, even a good size watermelon cleaves itself out of the way when it sees this beastie coming.The wide blade is great for transferring food from the cutting board. Plus it adds that much extra weight, allowing the knife to do that much more of the work for you. I also find the width makes it easier to keep the blade against the fingers of my guiding hand, which makes me feel safer/more confident.The length enables you to cut through small watermelons, large papayas and personal size pizzas with just one stroke. Sweet! The length also means that much more curve, meaning you can cut more and larger items without lifting the tip off the board. Also sweet!If had one tiny complaint, it's that the length means the tip of the knife is quite far from your hand, so delicate strokes with the tip, e.g. to cut a blemish out of a piece of fruit, are a little awkward. I've gotten used to it, but it's taken some practice. However, since a 10" wide body knife isn't primarily designed for delicate tip work, I certainly won't deduct for that.I have a Furi TechEdge Pro Knife Sharpening System. It's a great system, which I love to use. But I've only had to hone this knife's edge 2 or maybe 3 times in 6 months of almost daily use. Granted, I'm only cutting fruits and vegetables on a good quality bamboo cutting board. Still, that's pretty good edge-holding.You really shouldn't buy a knife of this size, or in this price range, without at least holding it. How a particular knife will feel in your hand is unpredictable, particularly one this large and weighty. But I already knew I liked the Wsthof Classic line, so I took a chance and bought this from Amazon without ever holding it. And I'm very glad I have it. I love this knife
great food processor but. plastic bowl seems like cheap plastic.  the motor is great as it puree and chops
B&D Lids Off---I took a chance. Bottom line: this product works as advertised!  I was hoping it would as my wife has an arthritic wrist making it difficult to open cans and jars.  I tried it out on a jelly jar; you know how hard they are to twist off.  Popped off like a dream.If you are in the market, might as well get the item that does it all instead of just opening cans, for example
Great Ice Cream maker... This is my first ice cream maker and this one exceeds my expectations. It makes great tasting ice cream and with the 6 qt capacity you can add lots of extras to your ice cream. Unit is built to last, nothing on it is plastic. It is noisy when you turn it on so I just put it in the garage when I'm making ice cream, so this really is not a big deal. I highly recommend this ice cream maker
Really enjoying this purchase. I have used this about six times so far and it's been great. I like that it comes with the two bowl size options. It's quiet and simple to use
EXCELLENT VALUE!. Great for people who love cooking and will put it to use. I'd recommend the product to anyone
Great sheet set. Brougt this 600 count set and a 1000 count set. The 600 count set was far superior. They are soft and smooth. Best of all they are indeed wrinkle free. Wish I had brought two sets instead of the 1000 count set. Can't go wrong with this 600 count sheet set
Steam Engine. First of all, this thing is huge! Make shure you have the space... All of the features work as advertised, the browning feature works much better than we thought it would, just like a skillet... Quiet compared to a stovetop unit and much safer... Build quality is excellent , easy to clean,just what we wanted..
Wonderful Winning Waffles. This waffle iron is the BEST!  I get nice, brown, crisp waffles every time.  I really appreciate the cooking control and the chirp, chirp that tells me when my waffles are perfectly done!  I've used many wafflers before, but this is tops.  Great price for the quality.
M. J. in Ga. The sprayer works great. I put olive oil in it and use it like Pam but with the extra chemicals. So it doesn't damage my calphalon cookware. Pam eats away the anodized finish but the sprayer is just olive oil so it doesn't. You just have to pump the Misto periodically. oh, Yea the price was half of what it is in the stores. Thanks Amazo
Just what we needed. We looked for a long time to find just what we wanted. We found this set and it was a lot less expensive than some of the other pieces we were looking at. They went together quickly and look quite nice. They are plenty sturdy. We got one for each side of the bed as well as the 5 drawer stands and the 2 drawer bench. Best of all, after a year and a half in the new house our alarm clocks aren't in the floor anymore :
Beautiful!. I've had this set for 4 years and love it.  If you see water stains, it's your dishwasher, not the set. Try some vinegar in your rinse cycle and you may see a difference.  And rust?  No way...somethings up, as mine are just as beautiful now than when I first bought it
Beautiful eating!. I love the Fiesta rimmed soup bowls-they hold cassaroles, stews and salads for easy eating.  The new scarlet is a beautiful addition to our set.  The color is clear and bright and makes me want to get out the Valentines
beautiful glasses. These are heavy and sturdy glasses. Very pretty- with the handmade appearance evident in the tiny imperfections and bubbles in the glass- we love them. Handwashing is the only drawback
Great as a cake board. This board works perfectly for my intended use. I'm always looking for attractive and simple ways to present fun novelty cakes. A cake can be decorated directly on this board, since it has no rims to interfere, and cakes cut on it beautifully. The speckled black is an interesting background for many themes
Great Shower Curtain!. I love the shower curtain and the detail that shows on all the dragon flys. Nice, light details and color. I also am impressed with the fact that it has metal rings around the holes for the shower rings to keep it from tearing.I didn't notice that when I ordered it.
Excellent for everyday. I bought these wine glasses so that I could have lead-free crystal for everyday use. While they don't have the "heavy" crystal quality (for example, like Lenox Tuscany), they have good clarity, a pleasantly delicate construction and a nice "crystal" ring to them. The "art deco" stems are not my favorite (style-wise), but this line was the only lead-free Riedel set to offer "Vinum" bowls at the time I bought it. But they have a very classy and stylish look all the same.
Mix-n-Measure. The item is of good quality and a good addition to any bar or kitchen
Perfect!. This was just what I wanted and I received it very quickly. Thank yo
great buy. Works very well, easy to use and clean.
Excellent fan. Excellent fan.... I have a smaller Patton that I bought about 10 years ago, and it is noisy too... industrial strength fans are noisy.  Moving air makes noise.   A very good fan, well built and I think it's a good value for $$$$
Very Handy. It's funny, the different experiences people have with the same products. Now, this review is for the Blender Express, not the "Plus." The only difference is the attachments. My wife picked up a couple of these at Wally World after Christmas (2005). They were in a clearance cart for 5 bucks each. I figured that they were probably pretty cheap and I'd have a backup after I burned the first one up. Well, a little over a year later, I'm still using the first one. I use it 3-4 times a week for smoothies and frozen coffee drinks. I have to say that I really abuse the little guy. My coffee drinks call for half of the mug to be filled with crushed ice.It will make these drinks with a minimum of "crunchy" ice particles and they are quite enjoyable. I never expected it to last this long because, truthfully, from day one, I have been able to notice the "burned wire" odor coming from the unit as I continuosly overload the mug. Yet, it is still chugging along. Even at the full price, a year of this type of useage certainly makes it a good value. And, cleanup is extremely easy and the "make it and run" mug is really handy. Of course, for larger quantities, I fall back on the larger blender. If I ever do wear out both of these units, I would not hesitate to purchase another.
Great sheets!. I am very happy with the quality of these sheets.  They are soft and warm and fit the bed perfectly
Indestructable!. These are without question the greatest spatulas ever!  Over the years I have thrown away plenty of spatulas usually because they deteriorate quickly and start to leave traces of white rubber behind.  The Le Creuset's can handle high heat, and really clean out bowls and bottles.  The price startled me, but after using one I bought several more. These will last forever. Finally, a perfect spatula
Its worth the price. Its a good filter, does what its intended to do and quite silent, for the price its worth it
Efficient and easy. This is a great product - very basic, but does the job (boiling water) qite efficiently.  It's also easy to store in a cupboard.  I like the european design.  Make sure you order the correct size, because this water kettle comes in two sizes.  Water boils FAST
Beautiful Set of Spreaders!. I LOVE this set-I actually bought two and am glad I did.  Beautiful packaging, and rich deep colors-of course they match all my service pieces.  Would be nice as a gift too!  Shipping seemed to be a bit slow-but arrived in good condition and well-packaged.  Thanks
Very Happy!!. I have just purchased this ironing board! and so far it looks great! Initally i was leaning more towards the rowenta ironing board which looks almost the same just alittle wider but twice the price, so i decided to opt for the cheaper option.  I was drawn to this product because of the under tray.  The only thing that I am alittle dissapointed about is that my iron does not fit properly in the iron stand.  Other than that I am very happy
Ironing Sleeve with an Emblem Patch?. I work for a federal agency which requires me to wear a uniform and since I prefer to do my own shirts instead of paying someone else I needed and easier way to get my sleeves ironed without leaving an impression of my emblem patches on the other side of the sleeves.  This item has completely solved the problem and has made sleeve ironing much easier.  Definitely recommend to anyone with a uniform shirt
Dirt Devel. Great product, great value for the price and does exactly as it is presented.  Wish it had a longer cord, but overall, good quality product.  Does an excellent job on all floorings.  I'm glad I bought this item.  It's easy to transport up and down stairs as well
I love this machine!. I have had a blast with this machine since it came out of the box!  It is remarkably easy to use and the results have been wonderful.
Great Product. Makes perfect waffles and we have no complaints so far. Big fluffy waffles, 1.5 inches versus the regular 1.25 inch waffle makers
Fiskar Craft Crate Scrapbook Organizer. Apparently the previous rater is not a very organized person. I find this catty perfect for travel to scrapbook parties and more. If you are a cuttered kind of person this in not for you.Smart crafter
Good Vacuum; Great Bargain. No, these do not come with the accessories, but they are good vacuums.  I purchased a Eureka 5856 a year ago, which is virtually identical to these 5860's, except for the color (yellow instead of maroon).  It is the best vacuum I have ever had.  It is really good at picking up pet hair.  After a year of use it performs like it was brand new.These refurbished vacuums show signs that they have been used - on the wheels, and scratchs here and there, but they are cleaned up, the filters are new, the brush is spotless.  You really can't go wrong, since they come with a one year warranty.  Replacement filters for these vacuums are almost half the cost of this refurbished 5680.You have to put the handle on, which is easily done by two phillips screws.The vacuum comes with extension devices for getting into hard to reach places, and a replacement belt.
Outstanding. I own a considerable amount of Fiesta.  I originally purchased it 3 years ago because I wanted durable dishes that could be added to and allow for creativity.  I love all the colors and Fiesta has been around since the 1930's so I know I won't have any problems with replacement should any ever actually break.  All vitrified china has factory flaws.  Fiesta does not allow its first quality pieces to have more than 12 flaws.  There are seconds on e-bay.  Purchases made on e-bay should be made with caution because many of these piece are second quality sold as firsts.  I learned the hard way.  If you want china for everyday use that can be added to or easily replaced than I strongly encourage you to buy Fiesta.  If you change your dishware frequently then you might want to buy something cheaper that isn't meant to last.
Wilton Cupcakes N' More display. great product.  Perfect for my daughter's birthday party and a big hit at the school parties as well.  a really neat idea
Great Vacuum!  Great Price!. I have had 2 Oreck vacuums in the past 10 years.  I liked them because they were light weight & I thought they were doing a good job.  I'm not sure why I felt the need for another vacuum, maybe because the carpets still didn't look that great after I cleaned, but I began researching upright vacuums and finally settled on this Bissell Total Floors Bagless which cost half of what I paid for each of the Oreck's.  It arrived last week & I was totally amazed by the amount of dirt and pet hair that it picked up only a day after using the Oreck!!!!  I have one pet, a short haired cat and no children, so my house should not have gotten that dirty in one day!  It had to be the vacuum.  I also love the little Turbo brush for cleaning the upholstery.  Does a great job!  I'm so pleased that I decided to buy it.  It is quite a bit heavier that the Oreck, but other than that, it's far superior in my opinion
great deal!. I ordered this sheet set mainly for the price, but also because I was curious about the microfiber material.  After about a month of use, I have no complaints.  It's lightweight and the microfiber feels great when sleeping.  I would definitely recommend this to others
It Really Works!. I took my knives to Chesapeake Knife & Tool to have them sharpened and they destroyed the edge. I saw that Cooks Illustrated recommended Chef's Choice sharpeners and decided to give it a try. It took about an hour but I was able to restore the edge and now my knives are just like new.
Excellent Showerhead! Great for people with lousy water pressure. I recently moved to an older rental. It even has an old fashioned fuse box.  The water pressure here is horrible. I thought I'd have to join a health club to get a decent shower... but this little showerhead is somehow able to turn the weak water pressure into a wonderful skin smacking shower! I mean, the water really blasts (I also took out the water saver device, but that did not help when I did that with other showerheads).As for the filtration... it is excellent.  I have been using this product with good results, but only recently with their showerhead.I used to have red and itchy skin on my back and stomach.. but not since I started using this product
I LOVE IT!. This is by far my favorite pan. I use it to cook everything in. Nothing sticks to it what so ever and I love the sleekness to it. It's very durable and versatile. You can use it for sauces, noodle, stir fry, and everything else! I would never buy a pan not made by T-Fal. They're the best
Great pizzelle maker!. I've had this iron for several weeks and am very happy with it. The iron heats quickly and makes crisp pizzelle. Despite the manufacturer's claim that you do not need to oil the cooking surface, I've had to add a bit of oil to the top and bottom plates prior to cooking the pizzelle to prevent sticking. Other than that, it is a good iron for the money
They REALLY do work. Bought these not too long ago. I use them all of the time. They do a great job on towels, men's under clothing, permanent press clothing, cleaning rags (not microfiber, Never soften those), etc. I find the drying time is a little less, the clothes do not tangle and they smell nice and clean. Best of all---no chemicals. If you have clothes with a lot of static cling, then you can throw in maybe half a dryer sheet to reduce that problem. I love these "little guys". Recommend them to all and especially chemically sensitive folks
Useful, sturdy, and stylish. Great way to eliminate the necessity for Pam and other unhealthy kitchen sprays.  This oil sprayer is not only very sturdy and well-made, but very aesthetically pleasing to boot.  There's not much to say other than that, as it's merely an oil sprayer.  I recommend it though
LOVE THAT CART!. These carts and shelving units are the best I've ever seen. They are flexible in shelf height, a minimum of one inch between, and it is very easy to reposition shelves after months of use... I have several shelf units and two carts and I plan on purchasing more. For those of you unfamiliar, not a better purchase can be made. Some units even come with wheels for even more flexibility.
Finally, a good dispenser. I've tried so many syrup dispensers all of which dripped, and often the flow mechanism would get stuck.  This one is the first which has neither problem.  It looks quite nice too.  Wish it were a little bigger
Makes Ironing a Breeze. I just got this iron yesterday at Linens & Things using their standard 20% coupon you find all the time in the newspaper. I tried it out on a cotton shirt and got the job down about five times faster than usual, less work, and no wrinkles. The shirt looked like I got it back from the cleaners. I also have an Elna ironpress, which also saves time, but I think I will prefer using the Rowenta steam iron since it steams the material while you iron it, and it can get into more nooks and crannies. Note to Rowenta Engineers -- it would be nice if the water tank had a level indicator to let you know how much water is in it. This would help when you fill it so as to prevent overfilling. Another option would be a removable water tank you could take over to the sink to fill. Also, if this is a typical high quality Rowenta product, why only a one-year warranty? Why not five or ten years
I love my mogu. I love my mogu doll this is the third one that I have purchased.  I now have two and my sister-in-law who always wanted to steal mine now has her own
sharp knifes again. i have chicago cutlery and other misc knives.  they were all to dull to cut soft butter.  When i received the sharpener, my husband sharpened and honed them all.  what a pleasure to have sharp cutting utensils
Exceptionally high quality - perfect release. I have used these for making florentine cookies which are extremely sticky, having used disposable mini aluminum pans in the past. They work perfectly, releasing the florentines immediately. Just ordered two more pans, and the price went down, too
Hot and stylish. If you are looking for a mug that keeps your coffee HOT all morning then this is the mug for you!  The top easily unscrews and aligns perfectly once screwed on to use the side handle.  The base is slip-proof, so if it's sitting on your desk and you knock into it, it's not going anywhere.  Besides all of it's great features it's also very stylish and well designed!!
works great. I haven't used the dryer since I got this.  It holds a little less than a full load, but I have an extra large front loading washer.  I may get a second one.
Fun glasses. I love Riedel glasses and these are no exception.  These are great for casual wine drinking ~week day dinners or just a couple of friends drinking and chatting.Sure they don't have a stem, but I rarely hold the glass in my hand the entire time I have a glass of wine so the wine doesn't heat up anyway. Elegant but durable, they fit in the dishwasher. And they are spill proof.If I set a fancy table, I still turn to my beautiful stemmed wine glasses.
Awesome little vacuum with lots of power. I was in a second hand store and saw this little vacuum.  Wasnt really looking for a vacuum but plugged it in to test it and was immediately impressed by the suction.  It had some of the best section power I had seen in any vacuum.  So I bought it and have been totally amazed by its capabilities.  Its so light...about nine  pounds and easy to transport and store.  Its power cord is on a reel that retracts into the vacuum at the touch of a button.  The bags are a bit small but its a small vacuum.  They are very easy to get at and change.  Its the best vacuum for hardwood and kitchen floors, along baseboards and on stairways.  Not so good on deep pile carpets although it will do the job in a pinch.  I have three cats and gets lots of hair and dust and its great for a quick vacuuming.  This is a great second vacuum to augments a heavy duty upright.  My vacuum came with two attachments and the crevice tool.  Many third-party vacuum attachments would work with it too.  I am glad I bought it and would recommend it.  Its the vacuum I would use most.  The biggest drawbacks to using a vacuum is the weight and unwinding the cord to use it and then rewinding it and your done.  Push a button and the cord automatically rewinds.  Whats not to like about this vacuum.  Highly recommended
Very Usefull. Very useful for storing my multiple journals.  Spray painted easily so now it matches my decor. Using in my home yet planning to add to my office as well.  A good value
A Decent Fan For The Money. This fan does blow a really good stream of wind, even at it's lowest setting, although it does so a bit noisely.  It's somewhat annoying at night, in one's bedroom, when the fan's noise is a bit intrusive.  It sounds sort of like a propellor driven airplane revving up for take-off, although not nearly as loud.  I've got another 16" floor standing fan several years old that also blows well, although not quite as brisk as the Honeywell, but is a good bit quieter.  I think that the low speed setting on the Honeywell HS-300 is somewhat higher than other fans, hence the noise.  The fan's blade design, which is supposed to increase air flow, is also a contributing factor in making this fan noisier than others, I believe.One negative point is regarding the fan's oscillation feature; there's no button for it on the remote control.  One has to pull/push a button on top of the fan housing to activate or deactivate it.While the noise factor is a slight issue, it's not severe enough to cause me to return this fan.......it does move air around quite well.  And, I did get this fan for a decent price directly from Amazon, $34.00, and no shipping charge with Super Saver.  Sadly, at the time of writing this review, the fan is only available from another company for $40.00 with a shipping charge of $17.46(yikes!!!)
Excellent. This Kettle is really quiet compared to the last kettle I had which was a Krups, and sounded like a tractor.  For the first couple of weeks I found there was a plastic smell when the kettle boiled but it wears off after a while.  It looks great
GREAT TOAST!. This toaster does a perfect job at it's unique requirement-to make great toast.  The wide range on the light to dark dials (1-9) gets it just right for everyone.  It has been nice to move up from a two-slot to four-slot with the addition of kids and not spend all of breakfast processing bread through the toaster.  The bagel feature really works.  It looks very handsome on the counter, but it is large - as large as some small toaster ovens, so measure first.  The only thing that hasn't fit well are long slices from a round of sourdough, I just cut them in half and it was fine.  It has been so nice to have toast that is perfectly done on the entire surface of both sides of the bread!
Works Great, No Problems. I weigh flour for waffles and bread to a tenth of an ounce. As for the on-off-tare switch, it could be a little frustrating if you got one that's too touchy but mine works fine.No regrets
A delight to use. I love this grinder. It's very easy on the hands, grinds consistently and plentifully (I don't seem to have the problems some others have had with the output), lets me have salt and pepper right at hand in one container, and looks good (I have the stainless model).I'm here to buy another one for a friend right now..
Cute. My son loves his new ducky shower curtain.  The ducks are large and fluffy.  The curtain does need a good ironing and the fabric is slightly thinner than I had anticipated.  However, it is still a nice curtain
Great Product. Has bought all my knives back to life. It takes no time at all to sharpen a knife and it's very sturdy
Extemely Large. This set is a great value. You can turn the sofa into a twin size bed, if you wanted to sleep outside. This is a true deep seating set. It even comes with cushions
Spiegelau will work just fine. Spiegelau was acquired by Riedel a year or two ago, and is quite similar to the Riedel Vinum glassware, which sits just below Riedel's high end sommelier series. These glasses offer exceptional value. The difference between the Spiegelau and the Riedel is less in the quality of any individual stems--both are well-made, European machine blown crystal--than in the fact that Riedel offers a broader range of glassware specifically designed to enhance wines from particular varietals (e.g., cabernet sauvignon, pinot noir) or from particular appellations (e.g., Burgundy, Bordeaux). If you are simply looking for a basic red wine glass and a basic white wine glass, the Spiegelau will work just fine. However, if you usually just drink Barolo, for example, you might wish to invest a bit more money in a Riedel stem specifically developed to enhance the bouquet and flavors of that appellation. However, the most important thing to know is that these are excellent quality glassware that offer the major advantages of crystal over regular glass, a thin lip and a microscopic pores in the glass that effectively increase surface area, increasing the area from which the bouquet can launch.
We eat 3 times more rice now!. This is the Rolls Royce of rice cookers. Excitement is what you'll feel when you open this box. Anybody who intends to eat healthy would love this for gift! Big for families, but cooks half a cup of rice for a single serving just as well. Too many benefits to this wonderful machine. Most of all, easy to clean. It's a little overpriced, but once you get over that life becomes easier, especially if you want to save money. Rice comes out perfect every time. The timer on it lets you know precisely when it going to be done. This is convenient to let you know when to start putting teriayaki strips on the grill, or cooking chicken so they come off at the same time. It fun to experiment with various settings...I prefer the Japanese rice soft setting. Keeps rice hot for days. Don't waste your time shopping all the "asian stores"...they all cost the same there or more. You know if you get yours from Amazon..it hasn't been sitting on a retail shelf of a year.
Very pretty design. Though these are a little heavy... they are extremely versatile. Looks great in the kitchen and well as on the dining table, if you want to serve in them. One note of caution, the yellow is lighter than in the picture shown.. it has more of a hint of light greenish yellow, but nevertheless looks wonderful
Just what I have been looking for!!!. I have had the more well-known travel mugs, and thought that they were the best.  Well, I was wrong.  This travel mug is by far the best out there.  It is truly leak-proof.  My friends get tired of me turning it upside down (I guess I'm easily amused hehe), but I really do like a mug that won't spill if tipped over.  When turned to the drink side, the liquid flows at about the right rate, not too fast, not too slow.  Anyway, I can't say enough about this mug, and the price also beats the competition.  I am not sure about the red color.  I have the blue and the black, and I prefer the black out of the three choices
An old friend. For many years I had a Presto pressure cooker, but when the sealing ring didn't work a few years back I tossed it out thinking I could never get a replacement ring.  I missed having that pot.  I'm glad to have one once again.  Stew and pot roast are the best reasons to have one, but tonight will be spare ribs.  The new pot is nothing like my 30 year old one.  It works the same in the end, though.  I would have opted for the aluminum as that was what I had, but my husband bought the stainless steel.  I don't think it makes a difference for the price, except in appearance
Bar-B-Chef review by poebaitfly. The grill is a significant improvement over my previous Weber in regards to:-grill area-regidity of the cast iron grill-control for raising or lowering goals-large charcoal shelf-three compartments within the charcoal shelf-heavy guage metal construction-the option of adding a rotisserieThe grill is wanting in regards to:-lack of an enamel coating on the cast iron grill-lack of closable upper and lower vents which would enable greater temperature control and the ability to seal the grill interior when finished in order to snuff out the coals
6 Stars Out Of 5. The other reviewers have said it all, but here's my take on this very affordable (I got mine from a local well known chain store for $3.00 less than A'.com's affiliate offers it for) to replace an old entry level Swing-A-Way that had seen better days.This unit is designed with the usual top gear wheel turned by the handle, BUT has incorporated a SECOND GEAR WHEEL for the can underlid rim advance wheel that meshes with the top gear wheel making for truly EFFORTLESS can opening.My $18.00 Rival Xtra-Tall electric can opener was JAMMING on the large 34.5 oz solid lid coffee cans, but THIS Swing-A-Way had NO TROUBLE with these cans opening them with great ease.BUY THIS ONE and let the others--including the "side openers" (a fad that I feel will fade quickly)--gather dust on the shelves.  Swing-A-Way--in this configuration--is the BEST!!
great vacuum. This vacuum is wonderful.  Easy to push and pull.  Neat brush spinning hose attachment, plus many more.  Cleans carpet by just going over them once.  Works on tile too!  Just a great vacuum
Quite operation, but what ever you do don't loose the instructions!. Ok, this is a nice feeder.  I like it better then our last that sounded like it was grinding gravel.  However, holy cow, what ever you do DON'T LOOSE THE INSTRUCTIONS.  Programming the thing requires the most counter-intuitive convoluted set of steps that make no sense at all and are completely illogical.  You will NEVER figure it out for yourself.  It is so retarded, even if you figure it out one time, forget it, you will never remember and be able to do it again.  Who programs this stuff???
Great Kitchen Knife. This was the first Global knife I owned and it is the most used in my collection.  I find it has great balance, an excellently sharpened blade, and a nice shape for dicing.  One of the things that I was originally apprehensive about when I bought this knife was Amazon's description of this being for small-handed individuals (as I am six foot and of average build).  I have no problems handling this knife.It's a little more slippery than, say, the Chicago Cutlery knives I have with wooden handles, but the trade off is that it's easier to clean (don't put it in the dishwasher) and looks a lot cooler.   If you're serious about cooking, and have the coin to upgrade, I would go with Global's heavier line.These knives are a little more difficult to sharpen than most knives I've had (especially this one with its curved blade).  The manufacturer says to use a waterstone, which I have, but I tend to use my electric sharpener which does the job nicely.Since I've bought this knife, I've acquired the Chef's knife, vegetable knife, and the paring knife from this collection and I am happy with all of them
great product, expensive but worth it. my cat only drinks from water thats running, siamese geez. he wasnt peachy with it at first, but after about a day or so, he realised that i wasnt going to give him water from the sink anymore and switched. but i had to keep up with the reinforcement of not giving him water from the bathroom sink. when he wanted to get water and meowed, i would take him over to the waterfall and petting him lovingly. i put the fountain in a seclueded corner so nothing is able to distract him or sneak up or frighten him.
Holmes HFH416 heater. Best space heater ever!  We bought ours in 2000 and it still going strong.  Best hot air penetration into the space of any space heater we've owned.  We later bought a model# HFH2986, but it's heat was not as robust as the 416.Highly recommended
Great Towel. This towel is very high quality and worth the money. The color is deep blue just as described
ok so far. Have not had it for very long.  I have arthritis and it is easy for me to use
So much better than wood. This is definately a good cutting board. I owned a nasty old wood one for years, this plastic one is so much more durable and easy to clean
Nice idea for spices. This spice rack works great in a drawer. It is a simple design, basically just a thick piece of plastic bent to make the spices lay on an angle. I reused my square Target spices with new labels -- it's beautiful! The spices are tucked in a drawer next to my stove so they are easy access while keeping my kitchen uncluttered.It was reasonably easy to install -- my drawer isn't as long as the rack so I had to get out my handsaw and cut it down a bit. It suggests this in the directions. Unfortunately, the rack wasn't cut squarely -- so I also had to get out my sander and sand down part of a side -- it was about a 1/16" off and wouldn't fit into the drawer. But after I did that, it fit very snugly and now works well.
We love this coffee maker!. After trying a different DeLonghi model and not being pleased (the thermal pot did not keep the coffee warm and it spilled coffee on the counters while brewing), we tried this model at my sister-in-law's request (she purchased this model about 8 months ago) and we LOVE it! The coffee stays hot and is easy to use. My husband and I would recommend this model to everyone
Good value and not bad looking either. My old coffee table was about to collapse, so I decided I needed a new one. After looking around, and finding a lot outside of my price range I stumbled across this one, at a very reasonable price. How could I go wrong? The table itself is surprisingly solid (and has no scratches btw), and although the legs need attaching (by the normal bolt to bracket type) they also seem solid, because it uses 2 bolts per leg. THis was why my last table did not last, so I'm pleased to see the extra strength this will provide. The table also looks pretty good. The dark wood is elegant, and although the little chrome pieces seem a bit cheap and tacky, they are actually hidden away, so that unless you're lying on the floor, you really wouldn't notice them at all.
Don't buy these!!!!. I am disgusted with the quality of this item! I understand it is inexpensive, but the sheets snagged after one usage ( and I wear satin pajamas there is nothing to snag on!)  After one wash they were unusable!!!  The quality is horredous!  Pay an extra 20$ and get something better
Wow!. My Samoyed loves this toy and so far hasn't managed to trash it. Yay! It's sturdy and VERY chewable
CRATE MAT. HAS WORKED WELL WITH THE CRATE WE PURCHASED TO GO WITH IT.  WIPES CLEAN EASILY
great product. We ordered this item, and it's not only useful as a trivet to place hot pots on, but also great to use as a oven mitt. It's very flexible so when I pulled out a hot cookie sheet my fingers didn't get burned! I highly recommend it. It is a bit tricky to grasp the hot items, but you just have to arranget it so
Mr Heater Propane Guage. This product should be labeled as a "Mr Heater" propane guage. It does not measure the level of liquid propane in your tank. However, it does measure the ability of the vaporized flow of propane gas to keep up with the usage of your propane appliance. The red, yellow, and green indicator disk on the circular dial makes it easy to see how your propane use is doing before you completely run out. Its debatable if you need to know "exactly" how much liquid propane is still in the tank. The vaporization indicator on this guage has been useful for me
Great Case!. I love this case!  It's light weight yet sturdy.  My machine fits in easily with lots of room for extras like patterns, sewing tools, etc
It's OK. What can I say? It's sturdy, handy and useful. It does what a kennel is supposed to do
Not Meant To Be Shipped. Packaging, packaging, packaging...  This product was meant to be picked up at your local WalMart or Target...  Carried to your car and tenderly moved to your home...  Although the outer box was wonderfully packed with plastic air balloons, the product box designer has no idea on how to keep a product safe during shipping...  The product arrived and works...  However, both dials had fallen off and had to be searched for in the box...  The product is cool...  However, this was NOT meant to be shipped..
Works well. We've had this for about a week.  It does a great job of keeping my daughter's 12x12 foot room warm all night when on low setting (700 watts) and about half on the thermostat setting.    We left it on full blast in the garage for three hours when we first got it, and it definitely gave off an oil smell.   We moved it to the bedroom after that & no smell at all.   It does get a little hot to touch, so not for use around small kids, nor can you put it against draperies or furniture
Very Impressed. The steamer works exceptionally well.  Cleans with almost no effort.  But if you have big jobs you might like a steamer with the ability to hold a larger capacity of water
Sunbird. I have one of these cute space savers.  I like the compact size and it does the toaster and toast over duties as well as the other big monsters.  You can see the bottem half of a piece of toast as it toast so the doneness can be monitored.  Only real complaint I have is that using the level to eject the toast is almost imposible, a considerable amount of pressure is need and the toast goes flying. My granddaughter thinks that is great.  Pulling the plug is the quickest way to eject the toast, and by the way was the manufactures' suggestion when I called to complain.  I also have a regular toaster and pulling the plug is the only way to get bread out early.  The oven does an excellant job of toasting my French rolls and Toastation is so compact I am going to buy another for my winter home
Good Size Double Boiler. Good size.  Easy to handle.  Fit most 3 1/2 to 4 quart sauce pan.  Yes the melted chocolate will stick in the rim
Works but does it affect the taste??. As a vintner we remove the CO2 from the wine as part of our process.  This device uses CO2 to "pop" the cork--very clever.  However this minor introduction of CO2 is insignificant and will vent quickly.  At times there is an off-taste --like a lubricant or something which affects the initial taste of the wine. Let it breath for a while -- 5 minutes or so and it seems OK.This device works well on corks, but is a hit and miss on composites and plastics.  Do not use it on partially filled bottles as it takes to much gas from the small cylinder to be effective.REW
Hard to find without Amazon!. We've been looking for this item for quite some time.  We had a set of these Revere pans but wanted an extra sauce pan.  The size is perfect for everything from sauces to canned vegetables and sometimes having two would be a lifesaver.  But we were unable to find the pan without buying the entire set again anywhere but here. The pans are wonderful and we'd be lost without them
A well made classy lamp... This lamp went together with no problem. The pieces fit tightly and the lamp stands perfectly upright. It is more brownish than reddish. But I believe that it can go with many colors, especially pastels. The design, color and simplicity make this a very classy lamp. The slate shade is gorgeous and much tougher than I thought. This lamp, as most lamps, is not made for grabbing and moving too much. Put it where you want it and enjoy it's beauty! Buying this lamp is a win-win situation
Same good quality and looks as other Calphalon Knives. This knife has completed the entire Calphalon set for me and I am pleased with all of the knives. It is sturdy, fairly sharp and also looks good. I would have liked a little more flexibility in the blade of the boning knife
Even easier- and better- than I thought. I wanted a dual coffee/espresso maker thinking I would mostly drink regular coffee with the occasional latte indulgence, but I was totally surprised how easy it is to use, and now it's lattes every day. Also, there was almost no learning curve-- my first cup (surprisingly, from what I've read elsewhere) was near perfect, and apparently it wasn't a fluke.If there is ANY drawback, it's only that there is no warming plate under the espresso carafe (but I'm sure a purist would scoff at such a notion).If I have one recommendation, it is to spring for a stainless steel carafe (or whatever it's called) to steam your milk. I'm not a physicist so I'm not sure why, but it does make a difference.In summation, this is a great deal on an excellent delivery system for my drug of choice. (I give it 4 stars instead of 5 because I have to grind the beans, and it didn't include an intravenous unit)
Working for over 2 years. I have had this unit for over 2 years and everything still works just as good as the day I bought it.  I use it as my only stove almost daily as I live in a basement apartment.  The only problem I have with it is that it takes a while to heat to the point of boiling but once there it stays hot.
Two polyactyl thumbs up for Cosequin!. My cat Mira, a 5 year old polydactyl tabby, was diagnosed with hip dysplasia several months ago.  She'd never been a big leaper (never leapt onto my kitchen counters!), but when she wouldn't jump onto my bed, or even sit up for a little bite of tuna, I knew she was in trouble.  X-rays showed hip dysplasia.  Her vet put her on a short regimen of prednisone, plus daily supplements of Cosequin (1 pill per day).  After two weeks, I was able to discontinue the prednisone.  That left her with just the Cosequin, which her vet recommended should remain a permanent supplement to her diet.I'm happy to report that since she's been off the prednisone, eating food supplemented once daily with the Cosequin, she's been her old self again!  She leaps easily onto my bed, and sits up for treats.  I'm VERY happy with the results of this supplement -- and so's she.  Two polyactyl thumbs up for Cosequin
Nice presentation... I don't drink tequila normally. But, I bought these as a gift for a friend who does. He paid me back by pouring me a `generous' glass of Patron Silver. Now, while I don't drink tequila, I do appreciate all fine liquors. So my first impression of these glasses was "fragile". I drink wine often and like a heavier glass, as I am sometimes clumsy. Though, these glasses did seem to be of high quality. They showed the clarity and color of the tequila nicely. They also allowed me to appreciate the aroma of the spirit without being overwhelmed by it. It was more of a sipping glass, but was shaped so that if you wanted to shoot it you could. I believe it did make the experience more enjoyable. It brought out taste and smell that I would not have normally smelled from tequila in a shot glass. So, if you appreciate fine tequila and think putting a $60 bottle of anything into a shot glass is a sin, I would recommend this for you. If/when I finish a wet bar in my home with nice liquors I will buy a set of these for myself for those special occasions when I entertain more sophisticated tequila drinkers.
Cats  will play. All the cats that I have everbeen owned by....yes you read thatcorrectly-- have loved this toy.Therefore we all recommend it
Customer service???  how about Customer Overservice!!!. I purchased the Rival BBQ crockpot, and once it arrived for a friend as a gift, I was filled with envy and wanted one for myself.  I thought that service charges were high, however the Smalls were swift, vigilant and dedicated to resolving my concerns.  Not only did the refund charges, we spoke as late as this week and my sole purchase was well over a month ago.  If I receive this service from a one-time purchase, can you imagine what a repeat customer gets.  Your Lowest Price Store is just that!!!  I probably could've taken my behind to Walmart, but I really got to know a couple that run a business with the customer in mind and will dare I say be the next Walmart
a very very good BIG knife. This is the knife I find myself reaching for most often while working in my kitchen.  Why?  1) it feels right in the hand, it is well ballanced and the grip fits my admitedly beefy hands quite well.   2)The excellent ballance makes it feel like a smaller knife in my hand, that is to say I have no touble using it even for semi-precission tasks.  This makes it very versitile and I don't find myself switching knives for every task. 3) I find that a few passes across the diamond steel brings the blade up to razor sharp.  Once honed on the diamond steel I can prepare meals for hours with only the occasional pass across the diamond steel to maintain the edge.All this said, I will say that the high carbon content of the Henckels knife makes the blade quite hard and if you let the edge go entirely, you will need to find a professional to return the knife to razor sharpness as doing it yourself is very difficult.A side note: I do not use a "regular steel" with any or my knives.  They are not really intended to "sharpen" a knife but rather to straighten the edge.  The diamond steel will give thes knife back its edge and does so quickly and rather gently at that
its a keeper. We had second thoughts when we saw how tall these were.  For some reason, we thought they'd be taller.  They're 5 feet tall, and sturdy.  Kind of roughly finished.  Not bad.  Works fine
Best cat litter I've used... I am so glad I tried this litter despite the few negative reviews I saw...  It clumps well and does not stick to the pan even after it gets wet.  It is simple and convenient to clean the litter box since the litter can be flushed down the toilet (we keep our litter boxes next to the toilet to facilitate regular cleaning).  Perhaps not the best odor control, but comparable to most litter.  I have two cats who switched to the new litter without problem.  I would recommend it, no question
Love this product. I love my Mellita One:One. I use it at work and have saved lots of money at the coffee shop!  I had difficulty finding a variety of coffee pods locally and couldn't find any tea pods, however, I ordered several varieties of each at Amazon.com.  I received them within a week and the shipping was free!  The hazelnut and french vanilla are my favorites and I don't think they taste like instant coffee
happy griddle buyer. The griddle was delivered promptly and exceeds my expectations - a great product! Thank you, Amazon
mortar and pestle. very sturdy little bowl and pestle. Just the right size for herbs and nuts.
Fantastic piece of kit. actually i bought this machine in england same model in black and silver.i tried out various machines while trying to find a good machine for not too much money.i love coffee don't get me wrong but i aint daft enough to pay big bucks when theres really no need. i tried breville (pure trash) i tried Gaggia (very good but expensive) but this machine comes a very close second to the gaggias suprisingly.i've had my machine for 3 months now and had a slight problem with the handles plastic teats where the coffee comes out of. i called Krups and they replaced it immediatley no problems, 5 star customer service and that is saying something considering i'm in Peru.what can i say? every time without fail fantastic expresso and lattes.if you want more gadgets go for the 4050 model but to be honest for the price this is your best buy.they say you pay for what you get. Not true. with this machine you get a lot more. good quality, well made and if you should need it good customer service.the only down side to this machine is it does have a loud pump but that just makes you feel you are in a coffee shop.Worth it, Buy it.
Beats the dirt method. I got one of these for my 5 cats, who love their drinkwell fountain, and they now love the cat grass addition.  It didn't last really long - just a few weeks before they'd eaten it all and it stopped growing.  The roots take over about half the bowl, but the cats didn't seem to mind.  I love this for the wintertime when the cat grass I grow outside dies for the year.
The perfect coffee canister?. Finding a decent coffee canister is not all that easy. It should be, in my opinion, airtight, non-see-thru, a decent size (to hold a pound of beans, for example), and look like it's intended for coffee. This one fits the bill perfectly. It's also very well made, and the included scoop is both cute and original. And, in my experience, at least, shipping was quite fast
Georgetown Collection. I bought this entire collection and was very pleased.  The console table is my favorite piece and I plan to buy more of these tables for other rooms of my house, including using one as a desk for my laptop computer in the office
Fiesta ware Canister. I love the canisters. They are a nice size and have tight fitting lids.
Extremely pleased with the fiestaware black lunch plate. Great item.  Rec'd it in wonderful shape.  Packaged well to withstand droppage and anything else that might have happened to it.
egyptian cotton blanket. very nice, warm blanket, but too big for a full size bed, way too big
top notch humidifier. I also purchased the Air-O-Swiss 7135 after first buying the Vent Sonic which appeared to be a knock off of another Air-O-Swiss model 7133 that Bed Bath and Beyond no longer carries. The AOS eloctronic humidifier is more than I needed but the cheaper manual (knobs) wasn't available. I thought the Venta Sonic was in fact the manual model of the AOS and bought it as it looked similar to the pictures of the 7133 model. When i opened the package I realized right away that this was not worth $99 and reading through the one page instructions found that it was not the AOS. It is pretty cheaply made and did not generate much mist and the fan could barely get the mist more than a foot from the nozzle. A big problem was that the Vent Sonic unit splashed so much water under the container that water leaked out between the base and the container leaving a puddle in just 30 minutes. I took the Venta Sonic back and bought the AOS 7135 which has an electronic buttons to regulate the fan and moisture. What is great is that you can set the percentage humidity and the unit will reach that amount and stop sending mist. It also shows the current humidity level. Since the main purpose of a humidifier is to add humidity to the air but not make it like a rain forest the electronic info is very usefull. The AOS 7135 works like a dream even though it is pretty pricey but a full nights sleep every night is worth an awful lot. It is extremely wel made and designed. While it is $149 there are discounts available from BB&B for 20%
Compare this to Mario's. I've had mine for about 5 years.  It stays in my oven 24/7.I agree with the one reviewer about packing, since the first one I received had one of the handles broken off.Seriously, I paid about $15 for this from Amazon and, with ordering another item, I got free shipping.Buy this if you want the best pizza stone on the market.  Mario's is the same piece with an enamel coating - no effect on cooking - for $60.Lodge is always the way to go in cast iron
Better than Expected. I received this coffeemaker as a Christmas gift and was initially skeptical of the thermal carafe being able to make hot coffee and the basket-style filter.  After using the maker for a week, I have to say my skepticism was unjustified.  This machine makes great-tasting coffee that is as hot as I could want it.  I never liked the "cooked" coffee that regular, glass-carafe makers produced - burned tasting after the first cup.  The coffee from this machine is consistent from the first cup to the last.  I fill the carafe with hot water, mill my beans and fill the reservoir, empty the carafe and enjoy.  After two hours, the coffee was still hot.  One great feature not highlighted is the front-fill aspect:  Kitchenaid designed the top with a channel to fill the reservoir by pouring the water from the front, right next to the filter.  No more struggling to pour water in the back and see the water level.  Extremely convenient.I have to disagree with the previous reviewer - this machine makes ten 5-ounce cups.  After reading the review, I double-checked the carafe capacity against my old Krups machine:  exactly 10 cups; more than enough for our household.  All in all, a great-looking, great-performing coffeemaker that meets Kitchenaid's high standards.  I highly recommend it
Great Product. I have bought one for every bed in the house.  The teenage boys, Grandma, and husband love these Memory Foam Mattress Toppers.  I only wished I had them years ago.  What a great price!  Thank yo
Nothing I can complain about. It is a forged knife at close to stamped price.  The edge came right up to snuff after a few passes on a steel. I bought it and their large Santuku and am quite happy with both purchases.  I'll use the Santuku a lot more but this is a kitchen standard item .  I had a nice forged one but it went missing.  Gotta be more careful
Wonderful. At last -- a strainer that will not tip over in the sink when you fill it to the brim
Fantastic sheets!. Since I shop at Amazon all the time for bedding and toys I knew a bargain when I saw one. My only regret is that I didn't get 2 sets. These sheets are super soft and extremely high quality. The seams and corners are better than sheets costing ten times as much! I only paid $12.99, but even at $30 these are a steal! I can't say enough how much I love them and I am a bedding fanatic
Very NICE set for the price... This is a very nice set of inexpensive flatware.Not overly weighty but still balance nicely in the hand.  Made well, no sharp or crooked edges to any of the utensils.  The 5 piece serving set is very nice addition.As mentioned before, the extra 8 pieces are actually teaspoons which is standard, not salad forks.
Perfect helper. Amazing how many things you can do with this little thing. Bought a caramel apple and had initially forgotten about it, but it makes the perfect cuts to regular and candied apples, and a great many other things
Super Duper Black and Decker. I have waited forever to buy a dustbuster, I don't know why.  Well, now I do.  This product has exceeded my expectations.  It picks up great.  I have a dog who chews up all of her toys and leave bits and pieces of plastic and stuffing all over the place.  It is a lot easier using the dustbuster than taking the vaccum out all of the time. This product is great
Some Things to Consider Before Purchasing. Given the reviews posted earlier, I approached this machine with some trepidation, expecting difficult operation, inconvenient clean-up, and poor juice.  I am pleased to say that none of this occurred.  I have had my juicer for 2 weeks now, have pressed over 5lbs. of oranges, and enjoyed a gallon of gloriously fresh juice.  It was easy to squeeze and easy to clean-up.  However, consider the following points before puchasing.1. You absolutely must have some upperbody strength to exert the required force and control the lever action.  While my wife had a bit more difficulty, she was able to squeeze the oranges just fine.  Also, operation may not be comfortable for left-handed individuals, as the lever is on the right-side of the machine and your free (left) hand must rest on the top of the unit to prevent excessive force from jolting the machine.2. When rotating the lever, do so SLOWLY, as rapid motion can lead to spraying juice from the orange, loss of control of the unit, or both.3. Do not use the machine for 1 glass of juice.  You'll spend less time and effort using a simple plastic pulper over a glass.4. Do not use this machine for 1 gallon of juice or more.  If you're making that much juice, consider an industrial automatic model ($2000 and up), or just get used to that juice out of the carton.5. Be sure to read the directions before using.  It really helps to know how all four removable pieces attach/detach when cleaning up.  Clean up is as simple as rinsing/wiping with a sponge and replacing into machine.  Really takes no more than 15 seconds.6. Leave the machine on your counter if possible.  Your lower back will thank you.7. Purchase good quality juicing oranges.  After buying oranges of several varieties from different purveyors, you'll be amazed at the differences in flavor.  All oranges are not created equal!8. Before pressing your oranges, give them a few seconds (10) in the microwave.  This will result in more free flowing juice during pressing.9. Some reviewers have mentioned that pressing the oranges releases some of the volatile oils found in the rind into the juice.  While this is true, these oils give oranges their distinctive aroma and taste, and therefore improve the quality of the juice and provide some bracing acidity to its sweetness.10. The imperfect shape of the upper and lower press molds doesn't extract all of the juice from the outer edges of the orange half.  We addressed this by simply moving the orange edges over the lower mold and repressing - a few more precious drops!11. Will not extract as much juice per orange as an electric machine with a rotary pulper, but requires less cumulative effort when doing more than a few oranges.I cannot comment about the durability of the unit as I have only used it for several weeks.  However, it is difficult to believe that avoiding overtorque using slow deliberate lever motion wouldn't reduce the probability of any cracking in the cast-iron.In summary, this machine provides great value for the niche it was intended to serve - fresh juice enthusiasts squeezing a quart or more of juice per week (but not more than 2 gallons!)with an eye for sharp design.
An Essential for Family of Four or More. This is a big saucepan!  I got it for Christmas because I needed a large saucepan shape with a long handle to make pralines.  This has become my favorite pot for many things; from cooking pasta to whipping up a large pot of chili on a cold night.  The see-through lid is great for monitoring food as it's cooking, and the second loop handle gives stability when carrying and pouring.  It is traditional Calphalon quality with a modern look, and I love it
beautiful!. I bought this as a gift for my mother who loves lenox - it's absolutely beautiful.  No complaints
Perfect!!. Thanks so much!!!!  This pad has a great variety and makes for cute scrapbooking pages!!!!
Best Bur Ginder for the Price. This grinder may be noisier than some others, but it stays clean and grinds a perfect grind each and every time. Excellent
Just like grandma used to make!. My daughter and I used the V5000 today for the first time.  It worked great!  Just like the one my family used for over thirty years (still do).  Very easy to cook and clean.  The basic recipe provided comes out to thick for me but it's easily altered.
OK toaster, not an oven. I bought this for the space-saving feature, which is terrific (and it looks good). I expected a toaster oven but it is really only a toaster -- it could use a little more power so that it would toast more quickly, but eventually it gets the job done
Great platter at a reasonable price... I recently added this platter to a collection of much higher priced serving dishes and it is the same quality as the others! The handles are just the right size and the glaze is very nice- true white, not bluish like some less expensive ceramics.Perfect size for a roast, ham or bunch of hor d'ourves
Try these!!. Started using these for a puppy, since I work irregular shifts.  Purchased a pad holder to stop her from shredding it.  Works great.  No leaky messes and very little smell.
Excellent Tool. Although this seems like an accessory that I could have done without, I am very, very please how useful this tool is.  It does a better job of picking up debris where the wall and the carpet meeting.  I also used it with Absorb carpet cleaner. In the past I was not able to get all of the carpet cleaner up, but I can when I use this tool
Powerfull little heater. This is a great heater, I got it for my girl friend who's room is in a cold basement. I never looked forward to having to endure her freezing room when I came to visit, so we got this heater and now her place is like sauna compared to before. I would highly recommend this heater
GORGEOUS. DURABLE, BEAUTIFUL WICKER HAMPERS THE BEST AND WHAT A SPECIAL PRICE, PAID $30., ANYWHERE ELSE YOU WILL HAVE TO PAY AT LEAST $80 BUCKS, THANK YOU AMAZON
I'm in Love With My Pots. My husband gave me a 9-piece set for Mother's Day last year, and I could not love these pots and pans more! The stews, roasts and braises I have made are delicious! I cook many curries (we love Indian) and the enamel holds up beautifully despite the turmeric. And, the grill pan does a great job making crispy bacon! I have the oval Dutch Oven, and am not sure what to do with it besides making a roast chicken with 40 cloves of garlic. But, I am sure I will come up with something! My set is red, which really brightens up my beige and black kitchen
Great buy. I agree with previous reviewers that the vacuum is noisy, but no noisier than my previous vacuum cleaners...they're supposed to be noisy.  The only problems I have are 1. that the hose does not stretch very far from the vacuum and 2. The hose does pop out every once in a while and I don't notice it until cat hair and debris is flying around the air instead of being deposited into the canister.  Other than these two issues, I have had this vacuum cleaner almost 3 years now and I like it.  The belt broke on it today, but this is the first time.  It has exceptional sucking power and the power spinning brush attatchment for the hose is excellent for picking up cat hair from the stairs and couches.  The warranty is the best I could find for this priced vacuum.  It also has a heppa filter.  All the features that come with this vacuum make it an awesome buy
No problems to report. Ok, cmon now.  It's a whisk and works well.  I own MANY oxo products and am pleased with almost all their products.  They all perform their function well and with style.  And they are also very comfortable to use thanks to the famous oxo nonslip rubber handle.  Seems very sturdily made and have had absolutley no problems.  I would hihgly reccommend
Great machine for the price. I bought this machine 2 years ago with the thought in mind that even if it worked for a while, we could see how much we would actually use an espresso machine and still not have to spend a lot of money. I worked in a coffee shop and was used to all the perks of a larger machine, but for "at home" use, this machine is great. It doesn't make double shots and you can't steam while making the shot or adjust the steam, but for the price, it's been well worth the money. We have used it at least once a week, more often 2 to 3 times a week for 2 years (making 2 to 4 drinks during each session). Just recently I did experience the same problem as described by others where the frother no longer works. I opened the machine up (only one screw on top under lid where you insert water resevoir) and sure enough the hose had come off. Replaced it and it's working again. Just some pointers, I do think it's very important to have the proper grind of coffee (I grind my own). Also important is a proper tamp and no coffee at all around the edge of the filter for a good seal. I even get a great crema. Cleaning of the machine is also important. I clean mine with a good wipe down of the nozzle and filter head after each session used and once in a while with a descaler, running it through the frother, as well as the filter.Maybe I just got lucky with this machine, but we have really enjoyed it and even if it quit working tomorrow, we've still gotten more than our money's worth
I love my broom vac. With cats comes cat hair.  I was tired of dragging the vacuum around and trying to suck up cat hair with a skinny hose.  This is the perfect answer to cat hair on hard wood, linoleum, and tile flooring in my house.  Works like a charm!!!  It is perfect for kitchen crumbs and lint dust on hard surfaces.  No more cat hair
Ridiculously Sharp!  Great value. This knife is ridiculously sharp and an amazing value for the price.  The fibrox handle feels great and the knife is NSF certified and dishwasher safe.  It also comes with a great knife protector/caddy.  This thing is almost too sharp to leave out and so I leave it in a drawer in the protector when not in use.  I have some other nice knives including some Henckels and a high qaulity Japanese Chef knife.  The only reason I didn't give the knife five stars is that it lacks the heft and is not as elegant looking as my other knives, however, it is just as sharp if not SHARPER!  I must admit that I haven't compared it to other boning knives as this is my first boning knife.We'll have to see how it holds up over time, but Victorinox provides a lifetime warranty, so I'm not worried.  I can't believe how nice this knife is for the price
Perfect for beginner and beyond. Whenever you add new tap water to your aquarium the chemistry of the water changes, these changes can be very harmful to the fish depending on how drastic they are. So it's recommended you do a 10-20% water change every week to your aquarium to help reduce chemicals like ammonia and dilute the nitrites etc. But the tap water also carries harmful chlorine and chloramine.Tetra AquaSafe removes both and enhances the stress coat produced by your fish, thus making it perfect to condition your aquarium. I've had no problems whatsoever with it, and it has greatly improved the overall health of my fish.I personally don't use it with every water change (although its recommended that you do) but that's usually based on the amt being added and the condition of my tap water.Use 5ml to treat 10ga
Fiesta Ware. I am a big fan of Fiesta ware.  I love the variety of colors and the cheer they add to my dinner table.  My husband even gets a kick out of the dishes!!  Enjoy!
great product. This is a great product to use when when need to clean the stairs or a small spill.
I LOVE this thing!. This is a great storage cabinet!  I looked around quite a bit before deciding on this one.  It was definately the cheapest of all I looked at and I think the best looking.  It's totally cute and very functional.  It's a cinch to put together - comes with very clear instructions and no tools are needed.  When it's empty it isn't very heavy and can easily be moved.  The 4 shelves are adjustable to different heights as well.
Great item!. This ice bucket is made of very thick glass and will accomodate quite a bit of ice.  The Cheers Martini Pitcher, as well as the Martini glasses really round out the set! I highly recommend this item. :
pretty good and long lasting and compact. very good booklight, only thing is battery to replace is on the expensive side. Compact and light. Last quite long.
Babies Too. I recieved this as a gift.  We have a very open floor plan with stairs.  Not a kid friendly house.  This gate has allowed me to block off wide openings so I can keep my 8 mo. old child in the living room, as part of the family, and not in a pen. It's great!  It's also sturdy enough that he pulls himself up with it and it doesn't slip or turn over
Fantastic tamper!!!!. This is the best tamper I had in a long time.  How did I ever manage without it?It works perfectly and I do not have to use much pressure.  I put it in the dishwasher and i am DONE,  Get it because you will be satisfied as well
wonderful -- designed for specific purposes. Don't plan on using this as an all-purpose crate.  Puppies will chew through it if you try to use it as a permanent training crate.  It wasn't intended to be treated as airline baggage.  I got it primarily to get my puppy through her first long car trip home.  I'm now using it as a safe way to take her on short trips and to train her to ride.  She seems to find it very secure, comfortable, and reassuring. It sets up and folds quickly and easily.  It is light and easy to handle, but very sturdy.  I use it mostly in the passenger seat of my car, but wouldn't mind putting it in the back with my adult dog -- something I wouldn't dream of with a hard metal crate.  The one time the puppy upchucked, the cleanup was trivial. The bottom pan is held in place by velcro; it got pulled out in a few seconds and then got hosed down.  The soft pad got hosed down and thrown into the washer and dryer.  I don't plan to use this more than a few months, but at the end of that time I expect to have a sturdy, confident and happy dog traveler
Riedel is the best in fine glassware. I've been using Riedel for years.  (Pronounced "REEdul") Their best line is handblown Austrian crystal and is called the "Sommelier" series.  VERY expensive, but peerless in quality and beauty.  The next line down is also very fine and is called the "Vinum" series.  My white wine glasses are from this series.  My red wine glasses are from the "Overture" series -- the Magnum glasses.  These are just the right size -- the Vinum can get quite large.  I also prefer a shorter stem, which these have.  I thought the Overture regular reds were a little too small for my taste (and smell!).Overture is a little more durable, MUCH cheaper, but not quite as elegant.  Still, they are very nice glassware and certainly nice enough to have for fine dining and guests.I would suggest you NEVER put ANY Riedel glassware in the dishwasher.  This is high quality Austrian crystal and it is definitely not a good idea to do that
Excellent Value. I own several All-Clad pans. I own the regular stainless and the copper core. I also have a high end stove at home with powerful burners. So I can tell you with some knowledge that this pot has performed excellently. Yes the rim sometimes is not the easiest to clean, but for the money, this is an excellent value and it has not let me down. It's a bit deep but caramelizing onions is easy, and simmering soup all day in it does not burn or gunk up the bottom. The steaming basket is wonderful and the pasta strainer is something I use all the time. The lid even fits my other All Clad pans. It may not be the same quality as other All Clad products but I can tell you it performs the same.
Zojirushi Air Pot. I have been using the Zojirushi Air Pot to store hot green tea. It looks sleek and beautiful on a table in my husband's antique shop and it keeps the tea hot and flavorful all day. I had been been worried that it might leak or drip after pouring but this has not been a problem. It is quite easy to clean, as well
A cute addition to my kitchen. It's not made in France but I guess it will do its job.
fabulous!. I LOVE this Pot!! It is now my favorite cooking item. I use it almost every time I cook and it is perfect. Clean up is easy and I leave it out because it is so beautiful.  Get Persimmon color -- you won't regret it
Beautifully manufactured and useful. This little steamer is perfect for small servings and, between uses, adds a nice decorative touch to the kitchen countertop
Pure luxury!. This is THE blanket!!! I have ordered several of the "micro-mink" type blankets, only to return them disappointed, but this one is the keeper, and the best by far!!!  I bought two of these, one for my son's bed and one for ours, and got a throw for the couch!  LOVE IT, LOVE IT, LOVE IT! You won't be disappointed with the softness, and the weight is slightly heavy, which I personally love.  Great blanket
stops the bark... seems to work for my little pug.  he was really scared when he was zapped the first few times, but now he wont bark when the collar is on, and when he's not wearing it he barks less.
AVERAGE. JUST GOT THIS, WASHED OK, NO COLOR RUN. THE TOWEL HAS A PRICE TAG OF $13.95 ON IT. I PAID $19.99. WOULD BE A GOOD BUY FOR $13.95. VERY AVERAGE, HAVE TOWELS FOR 10 BUCKS, SAME SIZE, ETC
Well worth the price of admission. I really like this item.  It's simple, but attractively so, and it's a really good deal.  Also, it's sturdy glass...it's got a good heft to it and it's not a shatter waiting to happen.  Think of it as the &quot;everyday&quot; decanter that you can use without fear while you're waiting for the perfect occasion to break out that nice, pricey Waterford job that you got for you wedding
Why didn't  I get one of these earlier?. I just got my Hoover Floormate yesterday and I LOVE it.  Now I don't cringe when my son crawls on the kitchen floors and I don't live in fear of him getting e-coli poisoning.  Now,to be realistic, you can't expect it to do jobs that require elbow grease, like caked on dirt, but it sure makes daily cleanup and maintenance a breeze! What I love is the fact that you don't need to drag out the vaccuum cleaner, mop and bucket, do the labor and then wait for the floor to dry or drag a bathtowel accross the floor.  It is incredibly easy to fill the unit, take it apart and clean it, and put it away.  Also, the older model is very reasonably priced, and I don't think the newer model is worth the extra money for the features.  This unit does the job
Pancakes anyone?. I bought this on a whim after my wife made the most delicious pancake breakfast using a large frying pan, it took what seemed forever having to cook them one at a time. Whith this baby she can make 3 large ones at a time, 2 loads an it's breakfast time! I grilled 6 talapia fillets ont it this evening, they came out great.For those of wondering whether or not it will fit in your dishwasher... it won't! But, with the nonstick coating, just sponge down and rinse while still warm, good as new!As a side note I'm kinda already sick of pancakes, but how can I tell her to stop making them witout her flipping out (pardon the pun)
Classy looking functional collar. I ordered this collar because I didn't like the looks/design of the kitty collars I found in the pet stores.  Also, at the time my kittens (I have two) were only 12 weeks old, so I was looking for a collar that would adjust with their growth.  I'm happy to report that this collar (I ordered two, in different colors) has been great.  Even the vet noticed the collar and remarked how neat it is.  The collar looks really sharp and has a nice sized metal loop for hanging an ID tag, etc. Both kittens took to this collar just fine (it was their first collar) and I have been able to let the collar out a bit as they've grown.  I also like the fact that there's no "extra collar" hanging out past the buckle -- the collar just forms a big loop around the kitty's neck.  The only issue I've had is one of the collars is a bit hard to adjust -- but overall I've been very pleased.
Great Crock Pot!. I like this crock pot. I haven't used the little one much, but I'm sure it will come in handy next time I'm serving a warm cheesy dip or melted chocolate. I love that the lid is clear so you can see what's going on in there. The "keep warm" feature is nice too, esp. if mealtime is later than you planned. Something kind of odd is that after you wash the crock pot and it dries there's always a white residue on it. I'm not sure what that's all about. But it's a good crock pot.
Revere Cookware. Revere makes great cookware if you stay away from their budget line.  This makes the second 3-quart that I own of theirs
Ultimate pepper grinder. I have purchased several other pepper grinders out there and this one is by far the best.It is inexpensive and can grind pepper at ease.This is a life saver when you are cooking and seasoning with large amounts of pepper, no more sore forearms from twisting or squeezing those unproductive pepper grinders out there. This thing rocks!
We are happy with this purchase. The pitcher retains the beverage temperature well. BAsed on th eonline image, we thought the colour would be a graded blue, to only discoevr the pitcher was a solid blue from top to bottom.We love the bright vibrant colour and find that it adds to our table at any meal
Great Item. I looked all over for a cutting board like this.  I almost didn't buy it because of the negative review on this site but I really needed one so I went ahead with the purchase.  This is an awesome item!  It does stand up to heavy use, you just need to bend the arms slightly to make them stay in place.  An added feature is that the bamboo is water-repellent and very hard.  I would highly recommend this cutting board
CUSINART  FEATURES LESS THAN OLDER MODELS. WE HAVE OWNED THE 12 CUP MAKER AND WE REALLY NEEDED THE 14 CUP FEATURE SO BOUGHT THIS MODEL.WE HAVE ONLY OWNED CUISNART BRAND COFFEE MAKERS FOR THE PAST 8 YEARS.    ON THIS MODEL WE WERE DISAPOINTED1.WE MISS THE CONTROL OF TEMPATURE PLATE FEATURE  TO KEEP YOUR COFFEE ON LOW,MED OR HOT. 2. ALSO WE NOTICED THAT GROUNDS SPLASH UP ONTO TO INSIDE TOP COVER AND PLUGS THE HOLES WHERE THE WATER SPRAYS OUT FOR BREWING THE COFFEE AND WE HAVE THE CLEAN THEM OUT. BUT OVER ALL WE LOVE  CUSINART
We like the dishes. We are very pleased with our purchase, we were able to get them much cheeper through amazon than anywhere else. It pays to shop around! as some items that amazon had were more or the same as in the department stoeres.We purchased these dishes for their durability
Great Tasting Coffee!. Because this coffeemaker was unavailable for a while I was waiting for it with some anticipation. My patience was well rewarded with some fine tasting cups of coffee!It does take a little longer to make coffee than my Mr Coffee machine. The cleanup is a little longer, too. But the difference in taste is worth it. There are limits on the advantages of convenience...However it is important to use a coarse grind of coffee. If the grind is too fine, or if the grind includes too much "dust" then the filter will clog. The coffee then never makes the trip down the tube and just sort of sits there, betwixt and between. So just remember to use the right grind and you will be very happy with your Bodum Santos.I also use a Cory glass filter rod instead of the plastic filter included with the Bodum Santos. The plastic one works just fine but the glass filter looks so cool. (The caveat about coarse grind applies to the glass filter rod as well.)Try it! You'll like it
It works. I bought this because it was rated highly by 'america's test kitchen', and it was available for a good price. I have never owned an immersion blender before so I cannot compare to others. The model I bought does not have accessories, but I don't think they are necesary. The reviews I read, mention that this has a strong motor, and the stainless shaft does not stain like plastic. The only problem I have is finding a place to put it when not using it
Chicago Cutlery Walnut 9 pc Block set. Very impressive set.  Excellent quality, sturdy, good value for dollar spent, and offers a nice assortment of knives for general kitchen use.Dav
The ULTIMATE pillow. This is the only pillow I have ever found, regardless of price, that gives me complete sleeping comfort. This pillow and I go back many, many years and I could not find it again in retail stores.  Today I received only two (what was I thinking?) from Amazon and immediately ordered two more for our cabin.  This is a "No Brainer Buy."  Sweet dreams
LOVE it - been using this for 3 years now!. The Bonjour coffee press was mentioned in a magazine (maybe Esquire?) as a top pick and after a little more research, we purchased an 8-cup version.  We (and our dinner guests) loved it so much, we decided to get the 12-cup version.Here's why we like it:1) The container looks really nice on the table.  We get lots of compliments on it.2) We've had it for over 3 years now, use it daily, and haven't had a single problem.  I've read about glass shattering or burning yourself w/other models, but we've been fine.  We often put it in the top rack of our dishwasher on the normal dishwashing cycle, too.3) It's fairly easy to clean, all the parts unscrew if you want to give it a thorough washing.4) As with probably all French presses, we feel like we get more flavor per scoop of coffee.  Delicious coffee!!Here are some tips:1) We grind our coffee at the store on the "French press" setting so it's coarser.  We measure the coffee scoops, but not really the water anymore since you get used to just looking at the color of the mixture or how far you normally fill it.  We use a wooden spoon (wooden chopsticks and bbq skewers also work well) to stir the grinds/water mixture - this helps prevent the glass from breaking if you accidentally hit the glass.2) I'd recommend getting this larger 12-cup version.  As mentioned in the product description it comes out to 4-5 mugs of coffee - this is because the "cups" they refer to are really teacup sized.  This is true for all brands when they say "12-cup," not just Bonjour.  The larger size gives you flexibility to make a little or a lot depending on your needs.3) You can also use this for steeping tea.  Handy with the loose leaf teas that aren't in bags since you can just press it down at the end
Great Gadget. I have two of these that I got late last year.  They have worked perfectly for four months and I have yet to replace the batteries.   Since it is battery powered it doesn't have cords causing "counter clutter". It is also easy to move around.  I have tried lots of storage methods for my coffee beans and this is easily the best
Classic Design. These days most people choose an elegant open-stock stainless steel flatware pattern for both their formal and casual placesettings. This Mikasa Italian Countryside pattern is an enduring classic that matches the Mikasa white stoneware line with the same name, and it also goes well with BIA white porcelain and Mikasa Libretto stoneware placesettings. This four-piece Hostess Set includes a cold meat fork, serving spoon, pierced serving spoon, and gravy ladle. You'll probably want to add some open-stock serving pieces to this set, such as more serving spoons and forks. This flatware has a nice feel, good balance, lovely design, and is made of heavy-duty 18/10 gauge stainless steel. It's dishwasher-safe, and it keeps its gleaming finish for a long time. Many people like to keep their sets of 'good' stainless flatware in wooden chests and use less costly patterns for everyday dining. I've been using Mikasa flatware for more than ten years, and I think it's comparable in every way to Oneida
Excellent. I love this rice cooker. I never thought the rice would taste as good as mine, but it did. Even my children approve. I haven't used the other features yet but hope to soon
Great Buy. This comforter is an amazing deal for the money.  While it does seem thin, it is incredibly warm and works quite well.  If you are looking for a warm comforter for a bargain price, I highly recommend it.  You won't find anything like it
Does the job!. I got one of these for Christmas and I love it. Great for small jobs (picking up litter, hair, dust). We've even used it in our cars. Charging is convenient, too. No bulky cradle to worry about mounting on the wall, there is just a plug. Also, I was happy to see that replacement filters were available both from Black and Decker AND Amazon should I need them
Excellent!. We love this vaccum!  It works really well, and shows all the disgusting, icky dirt that was collected... which, sadly, never seems to end! If only it would keep the dirt from coming back!  ha ha
I love this!!!  Great gift idea. This makes the best Americano's I have ever had, better than Starbucks!!!!  It takes a few uses to get the pot primed and then you are in business.  The cost of the pot has off set the cost I would have spent at the local coffee shop.  The only complaint I have, if you do not get a good seal when you put the pot together, the gasket sometimes leaks and you have coffee splatering.
Just perfect!. I snatched the last two boxes last night. This works perfect with my tall, rust color, iron headboard and my high mattress. I was afraid they would be too small but they're actually of a decent size for a nightstand. The drawer looked flimsy on the display at the store, but after a quick 15 min assembly at home I could see a pretty sturdy piece of furniture. The drawer looked &amp; worked great.  Best of all, PRICE... something similar would have cost me at least $100 @ Pottery Barn.
Great knives, but watch out lefties!. I agree with all of the accolades given to this paring knife by other reviewers.  It's razor sharp and a work of art.  However, it is designed for a right handed person, which shouldn't be surprising given that it's designed and made in Japan.  As you may have guessed, I'm left-handed.  Most people don't realize how many products are designed for righties and the challenges this presents for lefties.  The asymmetry on this isn't so severe that I won't be able to use it, largely because it is so small.  The "D" shape described in the product info isn't quite accurate, there is a ridge running down the right side of the handle, designed to fit in the crease of your hand.  That ridge hits the middle of my thumb when I hold the knife in  my left hand.This knife is great, but I won't be able to get a larger version unless they do away with the  "D-shaped Pakkawood handle; comfortable offset steel bolster" or make a left-handed version
Great Milk Frother. I love this product. I purchased a nespresso leCube. I wanted an espresso machine that made great espresso and was a breeze to clean up after. I have had espresso machines before, but I hated cleaning up the milk steamer and such, and I prefer my espresso straight up. So, my use of a milk steamer was occassional. This Aeroccino is perfect. Easy to use, easy to clean. Fill it to the line with milk, choose the attachment to heat the milk or froth it. Push the button. It stops automatically after a minute. Its easy to clean, run it under the faucet, a little dish soap, that it. No mess, no fuss. Highly recommended, especially as an accessory to the Nespresso LeCube
THE BEST BIG DOG TOY EVER. We have a 65 pound lab/husky mix.  She manages to destroy soft toys, vinyl toys, rope toys, squeaker toys, chew bones...just about everything in under 20 minutes. (especially if left unsupervised)  She has 3 of these large, red kong toys that have lasted for over a year!  They are the best toys for large, aggressive chewers.  The kong spray that you can purchase to spray inside the toy made our dog sick.  We have since learned that many other brand-name treats also fit inside the toy if you squash it a little bit
Great Machine. I have been using this mill for 5 years and expect to be using it in 20 more years.  I bake 1 loaf of bread twice a week with flour I grind at the same time.  The bread is simply the best we have ever found and fresh.  The machine is very, very loud but it gets through enough flour for a loaf of bread in 2 minutes, no big deal.  Others are more quiet but this excels in quality and ease of use
good buy. We thought this was very handy storage.  It holds all our video equiptment just right
A Great Food Processor. I bought this as a gift for my wife for Christmas and she absolutely loves it.  She couldn't believe the price that I got it for given the size and blades.  After reading other reviews of this and a Black & Decker, I chose the Hamilton Beach.  We have already used it quite a bit and no problems at all.  The suction cups on the bottom hold the machine firmly in place.  Overall, a great purchase
Really makes the brush roll move. I broke the belt of the vacuum when I first tried it. Replacing was easily done and now it works prefect, but that's not what baffled me. It arrived the day after I ordered it. I didn't have to go one day without a working vacuum
Best cat toy ever!. This toy is great, it keeps them occupied for hours.  I can not recommend it highly enough.  It can be an interactive toy, you can just put it on the floor and leave them to themselves, or you can mount it to a wall and watch them play with it for hours.  We have gone through quite a few of these with our cats, and they are always an easy gift for friends' cats.  Buy one and see
Great Product. I just received this set of cookware and found it to be one of the best I have ever used.  I will keep them forever
Hey, jerx- it works!. To be honest, I haven't used it all that much.  It gives off a fair amount of light, though, sort of like a miniature street lamp.  Usually, if my wife gets up in the middle of the night to pee- she's pregnant, so she gets up in the middle of the night to pee a lot- and I happen to be awake, I'll roll over and grab the Mighty Bright and guide her way into the bathroom with it.  It's pretty good for that.  Don't get me wrong- it's good for reading, too, I just haven't done much reading lately.  Maybe I've given up
Presto & It's Done!. Love my pressure cooker. Had another Presto for 30 years. Bought an electric one last year, & promptly threw it in the garbage when this one arrived! Can't beat them
Good quality and nice looking tank. I purchased this tank 9 months ago and have been fairly happy with it. It looks nice. I love the rounded corners which look much better than the glued glass panes. The acrylic material is still holding up, but I am a lot more careful cleaning it than with glass. The only problem I've had with this unit is a rattling noise that seems to come from the hood. It can be quite for 10 minutes to a couple of days. Then it starts rattling. I adjust the hood and it goes away. Lately, in the last couple of weeks the pump has started with some serious rattling which I can't get rid of. It annoys me and I am sure the fish are even more annoyed. I cleaned the impeller and every surface of the pump, but without luck. So I think I have to go buy a new pump
Love this knife tray. It's substantial and attractive.  The knives are off the countertop and beautifully stored.  Thank you
Simple and hard worker. Very good Snow maker. It works perfectly and easy to use and clean.Just if I could desire something else to this perfect machine, maybe a 110/220V converter would be very useful, to be used anywhere in the world.Excellent purchase, Thanks Amazon
I give it 4 stars for its handiness... I have not had a chance to use my cereal dispenser, but I do look forward to using it.  I, too, was not very satisfied with the color.  I was expecting a white dispenser, which would have matched my kitchen appliances, and I got the creamish, off white dispenser.  I learned a few techniques from the other reviews on how to use the dispenser to avoid crushing my cereal.  I will check back at a later date and rate how my family and I like it.  I definitely love the idea of not using cereal boxes and having to worry about if my husband or son will close the sack appropriately so the cereal will remain fresh.  That was a definitely plus for me.I guess I will see how things go!!
My mini pins favorite thing. First let me say I have tried lots of beds for my dog and she hasnt been jazzed by any of them but this one was a hit out of the ball park!I have this on my bed for her to sleep in it.....That she can cuddle under the top is heaven to a dog who prior to this would try and crawl up my pajamas everynight.  I guess that makes it heaven to me too :)Its nice and soft and cuddly - lots of cushioning....  Its probably the thing I bought for my little Ginger that she actually likes more than I do
Verry Good. Very nice product. Some people complainted about the amount of noise it makes, i really didn't notice that much noise.Maybe i got used to it really quickly or something buuut its really not bothersome.Fridge looks great and can be set VERY cold to possibly be used as a freezer (not sure tho, havnt tried yet). Only complaint is that standard beer bottles dont fit vertically, you have the lie them on their side. but thats really not a big deal.Very happy i bought this.
Don't Be Surprised. Don't be surprised if you order this item and it doesn't come for a year! I ordered this item in April and it is now July and I have yet to see it.  The delivery date keeps getting pushed back month after month. . .
great heat conduction. This product is excellent when used wiht the matching 4 1/2 quart sauce pot.  It conducts heat extremely well and my chocolate chips melted much faster than with other double boilers
great at the price. I am very pleased with this product, for the price I paid for it. It is sturdier than I expected, can hold a somewhat surprising amount of laundry (small items on the lower rods, bigger things on the upper), and folds remarkably flat.An optimal dryer might be shaped to make sure rods aren't quite so on top of each other so that things hanging down don't drip onto other things, but that's a small complaint: I repeat, I feel I got an excellent bargain on this drying rack
EXCELLENT product for what it's intended to do. Sadly I bought this item from a link in google that took me to Amazon and didn't list all the sources ON Amazon that sold it.  I ended up paying $15 or so more than necessary for it, since Their price was more than Target's SHIPPED price.  I bought it at Beach Audio, through Amazon for $33.07 with a shipping charge of $14.35, for a final price of $47.42.  Had I realized I should have RE-searched on Amazon for the brand and model number I would have found it from Target at the $25 listed price and shipping under $7!!! A substantial savings.HOWEVER, sad as I am that I could have saved a few of my Social Security bucks, I'm totally amazed at the job this tiny fan is doing for me.  Here's my situation, and though I'm sure yours is quite different, you can see the value of the appliance:I'm a retired person, living upstairs in a tiny living quarters with someone else living downstairs who is in control of the heating and cooling of the house.  During the fall and spring when it's nice outside, the house heat is turned on and migrates upward to become trapped in my tiny living quarters.  If I open a window, the heat goes out and the heating system comes back on to make more, I'm sure this causes their electric bill to skyrocket.  I found that if I become uncomfortable, I can close my door and my air conditioning vent and crack a window for fresh air, allowing the heat transmitted through the floor to warm the room.  This works pretty well, but sometimes not much air comes in the window... and occasional birds and insects to find their way in.The little Honeywell fit one of my windows perfectly and can be set to quietly blow air in and out at the same time, and it's thermostatically controlled so it can hold the room at exactly the temperature I like.  If I want to smoke a cigar or my pipe, I can set it to exhaust through both fans, or to circulate in and out faster, so I don't have to worry about poluting the air throughout the house (be sure the door and a/c vent are closed before doing this, they WILL notice :).The fan blades are plastic, but well enough made so the low setting is not objectionable at all.  I had tried a 20" box fan to exhaust air before, but that was extremely noisy even at the lowest setting.  The low setting on this one makes no more noise than my computer fan and still moves air so well I immediately feel the fresh air.I paid too much for it, but it's worth twice the price to me.  I'm a happy old man and very pleased with my purchase.  I hope it lasts a long time
Love it. The knives we got for our wedding 7 years ago had become dangerously dull.... no more!  I had been wary of ruining our expensive knives with a do-it yourself sharpener, but after reading the Cooks Illustrated review of this sharpener, I was convinced.  It's great, and my knives are once again nice and sharp
Wok Assistant. If you own a carbon steel wok, you may as well add this spatula to your cooking tools.  It works much better than a long handled metal spoon and is certainly safer than using a standard stainless spatula.  Instead of stirring the food around the pan, the spatula helps to toss the food around and get it up on the sides of the wok.  It also allows you to scoop out more food than a spoon or regular spatula.  I considered purchasing another wok spatula but the handle had an angle that made it appear to be better suited for scooping and flipping burgers on the grill rather than stir frying.  Speaking of handles, the one on this spatula may work itself loose after a few uses.  If this happens, you will need to bang it against a hard surface to reposition it.  I originally gave this 5 stars because I hadn't experienced the handle coming off.  I still think it works pretty good but would rather give it 3 stars
Gr-r-r-r-reat Opener. This wine opener is absolutely amazing!   I bought it after I saw it on one of the morning shows never expecting it to be as good as they said.  However I was totally surprised.  I've tried many different openers and always wound up with cork in the wine or the whole cork pushing down into the bottle.  It works very well on both regular corks and synthetic corks.  I have successfully removed the cork every time I used it, which is fairly often.  I plan on buying a couple for Christmas presents for people who are hard to buy for.  Don't think twice, buy it
Comfy neck pillow. I overheard a flight attendant raving about the Neckbones and also saw it reviewed highly in Shape magazine.  I still have not tried it in the car or on a flight, but am excited to.  It does feel comfortable, though is bigger than expected, so pay attention to the dimensions before you buy
Great Fence System. This is a great fence system, very easy to use and set up. Our dogs picked up on it in no time. The collars get good battery life (about 4mo if your dog doesn't need a correction very often) and the design of the wireless system makes it much more difficult for a dog to escape than an underground fence. Power outages are handled well. A sudden loss of signal doesn't issue a correction to the pet. This only occurs with the gradual reduction in signal strength as the animal moves out of range of the transmitter. Fluffy won't get zapped if the lights go out.My only small complaint is that I wish I could still purchase the original collar that shipped with this unit when it first came out. I know the newer collars are supposed to be better, but the original ones used a much easier to find and inexpensive battery
The classic mug -- for coffee only. Everyone I know is fixated on making the perfect cup of coffee. But let's face it: a lot of the coffee you will drink for the rest of your life will be average or below. That is where this mug comes in. Originally designed for diners and other cheap restaurants, this mug has history and tradition behind it. Virtually any coffee will taste better in this mug. The color is right -- off-white. The shape is right -- love those slightly concave sides. And the heft, the weight, is perfect. You won't be knocking this puppy over easily. Get six of these so that you always have one clean in your cupboard. Oh, and if you are a tea drinker also (like me), don't even think of drinking tea from one of these. For coffee consumption only
Kitchenaid Silicone Basting Brush. Works as advertised, no more bristles falling out on the food or stained brushes in the kitche
Beautiful but very delicate. They are elegant pieces, but be very careful with them. I broke one the first time I washed it by hand. The stem snapped in half
Super appliance. I couldn't be more pleased with this remanufactured product.  It exceeds my expectations for both quality and ease of use.  Any negative reviews have to be biased by some very isolated situation.  We have used both the griddle and the panini/grill.  It makes absolutely wonderful burgers, chicken, sausages and sandwiches.  The ease it clean-up is nothing short of amazing.  This was a real bargain and I advise anyone who is thinking about it to grab it
The Perfect Scoop!. I ordered this machine in anticipation of David Lebovitz' new book of ice cream recipes, coming out any day now, "The Perfect Scoop". He used it to test all his recipes. I have looked at machines with built in chiller compressors in the past but they have always been out of the price range that I wanted to spend for a "not so often" used kitchen gadget. The Amazon price for the remanufactured unit solved that. The best thing is that you can now make several flavors back to back and not need to wait a day to refreeze the chiller insert that has been taking up too much space in your freezer. This model is far superior and not that much more money. Granted,it is loud and takes up  a lot of counter space, but David's recipes are getting rave reviews. I am using it all the time now and ordered a second machine already to lend to friends and family.  How is that for a stellar endorsement!
Sweepa FURemover brush. I received my combo package of FURemover brush, mini brush and mitt combo. I'm not terribly impressed with the mitt but the brush is the best thing I've even tried for picking up pet hair. My yellow lab has been shedding like mad with hair absolutely coating her pet bed. I took the brush to the bed and it swept hair right up into piles which I was able to vacuum up. I had been trying everything and this is the quickest, easiest and most efficient means of removing pet hair I've ever seen
Really Works - Wish I Had Bought it Sooner. I bought this item when I had to replace my microwave and I was hoping to reduce 'microwave smell' - that funky tomato sauce smell that blows out from microwaves after too many spatters. You can clean out a microwave, but you can't clean behind the vent grids, and that is where splatters go and live forever, in pungent biomass. So I figured the food would blow out the vent hole of the cover and splat the roof of my oven, but reduce the problem. We use the oven mostly for reheating and melting. This cover exceeded my expectations.1. It fits my tiny Sharp R-209KK 800 watt oven - a bit of an overhang but it has never fallen off the platter.2. No discernable splatters even on the roof of my oven, which I wipe out every day! The steam vent (not a finger hole) on top releases the pressure at the top where steam rises. Even pyrex casseroles with glass lids are not as good because pressure builds, the lid lifts from the steam, and they shoot hot liquid in all directions.3. Food cooks better. We used to use paper towel, or another dish to cover the food. Here food cooks in a moist environment and doesn't 'explode' as much because of the steam regulation from the clever top vent. Paper towel would always slide off or sink into the food and cook into the food and let food blast out the edges.4. The cover doesn't get very dirty. I guess because food explodes less it is easy to clean by dunking in my dishpan and rinsing. Nothing has baked onto this lid.5. The food keeps better. If it is done cooking, I can leave the food in the microwave because the lid keeps it from drying out.6. It works great on taller containers that still fit under the circle. I have Rubbermaid microwave containers that are about 5 inchers tall and 5x5 inches at the base. I can set this lid on top of the container. The vent hole keeps the contents from blowing and protects the oven.The hole on top is not a finger hole. Use pot holders to remove anything from a microwave. Be defensive. It only takes one mishap to land a surprise burn. Never assume a spot is safe to touch.I note the comments about breakage. I wonder if that is from dishwasher heat? I find rigid plastic dishes cannot take the hot water treatment without becoming brittle, and often become opaque and crack, so I am hand washing which is easy because it hardly gets dirty. Dunk, swipe, rinse.I saw the cheap Chinese imitations. I will stick with American made plastics for food prep and save a job too. Nordic Ware is a great innovative companyAnd hey, if your food is piled higher than the cover you need something else.
Top of the line... OK. Admittedly, I don't do much of the cooking around the house, but my wife makes great soups using this Thermal Pot.Now... I'm not giving this pot a 5 out of 5 rating because of the great soups. I'm giving it because IF you use this cooking pot correctly, it will save you time and energy.When I first met my wife, she owned one of these pots (which she bought many years before in Hong Kong). It was also a Zojirushi. However, she got careless one day and left it on the stove while going to bed. Needless to say, she destroyed the pot. (Can't blame the pot for that) She claimed that under normal use... She would leave it on the stove top BOILING for 1/2 an hour and then put it into the thermal container before going to bed. In the morning, it would still be boiling (or close to boiling) and the soup would be great.So.... The pot was destroyed. She decided to buy another, but could no longer find a Zojirushi (They don't sell them in Canada) She decided to buy a Shuttle Chef. Crap! The soup was barely warm in the morning. She thought she made an error and didn't boil it long enough. Next time she tried... Same thing. It couldn't retain the heat. Well... it was just a matter of time before she left that pot on the stove before going to bed and completely destroyed that pot as well. (Oh... By the way, I have smoke alarms that don't work I found out that night!)Anyway... to put this long story to rest, I found this Zojirushi thermal cooking pot on Amazon that almost resembled her original pot. I decided to buy it as a Christmas present for my wife. She was estatic and started to use it immediately. (This time I always check the stove before going to bed myself!) Anyway.... We placed the pot in the thermal container overnight and... voila! A steamy hot pot in the morning, just like it's suppose to be.This pot will work if used properly. A lot of people make the mistake of taking the pot off of the stove immediately when the contents boil. This is not sufficient time for the bottom plates to store the heat. (There are 3 layers on the bottom) You must leave it on the stove top for 1/2 an hour (while boiling) and this will ensure continual heat while inside the thermal container.Wow... I wrote quite a bit!Anyway, Here's the summary:Zojirushi - 5 stars (if used properly)Shuttle Chef - 1 star (even if you use it properly)Boiling on stove for 1/2 an hour before placing in thermal pot - GOOD.Leaving pot on stove overnight - BAD
What a great idea!. I've only had this french press for about a week, but so far I love it. I keep it at work so I can avoid the swill that passes for coffee in the lunchroom. I can't attest to the mug's leakproof-ness since I don't actually travel with it, but it is very convenient to be able to brew and drink from the same cup. The stainless steel mug does a nice job of keeping coffee hot for a long time. This is worth the extra money over the plastic french presses, definitely
Nice but a bit overpriced. I love the yarn but after I bought it from Amazon, I found the same yarn for less at a craft store chain
Nice Quality Daybed Bedding Set. The quality is very good however the "uni-pillow" cover is longer than the two king pillows suggested to put in it so it sags in the middle.  Not sure if one of those "uni-pillows" would work better. The shipping time took about 3 weeks which was consistant with the shipping time listed.  The packinging showed a different daybed cover set than what I purchased and received so I was concerned at first that I was shipped the wrong order but it turned out fine.
Hoover Fold Away Bagless Upright Vacuum. Wonderful product.  Fast service.  Highly recommend this item
Seems to work. within 10 minutes of plugging this in, it turned my Maine Coon attack cat into a pansy.  I can now pet is stomach without losing an arm.  He is much more affectionate and passive.  Works for me
Best product for a quick dinner. I have one for myself and bought this for a friend of mine. He said it was the best birthday present he had ever received. I use this every single day to mince garlic and onions (so nice to not have to cry my way into dinner making), grind up leftover meat for pasta sauce (for that bolognese kind of meal). It is the best. No matter what the chefs on Food Network say about doing everything with excellent knife work, some times you just need a helping hand
Kone Cordless Hand Vac - Blue. Great handy little device.  Very pleased with the way it works on cleaning up small jobs
excellent product. product was exactly as described. beautiful and obvious quality.  very satisfied with transactio
Durable and functional. T-Fal is a unique non-stick treatment that out-performs and outlasts all others.  The pan heats evenly and does not warp like inferior pans.
Wonderful Sheets - Good Price. These sheets are extremely nice and I am very pleased with them.  They fit my older mattress well but are made so they would also work for a deeper pocket.  They do wrinkle some when washed but still remained soft. Great value for the price and I would definitely buy these again
Great Product, Happy Wife. This mixer has proven to be as good or better than she had thought it might be.  She has already made a lot of different baked goods much more easily than before.  She loves it, so I recommend it
More Than One Way to Fry a Donut. I'm a proud celiac chick from Finland, but I'm also a lover of homemade donuts. Now, for those of you who don't know what celiacs are, we can't eat any wheat or gluten. In plain-speak (no, I'm not implying you're stupid), we can't eat flour. It runs along the lines of an allergy, although the experts will gladly look down their noses and tell you it is NOT.So how the heck do I eat donuts when they're made completely of flour? The answer is my cooking angel, Bette Hagman, who wrote up a donut recipe in one of her books, More from the Gluten Free Gourmet. Anyway, I use that recipe. However, I don't use this donut mold like I'm supposed to. No, I don't do baked donuts-what's a donut if you don't do the indulgent full-fat thing?I put the batter into three of the molds at a time, tip it into the oil, and I deep fat fry those little suckers. And god, are they good! So, my ultimate point here is that this donut mold is extremely useful, in more ways than one. So grab one--especially if you're a celiac--and put your imagination and cooking skills to work
Best mini food processor. I read the reviews on this product.  I have to totally agree it is the best little processor for ease of use, size, clean up, storage and price. I use it almost everyday
great knives. I love these knives.  Nice balance and well made.  Very solid and they sharpen up nicely with little effort.  It might be my fault for washing them in the dishwasher, but after a year I noticed little rust spots that began to appear.  It will break my heart when and if they become too rusty to use
Very durable! Money well spent!. I have a purebred ladrador, who is a strong chewer and destroys almost every toy I have bought her within DAYS (3 days max). This toy, however, is VERY durable! I bought it about 3 months ago and there isn't a rip or hole on it. It has a high pitch squeak to it when the dog (or you) squeezes the ball. It definitely gets my dogs attention!!! I really like this ball over other balls I have bought, mainly because this one has feet. With feet, you can never predit where it will bounce or where it will decide to go. It keeps my dog guessing and she loves playing fetch with it. I am so happy so my purchase-- it's perfect for destructable puppies and adult dogs
Fantastic Blender. This is an absolutely fantastic blender. Runs smoothly and is quiet! I love the glass container too. Don't let the "factory-reconditioned" scare you. My blender came without a scratch or blemish; looks absolutely brand new and works like a dream! This is the second KA factory-reconditioned product I've bought from Amazon and both products have been superb and much higher than my expectations! I don't think you will be disappointed with purchasing the blender
It works as a replacement. I had to decide whether to get a whole new coffeemaker when the carafe broke, and did the usual search for a replacement.  I bought this one and was able to keep my $100 investment.  Items like this are hard to find locally (one hardware store was going to order it from a supplier and have it shipped to them), and are often way overpriced in specialty shops.  Being able to order online is a huge convenience and I probably will just do it next time instead of going through the brick and mortar search
Unfair Rating. I took a chance and ordered this quilt set, it is much prettier , nicer in person the colors are slightly darker, tan back ground fabric patterns in blues,browns w/small pink roses in tan fabric. I haven't washed it but it looks well made (although not hand made)very happy.
Very nice for the price!. My husband put this table together in under 15 minutes, and it is very nice for the price. We have it displayed in our living room, and it goes really well with our safari theme. Now if only I could find a similiar sofa/console table, I'd be good to go
Must Have. Accessory for the LED version of Zelco's excellent "itty bitty booklight".  Assure brightest light and eliminates need to change batteries every few days.
Wonderful Toaster!. This toaster is great!  It's a real space saver with big toaster power.  This seller is wonderful too.  Packed with care and received quickly and safely!  A+ to all
The copper's nice but the plastic isn't. These copper canisters are handsome but there are some caveats needing mention.  First, the so-called "vacuum-seal" stated in its description is a misnomer.  There is no suctioning force to remove the air from the canisters.  If the seal was actually rubber, they would have worked more easily.  But this seal is a hard plastic cup-like ring that extends down from the lid to mate with the interior brim of the canister, and the lids would not function if you were to remove them like I wanted to.Next Problem:  The lids again-now they're too tight!   I have to hold the canister against my chest to pull it off--not convenient.  This means the contents of the canister might jerk up and out when it pops open. Quirkiness given, it should still keep the bugs out better than any loose ceramic set.The company is named Old Dutch, but these are made in China... (not the Netherlands.)Additionally, the canisters have no labeling like "Sugar" or "Flour" or a designated place for a label--another inconvenience.  Brass labels would have added character.For the 40 dollars, these 4 copper cans will still function and sit pretty no matter where you put them.  And, if you want them mostly for that, with just some occasional use, you have found an eligible set.
Amazing coffee, but with some small inconveniences. First, there is a HUGE difference in making coffee with a bladed grinder vs a burr grinder. The first pot I made with this Krups, I was hooked. The appliance is pretty easy to use, and it looks sharp too. Here are the downsides:- Coffee does stick to the plastic container that holds the ground coffee, which can make it difficult to operate without at least a little coffee not falling on your counter.- During grinding, the beans will get hung up in the hopper, causing the motor to whine a little because no beans are being ground. I just pick the device up and shake it, which remedies the problem.- The grind is a bit finer than I expected, and the coarseness adjuster doesn't seem to do a whole lot of adjusting.BUT, again, the coffee is wonderful! It's not a perfect burr grinder, but for the money, and impeccable coffee, I'm willing to deal with the other slight drawbacks
Counter Top Trash Can Looks Great. I got this trash can to put on the counter next to my coffee maker for discarded Sweet & Low packages. I love how it fits in with my black and stainless appliances. The item itself works pretty good for the most part. The only issue I have found with it is the lid fits loosely on the base and slides off when putting something in it. to remedy the issue, I am planning to drill a tiny hole in the sides and out a tiny hand screw on each side of the lid to hold it firmly in place.I'm not sure if a review is the appropriate forum to mention that actually finding this item or one like it on the web was very difficult to locate. Perhaps additional keywords can be added to the item to make it easier to find. I used search terms like "mini trash can," counter top trash can," "small waste basket," small stainless steel trash can," but none of these got me to this item. I'm not sure how my husband finally found it.
Very nice. I am very pleased with this fryer.  It heats up quickly and does a great job frying foods.  Unlike most consumer grade fryers, this one barely blinks when you drop a basket of frozen fries.  Other fryers 'choke,' lose so much heat and take so long to recover temperature that foods get soggy and clump together.  Not with this baby.  I used a coupon, got free shipping and there was a rebate for a stainless oil storage cannister.  This was a great deal
Milling Grains. This is an excellent product and it makes wonderful flours from whole grains.  We make fresh whole grain breads, pancakes, and other foods with this mill.  It is noisy and a bit messy but it is worth every penny.  I wish it were built with stainless steel rather than plastic.  I am concerned about durability but so far it seems to hold up very well.  Freshly ground flours are so much healthier for you than store bought that have a limited shelflife. If you want your family to eat healthy, I highly recommend this product.
Works great, remember to clear by spraying upside down until clear. This works great, put your favorite oil in, pump and spray.  This doesn't produce as fine of mist as Pam spray, but it still produces a nice even coat.  A little more blotchy than Pam, but I get straight oil, none of the stuff they put in Pam.Don't forget to clear the nozzle when done by holding the spray bottle upside down and spray until the pressure is gone.  This will clean out the intake tube and prevent the dribbling as the 1 star poster mentioned.  Do this in the sink so you don't make a mess.  It is also a good idea to clean this occasionally, run some soapy water through it and then rinse until no soap comes out the nozzle.I am very happy with the Misto oil sprayer, and it works great for bread baking.  This doesn't work great for keep the bread from sticking to the a deep bread pan (use Pam or equivalent for this, works better), but it is great for misting the top of the loaves to prevent them from drying during proofing.  I reach for my Misto almost every time I cook
Swing Away Wall Can Opener. It's the best.  I ordered two to replace the two that had worn out (but only after years of faithful service) . . . One for my home and one for our summer hideaway.This made me think what a great (practical) gift this would make. . . included with it some canned goods for the newly weds . . . they'd thank me some day.  :
Beautiful. These little plates are so special.  I love them, they add charm to my kitchen.Great seller, will use again
Just what I have been looking for!!!. I have had the more well-known travel mugs, and thought that they were the best.  Well, I was wrong.  This travel mug is by far the best out there.  It is truly leak-proof.  My friends get tired of me turning it upside down (I guess I'm easily amused hehe), but I really do like a mug that won't spill if tipped over.  When turned to the drink side, the liquid flows at about the right rate, not too fast, not too slow.  Anyway, I can't say enough about this mug, and the price also beats the competition
I love them. These spoons are great.  They have the heft of a wooden spoon and, to me, they feel very similar.  They do not stain, you can throw them in the dishwasher and you can safely soak them if something gets dried/caked on.  I plan to buy another set and put the rest of my wooden spoons out to pasture
Kitchen Aid 16 Piece  Cutlery Set. This set is a great addition to my kitchen.  It's functional and adds a great red accent to the countertop, matching my other KitchenAid appliances.  I highly reccommend it
"5-year" warranty? How 'bout 28 years?. Yep, the 1978-vintage original from college is still kickin'.Of course there are now others for the lake house a couple for camping, the cars, etc. Who knows how many I've given as gifts over the years, happy in the knowledge that they'll replace whatever cheap junk the recipient now uses and last forever doing their job.One of the most durable, high-performance purchases ever
I love this Item!!!  No More Coats Thrown on the Sofa!. I am very happy with this Coat Tree.  It is beautiful and a great price.  I have been to several furniture stores looking for a Coat Tree (they were over priced, bulky and ugly!)  The Twist Style Cherry Finish Wood Coat Rack Stand was delivered within the secheduled dates.  Great condition, easy, quick assembly and adds character to the room.  I love this stand!  Now, No more coats thrown on the sofa
Krups 016-70 Replacement Carafe, White. Unable to procure the replacement carafe at a reasonable price and Amazon came through.  Nicely packed for shipping and received the carafe in a timely fashion.  Will continue doing business with Amazon
R. Nelson. This blender is super.  It has all the bells and whistles one could want
better than george. I have been using the smallest foreman grill for some time and decided to get a larger grill.  I read the reviews on this and similar grills and decided to try one.  So far, I really prefer this grill and have been using it exclusively.  It does not get quite as hot as the foreman, which I like because the food does not dry out as much.  I always use the 5 minute warm-up as recommended.  The grill does not slant downwards like the foreman, so the food does not try to run off of the grill when you open the top.  The drip tray is located under and to the side of the grill and snaps in, a feature I like as the foreman tray tends to move all over.  The lid floats and is heavy enough to press down on the meat when lowered, making better contact with the top of the meat.   Sometimes I had to flip the food on the foreman to get the top side cooked.In short, I think this grill is superior to the foreman and I am glad I bought it.I bought this at Target as Amazon has still not fixed my account and it has been several months.  I have bought many items elsewhere because of this and Amazon is missing out
Hottstuff. This is a very good product,well priced, good looking,large inside, and heats up food very fast. overall a great product
Pedrini Black & Satin Salad Spinner. The Pedrini salad spinner is a nice addition to a kitchen.  The only problem is that the gears do get out of sync occasionally, but not to the point that it is unusable.  It comes completely apart for easy cleaning
Beautiful functional decanter. I saw this decanter this weekend at a Silicon Valley kitchen warming party. Everyone watched with glee as this particular German's funnel sprayed the wine out of approx. eight small holes at its base and turned this symetrical two bottle decanter red with my excellent 1999 Benziger Estate Cabernet Sauvignon. The Wine Enthusiast Aerating Wine Funnel with Removable Screen allowed more wine to flow around sediment and was easy to remove and clean. This is made of a quality stainless steel and will last for years in shinny brilliance. My wife bought a funnel at William Sonoma the next week. It has a small one inch stem spot welded onto a small screen. It fell off before its first use. I took it back and started my search on Amazon the next day for the real thing. I highly recommend this 1st class product to be purchased with this decanter. WichmanGaller
exactly what I ordered. Wanted a stylish utensil holder to match the black accents in our new kitchen and it was perfect
bad to good. The first warmer i got, the porcelain was broken in 4 places.  I notified the company and there was no problem sending me another one.  Anyway, as stubborn as i am, i glued the first one back together and the coffee was warm at best. I really like my coffee hot and the second one will do just fine.  Coffee was much warmer
Makes a pretty cake if you're careful. You'll get compliments on your daisy cake -- if you take care in preparing the pan for baking and in adding a glaze. I had trouble unmolding my first cake with NordicWare's Wildflower Pan, so I contacted the company for help. They advise using Crisco and Wondra flour. Although I prefer butter, the Crisco worked far better, but I took extra time to use a pastry brush to apply the Crisco to ensure getting into every nook and cranny. I did not like the recipe that came with the pan, so I asked about additional recipes. The only response was to use a standard cake mix. This was not very satisfying, as I prefer from-scratch cakes. However, I do sometimes use a cake mix that I "doctor up," and have been pleased with the results. Even the addition of grated citrus rind in a glaze can disturb the lovely pattern of the cake, and even a thin glaze must be applied very carefully, or the flower petals will break up.
Good Deal. I'm very happy with this mixer. It arrived in pristine condition, even though the box it was shipped in looked very tired and worn.  The machine does what I ask of it with no glitches or complaints.  I bought it mainly for bread making, and after a certain amount of practice, I'm turning out great products.  I also have discovered that scoop shaped measuring cups work wonderfully for adding flour and other ingredients, so I think I will pass on the idea of purchasing a splatter guard.My only gripe is not with the machine, but probably with Amazon because I did not get the model that was pictured.  I got the HD.  I have researched as much as I can, and the machine I received is probably identical to the one I thought I was getting, but I just don't understand what is so difficult about matching the picture with the product that one is buying.  Seems kind of elementary to me
Proud to Be a Global owner. This item (utility knife) actually was for a friend... a fellow foodie.Once youve used any Global knife - you feel as though all other knives in comparison fail at their job. I'm the owner of 4 Globals thus far - I will purchase more in the next year, but this paring knife is a great starter to begin with... even if its the only Global you get - you'll see how versitile it is & will go on to recommend to friends and family.
There is a reason they call it the Animal. We used it to catch a mouse in the house.  Seriously.  Excellent.  We used the thin attachment and reached behind the tv cabinet and we heard a small "thud" as the little bugger got sucked up.  We could see it in the container and it wasn't breathing and so it seems the trip through the tube killed him.In the past we would chase the little critters around the house for an hour.  The cat has proven useless in these matters.  We like our Dyson
Great and Easy to Use Product!. I bought this for my husband because he's always wanted one to make beef jerky, and we love it. It takes about 1 day and a half to make the jerky and he is always experimenting with different seasonings. It's super easy to use and super quiet too. We have a three year old daughter who loves the dried bananas and apples we make. I love it because the dried fruit can last months and is great to take on long trips or for snacks. I searched and searched for the right one for the right price and amazon provided it. I would highly recommend this product to anyone who likes dried food.
Chocolate fountain. I gave this chocolate fountain as a gift to my grandchildren and they loved it!!!  However, we found out that it needed quite a lot of chocolate... a lot more than we anticipated.  Thus it can't be used as much as we would've wanted to
Great variety, easy clean-up, wondeful machine!. I have the black Fusion in my home office (which is next to a basement-level theater room), and my wife and I already love this machine.  We have tried all sorts of mixes, and we've only scratched the surface of what this machine can do.  This is one of the first times I've been so impressed with a product that I wanted to write a review for it.Physical properties: It handles travel mugs (if you remove the drip tray, which is largely unneeded anyway), and all our "standard" mugs.  The drink head moves up and down, so it can sit flush against the rim of your mug to cut down on the already rare splashbacks (more common with "frothy" drinks than coffee and tea).  When it brews a filterpack, it blows air through at the end of the cycle to clear it out (and, thus, keep it from dripping as you remove it).  The water tank could be larger (if only because we're so enamored with it that we keep making drinks all day long), but if you have a ready source of water nearby, it shouldn't be a problem.  The tank fits better and slides on easier than the Senseo (which we also have).Flavor-wise: It's made by M&M/Mars, so you can bet that the sweeter drinks (the so-called Indulgence fare) is excellent.  Coffee blends are quite good, especially the darker roasts like "French Roast" and "Sumatra".  Lattes made with Espresso Roast taste similar to Starbucks, moreso than other chains.Clean-up: Wipe the inside of the drink head, and possibly the front of the plastic column (the colored portion) after any particularly "splashy" drinks.  No need to worry about cleaning up the area around the machine, especially if you keep the drink head on the rim of your mug.  Of course, you can't watch its magic when the drink head is that low, so your first few times, you'll probably get a drip here and there.Final bits: We've had the Senseo since its launch.  Between pods that need "pre-wetting" to avoid blowing past the seal of the portafilter to the not-so-great varieties of drinks, the Senseo is lagging behind the Flavia.  We drink coffee, tea, espresso drinks, mixed blends, and sweet-tooth-friendly "indulgence" mixes every day with the Flavia, and it's brain-dead-easy to use.  Certainly easier to clean up after, too!  If you're on the fence between the Flavia and other single-cup offerings (like Senseo), get the Flavia.  Keurig and other single-cup offerings can't touch the variety of drinks you can make with the Flavia.    I'm sipping a lemon/blueberry tea blend now, made over ice, and it's fantastic.  Highly recommended
Mine Works. I guess I bought a good one.  This thing works great, no leaks, no white dust, and very quiet.The de-mineralization filters are easy to find at Target, and are $5 for two filters.I like this product
excellent choice. With two cats and two dogs in the house--plus a messy husband and a teenager--I have to have a really good vacuum and this is it.  I especially like the fact that the hose goes straight into the bag and all those little clumps of cat hair (and bits of clay kitty litter, etc) can be sucked up without getting caught up in the beater bar (brushes).  I also prefer the bagged type of vacuum because you simply fold the bag and toss it---there's no storm cloud of dust as there can be with the bagless models.
THEE RACK TO HAVE. We purchased these racks for our theater department and were so impressed by how easy they are to assemble (my 7th and 8th graders assembled them). We bought some cheaper ones (bad idea) as they could not hold the weight of our heavy theater costumes. This is affordable and I will be purchasing more. Thanks
betta kit. I have bought this kit two years ago and have had a betta live for two years. It was the best deal and the perfect size for a betta. The only thing you need is the fish! Over all it fits in tight spots and is very durible and easy to clean
Purchased on July 11, 2003. I loved this can opener...for the small cost I paid 2 1/2 years ago it was worth it!  After having about 6 months my daughter dropped it and it still worked wonderfully. Always left it plugged it for recharging. The only problem that occured was every once in a while the cutting blade would get pushed into the unit and i would have to take a butter knife to get it back out. Sad to say the rechargeable batteries just dies and now I am looking to purchase a second one!
Salton KM44WHT 2-Liter Iced Tea Maker, White. This Salton has a practical design and makes tea well. I love this ice tea maker because of it works well :-))) and doesn't leak water all over the counter:-(((( like other brands I've tried. My only "wish" is that it would come with an extra/spare ice tea pitcher
Fiesta Fruit bowl. Item was satisfactory but thought it was bigger.  Probably my mistak
Shed ender. I just received this product today, and I already love it.  I ordered it for my cats.  It works as great as they said it would
Fun for both of us... My dog was scared of it and barked the first two or three times I turned it on, but she's grown to love it and even whine for it!! She smacks it from one side of the room to the other and falls all over herself trying to pick it up while it's on. I can't help but laugh at her with it. I was so happy to find a toy she could play with more than once or twice without destroying. She just turned one year old and the extra large rope bones last 2 weeks before they're chewed into two pieces with strings all over my house
sleeping. this pillow has been fabulous.   it supports my neck and yet it is soft.   i am getting a lot more rest then i was with my feather pillows.
Great Scissors at a great price. This is a quality all around set for the home or Office.All the sizes and the pruning sheers are just right
Great little sauce pan. I got this as a gift and I love it. Great for cooking relatively small amounts of pasta.  It is sturdy, and has stood up very well to being used almost everyday for several years. The lid locks very easily on top and it is very easy to drain water out without burning oneself or worrying about the lid falling off.
oven mit. I was looking for something to replace the Pampered Chef oven mitts ( cloth) that I have used for over ten years. The Pampered Chef mitt has been retired so I took a chance and ordered the Kool-Tek. I am very happy with it.It works great
A Must Have For Any Thomas Fan!!. This is the cutest comforter, not the softest, buy my son loves it! I hadn't been able to get him to sleep in his own bed all night but as soon as we got this it was no problem. He loves to sleep in his 'thomas' bed!
Fish, Smish, This is a Wok Spatula. I purchased a Calphalon nonstick wok a little over a year ago and it's a wonderful piece of cookware.  However, I can't use my regular wok tools due to its Teflon-like coating.So I started searching for alternatives and came across iSi silicone utensils. Though they are all wonderful, I still needed something to replace the wok spatula and though this is supposedly designed for fish, it has the same proportions.The stainless teel handles and colored silicone are also very sharp looking
BARK CONTROL COLLAR. My dog is the nices dog ever, since i put the collar on him, yes i took a couple of days for him to realize he was going to "get it" everytime he barked but it was all worth it
Best price, best delivery. I love my Presto popper, but despaired of finding a good, reasonably priced source for the concentrators. Web searches turned up sellers at $3.50 per pack, but delivery for two packs (eight each) was $8, bringing the cost of a bowl of popcorn up to more than $1! I was so pleased to discover them in a sale at Amazon -- I am stocked up for at least six months now
I like it crunchy!. This is a great pan to make oven goodies (frozen packaged french fries, chicken nuggets/tenders, fish sticks, breaded mushrooms, cheese sticks, jalapeno poppers, etc.) bake up nice and crispy and crunchy!  The holes in the bottom of the pan make hot oven air circulate up underneath the pieces.  The holes sit below raised ridges that hold the food up, so some fat can drain off.  The food doesn't sit flat on the metal and turn mushy.  On one end, there is a pouring lip so putting the food onto a plate is easy.  This is a fantastic pan if you like it crispy and crunchy
SIMPLY THE BEST. NOW WHY CAN'T EVERYTHING BE MADE THIS GOOD? OPENS CANS AND LASTS AND LASTS.  JUST WHAT WE WANT...ONLY ONE IMPROVEMENT I CAN THINK OF: STAINLESS STEEL PARTS. IT DOESRUST
Tremendous value. Couldn't be happier with this cookware set.  Heating is even.  Very good performance in the oven for finishing. Pieces are well balanced and easy to clean.  Hand wash only!We waited a long time to replace a myriad of unmatched pots and pans.  We chose well with this set
Great whisk. Great whisk! Made in the USA. Dishwasher safe! Perfect gift for my chef. He even loves the ergonomic fit.However, the 5 year warranty in the description is not mentioned in anything when I received the product.  I have concerns about the silicone wearing or peeling and the 5 year warranty made me feel better about it. Now there is no indication on the Le Crueset paperwork indicating any warranty
versatile starter piece. As seems the case with some other reviewers, this was my first piece of Le Creuset.  It's wonderful for braising and easy to maintain.  It has all of the benefits of uncoated cast iron, with an easy-to-clean enamel coating.  While heavy, it is not unwieldy.  It was my favorite piece (until the next piece, of course)
VRROOOMMM  AND PRESTO  ALMOST !. WELL AS OTHERS HAVE SAID , ITS PRETTY MUCH DOES WHAT IT SAYS IT WILL.FOR 300 BUCKS ITS OK. BUT THE ICE TRAY IS KINDA ON THE CHEAP SIDE  AND I CAN SEE BREAKING THE PLASTIC LOCK ON IT WHILE OPENING IT TO FILL WITH ICE SOMEDAY IN THE NEAR FUTURE . ALSO SEE THE CHEAP PLASTIC LOCK TAB ON THE CONTAINER THAT HOLDS THE MELTED ICE WATER BREAKING SOON ENOUGH. THAT ASIDE , IT APPEARS TO BE MADE PRETTY WELL . MAKE SURE YOUR ICE CUBES ARE NOT IN BIG FROZEN CLUMPS AS IT MAY MAKE THE MACHINE FREEZE/JAM WHILE ATTEMPTING TO SHAVE THE ICE. HAD A PARTY THE OTHER DAY AND WITHOUT EVEN A DRY RUN MADE EXCELLENT MARGARIAS AND CHERRY DAIQUIRIS WITH LITTLE FUSS OR MUSS.BUY ONE AT ONCE AND GET YOUR FAVORITE BRAIN FREEZE GOING. IF I ONLY HAD ONE OF THESE IN COLLEGE .....
Love your espresso...best bet for the money. I could not resist trying this method of making espresso. You know you can spend alot trying to get a decent product and I have not been disappointed with the practically inexpensive Bialetti.  The first attempt was successful and that told me this was for me....the bonus milk frother made more froth that an old steamer frother I used to have.  There are a few tricks with the frother(1% milk by itself not so good but add some half and half to the milk and voile').  The milk mixture needs to be heated enough to coat the back of a spoon, pump it quickly and serve.  Regarding the espresso maker itself....just don't add any more water than to that line..and oh don't open the lid to look at it until it is done or you will get sputter onto your stove top.  To know when the espresso is done just listen you will know when it is done....very quick and yummm
Longterm User of HB Indoor Grills Speaks: Just Bought My Third Model!. I want to speak up on behalf of Hamilton Beach indoor grills.  I just ordered this 25295 model, which is my third in about a half-dozen years.  It probably will last a few years, making that three in ten years.  That's not bad at all.What went wrong with the one before this, the previous model 25285 with removable grids, is that the turn-off mechanism stopped being dependable.  I noticed that my steak got overcooked, but thought it had been my fault for leaving it on too long.  It wasn't until the next morning that I saw that the grill never shut itself off (eeek: stayed on overnight).  So it's time for replacement -- after four years or so of constant use and perhaps some casual abuse.The model before that, replaced with the 25285 (for cleaning ease and because I wanted white), was given to my mother, who also got a few years of faithful, second-hand service.  So that one too lasted about four years.  I also gave one away as a present -- and its recipient, who had been suspicious of such contraptions and has a tiny kitchen, loved it and used it for years.  Therefore, this is the fourth HB indoor grill that I've purchased.If you are single and don't have a lot of counter space, this is tough to beat -- particularly for less than $50 and no tax or shipping charges, and an easy return policy in addition to the one-year warranty.  Before I bought the 25295, I checked out the George Foreman grills (including the "next generation"), Cuisinart, T-Fal, etc.  Some of the others have some nice features that this model lacks -- such as temperature control, greater grilling area, floating hinge.  But to me, that was offset by how much bulkier they are, oftentimes quite ugly IMHO, and not that much more bang for the buck.  I really don't like it that some of the smaller GF models turn on only by being plugged in the wall.  Maybe this is intended as a safety feature, but I wouldn't want to constantly have to mess with that.  A power button should be essential, rather than considered a nicety for which they charge extra.This does a nice job with grilled sandwiches, meat and fish, sliced vegetables, etc.  You get grill marks and it cooks everything right, after you learn the appropriate times for different types of food.  It's cooked bacon fine, IMHO.  It does quite nicely with frozen meat or veggie patties and chicken breasts.  I particularly like to throw on a fairly thick frozen sirloin, or salmon or tuna steak.  The outside gets browned, while the interior stays moist and lightly cooked (if you catch it in time).  The reservoir cup holds a lot, so if you marinate the meat or fish and it drips, it's not a problem.  If it's not essential to dispose of the fat that drips off and collects in the reservoir -- the ostensible purpose of indoor grills and still their prime marketing claim -- you can find ways to use it to baste the food during cooking (buy a second cup or find something else to use) or use it as the basis of gravy.Some reviewers have noted that the nonstick surface on the GF models flakes or chips off over time.  These HBs hold up, but you do need to follow instructions.  Wipe the grids clean while still warm and wash in the sink or dishwasher.  Don't use cleaning products or tools that will strip off the nonstick covering, and use spray oil before grilling.  Also, let the grill heat up 5 min before use, as per the directions.  Food placed on hot surfaces sticks less than food that heats up with the surface (of course, such caramelization also enhances taste to some extent, so you may want to fiddle with this for your purposes, carefully scraping off the caramelized parts to avoid scratching the surface).  If the grids get messed up, they can be replaced as long as the parts are manufactured, which probably will be for a while.The models I've purchased have made a tidy "footprint" on my countertop, and I know how to make it do what I need it to do.  It wasn't worth it to spend maybe even twice as much for a few more bells and whistles, when I would be settling for a style that I dislike and losing half the counter space.  Yes, it can be put away after use, but I like to have kitchen gizmos within easy reach, particularly if I like the way they look.  The grill gets too much use to be constantly tucked away anyway.  And this model matches my other stuff.  If I had chrome appliances or did more entertaining or a larger counter area, I would've been seriously tempted by the Cusinart model, though, I have to admit.Therefore, I think some of the negative comments need to be taken in the context of maybe judging too quickly or nitpicking, needing a larger size grill for a family, preferring more features, using it incorrectly, etc.  Neither I nor the people I know who have had HB indoor grills have had problems with melting plastic or plastic odors.  HB makes the "Honda" of indoor grills.  It's dependable rather than flashy, not big which matters for those with small kitchens, rates well with consumers and through independent tests, lasts for years, and isn't more than a one- or two- person household needs.  Why pay (and pay for the electricity over time) for what you don't need?  If your needs are modest, a modest indoor grill may well suit your purposes.  I look forward to the new grill living up to the quality of its predecessors in my household
good product. A multi purpose bucket can be used for drinks or flowers. The reasonfor the four stars is that it took quite a while to come and arrivedtoo late for the occasion needed
I'm hooked on this gadget. I bought one a few years ago & got hooked--can't drink my morning coffee without frothy milk! It finally broke so I went online to replace it. I've seen other types, but this style is the one I had to have! Found it (new) at Amazon.com for the same price I paid 3-4 years ago. It came in a few days and works beautifully. I'm a happy camper again
Turboed. I am very pleased with the Turbo Scratcher Refill pads!  Our cats spend hours entertaining themselves with the Turbo Scratcher.  We highly recommend the product and this vendor
Great Tumblers - Great Price!. I am absolutely 100% satisfied with my purchase!The 2 sets I ordered arrived in a timely manner.  The tumblers are top rack dishwasher safe too!Our drinks stay much colder, much longer and even travel well in my SUV cup holder.These tumblers would also make a great present
Great Value!. These are great mugs for the price.  They don't leak, are a great size, fit snuggly in my car's cupholder, and keep my coffee warm (not piping hot but a drinkable temp) for several hours.  Sure the handles are a little weak and there are plenty of better constructed mugs out there but I don't think you are going to find them close to this price
great!. Excellent pedometer for the money.  Worthwhile investment.  I only had to play around with the step measurement sensitivity, and now it works great.  Radio works great also.. Definately reccommend
attractive and handy. I have two of these, one in yellow and one in a discontinued sea greeny color.  They're attractive, of course; this is Fiestaware, after all.  But they're darn functional.  They're long enough to accommodate a london broil or small roast or kebobs, and they're deep enough that any juices are not likely to spill while you're carrying or serving.  I like wish there was one slightly bigger too; then I'd get two more
MOM. This is wonderful.  The best laundry basket ever used
Good neck support. I wouldnt say this is the perfect pillow I have been looking for, but its almost there. Gives me good neck support. Its a good value for its price
It works fine for the lite stuff. I have had mine for about 6 months now and I use it 2 or 3 times a week. It is easy to clean. Cooks enought for 2 people just fine
Mixed opinion. I like the ability to cook on the burner.  Only need to dirty one pot.  But the shape of this crock pot is curvy, so you can't pour out of it without the food getting hung up on the lip of the crock pot.  The shape is odd in that the bottom is small and the top is wide.  If it's not entirely full, I just put a piece of tin foil over the contents
These are the best knives!. After showing serious interest in pursuing a career in the Culinary/Hotel field, my dad bought me my first 10" Henckel knife as part of a set in 1987. I dropped out after 2 months but I still had my knives.  And I promised my Dad I would make good use of them considering how much he had paid for them.I have been a loyal fan ever since.  Just last week the handle gave out on me and I have returned to purchase a new one.I got A LOT of use out of it and I was impressed with how long it lasted considering the abuse I put it through.  NINETEEN years of service was worth every penny
World's Greatest Mixing Bowl. I own every size of this bowl and if they made more I'd buy them.  In fact I'm thinking about throwing away all my other bowls and just buying several more of these.  They are absolutely the greatest mixing bowls ever made.  They won't slide around (the bottow is rubber or something like it) they are steep sided so things don't splash out, they are easy to clean, and they look great, I could just could go on and on with praise about these bowls.  I'm 63 years old and I cook a lot, I've never had a better product.  Buy these, you won't be disappointed
The BEST Cervical roll-- for me, at least. As a physical therapist who suffers from neck pain, this is the ONLY pillow that I can use without waking up to having cervical muscle spasms in the mornings. This pillow is great for people who do not have the normal curvature of the cervical spine a.k.a.-- straight necks (cervical arthritis etc).I bought one 3 years ago at CVS & have been looking for a year now for a replacement since mine cannot support my neck very well anymore.  It has been a week that I have been waking up to neck spasms & I am delighted to find that it is here at Amazon.  It was here all along, I just have been typing in the wrong name-- cervical pillow, cervical roll, neck roll etc....  I am happy that I remembered what my 5 year old son called it-- BONE, typed it, and boy was he right.
Heaven Sent. I bought my thermometer about a year ago and have used it to cook beef and chicken to perfection.  No more dry meat whether it is in the oven or in a smoker or grill.  Then I tried it to make fudge.  Best fudge I've ever made and the temperatures were very accurate.  Plan on buying one for each of my children for Christmas
Heavy duty comfortable sheets. I feel rich sleeping in these sheets! They are quite wrinkley, but just take them out of the dryer as quick as possible.  I will have these sheets for years looking just as they do today I'm sure. Money well spent
I will buy again at Amazon. Blinds were what I expected.  They were very good quality and low price too.  Shipping was excellent and on time.
Trully Impressive Knives. We had purchased some of the other Global knives and we very impressed with the quality & construction, but kept putting off buying the steak knives wondering if it was worth the price.  You know, they are steak knives.  How good can they be? After getting the first four, I have to say these are one of the best knives in the Global line! (The 3-1/2" paring is amazing as well)The balance is perfect, and they cut steak like it has no resistance. Guests make comments about how well they work & the unique styling. When is the last time anyone made a comment about steak knives to you other than it's dull? Buy them, you will be trully impressed
Love IT!. This knife is the best I've ever held and or used! It feels great in the hand esp. during prolonged use. For a smaller female with a weak wrist, this knife is the perfect weight (lighter than a German knife, BUT JUST AS POWERFUL!). I don't think I will ever switch brands again. The only thing is that I wish I had bought the version with the slots to help with the release of food from the blade. Reguardless I LOVE THIS KNIFE
Honeywell 18155N SilentComfort  airfilter, thumbs-up. very quiet for sure. it's helping a lot with my allergies. i run it 24/7 on low and that does the trick. the only disadvantage is the suggested placement, 3' from any wall. however i've got it maybe 1-2 feet from any wall and it's able to suck air from all directions
getting salty in my kitchen. Product just as promised - looks great - works wonderful -- a very happy purchase from my en
KitchenAid Knives. We purchased this as a gift for someone. The price was right and ordering it on Amazon was easy. We had it shipped directly, she seems to like them quite a bit
great use of minimal space. I really like this dish rack!  It holds a surprising amount of dishes.  I bought this for the cup-holder prongs (good use of space), the flat tray underneath, and the utensil holder, and have not been disappointed.  I don't use the drain board with it (put a dishtowel underneath), and wish I could have opted not to have that included.  The only concern is that there is nothing at the one end (opposite the utensil holder) to keep things from falling off - I have to be careful not to put anything precarious like a bowl there, for fear it would tip back and fall off.  I just make sure to put a big plate at the end. Also, larger cutting boards don't fit in it very well.  But I still give it 5 stars because it is just what I was looking for
Serta 3-Pound Micro Memory Foam Pillow. I bought two sets of these. Take the center firm fill out if you want them soft or leave it in for a firm pillow
A great Belgian Waffler. I've had this Waffler for several months and use it regularly at least twice a week.  It produces a perfect Belgian Waffle every time
Great Buy. I bought the toaster because Consumer Reports said that it was the best buy and they recommended it.  I also did a search for the best buy and found it at E-Bay.I used it for the first time this morning and am very pleased with the product that I bought
Just what I was looking for. I bought this because I wanted to divide gravel vacuuming and water changes into two separate steps, so I could spend more time cleaning up my dwarf puffer aquarium (it gets messy). First I tried the "Penn-Plax Air Vac Aquarium Gravel Cleaner" which you hook up to an air pump, but that didn't have much suction. This battery powered model has as much suction as a normal gravel vacuum (the kind that's just a hose and a tube) or a water change kit like the Python, but it keeps all the water in the tank for you.I had just one problem with the Profile, but it was easily fixed. I thought I had to attach the adjustable tube (item #14 on the side panel of the box), but this made it too long to work in my 10 gallon and 20 gallon-long aquariums. (If the handle end sticks too far out of the aquarium, the pump won't prime, and you'll hear a buzzing sound and get no suction.) As it turns out, the gravel attachment will also hook up to the unit directly without the extension tube.The Profile require 2 "C" batteries for power, and a rubber band to keep the sock filter from slipping off. It will work with any aquarium from about 8-9" deep up to 20" (or deeper, if you don't mind getting wet).UPDATE: I've stopped using this. The reason is because it kicks up a lot of microparticles which pass through the sock filter and sort of fog up the aquarium, so I worry about how well it really cleans. It gets the big particles though
Cute, comfortable and lovable. I received my Mogu about 5 months ago and I've gone to sleep holding it ever since!They really are nice to hold.Would reccomend 100%
Good Source for Relacements of the ProLine Coffeemaker. The replacement Carafe arrived in good order and was provided by Ace Hardware. They werem prompt with the delivery and asked if all was OK. They are a caring distributor
Honeywell HZ-2200 Mini Tower Surround Heater. I bought this little heater because my dorm room was way too cold or way too warm. During the cold weather the heater did wonders and my dorm room is a decent sized room not a really small one. Also since the weather is becoming really nice the fan is doing a really great job as well! I definitely recommend this heater. It is a bit loud though, but once you get used to it, it's really not a big deal at all. I'd rather have some background noise than be freezing. All in all the heater provides a good source of heat
Nova Brown Spoon Rest. This spoon rest is a great compliment to the rest of the Nova Brown dishes.  It is a very different style - the picture doesn't do it justice - true hand made pottery
Shun Knives are Beautiful, Elegant, and the Sharpest around. Shun knives are beautiful creations period. Since I'm Asian, I love the tradition look and feel of this Japanese knife. I love the beauty of the blade and the dark, polished, Pakkawood handle. The unique "D"-shaped, Wood handles are preferable. The shape fits my hand perfectly, and the wood does not get slippery when wet - providing a very secure hold. The steel is of utmost quality and sharpness. Do not put this blade into any old electric knife sharpener! Electric knife sharpeners are made to put one angle on any blade. These blades come with a 16 degree angle and you don't want to be changing that angle. There are electric knife sharpeners that can sharpen these knives, but you'll have to do some research and find out which ones can be a fit with these knives. I prefer to hone with a sharpening steel and manually sharpen with a stone if necessary (and I don't see it being necessary to touch it to a stone any time soon). The blade is sharp straight off the factory and as Alton Brown says - it's the sharpest straight out of the factory edge as he's ever seen.These knives are more expensive than most, but I think it's definitely worth it. To have the sharpest, most beautiful knife around - it's no contest. If you are on a budget, build your collection slowly. It's been said that there are only 3 knives that are the absolute basics for any kitchen: A 8" Chef's Knife (or some kind of similar, large-ish chef's knife), a Paring Knife, and a Long Serrated blade for cutting bread and larger items. I would add a thin utility knife and a boning knife to that list next. Then I would add those "in-between" sizes as I get more money flow in.  Now if you're buying a whole set like this, you'll get it all in one shot and it becomes a better deal than pieceing your collection together, one-by-one.If you plan on spending any time in the kitchen, good kitchen knives are a definite must. Preparation is the bulk of cooking and when you have good knives, it cuts down on the danger of cutting yourself, it adds pleasure to the work, and it cuts down on prep time. Knives are also a very personal choice and it's best to at least go to a store and try it out for yourself first. Shun Knives are designed by the Japanese, so remember - it's designed for small hands. This makes it fit most women's hands perfectly, but I've heard of guys with larger hands not like it so much and going back to the German knives. So definitely try it out. It's a personal thing, it needs to fit you.Why spend so much money on a knife? Well, if you spend a lot of time in the kitchen, and you almost always have to bust out a knife to prep a meal from scratch - why not use the best? Why spend that time with items that you love and brings you pleasure to use? Many times, it's the small things that brings us the most pleasure in life, and I consider my Shun knives as one of those things. Having something so beautiful and yet so sharp and perfect - it makes my time cooking just that much more enjoyable.Another good thing to know is that although the Shun Knives are usually offered for right-handers, you can get these knives for left-handers. You just need to find the guys who stock and sell those ones as they are less known, and less common
Thrilled with purchase!. I bought this for my sister as a Christmas gift. I was so glad I was able to find it, since Fiestaware Black is retired. This item was shipped promptly, packaged very well, and arrived in perfect condition. I am very pleased with this transaction and my sister was thrilled with her gift
AWESOME! My Eldery Parents Loved it!. my mother laughed so hard, beaming with elation on how wonderful and ingenious the touchless trashcan was. &quot;it is so beautiful, Honey. Now I don't have to worry about trying to open the lid when my hands are full. Especially when I'm cooking.&quot
Good Deal. The brick sheets are a deep rich color. I was not expecting much for the price, but was pleasantly suprised. They are super soft and silky smooth. As with any good cotton, they only get softer and more comfortable with each use. Good Deal ..recommended item
Makes the room warm and fuzzy. This product has several nice features that enable you to use this Radiator either as a back-up heat source or just as a room heater. It's efficient, not to large and the built in timer is relatively simple to use. I have 3 of these units and I feel they were well worth the investment
Birthday gift for daughter. I had previously purchased the Tribest for myself and had such a good experience with it that I decided my daughter would benefit from owning the personal blender.  She has two small children and the fruit smoothies are a big hit with them, she also uses the blender for quick sauces, cream soups, and other purposes
Buy This!. This pillow is incredible.  I got it for my boyfriend because he was having neck pain when he woke up in the mornings.  The neck pain is gone and he sleeps like a baby.  It's great
Champagne Glasses. I own Reidel as well as Spieglau.  The differences are slight.  The Spieglau have a very nice tulip shape and the heft/feel to them is very good.  And, given the price, if I break one I don't get upset as I would with a Reidel.  No wonder Reidel bought the company.  I recommend the Spieglau to anyone looking for an attractive, well made glass, at a moderate price.  Anything that helps you enjoy the champagne a little more, as these do, deserve to be recommended
Makes my every day fry pan useful but .... My All Clad LTD 12" fry pan is my most used pan.  While this 12" fry pan lid fits the pan, it doesn't seal as well as it should.  The bottom lip is very shallow and is smaller than the diameter of the fry pan.  I need to be careful to put the cover on properly.  I compared this 12" fry pan lid to my All Clad saut pan lids (since the All Clad saut and fry pans both have flared lips) and the saut lids have larger and more squared bottom lips that closely matches the pan opening than this fry pan lid.I will keep this lid.  But if there is the chance that All Clad listens, they have a chance to get up to five stars
Good design, great waffles. I am loving the aesthetics of this thing.  It reminds of the heavy-duty, no-nonsense waffle makers at a Waffle House.The iron heats up quickly - no more than five minutes from off to level 4.  The indicator lights are bright, and the audible alert isn't loud or shrill.  Any stainless steel case will get hot, so if you are accident-prone, skip this unit and go with one with a plastic case.I have to disagree with some of the complaints about the handle insulation - this unit isn't a panini press, and doesn't require you to grip it with your whole hand and yank up.  Slight upward pressure with your thumb is all that's needed to disengage the lock, free the waffle, and open the lid.  And speaking of the locking mechanism: it works perfectly on mine.  It is very subtle and does the job.The plates are non-stick and don't require oiling.  I have made dozens of waffles, ranging in doneness from spongy to crispy, and every single one has released cleanly.  Again, all it takes is a gentle upward pressure on the handle with your thumb until the lid opens.One welcome surprise about this unit: it is designed to be stored vertically!  The plate hinges and lip of the base make a tripod, giving you more storage options.My only issue with the WAF-R is that I think the gutters could be a bit bigger.  With a new batter, that first waffle can get a little messy
pinzon sauce pan. I love this sauce pan it almost compelets the set that I want to buy. Thank yo
Small but good. I like this style of salad spinner. When I ordered it, though, I didn't realize that it is as small as it is. It would be adequate for one person who doesn't chow down on salad all day. I recomend the product if you don't have much salad to spin
Can't get enough... ... of this toy! Our dogs prey drive goes wild when they see these balls come out. We have to monitor the use though. They each have to have their own ball and we have to take them away from the dogs before they collapse. They go really go crazy for them and would play 'soccer' for hours until they drop. The only down side is that our dogs can dig their teeth into the plastic around where the small opening is on one end. This creates gashes which we need to keep scraped down after play. Otherwise the dogs mouths, cheeks and lips become very sore and cut up as they roll the balls around the yard. (Keep in mind we have very strong dogs with high prey drive) When they have the gashes made, they can carry the ball around. Ours carry them proudly around the yard as if it is a trophy! If the balls were made of some sort of really hard rubber like a black type Kong or something it would be better, but then they would weigh too much. For the money - you just can't beat this toy
Works great. The Over Cabinet Door Towel Bar is a great solution for keeping kitchen towels accessible and neat.  Just the right size for cabinets of varying widths.
Coffee Maker. Bunn makes excellent products and having fresh brewed coffee in three minutes is the cat's meow
Sturdy, easy to inflate and deflate, pretty comfy. I easily inflated the Aerobed when I received it. I like how you can just plug the inflater into the wall. My old one required big heavy batteries. The pillow that inflates is a good height - I had worried that it would be too high.  It inflates into a real sized tall bed! And doesn't topple over because there are two inflated support tubes on the bottom of each side. I haven't slept on it yet, but I did recline on it, and it was very comfortable. I certainly recommend it.
Not a Vornado, but gets the job done. This fan is neither as powerful nor as quiet as the Vornado fan it tries to imitate, but compared to some of the other fans on the market today, the Honeywell Mega Turbo is pretty darn good.  It moves an impressive amount of air, is solidly constructed, and comes with a reassuring 5-year warranty.UPDATE: I just discovered that this fan cannot be taken apart for cleaning.  I would change the rating to two stars if I could
It Travels too. We took the fondue set and 4 pre-made cheese mixes for a weekend with friends.  It the easiest, fastest meal to assemble and be ready!  Great for after skating and skiing.
Smaller bites, but Works great---see the photos ive uploaded. this is not bad. it created batches of smaller like kind of pancake. the lodge brand created a bigger shell like shape. This one just has its 'twing'I dont like to go on and describe my first time experience today-- see and believe, ive uploaded the pics here and in flickr.I'd buy this if you're under budget and you want to create cute like pancake. it doesnt create those fuffy shell like---but its worth it!!!!!!I love to cook so Im happy to have this in my collection. not preseasoned..so what i did my oil spray on it.
Picture does not show the beauty of these pieces. I bought this Dinnerware set, and just love it.  I have since either bought matching pieces on my own or have friends wonderful enough to add to my collection.  I am planning to get another service for 4 and 2 to 4 extra dinnerplates, as I never seem to have enough.  Have had the matching containers on my wishlist for some time, may soon break down and buy them for myself as a present from my birds for Mothers day along with the salt and pepper shakers.  My work allows me to be able to get to many different stores, I am therefore able to comparison shop.  That has proved futile, I have yet to find a better price on anything I have bought or wanted that is less then Amazon.  The 4 piece dinnerware set is usually higher ..., so I am getting these from here.  Better price, take my word
Best coffee grinder I've ever had... I had a Cuisinart grinder prior to this one and there's no comparison. The Cuisinart was noisy, finicky and failed after about a year. This grinder is as quiet as any grinder I've ever heard anywhere and works great.
Nice value for glass decanter suitable for 1 bottle of wine. I'm very satisfied with this purchase and am writing this to clarify a couple points I was uncertain of based on other reviews.  This decanter is glass.  The box claims it is "mouth blown glass".  It is made in China.  The photo in the description depicts it holding one full bottle of wine (750 ml).  It does not drip when it pours (just one drop rolls off the lip much as what happens when you pour from a wine bottle).  It is nice looking, though it wouldn't be mistaken for a $200 crystal decante
Used it for Mojitos at our S. Fla. themed superbowl  party. They worked so well. We decided to have a themed drink for our Superbowl party this year. It was in Miami so we went for pink flamingos and palm trees. We served Cubano sandwiches and Mojito cocktails. The mojito's were a hit. We set up a "mojito education station" on our computer playing the Bacardi mojito video, then we had a station set up with mint,sugar, rum,lime wedes, ice and soda water. This muddle was an excellent purchase. It did the job efficiently and well. Even Mojito novices got the hang of it easily.Great buy and good luc
Never replace a bulb again. But get frosted cover instead. This is the only two-LED light I can find. It's a little larger in size than it has to be, but it puts off more light than the single LED version. Uses a maximum of 1 watt of electricity. Get the frosted cover instead of this clear one. The frosted looks nicer -- more like a real nightlight. Hi/Lo switch slightly controls light output. LED's are slightly blue in color
Henckels 6-Inch Stainless Steel Knief. So far, we are very happy with the knife and will probably order the larger version.
Not bad. The steel finish on these picks are not matte (like in the photos) but shiny more like chrome.  Cosmetically, over time they get scratched up when used to get into the nooks and crannies of hardshell crab.  Functionally, though, they work well
great for cooking. I'm using this pot for rice cookingIt takes less than 10 mini and the quality is goodI like it
4 stars item for a 2 stars price. We have been using our toast ovens everyday for the last 20 yrs or so. We had expensive ovens, we had not so expensive ovens. They all died after several years of services no matter what. So why bother to spend 100 dollars for a machine that just makes a little bit difference? For a $32 machine, this is really a good buy. No complaints so far
Perfect for my studio aparment. I have a studio with low pile carpet and a teensy kitchen and bathroom with linoleum.  I was so pleased to discover that this thing cleans both!The pros:*The brush roller thing at the bottom does a great job picking up things from both the carpet and hair/crumbs from the linoleum.*You don't have to mount the charging bracket.  It has a holder on the side for the battery by itself, which pops out of the vacuum easily.*The roller thing is between 9"-10" wide, which is a reasonable size to get in between pieces of furniture for me, not as wide as your standard vacuumThe disappointments:* The roller thing doesn't come off.  I have been reluctant to use it as a dustbuster because it can leave marks if you're using it on more delicate surfaces than the floor (like paint).* If you have cleaned up hair the roller thing is really annoying to clean.  The first time I used it I thought maybe I could just unscrew the cover, take out the bar, clean it and put it back.  DO NOT DO THIS.  All the moving parts are precariously placed inside the bottom - I never did get the little wheels back inside.  Now I just do the best I can with needlenose pliars from the bottom.The upshot?  It's an inexpensive tool that does exactly what it's supposed to.  The roller cleaning problem will probably result in fewer years of use than otherwise, but for the price it's a very reasonable problem to have.
Great value for an all-in-one unit. Received this as a gift (at my request!) over the holidays and have been very happy with it.  Unit is easy to use and produces a quart and a half of nicely consistent ice cream in 30 minutes (helps a lot to chill the mix first).  Much prefer it over my old unit that required the bowl to be cooled in the freezer overnight for three reasons: doesn't take up the freezer space; doesn't require advance planning; let's you do multiple batches without waiting.  One very useful feature is that the mixer operates separately from the compressor, so you can turn of the mixer off when it is no longer able to turn but keep cooling the ice cream in the machine for firmer texture.As some have noted in reviews on other sites, it is somewhat noisy, but not unbearably so.  Other than that, no real complaints; especially considering that this is not a commercial grade unit and only costs $175.  I would definitely purchase again.Some recommendations based on my initial experiences:1) Cool the mix first and you'll be able to make the ice cream quickly at the end of a meal for an impressive dinner party treat.2) Ice cream will be on the softer side (but great) when it comes out of the machine, so let it set up for an hour in the freezer if you like it firmer.3) A little corn syrup (about a tablespoon) will create a smoother consistency for some ice creams.4) Be careful to fill the bowl only halfway up as the ice cream gains a lot of volume as it freezes.5) Even if you are not usually a fan of fruit ice creams, try them in this machine.  Fresh strawberry ice cream blows away the store-bought stuff.6) The included directions are pretty clear, so read and follow them
Cup is exquisite and perfectly balanced in saucer. I have this cup and am very satisfied with it.  The design is elegant and lovely to say the least.  I enjoy it very much.
Take back your sink!. I bought one of these from Amazon 2 weeks ago, with the extra filters for half of what I would have paid retail.  At first my boyfriend nixed the fountain, as it was very loud.  Luckily, I remembered another reviewer had mentioned that the unit could be noisy if the water level was low.  Once I filled it up almost to the rim, we could barely hear it.  The cats adore it, haven't been in the sink or toilet (well, maybe once or twice!) since we bought it.  I give it 4 stars only because it is rather difficult to clean.  It's a great deal for a really good product
Great looking and nice to embroider on. These look very nice, expensive, and feel nice. I embroidered on them for gifts and they came out beautifully. (you can see the embroidered towels on my personal site [...]UPDATE: I've since ordered several of the other brands in the same price range and they can't compare to these. For the price, it's a very good value and I plan on purchasing other colors as well as more of these. I should have given them FIVE stars
Serves its purpose. This humidifier works quite well, is easy to operate, and not bad to clean.  It comes apart easily enough and cleaning takes very little time.  We go through a tank full of water each day on the lowest setting.  Unfortunately, it is a little noisy, so its turned off at night.  The noise isn't so noticeable during the day.  We're all breathing easier though, so I'm glad for the purchase
Decent!!. I had to replace my Space Saver B&D on a sunday morning.  I wanted another thermal carafe model but wasn't realy ready to shell out $80 for the Braun even witht the good reviews.  I found this on clearance at Target for $35 and I bought a Cuisinart gold filter for it.  I did not like the fact the Mr Coffee filter had a solid bottom to the gold filter.  Anways, there is not much I can say bad about this machine.Things I like:  looks,brew seletor,self clean feature,makes good coffee,the carafe is one the best I have used.  The easy change water filter disks are a nice feature as well, inexpensive and work pretty well.  I dont have any of the leak problems.  Things I would change: could make coffee a little hotter but not a deal breaker,the unit beeps 5 times when finished brewing not a big deal when everyone is up and moving but I tend to set it to go on before the family is up.  Overall for what I paid for this I'm very pleased
Batali 6 Quart Italian Enamel on Cast Iron Essentials Pot, Persimmon. I really like this product, great to cook, to bake bread and even better to clean. Excellent price (less than half of the other brands) and very good quality. Highly reccomended.
These work great, but I can't give them 5 stars because they cost too much for 4 dinky pieces of plastic!. For 4 pieces of plastic to cost this much is outrageous. These do work in my Senseo. They make great coffee and tea. Just load them and stap the top on. They have to be put into the 2 cup pod holder.I bought these and was shocked at the high price of shipping. The shipping was more expensive than the pods. They came in a bubble wrap lined envelope.Just use common sense and let them cool before trying to clean them
Okay for the money but nothing to write home about. Unlike what the photo suggests, the entire set is black and not dark brown.   This lends a versatile and contemporary look to the tables which would work well if you have modern-looking furniture.  However, the black finish seems to work against the veneer pattern.  The black ends up being shiny, so not only does the veneer pattern stand out but so do the natural patterns in the wood and any scratches or dings.  The end result is a rough almost old-looking table.  Seems like the wood could also have been sanded down more since there's still somewhat of a raw feel.On the plus side, both the coffee table and accompanying end tables are remarkably sturdy.  They are not easy to get knocked over, and they seem able to hold heavy items.  I've got my computer, printer, and feet resting on the coffee table right now, and it's not budging.  The coffee table is small and more suited to go in front of a loveseat--a perk if you're living in an apartment with limited space.  An advantage to the black color is that the end tables can go anywhere.Overall, I can't complain because $99 is a good deal for cheap apartment furniture.  It's functional, affordable, and reasonably attractive.  But there's no mistaking this for anything but low end furniture
Phorm Light- I like it!. I've had the Phorm light for a month and I enjoy it. It lights up the whole room, its compact so I can store it away when I'm not using it.  It's much better than using an overhead light.  I just really like this product and I'll go even further to say that this is the best product that I've bought so far this year.  And I'll constantly wonder what took me so long to order it, instead of struggling to get some light for reading out of tap lights
Just as expected. This was delivered promptly, packaged well and looked exactly as I expected it to.  The only downfall was that one of the beads was broken during shipping, but for my purposes it worked well.  I suppose if I had been using it as a curtain, I would not have been pleased that there was a broken bead.  However, it was just what I wanted
pretty and practical. I absolutely love this trivet. I use it on a daily basis to keep my tea piping hot (the trivet is low and wide and balances a teapot just fine), and its cast iron construction makes it sturdy enough to hold heavy dishes as well, so dinner never gets cold. To top it all off, the design is very appealing and will only enhance the beauty of a well-laid table. I have the trivet in dune, and my mother wants me to order one for her as well
2 Tone IS a thicker silicone. I am very satisfied with this product and the Red looks much better than expected. The standard size is smaller than the custard cups I have been using so this is a good purchase for me.Is this frugal?  no but I did not own a regular size muffin pan and I prefer silicone to the cheaper nonstick metal pansWould I have purchased this used at a cheaper price off of craigslist?  noDid I shop around for the best total price including the manufacturer's website?  yes and so should yo
Good item at a reasonable price. Produced crispy foods quickly but be careful not to overload it.You must use a lightly used electrical circuit or it can trip the breaker. It takes a long time to heat up but recovers after the first batct quickly for a frier this large. I recommend it
Great value!. I've just purchased these glasses from Amazon.  They arrived in about 4 days with free shipping in perfect condition, double-boxed with plenty of bubble wrap and packing material.  I find these glasses to be an exceptional value.  I won't quibble with reviewers who believe their Riedel glasses deliver wine with better taste.  I'm a wine enthusiast, but admittedly not an expert.  My palate cannot discern a difference drinking the same wine out of these glasses versus a Riedel product.  And at less than half the price, with great functional design and looks, I'll be purchasing Spiegelau products again
Great Machine. I love that it has a mini bowl.  So much less storage.  Also it runs so much more quiet than my old Hamilton Beach.  I am so impressed.  Love Kitchen Aid anything
fish tank filters. Very good value and the filters arrived quickly.  The fish are happy too
Great product for the price!. These mugs are one of the few 24oz. travel coffee mugs you can find out there.  They are not top quality/heavy duty but the reason I love them so much is that my husband only wants 24oz. mugs but he has a tendancy to lose/misplace his coffee mugs on a regular basis and I don't mind so much when they are only about $5-$7 each.  They are durable and he loves them too
working excellent. taylor 1456 is really a great thermometer ever seen.. I'm using since 3 months and ordered new outdoor unit and addtional one main unit with outdoor unit as a gift for my friend.
Magazine Rack. Basically,I really like it but it is too small for my needs. It is of good quality, attractive, and durable
I want one, too!. I bought this pillow for my husband and I can attest that it is VERY comfortable and has left him feeling refreshed in the mornings from getting a good night's sleep (finally!).  Yes, if you like "high" pillows, you'll need to put another pillow under it, but we've always slept with two pillows, anyway
Pleased. Got tired of can openers that left little "burrs" or that were difficult to get started.  Hesitant about buying a "As Seen On TV" product, but went for it.  Works well, amuses my toddler and the dogs.  Overall happy with product, hope it lasts
Super Knives!. I received three Global knives for Christmas last year from my son.  I can't believe how great they are.  Almost a year later and all three are as sharp as they were when I received them.  I would highly recommend them to anyone who is serious about the kitchen.  Yes, they are expensive, but they are probably the last knives you will ever have to buy
A great machine at a great price. The box arrived bashed, but my refurbished machine was packed like a newborn baby and arrived safe and sound. I unpacked it, assembled it in 3 minutes without looking at the instructions, plugged it in, scanned (literally) through the book, and let her rip! In about 20 minutes I was eating the best dessert imaginable.See, I wanted healthy, low sugar, non-fat desserts. I got a jug of organic black cherry juice (talk about antioxidants!)from the healthfood store (for about $3!) poured some into the freezer until it was about halfway filled, added about a tablespoon of wildflower honey and turned it on. I didn't really know anything about "overrun" which has to do with adding air to the mixture. It turns out that this makes a fluffy, creamy dessert without adding butterfats and cholesterol.Here in Santa Fe we have some swanky local ice cream that runs $6 per pint. They have exotic flavors like Lavender and Garam Masala and Chai. Frankly, I've got them beat and mine is healthier.Some of these reviews say how loud the machine is. I don't find it so - it's about as loud as my dishwasher. And it is a soft-serve ice cream maker which allows you to eat right away or store for later. I used to have an old Simac ice cream maker which was top loading like a washing machine, and it was a devil to clean. But cleaning this is easy as can be.Do you NEED an ice cream machine like this? Probably not. But if you love to cook and you love to eat wonderful, healthy gourmet food, this machine transforms kitchen work into a relaxing and enjoyable hobby that brings health to you and your family and friends
diversity. I ORDERED 4SETS OF THIS ITHEMS.I HOPE LOTS OF DIFFERENT PAINTING BUT I RECEIVED SAME FLOWER.EXCEPT DIVERSITY, EVERYTHING IS EXCELLENT
Very nice pasta set. I bought this as a Christmas present for a dear friend of mine who recently began collecting rooster objects.The entire set arrived in perfect condition.  The colors, red & black are vibrant and striking..the rooster pattern is on each piece and is very nice.Very good quality, good size and good price...will make a perfect holiday gift for serving pasta or stew or salad or whatever
Best and cleanest betta food so far. Hands down this is the best betta food I have used so far. The rest of the betta food brands I have bought sinks to the bottom and then it will rot if you don't' immediately clean it out and kill the fish.So if you want  good betta fish food then betta bio-gold will save you allot of time cleaning your fish tank more then you should have to. I just use a  small container to put the fish food in and take them out with tweezers so I don't dump to many in and if after a few minutes there is some still left I use tweezers or a net to get the few remaining pellets of the TOP of the water instead of a bunch of sunken pellets which can be a pain to fish out.
Affordable Riedel!!. I've always been a big fan of Riedel glasses, but they were just too expensive and broke too easily.  These glasses are the solution to that problem.  They have the right feel and weight, and although there are small seams on the stems of the glasses, they aren't noticeable to anyone but me.  I have dropped one and it didn't even break!  I highly recommend this series
Love this!. This is the perfect little pitcher to own for serving creamer or milk for coffee or tea. It's a wonderful compliment to the rest of the Fiestaware line of serving items. Not only for everyday use, but also for parties. However, I do recommend that you order more than one if you do plan on using them for many people. Mix and match the colors for a beautiful table setting
Excellent size for family meals!. About a month ago, a friend gave me her GF tenth anniversary grill because she said she had no room for it in her kitchen. In return, I grilled up some home-made sausage and veggies and had her and her family over for a great supper! I really love this grill. Even though it's got a big surface area, it's no trouble for me to either take it out or put it away, and it cleans really easily. My tip for cleaning is to rub the grilling plates with damp paper towels while the grill is still fairly warm; the charred stuff wipes right off!I wish this large grill had interchangeable plates for griddling and making waffles, like the smaller G5 version does. Just imagine the big breakfasts you could serve up with this baby! I do suppose extra plates would make this grill too hard to manage, though, given its size.Bottom line: I'd highly recommend this grill, especially if you're using it for a family of four or more
Great item. This is exactly the replacement part I wanted.  It's a great way to froth milk
great for the money. i don't understand why some reviewers say it doesn't sharpen.  i got this littler sucker with my chicago cutlery insignia set and it sharpens great, just 3-5 strokes every few uses, just like one of the other positive reviewers said.  afterwards, i can slice tomatos just millimeters thick with ease and virtually no pressure.  it's not a professional-caliber sharpener and i don't know how well it works on non-chicago cutlery blades that might have a different pitch or angle, but for 8 bucks, it works great
silicone baking mat. I absolutely love this product.  It is very easy to use and clean. Food wont stick to the pan any longer, which makes my life so much easier
Spray Commander is a great training tool. I have a very young, very energetic Rottweiler.  She thinks it is great fun to dig holes in the yard.  I tried every trick in the book trying to break her of the habit.  At the age of 2 a Rottie can dig a very big hole, very fast, and I needed a solution before my yard looked like a mine field.  After doing some research on the internet, I found Spray Commander.  I had to watch her carefully while she was in the yard, and as soon as she started digging, I gave her a blast of citronella (button #2).  This scenario was played out 2 more times.  Results?  No more digging.  We've had the product for about a year now, and I think it's great.  Easy to use, painless, and entirely effective.
CHRISTMAS SPODE CANDLE HOLDER. THIS IS TRULY A BEAUTIFUL PIECETHE SISTER WHO GETS IT WILL BE THRILLE
Great Glasses. What's to say?  Great look, great shape, very nice wine glasses.  I honestly don't know if my wine tastes that much better in good glasses, but it's certainly a pleasure to drink from them.  Good quality for a very reasonable price!I will add that if Amazon did have a problem with shipping them intact, they seem to have solved it.  My glasses arrived securely double-boxed, totally intact.
Excellent. I love my new salad bowl set. The color is beautiful, so is the quality and you can't beat the price
Great Gift!!. I bought two of the Margaritaville machines for co-workers.  They have been raving about it ever since.  In one case it has became a permanent appliance sitting on top of the kitchen counter right next to the toaster.  I havn't experienced it yet, but my co workers are having blast making all types of frozen drinks.
Great purchase!. I was extremely pleased wth the Lenox Holiday 12 piece set purchase!  It was definitely a great buy in that I did some comparative shopping and found the Amazon price to be the least expensive.  The set looks elegant and will certainly add to the holiday table
Great pan!. I love this pan.  I did some research and what everyone said about the pan was right...it is a real winner.  Easy to use, great to clean. The seller was wonderful as well.  A good deal all around
Picky mom says, "PERFECT". Rice is our staple food - no kidding, it really is. I have all different kinds of rice bins in my pantry - long grain, brown rice, par boiled rice, sona masuri rice and basmati rice. I cook rice everyday and I was never completely happy with any one rice cooker in all these years. I tried several different kinds, Sanyo, Aroma, Zojirushi etc., There was always something with each of these, uneven cooking, big splatters, bottom getting burnt, so on and so forth.  I finally got this one, recommended by a friend.* Perfect brown rice, white rice and pulav/pilaf.* Absolutely no splatters. I intentionally put 1.5 cups extra water and NOTHING CAME OUT - rice overcooked, but that is a different story.* Even though the lid is not detachable, cleaning is easy. Part of it is due to the shape; fancy looking rectangular ones are such a pain. I'd say crappy design.* Cooking vessel is definitely thicker than most cookers out there. Never had a burnt bottom even when left on warm for several hours.* I don't have to crank up my big oven for baking a small cake. This cooker does it!Complaints are really minor.*Weak LCD display.*Cannot cancel timer if you change your mind. You have to go in increments all the way to max and then start counting again.* Does not come in bigger sizes.
PUR Water. It's hard to find replacement filters for my PUR pitcher, yet I found them easily at amazon.com.  And, I couldn't have been happier.  Not only did I find my product, but the price was so good that I ordered up a goodly supply!  I find I'm relying more and more on amazon.com to purchase the items that are sometimes hard to find elsewhere.Keep up the good work
Very good!. It works great. My only problem with it is that it comes with an adhesive protective band and it takes forever to be able to take the glue off the slicer.
A Must for Deep Fryers. If you own a deep fryer and do not know about these yet, chances are you really need these.  Depending on how often you use your deep fryer, you could need replacements in less than a month.So, what do they do?  Simple, they keep oily fumes from invading your house when your frying-up a batch of french-fries.  The oily smell in the air is not normal, and the fumes can leave an oily residue on anything and everything.  So, you gotta have them.As far as I can tell, Rival is the only company that still makes the filters for home units at a reasonable price
A must Have for Ultra Sharp Knives. This very understated, plain looking piece of kitchen equipment looks rather like a conventional sharpening steel with a white rod, but is in fact an ultra fine grit sharpening tool.Don't be fooled by the modest appearance - this is a very high precision piece of equipment.For high quality knives (eg Global) that are already sharp, but need that extra finish on the edge to achieve a truly razor sharpness, this ceramic rod is superb.  Global actually recommend ceramic instead of steels, and once you use this product you will see why !!!Incidentally, Global also market their own ceramic sharpener, and it's made by - you guessed it, Kyocera.All knives will lose their ultra sharp edge in normal use, and the usual method of refreshing (re aligning) the edge is to use a steel.This ceramic rod takes this process to a new level.   The ultra fine ceramic actually sharpens the edge as well as re aligning it.  The result is an incredibly sharp razor edge, usually with a few strokes.I have been using it for about 6 months now, mainly on my Global knives, and it is the best sharpening rod I have used - lot's better than conventional or diamond "steels".I recommend using it like a "steel", with gentle strokes alternating from side to side, holding the knife at very slightly greater angle than the sharpened angle.Not just for Japanese knives, this great product also works just fine on European knives.Buy it without hesitation.
nice towels. I like these towel however the color is green,,, I thought is would be more of a grey or silve
Meyer Ceramic Bakeware. I gave this as a Christmas gift to my mom.  She has always used glass and metal bakeware.  For the price, it was a steal
My New Favorite Kitchen Toy. My Then bachelor husband purchased a George Foreman (small) grill about 4 years ago because he LOVES steak.  I recently purchased this item as he threatened to "fire up" the BIG BLACK BEAST - Outdoor Gas Grill - in our back yard!  The new Hamilton Meal Maker Express is without doubt my favorite new purchase. As my husband is a steak perfectionist it is imperative to experiment a little and then not to overcook by leaving the top grill down in order to keep the steaks warm (as they WILL overcook).  Other than that, I just trim the steaks, spray some olive oil on the grill, rub on some good steak seasonings and brush on some Kitchen Bouquet for "looks" and grill away.  Now I have perfect steaks and NO MESS at all.  Love it.  Love it.  Love it. Thanks.  VJ
Great LED nightlight. Cheap to run and last forever. This is the only two-LED light I can find. It's a little larger in size than it has to be, but it puts off more light than the single LED version. Uses a maximum of 1 watt of electricity. The frosted cover is nicer than the clear version. Hi/Lo switch slightly controls light output. LED's are slightly blue in color
Dog Door Bell. It takes a little patience to get the dog to use it, at first she thought is was a treat machine, but eventually she realized it meant go outside. Works very well.
Get Grilled!. Great for grilled cheese, ham and cheese or roast beef sandwiches.It also works good with fruit fillings, we just sprinkle powdered sugar on top after they are done.Our daughter used hers when we visited and after seeing how quick and easy it was to useand then tasting the results, we knew we had to buy one for ourselves. It makes it easy to make either one or two sandwiches at a time. I am glad we bought one because it came in handy for quick hot lunch snacks when I was hunting up North. ~ The Bos
GREAT ITEM FOR  THE PRICE!!. I picked this up a few months back when the price was *too low to refuse* *cough*$29bucks!!!*cough* and I am MORE than happy with it!Like others have said... its not a big and fluffy down comforter, but did you really expect to get big and fluffy king size comforter for this price?Anywho.. the reason I'm here replying right now is because I keep checking back to see if I can pick up another for the same price. YES, I'd buy another...Hello Kim~ :
My first "real" dishes. For my 2nd apartment I decided to get real dishes instead of the hodge-podge I had from dorms and thrift stores. I could not be happier w/these dishes. The price was reasonable and they are incredibly durable.  I really like the plum-it's a rich purple and it was easy to match it to other fiestaware.  I liked the color so much I got the mugs and 2 other kinds of bowls to match the dishes. It was a great deal and it will be easy to add to my kitchen set.
The most wonderful pillow ever!. I've been looking for a foam pillow, remembering as a teen I had one and loved it.   I never can find a good pillow--my neck hurts, my TMJ would get worse, or my ears would be sore.  I have had a very hard time finding a good one, and was thrilled when I found this on amazon.  Latex foam pillows are far superior in comfort to the popular "memory foam," which I think is so uncomfortable--I mean, it smooshes down and stays there--how is that support?  Latex foam, on the other hand, is light, but so supportive.  It's springy--it's gently lifting you up.  Anyway, I've had it for about a week and slept better than I have in years.  I absolutely love it!  Also, I can't believe how fast I got it.  When I ordered it it was out of stock, and I chose free shipping.  Had it in a few days.  Wow!  Thanks Amazon. (PS  The latex smells a little funny at first, but the smell was completely gone within a few days.)
Scoop Free LT1-3 Fresh Step Refill Litter Cartridge, 3 Pack. Excellent, just as described and arrived prompt!! Great job!! Thanks, Annmarie :-
Very Beautiful piece of furniture! Great Price!. I assembled it all by myself while my husband was at work and boy was I pleased with myself! The chest took me 2 1/2 hours, which I think was pretty good since I was doing it alone, plus my 4 year old daughter kept distracting me a few times! The only real problem came when I started assembling the drawers, you could not put the guides in the holes they had drilled for you because it wouldn't line up right, you had to move them all the way to the side.  The bottom drawer sticks more than the others. But I can deal with that, maybe one of these days I will get around to trying to fix that. I have noticed that the drawers open better when you squat down to the level of the drawer to pull it open. I have had no problems with knobs falling off as other people have stated, though in box the end table was in the knobs were broken in the package. I called the manufacturer and they are sending me two new knobs, don't know when they'll arrive though. There also was one part of assembling the chest that I had to skip because the screws it called to use were too small and too short for where they were supposed to go....they were to go under the bottom of the decorative molding in front and screw through the top of the chest, but the screw was way to small, would not even go through the wood. The top was screwed tightly down in another location so I skipped that step and you could not tell and it functions just fine. Very Sturdy and I highly recommend it if you are wanting something not too expensive.
you can make your one Quark. The Yougurt Maker is also woerking for making Quark You need just Buttermilk and let it stand for 16 better 18 ouers.That's what i do.I'm verry happy to make my on Ouark so easy.
Christmas Gift. I bought this for my daughter and she has raved about it.She has cooked so many dishes in it and loves it. The fact that it holdsheat and can cook on low or medium heat.Also easy to clean
It is very good. I have slept on such a pillow for nearly 1 year and I am quite satisfied with it. It does provide excellent support although I find it difficult to sleep face-down. Overall, it is a very good purchase and is one of the best pillows I have used. Recommended
Great Pan. I loved this pan. It is really solid,and it cleans up so well for being stainless and not a non stick service.Also I love All-Clad
Love it !!!. Best piece I have bought thus far!! Wonderful price and love that it came in the real box, not the regular white box!Have made potatoes, soups, stew, etc...You need to have one!
A Glove that simply fits over the metal handle of your pan!. THE essential requirement for those hot metal handles and so much more practical than a bulky oven glove.Another brilliant product from 'Le Creuset', a progressive company that never seems to stop coming up with bright ideas for serious cooks and kitchenalia addicts!Sensibly priced and one of those items that once you have one........you just cannot do without one!Look out for the cream, red, blue and black versions, too!As a footnote, the handle glove is a really useful and inexpensive 'extra' to give with a 'Le Creuset' omelette pan, as a home warming, a shower/engagement gift or a wedding present!
Ecopod works great -- with practice. I have run almost a whole bag of coffee through my ecopod now and it has become my standard method now.  I grind the coffee in an electric coffee grinder at the most fine setting, then run the coffee through again.  I fill the pod about 3/4 full after tamping down the coffee very lightly. I get good foam, and a fairly strong brew.  Using less coffee gets more foam sometimes, but the downside is a weaker cup.  I have also put standard drip grind into our grinder to get it smaller in size, and that has worked good also.  Grinding the coffee very fine fluffs it up and so it looks like you are loading a lot of coffee for each cup, but actually its about a heaping teaspoon of drip grind coffee, so it is very economical.  Those having problems need to try again.  If it works for me, it will work for anyone
good find. how can you rate a tamper? well, it fits in the basket and it tamps down the coffee. I guess Terry's tamper does  just that. It was a great price, I mean come on, who's the numbskull who would pay $20 for an item to tamp his grounds?I was impressed by the fast shipping and great customer service
Cute and practical shape. I have had this teapot for about a year and it continues to be my favorite.  I usually use loose tea and the paper tea bags which can be purchased empty, so I don't have any problem with the tea strainer at the neck of the spout.  I admit that it does drip a bit, but I use a matching square plate beneath it with a dark colored terry potholder to catch whatever does drip and even with that small inconvenience (what teapot doesn't drip a little?) I just love the shape of the pot, the lid and the handle.  I have arthritis so the handle angle is important to me.  A teapot full of scalding tea is not what I want to spill and the handle on this pot is at a very convenient angle, making it easy to pour, even when full.  Most other pots have big round handles that are just not easy for my wrist to manage.I also like the lid which has two "ears."  When it is on the pot, it won't fall off, even if you put the teapot upside down.  To remove the lid, it must be turned to allow one of the ears to slip through a little notch, then the other ear will also come out easily.  It seems like a small thing, but I've dumped many lids to their early demise while pouring the last cup.  The shape of the handle on the lid is flat and a generous size which is easy for my old hands to grasp - another great feature I prefer over the little "balls" that usually adorn the tops of teapots.The pot also keeps my tea hot longer.  I'm not sure if it's the shape of the pot or the material it is made of, but I never use a cozy on it and the tea is fine to the last cup.  If I do let it go too long - like hours  I can slip the pot in the microwave and zap the brew to heat it up again.  Don't try that with Royal Albert!It's a chubby little cheerful teapot that just does its job well.  I've ordered another to give as a gift.  I'm tempted to buy another for myself...just in case
just what I was looking for. I was looking for awhile for some nice solid flatware for everyday use and finally found it.  This is very solid does not bend I didn't want shiny because it usually dulls after awhile anyway.  We just love it I ordered 2 sets
Awesome Dirt Devil Platinum Carpet shampooer. I shopped and shopped and read lots of reivews prior to making my decision to purchase the Dirt Devil Carpet shampooer. I previously owned the Hoover upright shampooer and seemed to be happy about that choice for several years, but I wanted to investigate what was available and what was out there before making a new purchase on a new carpet shampooer. I read several good reviews about this Dirt Devil shampooer, comparing all prices, reviews and availability it seemed to be a better choice over the Hoover and other machines out there.  I can tell you now that I have owned it and used it for 6 months, I just love it.  I have to agree with the reviews. It is user friendly, has a nice size fill tank and a nice size storage tank and they are both easy to fill and drain and the machine is easy to use and does a great job.  You can use really hot water and it fills easily at the kitchen sink.  It also empties easily too.  The only draw back I can see, which other people mentioned in thier reviews too was that it is a little bit heavy; however, I think this is not a drawback but really a benefit because I think it really helps to clean and extract water from the carpet. This machine really shampoos's nicely and extracts the water well from the carpet, much better than the Hoover I previously owned.  In fact the carpet seemes to dry in only a couple hours after shampooing. I am sure this depends on the time of year summer/winter, but over all I am very pleased and happy with my choice. I love this shampooer, it stores easily, it is easy to use, and it really does a fine job. It does much better than my previouse owned Hoover shampoo model, therefore, I recommend it to anyone. The Dirt Devil Platinum Carpet Shampooer is an awesome machine. It should last for many years because it seems sturdy at a great value for the buck. In my opinion, It is the Top of the line in its class, it is a great choice at a great price around $150.00.
Surprised at some of the comments re. cosmetics. Honestly you would think many of the "reviewers" here were submitting their knives for a beauty pageant and not using them to cook with if you read some of the opinions voiced here. However I feel another poster was on the mark when they mentioned that many probably buy their high price German knives as more of a status symbol/showoff item than as a true tool or utility item, I wouldn't be surprised if many of those commenting on scratches on the handle order out five to six times a week and the knives at most get used to slice a lemon for their gin and tonic.With that aside onto the product at hand, my wife and I were given a set of both Professional S (I believe six piece set) and large set of Henckels Ever-edge for our wedding, we owned a smaller set of Ever-edge but put a larger set on our registry because we wanted something nicer and more versatile. We took both the Six piece Pro S and the Nine piece Ever-edge back and exchanged it for the nice piece Professional S set (I happened to be working at a store which sold high end cutlery -Wusthof, Global, Henckels, etc... and happened to get a good discount on it). I also picked up six matching professional S steak knives to accompany the set.As I said above I worked in a store for a short amount of time which also sold other high quality brands such as Wusthof and Global however I chose the Henckels as at the time the price was the best of the bunch, the knives felt much better in my hands than either the Global or the Wusthof, and I greatly preferred the straighter edge of the Henckels over the "belly" of the Wusthof. Really it comes down to personal preference though as what feels good to me might feel awful to you. Also Wusthof and others are only sold either on net discounters or higher end cooking stores which is great if you like to hunt around however Henckles and their Professional S line are sold in a good deal of retailers, which to me means that ordering replacements or buying additional pieces will be that much easier and I will have a good deal more room to work in terms of price negotiation. So if you are a knife snob and need to buy your knives at the high end knife/cooking shop only and or will get annoyed seeing your knives for sale in Bed Bath and Beyond then you might not want to consider the Pro S line.Someone below mentioned "Forged" vs. "SCT" and from what I have learned/read on the subject the differences are so minor that the end user will never notice the difference. Basically it boils down to the blade either being forged from one piece of metal (older method) or on larger blades forming them from a composite, or forging two pieces or more of metal together to make one blade. Consumer reports and cooking.com refer to the Professional S style as "Forged" because it is very close in form and function to traditionally "Forged" pieces the only difference is that it isn't physically "forged" from one piece of metal. The other option is "Stamped" such as cheaper knives and Cutco.Overall I am more than pleased with these knives and wouldn't hesitate to buy them again. My wife loves them and they perform very well. While the finish might not have been pristine out of the box (Yes I noticed some scratches as well on the handles) one has to remember they are only knives and they are meant to be abused, when selling other brands I noticed the quality was no better or worse (Wusthof and Global had their share of flaws in finishing as well) so your mileage may vary. As others said, check these out in the store before you buy and compare to others, if you like a nice straight blade with a sure feel and a slightly smaller handle (good for smaller hands) then the Henckels might be for you.
My jewelry is organized now. It's easy to access, you can actually _see_ everything you own, and if you organize it by color, you can see what you still need.  My sister admired mine, so I got her one for Christmas and she was thrilled
Great looking and easy to install Wall-Mount Wine Glass Rack. We've had a built-in bar for over 20 years and always had the countertop cluttered with glasses.  Since we have a very high ceiling in the bar we needed a rack that could wall mount and get them out of the way.  We ordered 2 of these racks on Dec 23rd - they were here by the 26th and on the wall the next day.  Now we can entertain having what we're serving on the bar instead of our stock of glasses.  Service was great through this seller (Kegworks) we got delivery tracking emails to let us know where and when our shipment was and when it would arrive.  Would definitely recommend this product and this reseller.  Check out the picture we uploaded to see for yourself
Holds a lot of water. I had an electric water dispenser that held 5 gallon bottles and decided to try a more economical alternative.  My main concerns were to have non-clorine tasting water and to remove the hard water deposits that gunk up my coffe pot.  I fill the resivoir in the evening and put the dispenser back in the fridge to filter thru.  In the a.m. I fill 3-4 water bottles to take with me for the day and make a half pot of coffee.  I love the amount of water this holds as opposed to a pitcher.  It's slim design fits nicely in the fridge and my water tastes so clean
Great. This skillet is the best.  Its shape and size are great.  Its quality is remarkable and the non-stick coating is revolutionary.  I have never seen non stick coating like this before.  I highly recommend this skillet
spiffy silicone spatula. There weren't a ton of reviews for silicone turners and I took a chance with this one.  It's pretty much what I was looking for: it's got a nice solid and durable feel to it, good heft, a little pliable but thick, moderately broad and not floppy, isn't going to damage my nonstick pans and hopefully won't leech toxins into my food since I've been concerned that plastics might.  And the company logo in the metal's cute/ classy
Not bad. I would definately recommend this over the cheaper plastic models out there, but I would also caution that it is not for the weak-armed. It takes a lot of muscle to use this french fry cutter, and I always have to make my husband do it. Overall, though, is tough enough to do the job, as long as you are too
Great coffee. If you like great coffee the french press is the way to go and the Bodum press is one of the best.
Decent space heater. This heater does a nice job heating a small area. It's pretty quiet and the fan forced output is about what you'd expect from a fan set on "slow". Doesn't get hot to the touch. A little top heavy, falls over with very little help, but shuts itself off. Heat proximity breaker takes 30 minutes to reset, that's too long.The automatic switching between 1000W and 1500W works, but it really needs an obvious manual LO/HI switch (it says three speeds in the writeup, I found two?). The switch to disable eco-save mode leaves it set at 1500W, which is too high on a shared bathroom circuit. Trips our house GFI breaker at least once every couple weeks, seems to be something to do with the tip-over shutoff
Spirited stemware. If you enjoy grappa or marc (dry liqueur made from the lees of wine) it's important to serve it in a tall, narrow-mouthed glass. This type of glass traps the subtle aroma of grapes that makes drinking grappa an interesting experience. If you drink Kirschwasser or other eau de vie, the same glass is used. These work far better than brandy snifters which aren't really so suited to this type of delicate but potent liqueur
Unbeatable!. The same as you see on many of the "Food Network" shows.  It is very stable and heavy.  Funny that a block of wood was one of the best packed items that I've ordered from Amazon (Cooking.com)!  It's not something that you put away until you need it.  Plan on leaving it out and using it all of the time
Round Cuisinart PrepBoard. These are my favorite cutting boards.  Cuisinart makes 3 cutting/prep boards, round, square and rectangle.  I bought them in a set all together, I use at least one everyday.  They are dishwasher safe so clean up couldn't be easier and they will not dull your knives, absorb odors or collect bacteria.  They are all slightly raised around the edge so liquid will not spill on your counter, perfect for tomatoes or anything else you are chopping.  I actually just ordered a second rectangle one.  You can even use them for outdoor serving, fruit, cheese, etc.  Highly recommended! A+
Libbey Glassware. I own this pattern but in a LIGHT BLUE color. Is it possible to find this pattern in that color
Works fine, no problems whatsoever. I'm not sure why there are several negative reviews for this vacuum. It has a great price, works well on my carpets and floors, and is very easy to use. What's not to like?Bottom line: I would not hesitate to buy another S3755 if I needed another vacuum cleaner
Great!. I can't beleive anyone would just use this for serving - it's a very useful size, great for searing meats and then roasting in the oven, rice dishes, etc.  The pan is not heavy, the lid is a killer, but I think that helps in braising
Best addition to my kitchen!!!!!. I got this grill just after Christmas and it is the best item I could have added to my kitchen.  It is the largest George Foreman Grill I have seen so far which is what I was looking for.  It is ideal for a family that loves to BBQ/grill meat and vegtables.  I have grilled, chicken, steak, salmon, and veggies and all have come out great!!  The cooking times are accurate in the booklet that is provided.  I would highly recommend this to anyone who is thinking about getting a George Foreman Grill and wants it to be large enough.  It also cleans up very easily.  The George Foreman Grill will be a permanent addition to my kitchen
Very Fast. I think the pads arrived even before I recieved confirmation that it was sent!  Thanks to all for a great site and effecient service
desk review. Nice desk...what I needed for the space that I have. I ordered the matching hutch, but there was no way to attach it to the desk. I wish the computer keyboard pullout was actually a drawer
Elegant pattern. I received this pattern for my wedding anniversary this past year.  I am very pleased with the set.  It is elegant enough for company but is great for everyday use.  Good quality stoneware at an Amazon.com price...you can't beat it
Simple toy loaded with countless hours of entertainment. My cat loves this toy.  She can't walk past it without tapping it with her paw.  If you just shake this toy and she hears the ball moving within the plastic, she comes running even if she's napping.  She can't get enough of this toy and its very comical to see her playing with it.  Its like watching a kitty play twister because they have so many places to put their paws and they want that ball so bad.Get this toy! It will bring you and your cat hours of entertainment!!
49erbabe. Don't hesitate to buy this light weight blanket.  It is wonderfully made; the reason I'm giving it a 5 rating is that it fits my California King bed.  I've looked high and low to find a blanket that fits....this one does!  Buy this blanket with confidence.  Deffinately a great find on Amazon, and the price wasn't bad either
Wonderful Rolling Hamper. This clothers hamper on wheels was just what I was looking for.  I had just installed a clothesline in our backyard with the intention of line-drying heavier items like towels.  Wet towels are heavy!This hamper is just perfect for my need.  I load the wet towels into it from the washing machine in our garage and roll it right out the back door into the yard for hanging.I had seen the reviews about difficult assembly, but mine went together quite easily and is holding up well so far.The only drawback for me is the off-white canvas is rather boring -- I had seen a lesser product made with a printed fabric -- but all in all it has been just great.
Extremely pretty, just the thing for dessert souffles. If you make dessert souffles (chocolate or jam-filled) these small heart shaped ramekins are just the thing to dress up your table. THey also hold cheese, dips or other small side dishes. The colors are very modern and interesting; if you know someone who has used deep brown and kiwi or aqua in their decor, this would make quite a housewarming gift. Or Valentine's day present
Terrific toaster. This makes the greatest toast and like the style of this toaster.  Also the T-Fal name has never been a let-down, their products have always been number one.Thank you,The Anthony'
Strong, Sturdy, Compact, but lacking assembly instructions. This is a wonderful piece.  It fits nicely in a small corner.  We've placed ours in a small mudroom, and it's perfect.  The piece is sturdy and solid, no wobbling, no loose hooks, and it looks very sharp!  I would give it a full five stars, but I've only been using it for 1 week, so I can't yet say how it will hold up after long-term use, and I do have one major issue;The product arrived without assembly instructions!  Fortunately, if you're assembly-gifted (and really you don't need to be that gifted), you can assemble the stand without difficulty, however, you will need your own Phillip's head (not mentioned anywhere, but that's something that everyone should have) and a bit of know-how.This may help:When assembling the pole, of course the piece with the holes will go on the top, for the hooks.The piece with the threaded hole goes on the bottom, and I believe that both washers connect underneath with the screw to hold the pole in place.  That's what I did with mine, and it's very sturdy.When you place the feet on the umbrella stand assembly, be certain not to tighten the allen-wrench screws, or you will not be able to place the Phillip's head screws at the bottom of the feet, to lock the feet in place.When you add the hooks to the top assemblage, do not tighten the allen-screws beyond tight, or you will strip the threading, and your hook will be loose.One other thing that would be helpful is a rubber mallet for knocking in the finial at the top, and the small, round covers on the hooks and the feet.In reality, these are the sorts of things that Vision Decor should tell you themselves, but since they don't, I hope this helps someone
Love it!. If you have the Drinkwell fountain, this is a must have, it is so great to go a week or so without refilling your cat's water.
This is incredible. We first used the new vacuum immediately after using our old Hoover.  I was amazed at the amount of dog hair and dirt that the Dyson picked up that the Hoover missed.  Already it seems like the air is cleaner and fresher in the house.  My only fear is that the Dyson is so much more powerful that one day it will suck the carpets completely up off the floor.
great frame. the frame has many options for display and has a good sized internal memory.  would recommend int highly to all.  large crisp display and can even be used as a clock.
Messy, but worth it!. I agree that the cartridge was not easy to fill -- the beads are a little tricky to get into the cartridge (they sort of stick to each other and to the bag they are in and to your hands, so it takes awhile to get them packed in).However, the cost savings definitely makes up for the slight trouble -- 3 separate cartridges would range from approx. $36 - $45, while this package of 3 refills only cost $19.00!  Well worth the extra 5 minutes every 3 months
good idea... We have used this crockpot BBQ Pit a couple of times since buying it.  The first time, we made the pork ribs - very delicious - tender and tasty, but cleaning up the crockery insert was VERY difficult - required lots of scrubbing.  The second time, I sprayed it with Pam cooking spray, which made cleaning up easier but still required some scrubbing, even after soaking it.  The third time I used a disposable aluminum pan, put the chicken and other ingredients into it, put it into the crockpot and cooked away - perfect!  No clean-up (just toss the disposable pan) and we had a delicious meal.  I would recommend this crockpot if you want a larger crockpot than the typical one.  The ribs were REALLY good - fell off the bone tender!  I cooked two whole chickens at once in it and they were good.  All - in- all though, a pretty good product but use the disposable aluminum tray...makes life much easier
Save the furniture!. We have three cats.  The mature one always uses it the new ones are not as into it yet but a little fresh cat nip helps.  I have been having trouble finding the refills in the pet shops.  Thank you Amazon
Great Inflatable Bed. So far, we are very happy with this inflatable bed. We inflated it about a week before mom came to visit. It did not leak. I used it to nap on a couple of times. It is very comfortable as long as it is not fully inflated, when it becomes too hard. Mom slept on it for 10 nights - no problems. She was so comfortable that, when the guest sofa bed became available, she elected to remain on the Aerosport Weekender Twin Bed. It is high enough to sit on, which is nice. The stabilizers help a lot, or it would roll too much. The only problem with the stabilizers is that you have to remember they are there or you can trip on them. All in all, a very nice inflatable bed
Perfect. Perfect size for rich desserts like creme caramel or creme brulee, or mousse. I also like the heavy feel
Save your  stove (and walls) from splatters!. This is my answer to the "invisible" little bubbles of butter and oil that escape from the frying pan and later decorate the stove top and neighboring wall.  The splatter screen is lightweight, which makes it comfortable to grab quickly and place over an active skillet; and the 13-inch size works equally well on smaller pans as it does on larger ones.  Don't know why I waited so long to get one
EXCELLENT PRODUCT. These are wonderful barstools with very comfortable cushions. All of my friends love them and want to know where I got them. I plan to buy several more to complete a set for my bar.I couldn't ask for a better quality product
Good vacuum for the money. Very good suction, fairly lightweight. The cord is a bit short, but my house is small so it isn't a big problem. I added an extension cord to make it longer. It can be a bit difficult to pull it along behind you; you need to yank on it a little. Overall, I'm pleased with it's performance. A few extra tools would have been nice, like a smaller brush for carpeted stairs, but I use the upholstery brush and that works pretty well on cat hair, etc. The big beater bar that comes with it does a very good job on cat hair as well
My little work horse!!!. I've had this little vac for about a month now and I use it ALL the time and just love, love, love it. It's great for the RV and it's just what I needed for my entry room and kitchen. Using it in these rooms, which only takes a couple of minutes every day, keeps the mess out of the rest of the house and soooo easy!!! Now I don't have to drag that big vac around the house so often. The Dirt Devil is easy to use and it's easy to clean. It's light weight and does a great job on my floors and flat carpeting. And it holds a charge for as long as I've needed it. So far, maybe 15 or 20 minutes at a time. This is the best purchase I've made in a long time and I highly recommend this little work horse.
Dog training collar. Having used a spray collar belonging to my friend's dog which only had levels of spray, the Commander having the 'beep' feature is proving it to be superior as you can get the dog not to view the collar as something to be afraid of. The only real problem noticed so far is that it is not waterproof and therefore has to be removed prior to deep paddling or swimming - easy to forget! Terrific value compared to what it sells for in the UK especially with the weak dollar. Would recommend
Love it; Cleaning a drawback, but not a huge one. I've had mine for about 4 years and just love it.  It's a perfect size for a single person or snack size for teens.Clean up can be a pain if you let the unit cool first.  I recommend wringing out a warm, wet sponge over the unit immediately after the food is removed.  That will loosen all the worst of the mess.  Use the plastic scraper thingie (it's a technical term, really! ;) to do a quick clean of the worst parts.  After you eat and it cools, it will be easier to clean then
A very nice set to work with!. I got the set yesterday and decided to put it to work today. It's very easy to use, you can use lower heat than with other cookware, easy to use my wooden tools with and the cleanup is easy. Emeril "BAM"med a home run in designing this set! :-
Eclipse 3 Filtration & Illumination System. Really like this system. Easy to change charcoal filter and easy to pull and clean Bio-wheel. Never had an aquarium stay so clear so long. Only drawback, and it's a slight one, is Illumination is on front panel. That means if you're short like me the light is off during water exchange, otherwise you could go through rear panel.
All-Clad Stainless 3-Quart Colander - Love It. This is an excellent colander, I love it.  All my cookware is All Clad Stainless Steel so I decided to buy this colander and have not been disappointed.  Although this is the smaller of the two sizes All Clad makes it is very roomy.  This colander can drain a pound of pasta (even a pound of lasagna) without any problems.  It is also great for rinsing salad, the solid side handles make it very easy to manage.  It is made very well and is very sturdy.  The cleanup is also very easy.  Highly recommended
Amazingly spill proof. What a great idea for anyone with kids or a clumsy adult in the house!  These tablecloths look and feel beautiful, but their main selling point is their stain resistant design.  If a liquid is spilled on them, it just beads up.  You have to chase the beads with your towel, but they don't soak in.  It also washes amazingly well.  I bought the ivory one for my mother with her 11 grandchildren (think chocolate donut and marker stains) and it still looks brand new!  Needless to say, we have since bought many other colors for both of us.  I cannot recommend these strongly enough--and the price is great
Love it!  Worth it!. This is a great blender!  Yes it is expensive, but it is worth it!  If you just want to make the occasional smoothie you might not want to spent that much, but even if you did you would find it well worth the money.  And probably the only blender you will ever need to buy, it is strong and it lasts.  You can make your own flour, it can blend all parts of apples, etc, skin and all.  You can make hot soup, just by using the blender nothing else.  And with the same machine you could make ice cream.  There is millions of uses and it is super strong!  I very highly recommend it
Works great!. Works great...the doser is kind of a pain sometimes, but totally manageable.  It does a great job on the grinding and that is why I bought it.   Bought this with the Gaggia Carezza, and together they make great Espresso
durable product so far. I have only had this for a month but so far its holding up to my endless loads of laundry.
Good Cleaner!. I only gave this four stars because this grease remover probably isn't necessary for most folks.  Regular strength Cerama Bryte's pretty amazing all on it's own and it gets off all the tough stuff.  Try it first then buy this if you find yourself using more elbow grease than you'd like
Versatile and sturdy. When these arrived years ago, I was disappointed because they are too wide to keep coffee/tea warm for very long. But lately I have noticed I use them almost every day, for things like cereal, soup and even edamame. I use these more than the Gusto bowls because they are easy to manage and offer a more modest portion size. They're not for coffee, but you'll find dozens of other uses for these jumbo mugs
Does fit my "classic Revere Ware. I bought this for my two "classic" Revere Ware 2Qt pots (marked "Clinton, Ill") and steamer attachment and this piece fits fine on all three pieces. All of today's Revere Ware, including this lid, are made overseas. The pots now seem to be made of a much thinner gauge of steel, but this glass lid works fine.
Love Revere. All the bad reviews on the Revere pots and pans are totally off base. The newer Revere pots and pans are not excactly like the ones made 40 years ago in Clinton Illinois, BUT this cookware is wonderful. I love the light weight, it making cooking easier, also the taste of the food using these pot and pans is worth the puchase. I am so impressed with my set that I bought on Amazon, and the Amazon price was great. I've used froo froo pots and pans, heavy in weight, and they did not cook my food as well as the Revere!
Not as soft as expected but tightly woven for durability. I've never heard of a 1200 thread count and the price was so good, I couldn't resist. The weave is so tight, I'll bet the water beads up in the washer before the soap gets in and breaks the barrier! I do have to say that they're not as soft as I expected, although they are fairly soft - but perhaps with a couple more washings they will be much better. I'll bet that they will last a lot longer than general (100 to 200-thread count) pillowcases and through a LOT more wash loads, so I still think this is a GREAT deal
This Danby is a Cold Winner. I bought this attractive little appliance for use in an airplane hangar where the occasional consumption of perishable food and cold drink storage is desirable. This quiet running compact fit the bill perfectly. Some designs in this class of refrigerator are barely capable of holding 2 six-packs of canned beverage. Why bother?  This fridge with 4.3 cubic feet of internal space is generous enough to store a reasonable amount of perishable food stuffs. Just don't expect too much utility of the freezer though, as its capacity is quite small. The internal layout of the Danby is well thought out and the vertical beverage stack on the door is a welcomed plus. The upper portion of the door also includes a special clear plastic insert to accomodate up to 9 eggs, but is an easily removed option. You can even change the direction of the door swing by swapping out the reversible hinges. Sized at a reasonable 20" across, the top of my Danby refrigerator perfectly accomodates a small microwave oven and the combination of the two is hard to beat when eating a casual meal miles away from the full sized comforts of the home kitchen
Great knife. I would recommend this knife to everyone - the occasional cook to the top chef.  It keeps a sharp edge, is very balanced, is a handy size and useful. I am always reaching for it
Neat Coffee Maker. Overall I really like this coffee maker! The stainless steel carafe is great! I only wish that the heating plate remained on for 10-20 minutes or so after brewing. It turns off right after the brewing is done. Which is a bit annoying especially when I set the timer for morning brewing and I'm running late. Plus, the "alarm timer" is called "delay" or something like that. Why not just call it "alarm" or "timer?
My cat loves it!. Sigh. Cats are so picky. You never know what they're going to like. If I had a nickel for every toy I have purchased that they never gave a second glance...One trick I have learned is not to make a huge fuss over a new toy. They seem to like to discover things on their own, so when I bring a new toy home, I just set it on the floor and walk away. Don't even act like it's for them. I find that they respond better that way.One of my cats loves this thing and the other won't even look at it. I rate it a 5 because the cat that does like it goes crazy for it, and I don't even use catnip. He loves scratching on it, swatting the little ball around and he even falls asleep on it sometimes. Too cute!I have bare floors, but I don't have a problem with the toy sliding around, because my cat stands on the outside of the toy and it rests against his hind paws as he scratches with his front paws. He figured it out on his own and he doesn't have any trouble with it.Also, make sure you turn the refill over and use the other side as well
Best Waffle compo sandwich maker available. We love it and it cleans easily.  You just pop out the trays and pop them into the dishwasher.Highly recommend
Stylish and good price. This one is very nice. Serve and store...hold good 3 cups! Really good for the price $2.99... lesser than the outlet price! Good buying!
Cotton Sheet Set. This item was received almost the day I ordered it. I LOVE THESE SHEETS. Now I don't even want to use the other set I have these are so soft and cozy.A+ Seller and A+ quality of item received.BUY THIS ITEM IF YOU ARE JUST THINKING ABOUT IT, YOU WON'T BE DISAPPOINTED
Handsome enough to serve at your dinning table. This brush finish stainless steel water pitcher is handsome yet functional to leave at your formal dinning table. The handle is big and very comfortable to pour. It will holds almost a gallon of ice water. There is a ice blocker to block out the ice cube from falling into the glass when you pour. This pitcher is very heavy duty compare to other lower price pitcher in the stores. A high quality 5 stars product.
super quality, upscale design. I have been looking for this kind of crystal items for a long time, nothing I found with this quality and relatively low priced. I would have spent $200 for this, if I had have seen this in the shops.I am lucky that I happen searched in Amazon, exactly the classic design I have been looking for. after item arrived, I am impressed with the super quality, the weight, really heavy glasses, plus simple designed silver plated tray, just perfect! This set is very tasteful, classic, elegant, very upscale! I recommend 100%. This was made in Slovakia. This is one of my few best purchases! I can imagine to keep it for home forever, I will never get tired of this set
Turned my 9 month old Rottie into a perfect gentleman. I was very hesitant to use a shock collar on my dog so I tried everything else I could think of to control his jumping, barking and general disobedience.  I worked with him myself, hired a trainer, and purchased an audio and spray correction device but nothing worked.  With two small children in the house I could not afford to have an uncontrollable dog.  Maybe if he were a miniature pinscher or pug it wouldn't be a big deal but Hades was going to be a 125 to 140 pound Rottweiler when he is full grown.  That would be a recipe for disaster.  I purchased the Deluxe big dog trainer from Amazon (at the best price available).  Five days later when I received it I still did not want to use it.  After trying each stimulation setting on myself (even at level 10 it is not painful but it does command your attention), I adjusted the collar and placed it on my puppy.  Saying that there was an almost instant change in his demeanor would be an understatement.  He was a different dog in just a couple of days.  Within 2 days I only had to use the sound to correct him.  And now, only a few weeks later, I don't even need to turn the collar on.  He is a pleasure and I know that this product is the reason for his change.  Thank you Petsafe for this wonderful product. I have already recommended it to my friends.
Nice....but heavy. I received this cookie sheet today.  I haven't used it yet but thought I'd leave a review anyway.  It is very nice and even has "cookie targets" on the cookie sheet to get uniformed shaped cookies.  I like it for myself but it is large and rather heavy. If you have difficulty lifting something heavy you might go for a smaller or lighter cookie sheet.
My wife and I are in love... ...with this ice cream spade. I gotta warn you though, it's not for the weak or the timid. But if you're serious ice cream lovers like we are, despise those ball scoopers and other cheap, almost useless excuses for an ice cream scoop, this is the ticket. Heavy, strong, sturdy, but stylish and comfortable, too, this may be the best 10 bucks we've spent this year. I'm thinking of how many lucky people will get an inexpensive but great Christmas gift this year
Home made Latte's. This Product is really amazing! Whips up the milk in seconds for great Latte's @ home. I would recommend this product with my eyes closed.Regards
Very nice large glass jar. I was searching for large glass jars to store bath salts when I discovered this Anchor Hocking 2-gallon container.  It has proven to be perfect for the application.  I highly recommend it for jobs that don't require a hermetic seal.  The glass is totally clear, and the jars are made of what feels like heavy Pyrex...old world quality!My two examples arrived in 2-days, very well packed.  The service through Amazon was outstanding.  The price was great too, the best I found on the web.
Love these Ramekins!  Can't live without them!  A++++. I ordered 12 of these Corelle Abundance ramekins ~ and wondered just how much use I would get out of them.  Well, after 10 months, they are still wonderful!  I use them almost daily ~ for little snack bowls, and all kinds of neat ideas.  When we have guests over, each one gets a bowl for baked beans, and with hamburgers ~ they are perfect for mayo/mustard/pickles/relish ~ the possibilities are endless!  I've even baked little custards in them ~ and they are perfect!  Can't live without them ~ fast shipping, great price ~ A+++
You wont want to get out of bed. I wanted a more comfortable bed so i purchased this comforter.  I've found i sleep in alot longer than before.  Getting out of bed is difficult.  If you're looking for a moderately affordable down comforter of high quality, this item will suit you just fine.  I met a girl with a really comfortable bed.  It made my own bed really unimpressive so i bought this comforter.  Made a huge difference.  I did notice that the edges of the comforter have more down fill than the center.  It seemed a little odd but while sleeping its hard to notice.  I think that is how these are made.  You can price other comforters, and some cost $500-$4000.  For less than $200 this comforter is a terrific value.  High quality, 15 year warranty.  Recommendable.  Be sure to get a duvet cover.  My pit bull now sleeps on the floor!I used the coupon code HOHOSAVE and it covered the shipping and tax.
My Husky can walk again due to Missing Link Plus!. This product is phenominal! I heard of this product almost 2 yrs ago, but didn't actually try it until Spring 2004. When my 8 year old Husky started limping severally from arthritis. She could hardly walk, and kept holding her front right paw up and limping. The vet put her on Rimadyl pain meds for 2 weeks. She still limped after 2 weeks. I heard how bad Rimadyl was on a dogs liver, etc. so we didn't continue with this medicine. I decided to try Missing Link Plus with Glucosamine, and in 2 weeks she stopped limping completely. Krystal is still on Missing Link Plus, I give her 2 tsp's daily sprinkled in her food. She's more active now and acts like a younger dog. She's even thinner and looks great. It also helped eliminate her constant ear infections. I have my 7 yr old Husky on this now. I have also used this for several foster dogs, a Boston Terrier that had hip replacement surgery and a lab mix pup that has demodectic mange. I would highly recommend trying this product for any hip & arthritis issues. For younger dogs not needing the Glucosomaine for hip or joint issues, I'd get the regular Missing Link, w/o the plus. Always consult with a vet first though. Not all vets know what this supplement is, so it never hurts to take in a package or print out the ingredients and info from the internet. But this product is awesome. It has helped my Husky to walk and run pain free again. It eliminated constant arthritis visits to the vet and I don't have to put her health at risk with a long term pain medication. This product usually sells for $22.00-$26.00 in pet stores for 1 lb bgs. Amazon has this for way under $20. This is a steal of a price and well worth every penny. Especially if it greatly helps your pet live a healthy life again
Stunning. This Maxxima night light is nothing less than stunning! I had high expectations but eventually it surpassed them. It provides very nice and powerful enough light, it is very cheap to operate and the price is great. I think that this is one of the best purchases I have ever made. Definitely, take advantage of this offer
Best I have found. Of the several brands and types of jerky seasoning I have tried, the nesco original flavor is clearly the best tasting, if you like conventional jerky as I do. If you like yours hot or spicy, nesco has them as well, in any case the nesco spices are far above the rest in my opinion.DA
Too cool for school/kitchen. Not only is this piece cool lookin, but the knives it comes with are excellen
the BEST roti/tortilla maker you will ever find!  SERIOUSLY!. I have tried sooo many different roti/tortilla makers. and this SAACHI is seriously the BEST out there!  Bargainoffers.com company is the best!  They have great customer service and are such nice people.  I have tried the crappy villaware 10 inch model as well as the horrible 8 inch REVEL brand, and i had nothing but problems.  They stick and dont heat up well enough.  The saachi is great, never had a problem, EVER!
Great cover and very inexpensive!. I gave this to my daughter because her down comforter was now featherless from age (the feathers came out). Also, she is a vegetarian and wants "alternative". The old one we always covered with a special cover made for that, but this one was so pretty that she just leaves it as a comforter/blanket (also she's lazy)
What A Fun Gadget !!. I bought this pepper grinder because I love Oxo products, and I also have carpel tunnel and arthritis in my hands.  I don't really care for pepper, but when I buy it I buy a combination of coarse pepper and sea salt.  I love the little window that you open to fill it, as well as being able to see how much is in there.  I also like the cap on the bottom, so it keeps it clean sitting on my stovetop, but most of all I like the knob to grind the spice.  I have mine set on fine grind, but it is adjustable.  I think you could use it for any spice you want to grind, not just pepper.  It is fun and easy to use and looks nice sitting on my stove.  I love this gadget!
A Great Saucepan. Despite what others have written about a degradation in All Clad quality, I have not seen any problems whatsoever. This pan is a staple in my kitchen since I purchsed it last summer. I like it's deep profile, which is useful for sauteing onions or garlic and then putting the rest of the ingredients right into the pan. A great addition
Tiny but Functional. A nice one/two cup tea pot - Will work for an every day cup of tea
Beautiful!. I love these glasses and the price is great!  Too bad Mikasa has discontinued the original cheers line
Great quality and wonderful for dieters - it doesn't hold much!. This is made in Indonesia to a high quality. It looks wonderful, no defects I could see, and it is just the right size for a cup of yogurt, small amount of fruit, you get the picture: it is not a supersize item. If you need to eat more of some side dish or dessert that this plate allows, shame on you!I use it daily in many ways and just love its very popular pattern - it's so civilized. This is one of the items in Old Country Roses I'm collecting (one day  I'll have it all!!!). The problem now is to find the space to keep and/or display them.Recommended
lovely heavy duty pan. These pans are lovely, were reasonably priced and work great. No sticking, even baking, easy clean-up. The popovers I made in them were perfection
excellent tool for careful cooks. I use this tool every day.  I have never cut myself with it, nor have I had any trouble with food catching on the blades.  Like any cutting tool, it requires careful use.  Used properly, however, it is a wonderful, simple tool.  I use it to cut cabbage, fennel and carrots for salads, ginger for stir fries, apples for garnish, etc.
Toaster. I was in the market for a new toaster to match my new stainless steel kitchen and when I saw this toaster from West Bend I fell in love right away.  It's sleek and the brand name is not large so it doesn't take away from the toaster itself
HOLY MACKEREL, MY CARPET IS CLEAN!!!!!. I have a Jack Russell Terrier and a Rat Terrier.  And now a new baby.I have been fighting a losing battle for years with my poochies' wiry fur getting ground into my carpet.  I tried the Furminator products which were great for temporarily reducing their shedding.  But this didn't address the mess that had already happened to my carpets and apholstry.  Every time I would set anything on the floor, even just after vacuuming, it would have hair stuck all over the bottom of it.  Now that just isn't going to fly with a baby in the house.I have laughed so many times reading reviews of these Dyson vacuum cleaners.  Why would anyone drop half a grand on a vacuum cleaner?  But when a friend with cats told me about the DC7 Animal she bought and how much stuff came up out of her carpet, I was intrigued.  As time wore on, I became obsessed.  And then my tax return showed up...I selected the "Ball" because of the enhanced maneuverability it touts.  I have lots of furniture and twists and turns that made vacuuming tedious.  If I am going to spend this kind of money, by gosh, I need to not only get all possible crud out of my carpet but I need to be able to do it with ease and speed.Let me tell you something.  This thing is LUXURIOUS.  Yes, it is a LUXURIOUS vacuum cleaner!  Compared to my Hoover Wind-tunnel, it is quiet, I can hear my baby cry over the motor.  It glides over my carpet.  You can see an actual STRIP of clean carpet after one pass, several passes render the carpet almost pristine.  The stabilizer bar will provide that traditional vacuum handling for when your wrist is tired, but turn it off and "The Ball" allows you to glide in zig zags, around corners, up under furniture, it's just FABULOUS!The canister is also fantastic.  I was skeptical after having to fight my old vacuum's canister outside and covering myself with the crud I had just vacuumed.  But all you truly have to do with this thing is hold it over a trash can or inside a grocery bag and press the release button.  The crud just drops out.  Then you run the bottom of the cannister over the edge of the trash can and it will shut the bottom of the canister for you.  Fast, clean, easy.  Praise the LORD!It also works on bare floors.  You turn off the mechanical brush bar so it doesn't scuff and the thing just sucks up everything!One reviewer comments that the mini turbo brush is worthless.  I thought so too until I realized that I didn't have it properly attached to the hose.  Once it was attached properly, I used it to suck my short wiry dog hair off of their WOOL dog beds and 97% of it came OFF!  Now I am sorry, but you just wouldn't see that with any other vacuum cleaner.So now I can put things on the floor with no dog hair sticking to it.  I can vacuum without hurting myself, without aggravating my allergies too much.  My house SMELLS cleaner!I retract all mean things that I have said about people being idiots for blowing this kind of money on a vacuum cleaner.  If you have pets, then I would STRONGLY recommend this product.  I LOVE MY DYSON ANIMAL DC 15
Once again, the best!. This is my second coffee maker like this one...I had a black one and LOVED it.  I remodeled my kitchen and wanted to get a white one and only found it on this site.  Bought it.  I haven't had a problem, at all, and I love it
Very fast delivery and smooth transaction. Smooth transaction and very quick delivery.  Product was as shown
Excellent product. This sharpener is very easy to use and does a fantastic job of sharpening both my wusthorf knives and my scissors
Flannel bedding. The colors are just beautiful and it is so soft. It surprised me how much warmer it made my down comforter. Love it...I will buy more products from this line
It's true. I often heard about the benefits of using Reidel crystal to enhance the flavor and bouquet of wine, but never tried it until I bought this set.  And it is true--I chose a nice bottle of petit syrah wine, but it was even better than usual in the Reidal stemware.Be prepared--it is a really big piece of stemware
Effective training that won't hurt your pets!. I have two domestic long-hair cats that love sleeping on the couch.  One of my cats has a bladder problem, and my last couch lasted only a year and a half because of it!  When I bought my new couch, I also bought the large Scat Mat to get some life out of my couch.I was worried about the intensity of the shock of the Scat Mat, but I kept the mat set to the lowest intensity.  My friends touched the mat just to ensure that it wasn't too intense - it startles the cats but obviously doesn't hurt them.I only had to use the mat for a week before my cats had learned to stay away from the couch.  In fact, they don't go near the couch at all.  Even though the mat only covers the seat cushions, my cats don't even jump up on the back cushions or even scratch the arms
It's Bigger Than You Think. It's well-made, sturdy, good looking pet crate. I bought the small first for my 12-pound cat, and it was MUCH too large, so I exchanged it for the extra small and it is just right. Remember that it's a crate, so don't look for the handle
Great espresso, poor steaming wand. For the price, I'd give the espresso making part of this machine 5 stars.  The portafilter and brew group are substantial and well-made.  I've worked at two espresso shops with commercial machines, and the parts on this moderately priced Gaggia are nearly as heavy and substantial as the big multiple-thousands of dollars machines.  I've had the machine for 4 days and have been brewing shots with Starbuck$ pods.  The toggle switches are easy to use, the reservoir is easy to fill, and the shots are aromatic and full of crema every time.  However, the steaming wand takes a star away from this machine.  It does not rotate in every direction like the comparably priced Starbucks machine. This makes it hard to remove a cup full of frothed milk from under the wand without spilling. Also, the plastic frother contraption is silly. Actual frothing capability is pretty good, though the plain metal tips on the commercial machines produced finer microfroth, and were more fine-tuned to the trained barista's hand.  Overall, it's a good-looking machine, and I'm satisfied with it for my main purposes - iced lattes and americanos, and straight double shots, all of which do not require use of the steaming attachment.  This is a good entry-level machine that will brew you good shots, and look good on your countertop.  However, I'm expecting to outgrow it and move up to an Isomac with more refined steaming capability within a few years
another "wish list:" item found and received. I have wanted one of these for years.  I put off because I didn't want to put it together. (I'm a 75 year old,alone).  I kept looking for one locally. Guess what !!!  It's already assembled... comes as you see it. Thanks so much
I love it!. I am SO pleased with this product. Very reasonable price and excellent quality...and looks good and feels good. I highly recommend this purchase
Nice Pan. I thought this was a nice pan, but I don't think it was quite worth the $16 plus shipping. I thought it would be heavier for that price.It's still a good pan and I found plenty of recipes online for baked donuts. They usually call for them being piped onto a cookie sheet, but I just used the pan instead with fine results.I do agree the donuts are a little heavier than normal store-bought cake donuts, but still they are good. Just don't over fill the shapes and your donuts come out fine looking. Nothing stuck, not even to the center flutes.I will definitely use it again and try many different recipes. The donuts are not too big or too small. Fill in the forms with a pastry bag or plastic bag with a corner cut out, it makes it much easier to fill and the final product looks so much better
AWESOME AWESOME AWESOME AWESOME. The money tree arrived today on time. It was a gift to me :) I opened the box and couldn't believe how perfect this tree was. I'm going to have to purchase some more of these soon. Especially for the holidays. The roots on this smaller tree are as nice as the roots on a bigger tree. Thanks
Awesome multi-use pan. I wasn't sure what to expect from this pan, but it's outshined everything I'd anticipated, based on the price.  I got it for less than ten bucks from the friday sale, and I've already used it at least ten times.  It's GREAT for frying (i made fried chicken a couple of times, and it came out perfectly, no hot spots.)  i've used it to make spaghetti sauce, french toast, taco meat, chili and mexican shredded chicken for chicken nachos.  it's heavy enough to feel sturdy in your hand, and they're a snap to clean, even with the mexican chicken (you have to cook that down for a couple of hours.) I haven't had any problems with sticking or scratching, and it actually inspires me to cook.  You won't be disappointed by purchasing this pan! It's great for the cook that uses a lot of different techniques or methods of cooking (soups, frying, steaming).
I have one. to go with my original finish Lodge cookware, but this one didn't take any effort to season.  Good going, Lodge
The Best Pot In The House. I never though that I would pay $99 for a pot, but I'm glad I spent the money on this one. It arrived in perfect condition and was put to the test immediately. There are no hot spots and the pot is fairly easy to clean. All of the receipes that we've tried have been marvelous. The meats are so tender and juicy, they melt in your mouth. This dutch oven has taken on "favorite" status in our house. Highly recommended
Fits the bill. I bought this board to cut large pieces of meat (chickens, flank steaks, pork roasts).  It's more than big enough for all these.  The reservoirs on the side do a perfect job of collecting all the juices that run off.The board arrived incredibly thirsty.  I gave it a healthy dose of mineral oil, which I treat all my wooden kitchen tools with, and this solved the problem.The board is made of cherry and is a bargain at the price amazon sells it for
I LOVE BRITA!. I am a water FANATIC.. and I have to have water that tastes good since it is the main liquid I drink. Brita is way less expensive than buying bottled water, and as another reviewer said.. the plastic bottles can sometime contaminate the water they hold. BRITA filters out some of those contaminates. Besides all that, BRITA water tastes great. I give it 5 stars, and hope that you like it as much as I do.  It does fill slow, and when its gone, you have to fill it up, and wait for it to get cold.. and that can take forever. I have one room-mate, and between he and I the pitcher was always empty. So if you are going to get one, get one that holds alot of water.. you will not be sorry. And if you are worried about cost, think about how much you spend on  for bottled water. I was drinking about 4 a week and then some.
nice bowls. I like and dislike these bowls. What I like about them is the shape and size for certain foods and for the dishwasher.  They are actually too small for cereal if you would like to add fruit to your cereal.  They are perfect for oatmeal or ice cream but too small for soup or stew.  They are curved perfectly to drain and rinse well in the dishwasher.The depth of color is very attractive on the table
Perfect!. I bought the matching bench a couple months ago for my new place and I love it. Recently I was in the market for a table to hold a lamp in my entry way and came across the plant stand. I didn't need anything too large and found the height on this item to be perfect as an alternative to a floor lamp. I put it together myself in less than a half hour and boy is it sturdy (with extra storage and display space too)! It is absolutely perfect for my needs. You won't be sorry with this piece...for any purpose
WOW, what a kettle!. I love everything about this kettle.  The clear guide on the side showing the level of water (in liters).  How quickly the water comes to a boil is astonishing, and when it does start to boil, the pot automatically cuts itself off.  The pot also cuts off if all of the water boils out.  The cord is short however to prevent tripping, but works just fine with an extension cord if necessary. This is a wonderful product
Midgy Stays Home !. Midgy stays home with this wirless system. It works for us...but if you are having problems RTFD. I understandwhy some people get frustrated with the system... Dog proof your life; make things easier for yourself. I came home last night and my Lab-Pit was on my pourch and never left her area. Down fall to this system- it isn't battery backed up... I can work with that!
Best Deal Around. Looking for a great armless chair?  You just found it.  This is an affordable chair, a comfortable chair, and a chair that is easy to assemble.Trust me on this one.  Unless you are going to spend 80 dollars or more, you are not going to find a better chair.See ya next review.
very good product. The memory foam mattress was delivered as promised and I love the product.I would recommend
Pet Chime Doorbell. This works great! However, be aware that once your dog learns how to use it, they really use! I think she is taking advantage of it a little bit. I would recommend it to anyone with a new pet
Great quality and unbelievable price.......... This deal is amazing. The quality is an eight out of 10 with a desgin that brings out an appealing look to the throw cover.  Ten dollars for such high quality is hard to pass by.
Wonderful choice!. I have always been a Revere fan, but this Stir-Fry pan is wonderful!  We use it every chance we get.  Well worth the price.  My only suggestion would be for the pan to be slightly larger
Simple and beautiful. I love these glasses.I think the traditional stemmed wine glass is fine, but I find this far more practical, while being elegant at the same time.I have the set for Sauvignon Blanc as well, which are very nice.I'll be buying more.
Best Frother. Frothed milk without the watering down inevitable with steaming!  Plus, an ingenious recharging system that bypasses ever needing batteries.  A must buy for capuccino aficionados
riedel cabernet glasses. These glasses are broad enough to allow for a nice nose while small enough to use at the dinner table without appearing akward.  They are also very elegant
Fast shipping and nice flowers. I surprised a friend with these flowers. They arrived in two days and they are pretty close with the site photo.Even with the shipping taxes included they are cheaper than the romanian roses. To bad that they are not shipping in Romania.Update: After 5 days from the receiving day the roses are still fresh and they smell very nice. I am so glad that I could make someone happy with these very nice roses
Love it! Love it! Love it!. This knife is great. It fits so well in my hand and I feel very comfortable using it.  It is light yet sturdy.  I sliced tomatoes today and was so excited that they came out so perfectly!  No smashed tomatoes!  I would highly recommend this knife.  The price is good and I will definetly be saving to buy more from Furi
Quick delivery. The delivery was quick and the item came good packaged.  I didn't try it yet.  It came with the usefull recipe
Crispy dry lettuce rocks. It does a great job of spin drying leafy vegetables. Yum
Attractive, Inexpensive. For the price, this wine rack is a good purchase. Once assembled, it is very attractive and fairly sturdy. Getting the two ends to sit level was a little problematic and the caps supplied to cover the holes where the screws are inserted are plastic, not wood, which I thought was a little cheesy.  Overall though, I really like this wine rack and would probably purchase it again to give as a gift
I think this is great!. I read all the reports last year about having a refrigerator thermometer, especially after Katrina, and figured it was about time I got one.  Well, I have been happy with this one!  I purchased it elsewhere but I love it!  Suction cups are tricky things and I noticed if I open and close the door a lot, it gets a little loose, but it is no problem to moisten it and restick.  I have kept this on the door so I can read it easily.  I just love a digital readout and am happy someone finally did one for the fridge!  I put it in the freezer for fun too, and it worked great there too
Best Trash Can Ever!!!!. I bought mine last year when we remodeled our kitchen and it is still working great and looking fine! Smooth operation, never a fight with can when pulling trash full trash bag out! Keeps odors in and cat out! Love it
Scooba by iRobot. I bought this on a lark to save myy wife and I a little time.  What the heck...  It works great.  The cleaning solution is a bear to find locally, so I opted to use 40% solution of Simple Green and it works as well or better than the Clorox that comes with it
Best Knives Ever!. These knives are the sharpest I've ever used and also quite comfotable to handle.  Well worth every penny
Nice blanket. I like this banket, both its look & feel.  I haven't washed it yet but, since it's nicely oversized, a bit of shrinkage shouldn't be a problem
great. Originally I was a hesitant to buy a remanufactured Dyson, but minutes after I started using it I could definitely tell the difference between other vacuum's and Dyson's. It works great and I haven't had any problems whatsoever. A great vacuum for a great price
Feliway diffuser - great product. We have a household of 6 indoor cats.  This product is very effective at minimizing the aggression that is bound to happen in this situation.  It was amazing from the very first day.  We now keep two units in the house...and it is quite obvious if we forget and one of them runs out.  I have heard similar stories from friends who use this product, even one friend who works with feral cats.  I highly recommend this product for anyone with a multiple cat household
I love these scoops!. I have found these to be very handy. I've used them for kiwi, mangoes, even for making potato skins (I use the red one to scoop out some of the potato from its skin, leaving a nice shell to fill with cheese, etc). Because of their shapes, they are better than using a spoon to scoop stuff out. It takes a little finesse to use them, but I have found that they make certain prep jobs easier, safer (I don't need to use a knife in some cases), and less messy.
Love these knives! But NEVER put in dishwasher!. Well that pretty much sums it up. Great knife, good balance and feel. Keeps an edge most of the time. But never never never put it in your dishwasher. This purchase was to replace my previous knife which went through the dishwasher routinely. Then one day, we noticed the handle was warping and had hairline cracks all around the tang area. So lesson learned. And the warranty is only good if you don't use the dishwasher. Enough said
Convenient and attractive for a busy lifestyle. This size is perfect size for small-individual portions of mac n' cheese, lasagna, cup of soup, apple crumble.Great for large families where everyone wants to eat something different and busy singles who would rather freeze for later than eat the same leftovers for a week.Divide the recipe into individual portions and refidgerate/freeze.  Then just reheat as many portions as you need. This way you can make more dishes and have a variety in the freezer for later. Prep & Washup is simple as the ramekins are attractive enough to double as serving pieces too.
Indestructible ball. My Golden Retrievers have not been able to chew thru these balls and love chasing them.  Good product
Seems a bit flimzy. This item is acually rated for 900 total pounds, but it seems a little flimzy to me.  I already had one shelving unit that I bought from a local store that is much beefier, but was not much more expensive.  I loaded this unit up with items in my garage and it is holding, but I don't fully trust it.  The side supports are a little too thin and it is just a bit wobbly.  I am going to anchor it to the wall, but I really shouldn't have to do that.  Also, the edges are very sharp.  I would recommend wearing gloves while assembling.  The instruction sheet did warn of this, but really.....how many people actually read the instructions
Lots of light. I love this booklight. It's small and light, so it doesn't weigh down the book and the color of the light it gives off is excellent, not to mention the amount of space it covers. It is good for reading, knitting, or any small projects for which you would need spot lighting
Comforter is a Delight!. We have the heat in our house turned way down at night and we are toasty warm under our new comforter. It's lightweight and a delight
Easy-to-use, delicious results. The VillaWare V3600-NS Prego pizelle baker makes two 5-inch cookies at one time. It comes with a booklet containing easy-to-make recipes. The results are wonderful. You can roll the pizelles when they first come off the baker to make cannoli shells. It says not to use metal utensils, so I just used a toothpick to pry them off the baker. It was very easy to do. They keep well in an air-tight container, but don't really last long, since they are so delicious. I put a hard chocolate icing on some of the pizelles. The baker is easy to clean. High recommendation!
good unit. size and output quite adequate for a 12x15+ space I'm using it for. Yes initially,it stinks, but they do recommend runing it 2hrs. outside first, so no surprises.  Efficiency...hard to say whether I 'm saving yet, the timer's fine.It would be nice to have an actual temperature gauged thermostat, not a number from 1 to 10.
Love the sheets. The sheets are just what I was looking for. The delivery time was good. Am very happy with my purchase
Best Christmas Present. I have been so impressed with this set. It all cooks great. I think the frying pan would cook best with a gas stove. I love the mixing bowls that came with the set. It is a VERY good buy
It is the Magic!. 100 STARS! Excellent! Excellent! Excellent! This is worth it! They have restored my faith in Paid Programming! I love this product! It's strong and powerful! I use it almost everyday for protein shakes and mixes! I love it
So worth the money. I was in a car accident and have trouble gripping, and also have pain and limited motion in my shoulders, so even using the wing-style cork screws were uncomfortable for me.  I finally decided to splurge on an easy-to-use corkscrew.  I'm so glad I bought this one.You just place the corkscrew on the bottle, then turn the handle clockwise.  It's big and rubber, and easy to turn & grip.  The corkscrew goes down into the bottle, and actually lifts the cork out, as you continue to turn it clockwise.Then, to get the cork off of the corkscrew, you just turn the handle counter-clockwise.I'm so glad I splurged and quit struggling with cheap corkscrews.  You do still need the use of both of your hands, one to squeeze the corkscrew against the bottle, and the other to turn the handle.  But, it did not require much strength at all.It's also attractive, and comes in a sturdy plastic box, which is nice, as it won't get scratched up in my messy kitchen utensil drawer
Great for long-lasting fun. I'd been looking for a good durable chew toy for a long time, and have heard rumors about the 'Kong': it became a legendary toy in my mind, until I finally saw it in my local pet store and bought one for my Toy Rat Terrier.  As soon as I got home, stuck a treat inside, and now it's Marcello's favorite toy!  This'll surely keep him happy while I'm away at work, too
great buy!!. arrived looking brand new. all attatchments, bowl and mixer in perfect shape.  have not used a whole lot, making cookies, and light duty mixing,but am happy with the over all purchase...
Read the Instructions First - You'll Love It. This toaster does everything. We've had it at least 5 years.  If the toast comes up and you can't reach it, push up on the handle and it's easy to grab.  If you only like bagels toasted on one side, you can put the halves in, push the &quot;bagel&quot; button, and voila! your bagels are toasted on one side (be sure the cut sides are facing out).  The bread is frozen?  Keep it on the toasting temp you like and push the &quot;Frozen&quot; button.  The toaster gives you your toast just the way you want.  Easy to clean.  Should be advertised better. Great bet
Better than Arm & Hammer pads -- but these have doubled in price!. Have used puppy pads in place of kitty litter for past several years after having a kitty w/ cancer.  Even after she died we stuck w/ the pads for our other two because they're used to it & there's no scooping & no tracking.All we can find locally is Arm & Hammer, which over the past few years have declined in quality and gone up in price.  These are much better and do not leak -- BUT unfortunately when I first bought them (a couple of months ago) they were only $11 per pk of 50.  Now they're $20!  No increase in value but a major increase in price.  What a ripoff.Unfortunately I can't change my rating -- I would give it a 2 if this would let me edit the rating
Pleased with the product. The cup was just as ordered and received in a timely fashion
could be better. I had a Pampered Chef sprayer that I loved, but it got clogged and stopped working after 2 or 3 years. I should have tried harder to find a Pampered Chef rep to buy another one, the Pampered Chef one works better than this one.However, this is not a horrible product. One drawback compared to the Pampered Chef one is that you can't see through this one to see how high the oil level is. You want to fill it just a bit higher than halfway, and when it is less than 1/3 full you need to fill it back up or it won't work as well. This unit is even more finicky than the Pampered Chef one about the level, it almost won't spray if the level is too low. But since you can't see through it, even holding it up to the light, you have to look down in and estimate how high it is. The reflective coating inside makes it very hard to see how high it really is. You don't want to fill it all the way up, either.Then, you need to pump it more than the Pampered Chef one needed to be pumped. This one sprays a very fine spray, finer than the Pampered Chef one. And it sprays quite nicely if you have the correct level of oil in there.I think I know why my old one got clogged. So I'm trying something new: each time I'm done, before I put it away, I twist the screw on cap around the nozzle and release the pressure. I think if you leave it pressured up all the time, like I did with my old one, it damages the nozzle over time. But time will tell if I'm right.Another tip -- don't fill it with anything but olive oil. Other oils evaporate and leave a sticky/greasy feeling on the outside of the sprayer. You know what I mean if you use vegetable oil for stovetop cooking a lot, you get that greasy feeling on things that you leave near the stove or that hang over it. Olive oil doesn't do that, that's why I now don't use anything else on my stovetop (except sometimes peanut oil for stir frying). This type of sprayer will work much better if you just use Olive Oil in it, trust me.But if you have a choice, go find a Pampered Chef rep and by their sprayer. It's cheaper and better quality
good sheets. I like these sheets, the only thing is they are heavy, so I'm going to wait till winter when it gets cold to put them back on the bed.
Great. I have 8 house cats and i only kept one of these in the house... to watch 6 of the cats climb on top of each other to get in this thing is hilarious... and all the cats that cant fit into it, they have to sleep next to it.
Customer satisfaction was no surprise here. We saw the other good reviews. In addition to being attractive we like the weight of the tablecloth. It is not sliding all over because it has some substance. Very nice tablecloth! We might buy more of them.
Friendly Village. I was extremely happy with this purchase.  I had delivery in two days.  Amazing.  All the dishes arrived in perfect shape.  I would order again
Useful and stylish. I love, love my set!  You have fun colors to choose from and they don't disappoint in person!  There is a half way measuring line in each bowl to make it really nifty!  When I first got them, I dropped the whole set from counter height. I was worried about cracking the plastic bowls.  And was happy to find all were in perfect shape regardless of my little mishap!  So, they are durable, stylish and extremely useful!I say buy a set, you won't be disappointed
OXO Soap Dispensing Sponge Brush. This is a convenient tool for washing hand dishes. Adding soap is easy. Its adequate sponge size, and comfortable handle make it nice to use even with lots of dishes.
Great Blender. This is a great blender that is easy to care for and fun to use.It does a fine job of blending ingredients, including ice, to the consistency that you desire.  The only negative thus far is the fact that it doesn't swirl the contents from top to bottom as I'd like, perhaps I have unrealistic expectations
lasagna baker'red. this could possibly be the greastest deal I've gotten on Amazon ever,the price I paid was a steal for the workmanship of this baker,thank you Amazo
Good raclette. I bought this raclette a couple of months ago.  It is very easy to clean (you can put most parts in the dishwasher).  The only thing that I overlooked when I bought this item is the fact that you cannot control the heat (only on/off).  That does bother me at times.  Other than that it is very good price/quality.
Great For Apple Lovers. This was a great gift. Very light weight and all seal really well..
Inexpensive air circulation. Excellent for Fall & Spring here in Florida. Fans have a reversible switch which is very handy (don't have to turn the whole fan around)
Danby Countertop Dishwasher. Well, The only problem I had with mine is lifting it by myself up to the counter. I have had my dishwasher for eight monthes now and have used it almost every day. I have not had a single problem with it at all. It works just as well as high priced built-in models. Just plug it in to any outlet, instal the faucet adapter and attach the quick release water hose and turn on your hot (or cold, it will heat the water by it's self) water and add the soap, turn it on and it's done all the dishes in it's longest cycle (it has four) in about 45 minutes. I'm a guy and love the thing. Before, you couldn't get me to do the dishes at the sink for a gazillion bucks! (Ask my wife) This thing is very well made. If you're hunting for a portable counter unit, get this one. It's well worth the money
Great for bathroom doors!!. I generally leave my dirty laundry in the bathroom when I take them off, (I know a bad habit) so I always have a dirty bathroom.  I hung this from a hook at the top of my door and place all my dirty laundry in it when I take them off!!  It works great!!
Quality knife set. I ordered from Amazon, the KitchenAid KA1PR16N Cook's Series 16-piece Cutlery Set with Traditional Natural Block, Red Handles which is exactly the same as this set, but cheaper. The picture for the other set is wrong though because it shows polished handle ends for the steak knives, but the handles are red plastic only and the handle ends for the other pieces are actually brushed steel and not polished as shown in the picture. In essence, the knife set that is pictured here is the knife set that you will also get if you purchase the other KitchenAid knife set that I've mentioned above.As far as the knives themselves, the weight is perfect for chopping and the blades are nice and sharp. The funky red color looks cute in my kitchen too. The only negative is they're not dishwasher safe, but luckily they do clean easily by hand. Even though Amazon is having a hard time correctly picturing the KitchenAid knife sets, I'm very satisfied with the set that I received and thrilled to finally have a knife set to be proud of
Wonderful. I love these knives.  They fill their need and with the full tang, they are nice and sturdy
Perfectly fits the books' atmosphere. For those of you unfamiliar with the "A Series of Unfortunate Events" books, they detail the absurdly tragic lives of the fictional Baudelaire orphans, and their struggles to overcome adversity (after adversity, after adversity, ad infinitum).  Hovering in the background of their tragedies and occasional, brief glimpses of happiness, is their distant cousin, the scheming, greedy, conniving, ruthless cousin, the Count.Given the concept of the story, this poster fits perfectly, with the orphans, standing together but otherwise alone, in the middle, with the shadow of the Count casting gloom upon them.  It is a perfect fit, as is the casting of Jim Carrey as the Count
very comfortable. I have had this for almost a month now and I am very impressed with the extra comfort and cushion this has added to the bed.  I was a little concerned that it might flatten out and lose its padding but so far it feels the same as it did new.  Very happy with this purchase and I ordered a second one
Sportsman's grill. Durable hunk of cast-iron. After building a custom cart for the Lodge the propane grill now takes a back-seat. The grilling grate can be improved by adding a lip around the perimeter to prevent fall-offs. Also a two-position height adjustment would aid in temperature control
Pleased. I usually only buy something if it has good reviews.  I'm pleased with this table that I purchased to put in my entry way.  It looks very nice there with 2 lamps set on top. The only reason that I rated it 4 stars and not 5 is because there are a couple of blemishes on the top.  I'll be able to hide them with the lamps tho!It only took me 10 minutes to put it together
Archie's favorite!. My cat loves this toy, and so do I. When his energy level is through the roof and I'm too tired to run around the room any more, I pull this little boogie out and he's in cat heaven, while I get to sit in one place and laugh at him. Battery is quite long lasting -- I've been using it daily for six months now and haven't needed to replace it yet
Order extras. I was not so lucky with packaging. They were loosely wrapped in bubble wrap by, my guess, monkeys. Then, they were put inside a large box allowing lots of room for shifting and breakage and, finally, it seems, pounded on by gorillas. However, only one plate arrived broken, which seems a good sign of how well they will hold up under use. The dishes are not perfect either. There are significant imperfections on a couple of them, but the rest are more beautiful than the picture. My suggestion would be to buy more than you need and donate the imperfect ones
Dog food storage. Great seller, but this item lid does not fit like our straight on top lids, which we love.  Also would suggest the next larger as this will not hold an entire bag of 40# Science Diet
great product. This was a gift for my mother and she loved it. She especially liked the stand the mixer sits in. And boy does it have power.  GREAT!
CERAMA BRYTE Cleaner. This stuff really works well - makes it look brand new.  The key to getting the tough baked on foods off the range are the scraper and cleaning pads
Perfect for use on top of a boiling pan. This cover works great in my saute pan and is 'perfect' for use on top of a sauce pan when steaming or even boiling pasta.. NO MORE BOIL OVERS...A bit pricey as a microwave cover.. But cannot complain about performance..
had it for almost a year. very nice looks great in fish tank and very good quality. you may not notice but the back part is also in detai
My Mom Loves It. This is a very good quality item from Farberware.  It's strong and cooks really well.  The price was/is excellent, too.  A stockpot such as this is one of those essentials you must have around the house.  As I said earlier, my mom loves it and she's picky when it comes to cookware... so most of you probably will enjoy it too
Beautiful Sea Mist Pitcher. I decided to add this pitcher to my Sea Mist collection since Fiestaware is discontinuing the color (much to my dismay).  I was pleasantly surprised at how beautiful the pitcher is.  Sea Mist is much more beautiful in person, and so is the pitcher.  It not only matches my other Fiestaware pieces, but is an item that I can use in any room of the house.  I can see it displayed on the mantle, in a bedroom, the bathroom, as well as the kitchen.  If only Fiestaware would continue Sea Mist....I could order all the sizes of the pitcher and have a really nice display
HEAVY DUTY. THIS COOKWARE SET IS MARVELOUSLY HEAVY, MAKING IT EASY TO COOK WITH AND DURABLE. IT'S HANDSOME, SUBSTANTIAL AND YOU GET A GOOD VARIETY OF POTS AND PANS. I HAVEN'T ONCE THOUGHT, I NEED... IT'S THE KIND OF SET THAT MAKES YOU CHUCK YOUR OLD PANS. CLEANING-WISE, I DID GET A SORT OF RAINBOW MARK AT ONE POINT ON ONE PAN, AND SO I PUT A VERY SMALL AMOUNT OF OIL ON A PAPER TOWEL AND WIPED IT OFF. NO WHERE IN THE INSTRUCTIONS DOES IT SUGGEST YOU DO THIS, AND TOO MUCH OIL COULD MAKE IT TACKY. THE INSTRUCTIONS WARN AGAINST OIL SPRAYS, FOR INSTANCE. BUT A FEW DROPS, THEN WIPING VIGOROUSLY, RESTORED MINE TO THAT GREAT STAINLESS SHINE. THE STAINLESS UTENSILS AND CANISTER THAT CAME WITH IT ARE GREAT TOO
The best. I used to put a hair band around the neck of the wine bottle to keep it from dripping along the sides.  With this handy gadget, I threw all the hair bands away.  I will never have to deal with wine running down the bottle again.  Who wants wine stains on their table cloth?  This is going to solve that problem.  I can also guarantee that once your guests see it, they'll want this wine pourer too
Braun Electric Water Kettle. Great product. We use it all the time and it works perfectly
Thank you Rachael. This knife is the most outstanding piece of cutlery I have ever used in my life. I have given my "chef's knife" to Goodwill after I first used my "Rachael." More to the point my daughter has been a professional chef for almost 20 years, has prepared dinners for three President's of the United States, and has been an Executive Chef at two fine restaurants in the Middle Atlantic area, - she has tried my "Rachael" and I had a hard time keeping her from walking off with it. That will be a Chanukah present for her.She is a top flight carver and on labor day at a large family outing she will be using my "Rachael" on a steamship round of beef.The knife speaks for itself from the moment you pick it up to the moment you put it down, and literally sings in between
Item before this one. The item I received before this one, which was the LARGE SPOON for the same type of stoneware, Sango Nova Black  was snet BROKEN!!! But since it only cost $4, it will cost me for than that to send it back, so I guess I am stuck with it. A disappointed customer.Brian STanford305-479-884
You Really Need This Floor Sweeper. At first, this thing is pretty odd: it is rather expensive, and appears to be a simple mechanical device. When cleaning the bare floors in my home, it does a better job than regular vacuum cleaners. For cleaning bare floors and flat carpets, nothing is better than this mechanical brush floor sweeper, and I give it my highest recommendation. This happy little device is in my Hall of Fame Floor Sweepers/Vacuums (the other members are the Wet and Dry Shop Vac, and the Panasonic Professional Vacuum Cleaner).I have used this sweeper (or ones like it) at various jobs over the years cleaning the floors/carpets in restaurant dining rooms. Only recently, however, did I actually get one for my home, and I love it.  Since it is lightweight and easy to use, many floors now get daily cleanings rather than their traditional weekly ones. It does an amazingly complete job of sweeping up every particle of dust and debris on the floor. If you have allergies, it is important to note that this sweeper does not kick up any dust (which brooms and vacuums all do). Since it is mechanical, it will work even during power failures. When you fold the handle down flat, it requires only 3 inches of vertical clearance for sweeping under furniture. Note that this sweeper does better in large, clear areas (like the living room) rather than small places that require manuevering (like around the chairs and table). Interestingly, it sweeps on both the forward and backward strokes; this also means that it has 2 dust pans that you have to remember to clean out, not just one.I do have a few quibbles about it. In order to fit into the box, the handle is in 3 pieces; if you do not jam them together hard, the handle might come apart (although this has never happened to me). It has trouble picking up small pebbles and pieces of glass. The brushes get stuck full of dust bunnies, and the supplied brush cleaner not only falls off the handle a lot, it does a poor job of cleaning the brushes, and you have to pull out the dust bunnies with your fingers anyway.  There is a 3 inch gap in front, since the brushes are recessed back from the front of the pan (like when you push it up against a wall). This means that in order to clean the wall edges, you have to run the sweeper against the wall and parallel to it.  Note that this sweeper does bare floors and flat carpets only; if the carpet is pile, shag, or is not totally flat and hard, you are out of luck.
Better Than Five Stars!!. 11/11/06 Update:  I can say now that I have no regrets. This knife is actually my favorite knife and the one I reach for first.  I have to force myself to use my chef's knife.  My Shuns are still sharp!I believe if you're serious about cooking, you should own great cookware and excellent knives.  I finally stepped up and got excellent knives.  For those who haven't heard the hype, Shun is one of the most respected knife brands in the world.  [...]Great features of the entire line include these cool "D" shaped handles that fit your hand better.  Each knife is made in a right- and left-handed version [...].  The handles are made of wood and are specially treated so they are diswasher safe!! The steel used for the blades is harder than what you would find in most other knives.  The knives are EXTREMELY sharp.   One thing to note about Asian knives is that they must be sharpened at a different angle, 16-18 degrees vs. 20 degrees for German knives.  The Shun steel takes the guesswork out of getting the angle correct because of the flat edge on one side of the metal disc below the handle.About the 7" scalloped santoku ... this is my first Shun knife.  It is honestly the sharpest knife I have ever used.  I minced onion with relatively no effort.  I didn't feel any resistance while cutting and the job went amazingly quickly.I have small hands and this knife felt perfect.  The weight was just right and it just fit well in my hand.  I will have to make adjustments to my grip as I get used to the knife.  (I used the traditional grip you would use on a German blade chef's knife my hand slipped toward the blade.)  This knife will not replace my chef's knife, but it will see a lot of action.This is an expensive, but lifetime investment.  I encourage you to visit stores and feel the knives in your hand to make sure you are comfortable with them. For more info on Shun, check out Alton Brown's website.  For ratings on various brands and types of knives[...]This is probably the best kitchen purchase I've made and the one I'm most proud of.  I can't wait until the rest of the set arrives.
Great Pillowtop for the price. We recieved the pillowtop promptly. It is quite full and puffy- well made. We are using it on our guestroom bed and so far every one has had a great night sleep
best coffee I ever had. best coffee maker but the price here is a bit much you can get the same bunn at TARGET for under 100 dollars check it out I got mine at target 1 and a half years ago and no probles and I use it 1 or 2 times a day I paid 79.9
Where Have These Been All My Life!. These Hercules Hooks are absolutely incredible.  I wish I had them before my husband put many, many holes in our walls with anchors and screws.  If I want to relocate anything, he tries to patch up the hole, but it always shows.  These hooks make only a pin sized hole!  I hung a shelf unit in my bathroom and put books on it.  It is still there.Incredible product and well worth the price
Very nice. Beautiful canister.  I purchased one in each of the three sizes.  They look fantastic in my kitchen.  Highly recommend
buy it !! it really works!!. It really does sharpen perfectly !!!Ands is also very easy to use!!  It is also  nice looking and sturdy!!Great buy !
latex pillow. I have used a queen size Beautyrest pillow for years but wanted a smallersize for travellig
Awesome Book Light!. I like this book lite becuase it can flex around very easily, it has a brite lite, if it's a hard cover book it will easily clamp on, and it has a handy switch on the back of the lite
Compact and sturdy. This mill is smaller than I thought it would be but works well and looks great
My dog can play outside!. We do not have a fence, so the PetSafe wireless fence unit has significantly improved the quality of life for the dog and us.We adjusted the base unit to allow the forest creatures to escape.  We weren't able to put the invisible fence where we had planned because the chain-link enclosure (the dog's "sand box") beside our driveway interfered with the signal.The collar uses up the specialized batteries quickly, so keep a supply on hand.  Check the collar daily before using.  When the battery is replaced, the collar must be reset to the appropriate shock level.  We left the boundary flags up for 10 days although the dog figured it out the first day.  My dog has only experienced one shock (at a setting of four) on the first day; since then, the beep is enough to keep him within the boundaries.PetSafe retains control over the selling price of its products, so there are no bargain basement prices by any vendor.
Pleasantly surprised!. Purchased two comforters and very pleased with quality. I comparison shopped extensively via the net. Upon arrival found website's description to be accurate. Comforter quality exceeded that of other brands advertised elsewhere at much higher prices. Delivery and e-mail notification process was very good.  Pleasantly surprised
I'm so glad I bought this. I've had this for over a year now. It's perfect! I had always found cooking rice to be very tricky. My husband even bought me an electric rice cooker, but that doesn't seem to work either (the rice seems too hard, not all the way cooked). What's great about this steamer/cooker is that you can adjust the cooking time because you put it in your microwave. The booklet gives you a range and I have found I need to use the maximum time listed. I only wish it listed more options -- it just lists instructions for 1 cup raw rice, and 2 cups raw rice. I'd like to see how it would work for less, to be able to make one serving of rice, but I guess I can experiment with it.What's also great is you can use it for steaming vegetables. It has an insert that keeps the veggies above the boiling water. The instructions say you can use it for pasta, too, though I haven't tried that. Pasta in the microwave just seems wrong somehow, but rice in the microwave works great! If you're looking for a foolproof way to cook rice, you should get this product, you won't be sorry
Works quite well. This wine pourer works quite well. My wife and I have enjoyed how nicely it pours and that it doesn't seem to drip. Apparently as a bonus it also is supposed to aerate the wine. I'm not quite sure of the extent of this talent, but it does seem to pour well - hence the clever name!One note, to pour nicely it does lessen the pouring flow rate. It's not bad for small-to-normal sized social gatherings, but for large parties where your goal is to get large amounts of wine in lots of glasses in a short time, there is a limiting factor with this pourer. For most people (ourselves included), this little do-dad does seem to pour effectively without the wine drip
You will love this griddle. This griddle is worth $75-$85 at a minimum. When I opened the box I was pleasantly surprised with the wieght and feel of this product. It is Calphalon - which is always great cookware - so I should not have been so surprised
Lots of Settings and It Works!. I am delighted with the fan and just ordered 2 more for my bedroom and sunroom.  The fan has a smaller profile, but is substantial enough to stand up to my giant breed dogs' tails.  On the lowest setting, the fan keeps my 22' x 14' room cool and I am only slightly aware of the noise (a hum) generated.The fan was very simple to assemble - it involved inserting 4 screws to attach the base to the fan.  Although I don't use the remote, it may be useful for others.  The LCD displays the current room temperature and the desired room temperature.  I like using the buttons and LCD versus having knobs or switches to adjust settings.  And the settings are incredible...The Speed Levels are high, medium, slow, and automatic.  On the automatic setting, the fan automatically adjusts the speed to achieve desired room temperature.  Be warned that this fan is NOT "whisper quiet" - certainly not at the medium or high level.  There is a distinct and constant hum.  But set to high, the fan blows papers off my dining room table, which is 5 feet away.  That's a lot of power to expect silence!The Wind Levels are normal (the wind speed is constant), natural (the wind speed resembles nature wind and shifts among slow, medium, and fast), and sleeping wind (the wind level cycles from fast to medium to slow, until stopping at the selected time).  *I'm looking forward to using the natural wind setting in my bedroom.  It will be like having the windows open, which is impossible here during the summer months.*The timer can be set for between 30 minutes and 7.5 hours, at 30 minute increments.  You can also select between oscillating and stationary.What's not to love
Great saucepan. This saucepan is a convenient size.  It heats up well and maintains the heat.  The glass dome lids are great.  Very sturdy and seems like it will last a lifetime.  The clean up is also VERY easy.  Stuck on food and sauces come off easily with a little soaking and if that doesn't work the cleaning pad and Bon Ami cleanser finishes it off with little effort.  A great investment
KitchenAid Reconditioned Blender. Overall, I like this blender:Pros-VERY QuietGood Price (probably have to pay more for a different brand w/ sharp blades-see Cons below)Nice DesignCons-Blades not suited for chopping; they're designed for crushing things like ice. Doesn't work great for things like fruit smoothies; there are chunks of fruit left that don't get liquified. I have an Oster blender and its blades are sharp; the KA blender blades are blunt.
I think this coffee pot is awesome!!!!. I have owned my percolator for about two or three years now.  I've never had any trouble with the plastic top breaking off - don't know if other people just happened to get defective models or what and have never had trobule getting the lid off ever.  You just grab the top handle which is made for this purpose - again maybe some other people got a bad model.  The only downside I've found is that my guests will get to the pot first and pour their coffee with the grounds still in the basket - yum - crunchy!!  So dump them\ basket out quickly!
Did I get the only one of these that works?. I love my oil mister sprayer thingy.Pour the oil in, pump the cap about 5 times, and a fine mist comes out.  No, it's not a lot of oil that comes out each spray, but enough to coat a 15+ inch frypan to grill quesadillas or grilled cheese sandwiches on.  I used to use butter for this task, but no more.It's absolutely perfect for coating your pan in an instance where you would use butter or 'pam' cooking spray.  No, it's not going to get a whole cookie sheet in one spraying, but I think its well worth the extra pump
Great Buy. Love the way the mattress pad works... no leaks... but even better it's comfortable and QUIET ... no crinkly sounds like a vinyl cover... Very comfy and unnoticable!  Only reason I gave it a 4 and not a 5 was washing... when removed from the washer it's very heavy... I was afraid to dry it... although it did dry fine... so no concerns there either
Pretty Happy. I have two little boys and somehow, my spoons seem to disappear.  I am sure some dig of my home in a million years will have people wondering if we worshiped utensils.  Anyway.  I am pretty happy with this set. I didn't fall in love with it, but for the price I think is is wonderful.  It has a sturdy feel to it and washes in the dishwasher well.  There isn't much difference in the size of the dinner and salad fork and the same with the spoons, but I do think it was a great buy for the price and would recommend to others
Great Crate- but be careful with teething puppies. the crate is overall nice, light, convenient to setup and fold for transport. The pockets are great and handy to keep clutter out of sight. the only criticism would be the mesh on the sides isn't bulletproof strong, seems to be a tough coated plastic mesh but my bulldog who is teething was able to chew a small hole through it which if she continues, would render the crate unusable, if your dog is not a chewer it's a great product, if he/she is, be wary of this or just spray bitter apple on it. After i did she has stopped.
Best Coffee Mug out there.  Period. I've always been on a search to find the best coffee mug that includes all the features that serious coffee drinkers are looking for:1.  Keeps the beverage hot for hours.2.  When sealed, it does not leak at all.3.  Easy to drink from and dribble-free.4.  Suitable for right and left hand drinkers.5.  Fits into most car cup holders.6.  Clips to straps/loops/handles to carry easily, even when filled.7.  Easy to clean and stays stain/smell free.8.  Rubber accents provide non-slip grips and doesn't make a clanking noise when the mug is set down on the conference table.9.  High quality construction for durability.10. It looks really cool!This mug has with out a doubt ended my search for the perfect coffee mug.  I look at all others now and laugh because they pale in comparison to this mug.  Finally, a company has created the ultimate coffee mug for even the most demanding user.  This is a fantastic mug and is definitely worth the price
Save your pennies !!!!!!!. Like all of the coper-core pieces from All-Clad, this is a beauty.I used to think people who spent "so much" on cookware were INSANE.If you actually use this pan every day (and you can)......and turn out consistently delightful meals (and you will)......for every dish that turns out as you had hoped, pop one penny in a jar (you can find them everywhere if you look, my kids do!) and by a years time(1 cent a day) you will have saved enough to go and get another of these delightful pans!The flat cooking surface of this pan is actually just a tad larger than the 13" braiser and the overall interior diameter and height of the domed lid is just a tad smaller.  (Imeasured side by side)I got 10  2" thick lamb chops into this pan.  Seared em', deglazed then added the magic ingredients, popped in the oven with lid and braised.Delicious!!!!!!Sautese = higher sides makes good for frying chicken - if you doBraiser = probablly better for a larger quantity but even that might not be so because while the braisers sides flare out they are shorter.  The sautese sides go straight up and are higher.All depends on what you are cooking I supposeAlso the sautese has a lip around the edge which helps in pouring without dripping.Lastly it is roughly $25 lessMay all your meals be joyous!
Calphalon Simply Skillet. This is the best skillet we have ever used for high heat usage.  It conducts heat evenly in all areas, is heavy, substantal fry pan (similar to cast iron) without the downside rusting, sticking etc.  Even though it is not advertised as non-stick, we have had no problem with sticking, without the problems of tefelon scratching and flakes coming off the surface during high heat use.  We plan to replace other pans with Calphalon in the future if this one continues to provide the service indicated. Review based on 1 month of hard usage.
Convient storage. The product shipped great.  Only problem was that one lid did not come with a seal on it so it had to be returned.  The colors are great and the storage is good.
excellent coffe maker. This coffee maker is perfect for our office - especially the automatic feature.  The coffee maker we had previously was a "pour-over" type - no one wanted to be bothered making the coffee when they took the last cup - now its so much more convenient!  The hot water spout is really a nice feature for those who drink tea, hot chocolate or cup a soup for lunch.  We have been very pleased with this machine and would recomend it
Good Value, Large Capacity. Works as advertised. A bit larger than anticipated but otherwise has met my expectations. I haven't had any issues with the filtering.If you don't need a large capacity check out T-Fal's smaller capacity EZ-Clean.I mostly fry fish, chicken, french fries, onion rings, and occasionally burritos/chimichangas
Good value. If you are terrible at making rice as I am, this is a very helpful product.  The liquid tends to boil over if cooked at high temp in my microwave.  I cook the rice at 50% power for about 50% longer than the directions recommend and it comes out perfectly.  Easy clean up in the dishwasher.  It is a bit of a pain to store, but I'd buy it again.  Also comes with a steamer insert for cooking vegetables, etc. but I haven't tried that yet
Great Cooking Experience. Wow, 90 bucks for a pot seems kinda hefty but this sucker really is worth it.  Packaging was good, came fast and I've used it 4 times already in the past two weeks. This is not only for cooking moroccan food but others as well.  Meats prepared on stovetop for 2 - 2.5 hours are incredibly tender and juicy, based over and over again with the lid shape designed the way it is. So far did beef, chicken, pork and gonna do a turkey breast later this week and I cant wait. I love it and leave it on my counter top cause I love the way it looks too! Seems pretty solid, i forgot I left it in the oven and had it pre-heating at 425 for an hour.  Seems to be quite sturdy too
Georgeous color. The color is quite pretty under food and garnishes show up nicely. This is a nice size for serving about anything for a smaller dinner party
Best coffee!. Love it!  Bought several for friends.  Definitely buy the beans and a grinder, a huge difference between this and drip
Multi Small Pet Friendly. I love the Catit Fountain - I have 2 cats and a rabbit and they can all drink out of it at the same time.  The bunny and young cat prefer the dome and my older cat prefers the bowl part so there is abundant harmony at the water bowl.  It is very easy to clean (I do it about once a week in the dishwasher), much quieter than the Drinkwell and comes (when I got it) with a hard cord cover making it particularly bunny friendly
Love this mitt, and oh that magnet!. Love this silicone oven mitt.  I have had no issues with heat conductivity and it is extremely resistant to stains.  Also love the magnet that allows for refrigerator hanging.  All in all, just a great item that I use all the time. Great colors, too
The cost is worth it. I do think it's a bit overpriced, but it works very well.  Much better than a hose you have to hook up to a faucet
Astounding value. I would not even say "for the price"; this is simply an excellent, very firm, well-made pillow. For this sort of quality of materials and manufacture one normally pays several times this price--and everyone loves a bargain
Didnt Use To Be A Coffe Drinker, But Now... My sister purchased this item for my wife for Christmas of 2005, since she was the coffee drinker in the family. In the last year, I have gone from not drinking coffe at all, to making at least 4 mugs a week (14oz setting). I don't agree with any of the negative reviews this machine has received.I have put a cup of coffe brewed with this machine up against various brews from [national chain name omitted] and prefer the brew from this Balck & Decker 9 times out of 10 (they do make a few great lattes).--ConsOnly thing I can think to mention is that the resivior only holds enough for 2 brews on the 14 oz setting, but that is enough for my wife and I to have a full mug each morning.--ProsFast brew.Great serving sizes.Easy to fill and clean.This is simply some of the best coffee I have tasted
Tough little booger. I put this clock on my wedding registry cause I liked the look of it and it seemed sturdy....and boy is it! My husband and I are stationed in Spain and over here, the kitchen walls are solid tile from floor to ceiling. I wanted this clock in my kitchen so I baught some sticky-hooks to hang it with, thinking that two should hold it. Well, twice (you'd think I'd have learned the first time) it fell off the wall, bounced off the counter (after first completely shattering a dish...wow) and to the floor, sliding accross the kitchen. I was surprise to see it was not only still working but had just a minor scratch on the metal! This is a tough little booger and I would definitely buy another one. Plus, the warranty is very good. And, I finally got it mounted firmly to my kitchen wall....yea
handy Kitchen tool. For small amounts, no need to haul out the big food processor.  I use this all the time.  Perfect for salsa's and for mincing onions and garlic for dishes
great for dips. I love this smaller crockpot for dips of any kind. My family has food at every get together and having this 2 1/2 quart crockpot is perfect. It makes cleaning up easier too
It works. Unlike so many spot cleaners on the market for carpeting, this one really works.  Try it, you'll like it especially if you have animals, children or a very messy husband.
A Functional Piece of Art. The toaster is beautiful and works beautifully.  No preheating.  No need to watch.  Just set the timer and push the lever.  The only drawback is that it gets a bit hot while in use, but I suppose all chrome toasters are like that.  Makes perfectly consistent toast every time.  Finally, it looks *magnificent*.  Pricey, but you are acquiring an objet d'art in your kitchen
A must have!. These are easy to use, they do not make a mess, and offer vibrant colors.   They do not taint what you are decorting as some colors can.  I would  highly recommend these to anyone to likes to decorate
Great ice shaver!. What a great buy we made with this, now we can make our own ice cones, frappe lemonade and everything for the hot summer
great cap. i received this for my birthday and i must say, i haven't had a problem with it.  it's a lot of fun... especially hearing the pressure steam froth the milk!  it did leak on me once, the first time i used it, but i did not tighten the two halves together as best i could.  when i did tighten the two halves, i had no problems and it made great coffee.  i'm excited to see how it seasons up and the better coffee it is supposed to make the more i use it
Good Waffle Iron. This waffle iron browns evenly, and the browning scale is accurate.  An added bonus is its easy storage because it stands on end and will fit into a cupboard
Convenient & Inexpensive. I love this hamper.  Even when it is full of laundry, it does not tip over, the handles make it easy for me to carry downstairs to the laundry room, it callapses if I don't need it and stores easily, it's inexpensive and has free shipping.  Plus, it doesn't take up lots of space, and vents so wet towels don't mold other clothes in the hamper.  It's perfect for anyone who doesn't want to spend a fortune on a hamper
clean classy design. I've owned this flatware in this pattern for three years.  I paid top dollar for each place setting, so this price is exceptional.  The picture of the flatware here doesn't do it justice.  You have to see it and feel it in your hand to truly appreciate the quality and craftsmanship.  The combination of shiny and brushed metal is both eye-catching and elegant.  It's a clean and classy design.  We use this flatware year-round. The hostess set is nice too, but the serving spoons have such large bowls they are slightly goofy looking
Outstanding. We received this as a gift from our wedding registry. Easy to season, it comes with clear instructions for seasoning (and cleaning).  It also came with a slim cookbook.  Quite helpful, since we'd never used a wok.  Now we can't get enough of using it!  Great quality for a very low price.
Great Popcorn Popper. Great machine...pops all the kernels.  Only drawback is the powerpop disks are hard to find. Needed to order them online
A "Must Have" For Your Puppy. This washable cedar bedding fits in the Pet Gear Home 'N Go soft sided pet crate, and the manufacturers really should have included it with the crate. Don't buy the crate without also purchasing this necessary padding. The combo makes a great "starter home" for your new puppy
Great piece for the money - gets lots of compliments. I was a little skeptical about ordering a piece of furniture online -- would it arrive scuffed up or broken? -- but I was very glad I took the risk with the console table.  I had seen it long ago in a Target store, but they have since stopped selling it in stores.  It was as nice as I remembered it being when I saw it in person.Other than a very minor flaw in the finish on the top of the table -- which I don't think was an issue with shipping or handling -- it arrived in perfect condition.  Everyone who has been to my house since I bought it has commented on what a great piece of furniture it is.One thing to note:  the drawers are very shallow, so don't expect for them to hold bulky items like remote controls.
I'm cookin' fer a livin and... Found this at an overstock price (you don't want to know ;) and snapped it up for heavy duty work at the restaurant. It has performed flawlessly for the past 6 months despite heavy use and abuse. Dinner for four...sauteed with stock reduction in the pan? NO problem...finish 12oz. sirlions from flat top to oven...NO problem...rendering duck breasts, sauteing and finishing with delicate shrooms in demi....NO problem. Rockfish, softshell crabs, mussels in safron stock, snap peas, braised endive, CREPES...you name it, this pan can do...WHOOHOOO.I scrub this one myself and then send it through my commercial dishwasher full of caustic detergent, sanitizer and drying agent...hundreds of times...still looks new. DO NOT try that at home as it voids your warranty.I'ma givin' out 5 mojo*z for this tough guy!!
Terrific little vacuum. This little upright vacuum has more than enough power to reallyclean my one bedroom apartment. And it really cleans. The suctionpower is strong and I am impressed with how much dirt is collected.My little eureka mighty mite was just not doing the job obviously.Lightweight, 8 amps powerful, easy to put together and easier to use.I totally recommend it. Hope it lasts a long time. I will definitely buyanother Hoover. The price is amazing - a great value
They're also Finnish, too!. My mother used to makes these for Christmas and my sister and I decided that we must pass that tradition on to our children, too.  For us, it's not Christmas without Rosettes!  They are so delicious
I LOVE this machine. I love it I love it I love it. My mom let me use this machine and now I'm the official "ice cream maker" in the house. Clean up is really easy even for a kid. You just pour a quart of warm water in the funnel lid  but make sure it is closed because this machine has an interlock feature that stops the machine from operating when the lid is not engaged just flip the mix switch and use the lever to drain out the soapy water. I made vanilla ice cream from an episode I saw on Good Eats it was so smooth and you control the amount of overrun this is the only machine on the market that lets you do this....light ice cream for the kids and sinfully rich ice cream for your parents. Store bought ice cream doesn't stand a chance against this machine. Try it ...you'll love it!
GREAT FUN!. If you like fondue....you'll like raclette...as much or even more.  Use your imagination...don't stick with what is traditional.  You can use your raclette for desert, pizza, breakfast....and much more! Traditionally served with steamed red potatoes....this will satisfy the "meat and potatoe" man in the group.  Marinade the meat with different flavors...to add some spice.  Don't forget the vegetables....slice onion, red peppers, mushrooms, romas...and even pineapple. It's a great way to spend an evening with a couple of friends.  Extra trays are a good idea if you use your raclette a lot
Moroccan cooking. I am very pleased overall w/ this product.  My husband is Moroccan and we cook tagines probably 5 times a week.  We had been previously using a very small clay tagine from Morocco and needed a larger size.  We have cooked a wide array of foods in this tagine and are very happy w/ all the results.  Not to mention, it also looks wonderful displayed on our range top when not in use.  The heat is evenly distributed and the steam is circulated well in the conical lid.  The one thing I would do to enhance this product is to create a small hole for venting.  For now, we prop it open on occasion w/ a wooden spoon.  We have requested the smaller (9.5") tagine for a gift.
Love the pizza Grill. I have a Pizza Grill and I love it, the Pizza Grill is easy to use, the Pizza doesn't stick to the the stone. Now that the weather is nice, it is great to get everyone together and have everyone make their own pizzas.I disagree with Tom: The thermometer on my high end Weber never seems to match the temperature that the Pizza Grill does, probably because the location is higher or something. Getting tiles from home depot can be dangerous for 2 reasons; they could have lead or other poisons that would leach out at high temperature. Or they would just crack.
Very Classy. I purchased the wine cooler and ice bucket as gifts for my mother-in-law. I was surprised by how light in weight they were (which was a good thing for my mother-in-law). They certainly are Lenox quality and the price on Amazon was outlet store pricing. The only draw back is that there is not a set of tongs for the ice bucket. And choosing a set of tongs turned out to be time consuming... I recommend the Onieda silicone tipped ones. They were very classy and actually worked better than regular tongs. The only somewhat drawback is the color choices offered for the tongs.
Great little whisk. This is a fantastic little whisk.  It is perfect for whipping up hot chocolate or other drink mixes & also to scramble eggs.  It is a must have in the kitchen for those little tasks that are too small for a big whisk.
Excellent Coat Rack. I purchased this coat rack as a replacement for one that was similar in color and style because it had broken.  I couldn't be happier with the product I received and I am sure that it will last just as long as the other one that I had.  A great buy
Great For Daily Use - Nott Made For Heavy Duty Cleaning. I read the reviews before I purchased this machine. I know from experience that reviews are extremely subjective and often times people misuse the appliance or simply expect more than a machine is capable of. So with this in mind I will put in my 2 cents.I have had my machine for two months and I use it about 4 times a week on a 200 square foot vinyl kitchen floor that accomodates two adults, a 4 year old and two dogs. Generally it works pretty well and is much more convenient than a regular mop and bucket.You must remember that this is a low cost residential machine and as such will not replace the suction and scrubbing power of a serious vacuum and elbow grease.The machine is set up to auto-shut off if you move the machine quickly or drop it down low. I agree with with the other writers about the poor suction capability but you must consider the overall design of the machine. A powerful adjustable head machine that would pick up more than dog hair and dust would be cost prohibitive. I see what Hoover was trying to do with this machine. They were trying to accomodate our scrubbing and vacuuming needs in one cost effective machine. They gave it a good shot but for all of us clean-freaks this machine doesn't quite hit the mark.The water/cleaning solution section is, in my humble opinion, to small. I run out of water quickly and I have a very small kitchen. But the good news is that my kitchen is so small I can take three steps over to the sink and fill it up. :)One more comment before I give my final review...remember to follow the instructions and use ONLY the kind of cleaners Hoover recommends. There's a reason for this. If you use regular household cleaners that cut crease you will damage your machine and it will most certainly leak and die! The grease cutting agents in regular household cleaners and soaps strip the bearings and fry the gaskets.So my final opinion is this. If you have a relatively small space and need a daily quick scrub it's a great time saver. It's a good overall cleaner if you need a quick vac-up of dog hair, scrub and mop. Any more heavy duty than that and you are back to the good old vacuum attachment, mop and bucket routine. If you are a cleanfreak, like me, you know that nothing replaces a good old fashioned hand-and-knees scrub. No machine will ever leave you satisfied. This machine was definately NOT made for heavy duty cleaning but for light daily use it's great.I am giving this machine 4 stars because I think it does what it was designed to do...light cleaning. I would have given it 5 stars if the cleaning solution bucket was larger and the cut off mechanism was a little more liberal and a little more suction power would have been nice.When Hoover finally comes up with a heavy duty scrubber with the suction power of a regular vacuum, scrubbing power of my own elbow and ability to get into corners and baseboards I'll be all over it! Until then, I'll settle for a daily scrub with this machine and a good hand scrub once a month.
Makes Tastey Food. Burgers and chicken tastes great after cooking it on this pan.  Can't use the round grill press though - too big.  If you cook meat on the pan until its well-done, you will have to put a bit of water in it to soak before washing.  It can be difficult to wash; but, I still like this pan.
Perfect!. I love these for leftovers, as the re-heating process is simple.  Just pop open the top and microwave.  I have no trouble getting them on and off and have had hand surgeries
Handy Little Product. I really like this product!  It's small size makes it very portable and the display is easy to operate.  Works well with bowls, but a little tougher to use with plates unless you raise the plate slightly with some sort of stand and adjust for the additional weight.  Thank heavens for the HOLD feature
HEPA Air Purifier. The air purifier arrived in a timely fashion. So far so good
Love it!. I bought this mixer for my dad. I have a Kitchenaid but the reviews liked this model better for bread making, my dad's passion, I agree. He is really happy with it and I used it last weekend and I love it. It is great and bonus, $100 cheaper than the Kitchenaid. It would be nice if it had the capability for some grinder, pasta, etc, attachments but really, I buy my sausage and pasta so.....
Wonderful. I just purchased this set and LOVE it.  I have been looking for a stainless steel salt and pepper shaker for some time but didn't want to pay a premium price. This fit the bill and as a bonus I got a cocoa and cheese shaker as well.  The large size makes them easy to handle while cooking and they make a stylish piece placed on the stove top. I don't believe they will clog any worse than the average salt & pepper shakers as all will clog when exposed to moisture. The bottom hole for filling is easy and convenient.For the money they are an excellent buy
great. My daughter bought this for me for Christmas.  She  down loaded  pictures of all my grandkids  on it.  I just love it.  Easy to carry around  and  you can  add or detract old photos .  A must for anyone  who likes to  show off  children, grandchildren  or pets
A great dish for many uses. Im not much of a baker, Ok, who are we kidding, I dont bake. However I have used the devil out of this dish, I make hot appetizer dips in it, I use it as a serving bowl, I have filled it with water and floated flowers in it as a center piece.I rabidly collect fiesta ware and recommend this as a great additional piece. Mine is Sunflower Yellow
Nice in many ways. I bought this for my wife and I to use a few months ago.  We were looking for something to cook in that was between the 4qt. and 8qt. size.  At first I just wanted a new pot, then when I saw this I took a chance - and I'm glad I did!  We use this almost every day.  I have slow-cooked meats in it, cooked pasta, casseroles and soups along with dozens of other items.  I don't often deep fry, but the few times that I have I have enjoyed this cooker.  I especially like the extra room it offers over most "dedicated fryers".I can cook enough for all five kids and still only have one easy pot to clean!  What more do you want
Now I can rest!. Cooking breakfast for 11 can get hectic, but with the Cool Touch grill, my 10 year old grandaughter enjoys making the pancakes and French toast. Of course, she has supervision, but we can make many items at once making my mornings easier when my children are home to visit
aerolatte. Great for whipping up hot chocolate....my little granddaughter just loves it and so do I!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Dyson DC 15. Great product.  Works very well.  Only down side is that it is very loud.  Much louder than any other vacuum that I have tried.  The unit is also heavy, which my wife dislikes.
Outstanding Hotdog Cooker. This machine cooks hotdogs like the ones you used to get at the county fairs.  The hotdogs are hot and the buns are hot.  I would not give up my cooker for anything
Stylish. I just got into wine a little while ago, and wanted some nice glasses to sip from at home, rather than just using a plastic or glass tumbler.  But seeing as how I'm anywhere near wine snob status, I didn't want to spend a bunch on a set.Enter the Riedel O glasses.  They were on sale, great price for two glasses.  They arrived and I'm happy with them.  They're sophisticated enough to be wine glasses, but without the stems, they're not snobby either.  I would have given this 5 stars, but one of the glasses I received has a minor imperfection along the rim, almost a little bubble of glass, or crystal.  Other than that, they're great
Fabulous!. This is one of the little items that makes a big difference. I am not a gadget person. I like a lean, clean kitchen. This splatter screen helps with the clean! I can't believe how well it works and how well it fits on any size pan. Get one...you'll love it
Classy and Beautiful!. The set is so beautiful!  It is the perfect color and style for our new house!  We love how it is simple and still classy enough for formal dining!  I love this and it's a great deal!  I would recommend this set to anyone!  It's perfect
My favorite vacuum container. We have this container in constant use in the refrigerator, holding prewashed/precut veggies for snacking.  I find it easier to pack food into than our assorted tall, round canisters.  It has actually improved our nutrition because the clear container with colorful veggies all ready to eat is the most beautiful thing in the refrigerator.  And the veggies stay all nice and fresh and crunchy - no more slimy pepper strips!The only downside is that you can't stack anything on top of the domed lid.  I don't use the cheese grater
Quick service on belt. The belt was received very quickly and we were very satisfied with it.Donna Wilso
Great BBQ. I bought this for my husband's birthday and he has been having a great time using it ever since.  He never cooks except on the grill outside so now he can use this inside during the winter.  He seems to be really enjoying using it and creating new things. (And that means I don't have to cook that night).  I recommend this BBQ.
Very cool. I think this tem is very well priced and very nice for dog
Well worth the price. I bought this pillow because I wasn't completely satisfied with another foam pillow that I bought, nor was my husband. This thing is great. My husband liked it so much that I ordered him one too. They hold their shape better. The only reason I didn't give these pillows 5 stars is because they aren't quite high enough for us but we just use the other foampillows we bought to raise them a bit and sleep better than before
Excellent quality grinds!. I bought this grinder from my local coffee house on the recommendation of several of the employees at the shop. I've had it for almost 6 months and I couldn't be happier. I have used several other burr grinders, all of which have produced far more coffee dust than I would like. I use a press pot, so I use fairly coarse grinds, and the consistency of the grinds from this machine are perfect. I haven't had any problems with the grinder not functioning. The same button that turns it on turns it right back off. I honestly don't care how loud it is, as I would expect a coffee grinder to be loud. It is not difficult to clean at all. I just use the included bristle cleaner and a moist paper towel, it only takes a couple of minutes
Zojirushi Thermal Carafe. I just recently received this carafe and am VERY pleased with it.  So far, it has kept our coffee piping hot for over 15 hours.  I love the design and the swivel base.  We have used the glass-lined plastic carafes in the past, and they just don't keep the coffee very hot.  The Zojirushi Thermal Carafe is well worth the price.  Excellent product
It works!!. Surprisingly, this vented plastic storage container actually keeps bread fresh. Pricey little devil ;-
Classy,  yet durable. These ramekins are perfect for flan, custard, pudding, and the like.  They are beautiful, yet very heavy duty.  After buying one set in cherry red, I bought another set in flame 2 weeks later.  These are a definate must buy
against conventional wisdom advice. I'm going against what many home chefs like in an all purpose knife.It's not heavy, German, or made of surgical stainless steel.These are light knives, picking them up is effortless. If you uses knives often, why get something heavy that promotes carpal tunnel syndrome?They are not German. I think German knives are overated and overpriced. These knives are a great bargain. You can get 2 whole sets for the cost of one henckels or wusthoff knife.I admit the cheaper steel they use in these knives do not hold their edge as long nor can you dishwash (always handwash these). These knives rust if you throw them in the machine but they are very easy to sharpen and can get ridiculously sharp using those cheap 2 stage knife sharpeners.As long as you handwash and sharpen periodically, you can cut with the best of them.The secret to caring for your knife is to handwash, a light oil cloth, and sharpen your knives periodically.
Nice craftsmanship and functional, too. This knife block is very well made, looks nice and fits my knives.  Only a few of my knives are Henckels but even the others fit nicely
Just what I wanted!. Thank you for offering this wonderful product, oh I have other juicers etc, but wanted this after searching and looking at wooden ones
Super Soft. These sheets are fabulous, very soft, even after washing. I love em, and the color is beautiful
Great for cleaning grout. I bought this steamer primarily for cleaning grout and it worked!!!! It took a little bit of scrubbing along with the steam but the grout looks like new. However, my grout was only two years old, so it may or may not work as well with older grout. Overall I think this machine is a great value for the price.
I like it, but a pain to keep clean. I really like popcorn and I really like this popper.  Perfrect popcorn everytime and very, very few unpopped kernels.  The butter drip on the top is a nice idea, but it doesn't work very well.  I can't taste the butter when I use this method, so I don't.  The only downside, and I think this would probably be true of any oil based popper, is that it is a pain to clean.  You have to put the cover and the stirring mechanism in the dish washer to get it truly clean and if you have a dishwasher with a heating element in the bottom that is going to warp the cover unless you can somehow fit this large item on the top shelf
great deal. Great deal and even better product. Lightening fast and easy on the eyes
beautiful. I am a big fan of the Royal Albert collection. This particular piece is a beautiful addition to my collection. I am quite satisfied with my purchase
Performs exactly as described. This item performs exactly as was described in any of the marketing information I read.  That, in and of itself, is something to be happy about.  Keeps coffee hot up to 36 hours, is easy to disassemble and clean, and the Stainless Steel is well worth the extra $$. The last one I had was aluminum, and it became dulled and dirty looking over time.  This one looks new all the time
Wonderful Desk!. This desk is awesome! It is made out of SOLID WOOD not the cheap pressed cork wood from cheaper `discount' products.  Trust the saying "You get what you paid for..." and for this case this is a good buy. The shipping was fast it took about 5 days to come by UPS.  Despite the box the desk came in was beaten up the parts of the desk inside where in great condition.The desk needs assembly and the instruction booklet took a while to figure since it was mostly pictures. Each part was labeled well so it was very easy to put together and I did it with out using any power tools and it took me about an hour to finish the job.The style of the desk is very nice for small apartments. It sits against the wall and doesn't take up a lot of space.  I would defiantly recommend buying this desk especially if you want a desk that isn't bulky and solidly built.
Astoundingly clean and useful. This is the best tool for dismantling a whole chicken.  Safer than a knife, and you can take it apart (easily!) and put it in the dishwasher to disinfect.  And then reassemble it easily (in 1 second!).  I use it also for trimming fat off of pork, lamb, beef, etc., and it's invaluable for removing extra fins, etc., from fish
Works great. This replace one that was 10 years old and also made by Rival. It will see a lot of use and works great
Works great!. No more allergic reaction to my friends cat after using this air cleaner! Surprised the heck out of me but it beats my Ionic Breeze by a mile at a fraction of the cost. Allergy season is upon us so I'm ordering another one tomorrow along with some extra filters. It's just great finding an inexpensive solution to a miserable affliction
love it. I love it.  A great purchase.  Quality and function.   Makes me smile
Nice personal coffee maker. I read the reviews before I ordred this and was a little leary (because of drips and after taste) but ordered it anyway.  Let me say that I love my new coffee maker. I really like the fact that the pot has a lid that you can drink from. You don't have to dirty another coffee cup. Some others reported that it drips when you drink but I have not had that happen to me. I followed the manufacturers instructions to put a vinegar and water solution through it a couple of times before the first use and have not experienced the plastic after taste some people reported. The top is a little bit hard to take off to add condiments but can be done with a little practice. It is a little bit large to take with you in the car. It does come with an attachment so that it fits down in a drink holder but my car has flip up covers on them and they get in the way of this fitting down in completely but I've used it anyway with some success. Most importantly, it makes excellent coffee. Glad I bought it
quality construction, good performance, looks nice, great price. I purchase this unit refurbished for $120 about 10 days ago.  I held off writing a review until I used it for a bit.  So far my overall impression is very good.  I feel I received a good value buying the refurbished product.  To be completely honest I'm not sure my unit was even used once.  The exterior of the box had a lot of wear, but inside the box everything seemed brand new.  I smelled the burrs and there was no coffee smell at all.  Was it even used?It works very well.  I have noted the same minor complaints as others.  Mostly that the bottom glass jar feels like I could break it simply by holding it in my hand, and there is always a pinch of mess after grinding no matter what you do.  I have one other minor issue to add to this list.  When grinding there is a small row of beans that do not drop down into the grinder.  They get stuck along the ridge of the glass at the top.  I have to leave it running and try knocking them all down.  This isn't really all that bad of a thing to deal with, but I'd prefer to walk away and come back to all beans completely ground.I have found a way to minimize the mess when you pull out the bottom container with fresh ground coffee in it.  Leave the unit running even though all beans have been ground.  Then rock/slide the bottom jar back and fourth to jiggle the plastic plate where the grounds fall out through.  When I do this I get a lot of extra grounds that fall through into the jar.  A lot more than I'd expect.  Then I shut off the unit and pull out the jar.  The mess is significantly reduced.  Just a few crumbs instead of a small pile.I can't speak for life span of the unit.  As others have noted, it feels very solid and of a high quality construction.  If someone were to break into the house you better believe I'd be reaching for this grinder.  Heck.. I might use it as an anvil when I need to do metal work.I gave this a 4 star rating.  I reserve 5 stars for a product that is perfect.  If KitchenAid beefed up the glass thickness in the lower jar to match the upper bean hopper, did something about the slight mess, and removed the ridge in the upper hopper so all beans are ground I would have rated this a 5
Stylish yet Useful. We bought this kennel for our Shih tzu puppy, and she just loves it.  The floor mat is soft yet easy to clean, and the multiple zippered mesh openings allow us to access her from several sides or roll up the mesh so she can get in and out on her own.  It comes with handy zippered pockets for toys or treats, and one large pocket detaches from the kennel to form a bag with a detachable leash - great for travel.  The kennel is lightweight so it's easy to move around, although we don't fold it up frequently (it was a bit harder to unfold and open up than we expected, but once it was open, it was very sturdy for a small dog).  Larger or more aggressive dogs might chew through the canvas material so you'd want to  be careful in matching this choice to the temperament of your pet.  I'd rate this a 5 if it weren't for that concern
Nice, no complains. I like the nice pink trio pattern, and the price isn't bad at all ($1.99).  Looks cool so far.  Bought it 2 months ago, and it's not stained or damaged yet
Very nice, solid roasting rack. This rack is very nice and heavy-duty.  I cooked an 18lb turkey on it with ease.  The non-stick coating seems durable enough for the purpose and the rack is plenty large and heavy enough.  The only reason I am giving it four instead of five stars is that the piece could have easily been made even sturdier by using a few more welds.  There are a number of points on the rack where the metal rods simply touch one-another and are not welded.  While the rack held my 18lb turkey with no problems, it seems to me that two or three more spot welds by the manufacturer would greatly increase the durability of the item.  That being said- it is the sturdiest rack I have found so far
Quality. Riedel is always a quality product.  You can never go wrong with them.
Quality product!. This is a great curtain.  It's listed as a liner but I use it as the shower curtain itself.  It's heavier than most and not stiff so it hangs really well.  The ring holes have metal gromets so it will last without the holes tearing.  This curtain also resists the cloudy water-deposit film that ruins most curtains.  A great quality product
Great option at first, motor seems to lose power after a while. 03/29/2007 update:  OK, I have had this for a couple of months now, and I have started to see the problems other people have mentioned.  The rake is not powerful enough to take the waste to the disposal container and I end up scooping it like a normal litter.  I also purchased the larger size at the same time and that one has not had this problem.  Either that one has a different component or the quality control of these and deviations in production make the power behind the motor really variable depending on which unit you get.  Buy the small size at your own risk.   I would downgrade this to a 1 star at this point but they don't have that option once it's submitted.Previous Review:  I used to have the old model over 7 years ago when they first came out, but the rake was not detachable and made cleaning very difficult.One of my 4 cats is very picky about her litter and I decided to give this new model, which easily detaches for cleaning, a try.  I have had it for a week with no problems (and this with 4 cats).I have left the old litter boxes (2) just in case, but they seem to prefer this for the number ones.  I think they like deeper fill for number twos, which is one negative, you can only put in the litter about 1 1/2 inches deep.So far no problems with the rake getting stuck, although I think I might get a mega sized one next since it seems a little short where they are always going right at the very end in the corner
Excellent product. Not only my copper cookware shines, this even cleans the rust on the bottom of my cast iron cookware. A very good product
The best canner/pressure cooker I've owned... I do lots of cooking and canning - sometimes just for family, sometimes for large gatherings - and this cooker has made that chore much easier.  Even when cooking for family, I'll make 2 chickens at a time, that way I won't have to cook another night.  While the chickens are cooking, I'll also have stock to make rice or soup with.  Forgot about cooking dinner?  This baby can take 2 frozen rabbits from the freezer to the dinner table in less than an hour.  Its large size makes canning large batches quick work.  The only drawback I have is washing it - it is heavy, and if you don't have a big enough sink or a hose to rinse it out, then your in for a workout.  I have a double sink and it fits in nicely - a must for anyone with a large family
Very pretty and elegant-looking. I finally got iced tea spoons! No more burned, wet fingers from stirring tea with a short spoon. These have a simple, graceful design. The shiny parts are very shiny and the satin finish parts are a matte silver, a nice contrast. I've washed them in the dishwasher already and they are d/w safe as advertised
Tickled Pink!. I am thrilled with this product.  I make ALOT of homemade fries and this is now one of the best kitchen helpers I have.  Yes, you have to use smaller potatos, but, it is sure making my life easier.  I now have fries ready to drop into the deep fat fryer in 1/10th the time it used to take cutting them by hand
I loved it. I was glad to see the unit arrived without damage- (despite  poor packaging supplied by the manufacturer).  The unit works great!
Patio decor enhancer. The assembly was a bit tedious, forty (40) bolts to be tightened with a hex tool, even for a "do-it-yourself-er" like myself.But upon completion is was well worth it.  This set has definitely transformed my living space and is extremely comfortable.  Solid construction, no wobbling!As we say in Trinidad, MONEY WELL SPENT
corelle mug. excellent for storing food in the refrigerator and then heating that same food in the microwav
a must have. If you decorate cakes, you need to have a cake stand. I'm not a professional but enjoy is as a hobby. It's quite handy
Cat adores this bed!. I bought the bed for my new puppy, but the moment I put it down the cat ran into it and wouldn't come out.  He absolutely loves it and spends every day in it.  I come home and see his wide eyes peeking out from under the hood.Yes when he lies way in the back it tips backward which might be a problem for some dogs, but the fluffiness can be flattened by hand to help this to not happen.  The cat seems to enjoy it when it tips!So the cat has taken it over and now I'll have to find something else for the dog :
Norpro Butter Keeper. I really like my butter keeper.  It does exactly what it was advertised to do.
Sharp knives, takes practice. I've owned one for five years and my knives are razor sharp. It took me a little practice before I realized I was using it correctly, though. The directions could be better, and the machine doesn't provide any feedback to distinguish proper sharpening. _Cooks Illustrated_ magazine found that they could get knives sharper with this device than with the higher end models
Perfect size!  The one pan that does it all!. I just received my Le Creuset Casserole a few weeks ago and LOVE it!  I was a little 'on the fence' about the size before I bought it, but I've found that it's the perfect size.  I've used it as intended (making a casserole), but I've also been able to use it in place of my skillet.  The pan is nice and wide, and I've been able to brown 6 chicken breasts in it.  The lid is nice and heavy, with a tight fit.  I cooked and simmered a meat dish in it tonight and it made everything very tender and moist.  This is a very adaptable piece of cookware.  I think I will end up cooking most of my meals in this pan.As most Le Creuset pieces, clean up has been a breeze.  I just let it cool, soak in in a little water, and it wipes clean.  Very easy!As I said before, I am very happy I went with the 3.5 qt. size instead of the larger 5 qt.  I usually cook about 4-6 servings at a time and have found that this works great for us.  I would only suggest the 5 qt size if you are cooking for 8+ on a regular basis
Even my fat cat loves this!. I bought this after I read it was recommended by the author of "Cat vs. Cat".  I have 3 cats - a stuck-up prissy female, an obese lazy female, and a psychotic energetic male.  I love this thing!  I am so amazed and very happy that all 3 of them love this toy!  My stuck-up cat usually never plays with cat toys, only strings, pens, and straws.  My fat cat just never plays, but is obsessed with watching out the window and talking to birds.  The male, however, was born in a feral cat colony, but bottle fed by my step-sister.  He has endless energy.  Before I even got DA Bird out of its package he was excited (the other two were sleeping).  We started playing, and soon the fat one came downstairs to see what was going on.  Before long, I had my two females playing with it, having put the male in a room.The only thing you might want to consider is if you have a cat who is over possessive or wild, he/she may destroy the feathers before a normal cat would.  My male cat was so nuts over this, he actually was tiring himself out to the point of panting.  The problem is when he would actually catch Da Bird, he will not let go and growls, so the other cats don't want to play.  Really, if you think about it, wild cats (and some domestic) catch birds then take them off to eat, but as long as you don't allow them to get to aggressive with it, you should be fine.I definitely recommend this toy.  Be sure you keep this somewhere your cats can't find it when you aren't playing with them.
Nice color. This tablecloth is a little stiff, so the folds don't really come out even after it's been on the table for a few weeks. Otherwise, it feels like other vinyl tablecloths I've had. The color is light and neutral -- a warm beige with a tiny weave pattern. For the price, it's useful and nice looking. I keep these on the table where we read newspapers, so after a tablecloth gets too much printer's ink on it, I replace it
Best ironing board!. I recently got my ironing board, and I must tell you that is the best thing I ever had for ironing. It's size is adequate for ironing my shirts pant's etc. It's handy and doesnt take much space, I can place it inside my closet, and also take it with me on my trips.I really recommend this item to anyone interested in saving space while doing your job
They are small but beautiful!!. Well they do not have that marble texture but they still add alot to a room. I have not burned the candles yet because I bought this item as a display. I just love them!!!
Works as described ... This little unit works well.  I had a cat "accident" in a very cramped area in my basement that ended up causing a very nasty smell in our basement and part of our house upstairs.  We put it near the location of the "accident" and ran it on the "quick clean" mode for a few hours and then in standard mode the rest of that day and the following day.  The smell diminished substantially over that time.  Operates fairly quietly.  Only complaint is cost of filter refills (are they really worth 8 bucks?)
BREWER. PRODUCT MEETS MY REQUIREMENTSMAKES GOOD TASTING COFFEEONLY COMPLAINT: IT IS DIFFICULT TO PUT BACK THE COFFE FILTER HOLDE
Inviting Salad Set. This lovely salad set will be a great addition to any lunch or dinner setting.  The serving bowl is much larger than I anticipated -- and great for tossing space.  The individual bowls are also deep.  This is a great  set for salad lovers
Beautiful, elegant placesettings. This dinnerware looks rich and elegant. You can feel the quality in each piece when you hold it in your hands. I got white and I couldn't be happier, the enamel is bright and glossy and there are no imperfections whatsoever.My clumsy self whacked a plate against the faucet and dropped a mug in the sink but not a chip. These dishes make your meals look very appetizing and are perfect for casual or formal meals. I am excited about buying more Waechterbach pieces...maybe in different colors for some pop
great bowls. these bowls are great . my husband loves them. the shipping was on time even though i ordered the week before Christmas
Peaceful kitties. This product really works!  I have 9 cats and fighting was inevitable.  My only complaint is that the product barely lasts a month.  It's rather expensive, but I love having a peaceful home.  I have high ceilings and that may be part of why I have to replace these often.  Another multi-cat person I know says these last about 6 to 8 weeks for her.  I intend to continue using this product as along as I have a lot of cats
optima vaccuum. Very good suction and light weight Dust cup is easy to empty, but dust does cling to the filter. The extension hose is a bit short and sometimes gets disconnected from the unit. It should have a more secure lock on the hose connection
Chef's Choice 632 Food Slicer. The performance of our food slicer is exceeding our expectations. It slices items like hard salami super thin without difficulty.  It even works in making Beef Carpaccio with the standard blade.  It had been on my wish list for years but I was afraid it would be a flimsy and dangerous tool, but the design of the carriage and the stability of the machine made my initial fears go away.  The VariTilt is worth the extra price because the slices fall away from the blade instantly
Big, Soft Towels - A Great Bargain!. When these towels arrived at my home, I was surprised by how big and soft they were. Most kitchen towels I have had have been rather small and weren't very absorbent. I was pleasantly surprised when I saw how nice these towels really are.
Power! ... and decent on the allergies. This corded little vac is your answer if you're sick of cordless vacs that don't hold their power like I was. I love it for the car and stairs and corners and family room carpet. Be prepared to buy a lot of filters. The power in this thing does fill the filter quickly but I appreciate them because they help keep my allergies away. When the filter is clean it is also a little bit loud. But the noise means you're being productive (apparently the industry isn't using space age insulation and noise reduction just yet). I own two of these and am thinking of buying a third
Works with booklite. Good combination.  I keep the booklite at the computer so the adapter is nice to have, no worry about changing batteries
Marvelous Steamer ! ! !. I ordered this item when my American Tourister steamer (also made by Franzus) began leaking after more than *20 years* of faithful service both on the road and here at home.  I had been looking for several weeks since I'm pretty picky about my appliances.  This steamer has exceeded my expectations in every category.  It must have been designed by someone who actually uses the product--it is efficient, well-designed, easy to use, and very compact.  The cord is ~8 ft long, making it usable even in those rare large hotel bathrooms where the outlet is far from the shower bar.  The butterfly handle design is easier to use than other steamers on the market, affording level grip even to a jet-lagged traveller.  The handles fold well flat against the body of the steamer.  Comes with a brush head that I haven't tried yet (forgot to put it on the steamer while it was cool), and a drawstring bag for easy storage & packing.  I am **thrilled** with this steamer !!!  It's even better than the older version that I loved, obviously the company has paid attention to detail & continued to improve their product.  I was so happy to find this is made by Franzus since I already know their high-quality based on the long life on my last Franzus-made steamer. The Micro Pro also steamed clothing wrinkle-free in less time than my old model.  Great for at-home use too if you're like me and HATE to iron.  Saves your fabric while making clothes look fresh from the cleaners or the dryer.  I rate this Franzus Micro Pro Steamer a 5+++ for its compact good looks, clever features, and easy usability.  Franzus thought of everything.  If you've been shopping for a steamer--look no further !!
THE COOLING FAN. My sister recently bought 2 of these fans and I had to get 2 also because I really liked them....and of course, I like having the remote control.  The fans work great for me
We like our Dualit percolator!. Bought our Dualit percolator before I read all the negative reviews;  Have to disagree: our works perfectly, seems to be very well made; makes good strong coffee and keeps it very hot like we like it; easy to clean also.  We also purchased one for a friend as a gift and they are pleased as well
Good starter juicer. This was my first juicer and I felt it was a good buy.I do not know if this model comes in appliance white yet, but the black is attractive and it can be left out on a counter if you have all black appliances without detracting from the look of your kitchen.The juicer was easy to set up and use even without reading the manual. Very similar to food processor. It comes well packed.When running the juicer, the noise level is quieter than a dishwasher or blender. Perhaps not as quiet as a Krups ice cream maker, but certainly acceptable middle ground.It comes with a cleaning brush that works well to scrub the metal inner piece that strains the juice. I do wish it came with a smaller one to get in the spout of the juicer to clean that area. A baby bottle nipple brush will have to do. This is the only part I wash by hand. The rest can be rinsed and put through the dishwasher.If you line the pulp container with a grocery bag, clean up is easy. Just take the bag out! The pulp it makes is relatively fine and moist. You can use this in baking or add it to your compost.The juice container holds 2 cups, but it could be improved by adding measure lines to it.I bought this primarily to juice for my 3 year old daughter to help keep her palate open to produce tastes. She enjoys putting things in the chute and turning it on. Our first combo was equal parts carrot and apple.Citrus seems to get a little messier than other items, but it is still easy to clean up.I would reccommend this to a friend
turner. just what i needed to get under items close to the sides of the pa
Great Orange Juice!!!!!. I love this juicer because it is heavy enough to stay in place, and it extracts all juices. It's really easy to clean.  I had a lighter weight (cheaper) one before buying this one, and there is no comparison in any way!  Someone said it slams down and is dangerous.  Not true.  Kids help me, and I have no fear what-so-ever that it will hurt them.  It is reliable in every way.
Great set of barstools. I purchased these barstools about a year ago. They were quite simple to assemble (I'm not the best at assembling things). Once put together, they were very sturdy. The seat itself is quite comfy, although the back of the seat does not provide the support that it boasts. Overall, this is a nice set of barstools and can really add a bit of flair and style to a bar or counter
Beautiful but on the small side. They are very pretty.  I love the coloring and the high gloss.  I just was expecting them to be a bit bigger.
Just what I expected. I live in a solar electric home so I don't use an electric coffeemaker.  This is a good alternative that brews 1 good cuppa at a time without requiring a stack of filters.  The only negative is that by the time I wait the suggested 4 minute steep, my coffee has cooled considerably.  Next time I would go with an insulated caraffe
Best Mitts Yet. I just today received the pair of OXO silicone oven mitts I ordered and used them immediately for today's bread baking, which involved getting a hot crock in and out of the oven.  These mitts work marvelously.  I felt no heat through them from the 450 oven, they protect my wrists very well, and best of all they are much more flexible than the usual waffled oven mitt.  I am sold on these and am about to order them for  a number of my friends.  They will get frequent use in my kitchen
Knife sharpening is not a dull subject... After my wife complained that our kitchen knives were getting too dull to use, I set out to find a good knife sharpener for household use. I researched a bit and found several options - both manual and electric. One name that kept popping up was "Chef's Choice" and I noticed very few negative comments on their models. Having both a discount coupon and gift certificate from Bed, Bath & Beyond - I decide to make my decision there. Unfortunately, there wasn't any sales staff knowledgeable about knife sharpeners and I had to go it alone. It was there that I first noticed the Waring KS80 Professional Sharpener. With it's black and stainless finish - it was definitely more attractive than the plain white Chef's Choice - but, it was somewhat more expensive retailing at $100. I settled for the Chef's Choice 110, took it home and was promptly disappointed. On the expensive chef's knife I first tried it on, it left a decidedly sharp but ragged edge on the blade. It looked as though I had tried to sharpen the knife on the sidewalk! I didn't dare try sharpening any other knives and risk leaving such an ugly edge on them. Bed, Bath & Beyond gladly made an exchange for the Waring and I was much more pleased with it's final results - a sharp blade with a more visually-pleasing edge. It even cleaned up the rough edge left by the Chef's Choice. The only disadvantage I have found is that, with most knives, the inch or so of blade nearest the handle cannot be sharpened since the hilt of the knife keeps it from being placed into the sharpener's slots. This, however, is not a major drawback since this area of the blade is not frequently encountered in most uses. The Chef's Choice will cover the entire blade length - but with a very rough finish. I recommend the Waring over the Chef's Choice without reservation - but the Waring is probably a bit too expensive for an appliance that will likely see only a very few uses a year.
SPODE FOR CHRISTMAS. THIS IS A LOVLEY PIECEMY SISTER LOVED ITSHE HAS A COLLECTION OF SPODE AND WANTED THIS PIECEAND I FOUND I
Never going back. My husband won't enjoy his morning coffee from any other maker.  We love Chemex
Kitchen Aid stands behind what they sell. I ordered my first mixer... it was shiney, and I was excited to use it. The first time I used the mixer it FELL APART!!!  Literally, the screws fell out of the bottom and the head of the mixer fell forward in the mixing bowl!!! I was sick about it, and called the Kitchen Aid number that is right on the mixer.  I told them what happened... they sent me out a new mixer immediately!  They even paid for the pick up of the broken mixer.  Although, I was upset... they really did stand behind their mixer and were VERY nice about. Now... I LOVE THIS MIXER.
801 mugs any color. Several resturants in our area use these mugs because of their strength and certainly their varied colors that make any table setting look good. I personally love the handle design. It fits my hand and I just love the unique design of it
Great Product. This product is exactly what i thought it would be. Ive been looking for a wheeled hamper for a long time now so i was very happy to find this.
Sheets are great!. I read all the reviews to these sheets AFTER I purchased the sheets and so was extremely skeptical when I received the sheets.  The sheets ARE heavy.  VERY heavy.  I didn't notice a funny smell as other reviewers noted.  BUT - I DID throw them immediately in the washer.  I washed them 5 times.  And then I was disappointed that the sheets were so 'crinkly'.  I put them up.  A few weeks ago, I needed another pair of sheets in a pinch and so put them on the bed.  These sheets are SO smooth.  I really like them.  I have other sets that are 300-800 thread count and I really like this set the best.  They do not hug my body and I don't get tangled in them when I turn around in the bed.  I was skeptical when I received the set but have totally changed my mind
Breakfast of champions. I like cooking breakfast.  My family likes eating breakfast.This griddle is perfect for cooking up a bunch of eggs, pancakes, sausages, croissants (fried with butter, yum) for a large number of people.Breakfast made easy, no more trying to weasel 3 or 4 pancakes into a frying pan.  This thing will handle 8 pancakes at a time, no worries.  And clean up is a breeze.Just don't scratch it.
Useful Tool for Bakers. This is a well made product that makes life much easier for bakers. It is perfect for chopping bulk chocolate and minimizes the time it would take if you were chopping chocolate with a knife. It is very sturdy and well-built
replacement. Our old Melitta broke one day; we use it to make tea each morning. We tried three stores in our area and could not find another one similiar to the one that broke. Amazon.com had the exact set. The Melitta coffee pots are good products at a very reasonable price, and of course, are quite versatile
Dry Clean Only!. Seems nice but I wish I had known it was to be dry cleaned only :( That will be difficult with a new baby and pets
Just what I was looking for. I was looking for a tool to process the exotic fruit I grow, and Amazon had the largest selection
Fabulous for the price!. These sheets are the best deal I've seen on deep pocket sheets.  It's so hard to find sheets to fit our bed.  They are a great deal
Excellent!. This is an excellent boiler, with all the features anyone familiar with the concept will expect. Dependable, remarkably efficient and convenient. Highest reccommendation
Whirley-Pop Stovetop Popcorn Popper. This is a great popcorn popper.  Not only is the popcorn the best but cleanup is a snap.  Will never go back to microwave popcorn
Held up to some serious hi-test urine!. Thanks to an obscure medical condition, our son's urine is highly acidic. Remember "Alien"? Remember the alien's acid blood that dissolved steel floors? That's what we're talking about.Our last waterproof pad (and who are they kidding when they say "waterproof," as if you're worried about water!) lasted one night, after which our son's pee sizzled right through, ruining another mattress.Thanks to it's Kevlar-Romex weave and carbon-nanotube construction, the Simmons pad was able to stop the urine better than any ordinary "water"proof pad. Highly recommended.(Seriously, it's a mattress pad with a plastic lining. It works -- it stops the pee from soaking through. What more do you really want? :
I want to buy this item but..................... I haven't noticed any complaints about the way the carafe on the coffee pot pours?  I have the XP2010 and you have to pour it sooooooooo slow or else you'll have a huge mess!!!!  I've contacted the company and they say that they cannot help me with this prob, and my only solution is to return the machine since it's within 90 days of my purchase.Help, I can use some feedback on this subject
Great Gift for a Rachael Ray Fan. My wife loves Rachael Ray and was very excited to receive this cutting board set as a Christmas gift
Great Glasses. We live in Mexico and therefore drink tequila quite often.  Most Mexicans will tell you that the only way to drink tequila is in a "caballito" or shot glass, but these glasses make a big difference, especially when drinking aejos or reposados.  They are tall enough that you can get a good whiff without too much  interference from the alcohol fumes.  The sweet vanilla oak notes of the aejos are especially enhanced by these glasses, but even the grassy, vegetal blancos are more lively than when tasted in a standard shot glass.  My wife, whose hands are much smaller than mine, agreed that the glasses are very well balanced and comfortable to hold.  A great way to "degustar" a very noble spirit
It pops popcorn... Maybe one or two kernels end up on the floor. Perhaps others were overloading it. Healthy alternative to greasy potato chips
nice coffee maker. this maker pours well and has a soft handle.  we actually found one at a department store so we were able to see it in person before ordering it online.  nice little coffee make
Mission Folding Bookcase. This bookcase was fast and easy to set up, and it fits perfectly in the small space I have for it.   The one thing I would change would be to put more slats across the back of it to prevent small items from falling off the back edges of the shelves.   But that's not a problem if you actually put BOOKS on this bookcase.
Soft and thick. These sheets are an exceptional value.  They are very thick and extremely soft.  The color was even nicer than pictured
A must have for any kitchen!. This is a fantastic shaker mixer that is designed well and is ergonomically shaped to fit your hand.  This mixer thoroughly blasts any chunks and "powder pellets" to shreads!  The lid fits very tightly, and seals well.  I have several Tupperware products and have never had any problems with exchanging with a local representative the pieces/lids/snap-on's that were defective or didn't fit quite right.RECOMMENDE
Beautiful and functional. I love this teapot.  The colors are beautiful. They are bright and vibrant.  It is also a completely funcitonal teapot. Not just a pretty shelf peice.  It pours well.  Alot of teapots (even well made ones) "dribble" when you pour the tea.  This tea pot does not "dribble," which makes it one my favorite teapots.
This is the only way to drink tequila . . . . . . this glass and, of course, a good tequila. As a resident of Mexico for four years and a tequila obsessive, I have tasted over 70 different tequilas ranging from $5 to $175 per bottle. Riedel's is the only glass that has allowed me fully to smell, taste, and enjoy tequila, and the only glass recognized by the consejo regulador de tequila, Mexico's FDA of the tequila industry. In my quest to enjoy the best tequilas at the lowest prices, I have purchased cheaper wine flutes and just about every other glass that I have been able to find that resembles the Riedel shape; all, however, has been to no avail: This glass's singular construction is unmatched for tequila. Unfortunately, these glasses are not created equal: I have owned 16 of these glasses, and, from time to time, I come across a poorly finished glass--an unsightly stem seam, a rough lip. Moreover, this glass confounds all attempts at describing the color of tequila. Finally, these glasses are not cheap, nor are they very strong--my two-year-old son and I have managed to break twelve already. Nevertheless, this is, at least for the moment, the only way to drink tequila.For those in search of the perfect tequila, I would like to share some recommendations after having spent thousands of dollars in my own search.But before I begin, I wish to urge all tequila drinkers to give serious consideration to boycotting Cuervo and Sauza. These U.S.-owned megacompanies have bought up a huge amount of the agave in Mexico and have consequently had an inordinate influence on the production and price of agave, with Cuervo being especially destructive. Competition has become very difficult for other, less financially powerful producers, who have been going out of business/selling off. Depressing to me was Cuervo's recent acquisition of Don Julio, whose 1942 is among my favorite tequilas. Before you buy from these behemoths, consider what they have done to the Mexican farmers, smaller tequila producers, and the ever-rising price of tequila.Now, on with a few recommendations. Keep in mind that price has been an object for me, and that I have done most of my tasting in Mexico, so I have not been able to try some of the very expensive tequilas or tequilas that are export only. Also, note that I have not included tequilas that are impossible to find in the U.S. In no particular order, then, my recommendations are:1. Azulejos anejo ($90 per bottle? Difficult to find, but worth searching out, this tequila is among the most flavorful and best-balanced (i.e., between agave and oak) anejos that I have tried.2. Don Julio 1942 anejo ($100 per bottle. Okay, it's owned by Cuervo now, it's a bit overpriced, and its flavor strays from agave, but the exceptional complexity is mind-blowing).3. El tesoro de Don Felipe anejo (At $36-40, a strikingly pure- and full-flavored anejo, this tequila is more readily available in the U.S. than in Mexico).4. Chinaco reposado (At around $40 per bottle, a solid, pure tequila, and arguably better than the over-the-top oaky anejo; this tequila has an artesanal flavor).5. Casa Noble reposado (I was able to buy this for around $40-$50 in Mexico until, like an increasing number of tequilas, it  apparently became available only as an export and no longer in Mexico; this tequila sells for around $60 in the U.S. This tequila probably has the best nose of any I've sniffed; unfortunately, however, this tequila has one of those house flavors that permeates every tequila that its fabrica, La Cofradia, makes, and that not everyone will necessarily like).6. Corazon anejo (apparently export-only, selling in the U.S. for anywhere from $47-60. This is one of the better middle-priced tequilas, notable for its balanced and complex flavor, which edges out Don Felipe's).N.B. Perfidio is back in production. I bought a bottle for about $120 in Mexico. Some call this the best tequila ever made, but I found it so carmelized that, as delicious as it was, it ceased seeming to be a tequila. It is, however, worth trying.Enjoy
easy weighing. This is an excellent set of scales. The display is very good, easy to read both in lbs and kg. The tray is a good size and can hold reasonable quantities. It fits snuggly onto the support. The stainless steel finish is easy to keep clean. The scales look very professional on the counter.
it's ingenious as a humidifer. It's of course bogus to point out the German social system as reason for the price. A free market is characterized by supply and demand setting the price. I asssume there is a free market in the U.S.?. What you effectively pay for in this humdifier is the idea and patent, not the material. It's the same why an Armani suite costs 2000$ and why Microsoft Office costs more than the CD it is burned on.I have this humidifier now for a year. I am an allergy sufferer and dry air makes it worse. I live in CA.  Thye humidifier extends on the principle of what my Mom always recommended: Put a bowl with water in your room. Since it does not heat the air you don't have problems with overheated air that then condenses on windows etc. The dryer the air the more it will pick up the humidity. It's kind of self regulating.It does the job for me. I measure it and I get usually a jump from 45% to 55% of humidity in my room. I personally think cleaning is very easy. You have to use their cleaner, I do it every 8 weeks or so. It's true there will be mineral deposits on the air cleaner. I wipe them away every 2.5 months. It's not a problem as you can dissassemble this thing completely.I think this is the best humdifier out there. It avoids all the problems of heated humdifiers and it's self regulation is ingenious. I don't believe it does a good job of cleaning the air however. That's why I have Friedrich B as well. BTW speaking of which it costs 500$ and is a set of metal plates with a fan made in the U.S
lello 2200 pasta maker. Love it!  Simple...easy...makes great pasta...fun!  No problems with it...sturdy and heavy duty...highly recommend it
Great quality item. For the price, you can't beat the quality and size of this dish.  I'd like several more
Excellent and Elegant. I am usually wary of things coming in fancy boxes but these knives have turned out to be fantastic. I purchased them (without my wife knowing) for a special dinner I had for a couple friends. My wife didn't notice them until she sank the knife into her perfectly grilled rib eye. The knife went through it like butter. My guests were also impressed. This helped to temper the scolding I got after they left for going over my kitchen gadget allowance. As soon as they go on sale again in my gold box (which now seems to filled with too much jewelry) I'll purchase another 2 sets immediately
Wallace Venetian good buy. I received the flatware and was very pleased.  It has a nice weight and is shiny.  Great for everyday use or special occasions.  I just wish it had come with the long teaspoons
great little food processor. My husband got me this mini prep processor for Christmas and I love it.  It is great for making fine cracker crumbs and stuff for breading.  It is quick and easy to clean up and best of all it isn't bulky or too heavy.  It is great for everyday use and saves me a lot of time
Floor cleaning. The Bissell Flip-It saves me a lot of time cleaning floors and does a more thorough job than a mop
Great product for the price. My son just loves this.  It is well made, the material is soft, and the price was great
Duck with cherries, rabbit with kasha anyone?. In addition to all the beautiful words said about Le Creuset I want to add several things that I haven't seen anywhere else.        First, the oval shape in a pot this size is preferable because it's easier to lift (you hold the pot closer to your body). Also it fits better in the oven. A 5 pound duck fits perfectly in 9 1/2 quarter oval pot with just enough room left to place some cherries or oranges around.         Second, Le Creuset became some sort of a cult (I saw a couple of large french ovens on Emeril's show the other day.) and if you are into French, Cajun or just any rich cooking you just have to have at least one.         Third, the price seems to be high, but then I saw some fifty year old Le Creuset ovens being sold at the auction for at list 25% of what they would cost new now. Think of it as an investment.         Forth, about the colors. I was disappointed in the beginning to find out that they only sell this size in white or French blue. But when I received my blue oval oven I loved the color. The picture in the catalog doesn't do it justice. This large pot in red (my initial choice) would have looked like a fire truck. I since added a couple more blue pieces and for those who are interested in starting their tableware collection, this color coordinates beautifully with the Denby Reflex pattern
perfect for a short trip. I purchased this in advance of a quick three day trip. We live in the middle of nowhere and I cannot expect someone to come over and feed our cat twice a day.Sasha is a little piggy, and we cannot leave food in any quantity or she will eat until she vomits.Started using it at last nights dinner hour and she was not afraid of it at all. Ate like her normal "gulp it down in a minute". It opened this morning just fine. At one point today I found her sleeping next to it!The only draw back is the timer, you need to set it so it does its thing at the correct interval from the time you set it, and that the first feeding is right there. Cannot have it all at that price. A good item at a reasonable price
Very useful in a house that lacks storage space. I use this item as additional pantry space.  The kitchen in my new apartment is small, and didn't have enough space to store everything.  I hung this storage rack over the back of a closet door, and use it for boxes of dry goods and some canned foods as well.  It holds quite a bit for its size, and is very sturdy.  My one caution:  if you're going to hang this over the door, use the included screws and clips to mount it to the door.  If you don't, when you open/close the door, it rattles around a lot.
Beautiful!. The picture on the website really doesn't do them any justice.  They are beautiful and tough, and I'm so glad I got them
Great - Fast and Simple. No problems whatsoever - arrived as expected in less than expected time.  Thanks
Great product!. This is simply a great timer... very easy to use and you don't have to push a key repeatedly to reach a number to count down from because you enter it directly.  All timers should be this easy
pretty good. They're pillowcases.  They hold my pillows well.  Good fabric and stitching.  Comfortable
Nice product. The three bowls are nice, but on the heavy side due to the fact that they are stoneware. I failed to read that part and thought they would be lighter in weight. They are just as described and will be a nice little gift for my cousin who has a black and white kitchen
A cool splurge. These are just nice. Nice quality, great design, decent price. They are easy to clean, easy to use, easy to hang - easy to like. Get them along with a set of the Michael Graves cups, and while your cooking may still suck, you'll at least be doing it in style
Great Performace. The wireless fence worked great for our mixed bread lab.  She understood where the boundary was within 2 days.  The idea that the collar gives an auditory signal before shocking helped her to figure out her territory without getting "zapped".  It allowed us to have the peace of mind that she will stay in our un-fenced yard and will not run to the road.
Awesome!!. How can you not love 800 thread count?  I love the sheets and the price was too good not to pass up.  I highly recommend this product
great little machine. Compact, quiet, great suction, and suction control options. Simple to use. The telescopic wand is great, as are the 360 degree turning wheels. The two different temporary housing slots for the wand make stopping and starting during the vacuuming session easy. The design of the Miele in terms of maintenance is simple and effective.The only cons I can see are that the tool storage on the wand sometimes gets in the way when you want to vacuum under furniture; you need to take it off. Also, the on/off switch is not always very responsive
EASY DOES IT. The Loren set was assembled (except for the table) and securely packed. Good workmanship. I recommend the set
Absolutely great. I have a number of booklites, different vendors, different styles, some AC adapter, some straight battery, cheap to higher prices, and this one is the best, the brightest, the one I will most often use.  It is connected to adapter and kept near computerat all times.  I am careful with such items, don't expect any problems, most booklites are not meant to be manhandled
Versatile and good additional piece. The 3 quart saucepan is a great piece.  The lid has perforated holes to allow either steam to excape, or when cooking pasta, the elimination of using a colander.  The lip is a nice touch and much appreciated in a larger saucepan, whose use extends beyond reduction sauces, gravies, and hot beverages.  Good to boil potatos and pasta. Probably deep enough to use as a double boiler for a small amount of melting, but have not tried yet. Coated to withstand metal utensils, but it is safer to use silicone.  Easy clean up, but you must buy a hard anodized cookware cleaner or expect stains.  Nice versatile sized item
GREAT COLOR. This food coloring was the best I have ever used.  It is very concentrated. I obtained several different shades of purple by adding just a tiny bit each time.  I did not notice a flavor at all so I look forward to trying the black.  The bottle sizes are very similar to a bottle of finger nail polish
Better than advertised!. I love my cat but detested the cat box.  After reading the reviews I bought this and it is the best buy of the year!  No smell, my cat took to it right a way, After I ordered, I bought a box of the crystal litter and put it on top of her litter.  By the time this box came in she was ready!  No smell, and it last over the suggested 30 days.  Almost makes me want to get another cat
My Kids Love the Mickey Wafflemaker!. We went on a Disney cruise recently and my children had Mickey waffles almost every day for breakfast.  I checked online to see if they had the same wafflemaker, but this one was just as good.  My children love having Mickey Mouse waffles.  I make them at least once a week.  It's easy to use, easy to clean and the waffles are ready in about 90-120 seconds.  They also give you some recipes for specialty waffles.  I would recommend this wafflemaker to anyone who enjoys Mickey!
Excellent product. I have been using Airbake pizza pans for at least ten years, if not longer.  My original ones are still in great condition.  I spray the pan with no-stick spray before putting the pizza on the pan.  The fact that cheese can get stuck in the holes is indeed a drawback, but the fact that you get a nicely browned crispy crust more than outweighs the inconvenience.  I make my own pizza dough, and bake the pizza at 425.  (Maybe it doesn't brown as nicely at a lower temperature?)I scrub the pan with a plastic mesh scrubber and dish detergent, and let the suds sit on the pan for a while if something is sticking to it.  A round wooden toothpick neatly removes any cheese caught in the holes.I agree that a Teflon coated pan would be quickly marred by the pizza wheel, since my metal pans are scored from years of use.  The marks from the pizza wheel do not impact the performance of the metal pan, but I would think that they would cause food to stick to the teflon pan
Eliminate mess and odor!. Wow I am very impressed with this product! I have 3 indoor-only cats. When I first saw this product in the pet store I thought this thing would fill up too quickly, but I have owned it for a month now and only needed to empty it once. I also assumed I'd have to replace the bag roll each time it was emptied, but that was not the case - the original bag roll still has plenty left!I used to flush the litter waste but there were always kitty litter grits sticking to the toilet bowl or seat and falling on the floor. Also our toilet backed up once when I tried to put too many litter clumps in it - eww! But the alternative - smelly trash - was just not an attractive option. So I decided to give the Litter Locker Plus a try and very glad I did!I wonder if the previous reviewer who complained about it filling up fast had an earrlier smaller version, because my 3 cats produce a normal amount of waste which I scoop 2-3 times a day and it didn't fill up until 2 weeks passed
Excellent Towels for the Price. These towels are an excellent bargain. They are just the right size for wrapping my hair in and still big enough to dry off with.
Very pleased with purchase. Mikasa's dishes blend well with my Paltzgraf "Gazebo" collection, extending my adventure in white dishes into the second 20 years of our marriage. These are great for blending with other tableware and lend themselves to formal or casual dinners. We've used them in the warming oven and microwave...kids LOVE the size of the bowls for cereal and icecream but we've had to school them on portion size in 13 oz. bowls.I ordered three sets and had to ask Amazon to send another to replace dishes broken in transit. Each of the three sets had broken dinner or salad plates. We were able to replace all with the fourth shipment. The exchange was very easy
may deserve 5 stars... solid, well made, cool looking and I think works well.  wife doesn't like it because only a small amount of pepper per pump, which is true but I don't think someone would expect large amounts "per pump" from this... certainly good enough for peppering a meal versus cooking.  I'm going to buy the salt mill to go with it.  four stars because of my wife's opinion and it is a bit pricey...otherwise I'd give it five
Awesume confetti color!. My daugter moved into her 5 bedroom home recently, and loves her small powder room downstairs right off the living room. She decided to go "Bold" with black and white stripes wallpaper and a bright pink flowers border at the top. I searched and searched for the right color of "bright pink"...finally found these confetti pink towels. I was not disappointed when they arrived, more important ...neither was she!!!Awesume color and great quality. Thanks for such a product
Great for &quot;ON THE GO&quot;. I just received my Zojirushi Duel Coffeemaker and it lives up to my expectation.  It distributes coffee evenly into both cups and the cups are great for home or travel. I was very surprised at the great cup of coffee this machine makes. I would purchase again.  GREAT LITTLE COFFEE MAKER!!
Sheet review. I bought this as a gift.  I was told that the 800 count label was applied on the package over a 250 count label.  The sheets feel like a higher grade than 250 but it makes one wonder.  We also recieved king size rather than queen.  We may have considered exchanging them but the recipient is out of country.
Good but not Wonderful. I hate giving a less than perfect review, but I have found this product to be a bit disappointing.  Maybe it is me that is not doing something right, but even after spraying it with Pam, I can't seem to get the cakes I make in it out without them falling apart in some way.  Cleaning it is also more difficult than your more traditional baking pans.However, my daughter loves it, and we will continue to use it until we figure out what works
GREATEST THING  SINCE TUNAFISH. MY SON IS A CHEF AND RECOMMENDED THIS ITEM. BEING AN OBEDIENT MOTHER, I PURCHASED IT.  IT WAS FABULOUS. IT CUTS AS FAST AS HE DOES, AND JUST AS EVENLY SLICED.  I RECOMMEND IT TO EVERYONE WHO WANTS TO MAKE A GREAT PRESENTATION!  P.S. AS USUAL, MY CHEFY WAS RIGHT ON
fabulous sheets. Fabulous sheets.  Great price and the quality is excellent.  Purchased them for my granddaughters.  They love the color
A little beauty. What a lovely pan.  Heavy without needing daily gym visits to manage lifting and a great non-stick surface.  Just about the right size for 1 or 2 people, if I found the 12" for the same price, I'd buy one of those for bigger jobs
Wonderful and Waterproof. This is a wonderful mitt! By being waterproof, it maintains insulation even when I accidentally stick my thumb into some of my hot cooking.I purchased mitts for others in my family
great hand-held sharpner. For a relatively inexpensive sharpner this does a super job, and the scissor sharpner is a welcome extra
A big funnel and worth the cost. This funnel is bigger than I expected and for the cost it should have been. It is very nicely made with a very wide mouth and hefty material. It will hold a lot of liquid if you pour too fast but is very well balanced and has not yet tipped on me like other funnels do this is probably due to it's significant weight.
Purchased as a Xmas gift. Extremely satisfied with this purchase.  Even though it was purchased as a late Xmas gift (was ordered on 12/21) and was told it would arrive on or after the 3rd week in January, it arrived on 12/27.  Not a bad deal when your order ships for free. Would recommend this product and site to all my friends and co-workers
Functional opener and helps to avoid splitting a cork. I found the Pedrini double lever opener to be a good buy. There are many others which look similar, but look closer. The Pedrini has a true wound-metal screw while many others only give you a die-cast screw. The difference is important as the die-cast style has a thick solid center to the screw, so it must displace more cork while turning thus increasing the effort and the risk of cork splitting. The diecast screw is also not nearly as strong as the wound-metal and can crack and break; it is also heavier. It is a good value, a good manufacturer and a good choice
Great piece, I love it. I wanted a small table to put in my guest room to put the tv on.  When I saw this piece on the website I thought that it would go good with the cherry bed that I had in there.  My son uses the guest room as his game room for his PS2 and Gamecube, etc.  We put all of the game stuff in the doors so that when guests are in there they cannot see all of his game stuff and it does not look cluttered. &#60;br /&#62;When my husband got the piece put together (which he had no problems like some of the other reviewers stated) I was so impressed by how great it looked in the room with the bed.  It matches perfect!  I am really pleased with it and would recommend it to anyone that does not have a lot of space for big pieces.  The only thing I did not like was that it had a couple of little tiny knicks in the wood but my husband touched that up with some stain that we had that was the same color.  Overall, very pleased and would buy night stands if they had them
sturdy basics. if you're like me, and suddenly need glassware, this is a great choice.let's say i got a little sauced at a bar with friends, was feeling a bit grand, and decided to invite twelve growling, tattooed, punk hooligans who'd never touched a decent stem over to my house for a somewhat formal dinner. obviously a problematic situation.would i want something that wouldn't send me into a fit once someone decided to hurl one on the floor as an proclamation? absolutely. would i want to make sure that my smelly, ill-mannered punker friends had a good glass of wine in their calloused paws, and are treated as royalty at least once in their lives? without a doubt.this is a good, hearty line of glasses for those with both price and quality in mind. rock on
Over-the-Sink Board. The metal-plastic coated rods at the ends of the board slide very easily inward and outward thereby subjecting the board to fall into the sink.The board received had an elongated crack!  Not worth my time and money to return.I've learned a lesson!!
Gimme a break. ... I received this set and it's gorgeous, and in the colors stated in the description. Perhaps the other customer should have called Amazon and let them know that they received the wrong dish set. Mystic is only offered in this color palette
Great Machine, Great Price. I read mixed reviews on the XP4050 on the web, with some folks tagging it as unreliable or noisy, or in several cases DOA. I decided to take a chance because my past experience with a Krups espresso machine was excellent.I've had the XP4050 for over a month now and it has performed flawlessly since day one.  The coffee is terrific, the frothing attachment works well (I removed the attachment from my last machine and used the metal wand only), and it works beautifully with my favorite brand of ground coffee--far better than my old machine.I would have given the XP4050 five stars, except for the wait between pushing a button and achieving results.  For instance, if you brew your espresso and press the steam button you have to wait some time before the machine is ready to roll.  I suspect this is no different than what might be expected from any machine in this class, but it is irritating in the wee hours when I am impatiently awaiting my first jolt of the day.So far, the XP4050 is a great machine and I am a satisfied customer
Flip it is awesome!. As a military spouse, we move, and have different types of floors that need cleaning.  I have hard floors pretty much througout every room in my home, and also in our previous home abroad.  The Vaccum side does not work well at all, but I prefer to do a good sweeping first no matter how I mop.  In comparison to sponge and rag mops, this leaves the floor pretty dry, and the suction is great.  As long as you empty the tank and keep it clean, and use just a minimal amount of cleaner in the clean tank, it works wonderfully.  It's about half the work then regular mops and cleans twice as good as regular mops and swiffers, that generally just push dirt around.  I believe it's worth the $$.  I've had mine for two years now
Contour Pillows. An excellent value! I have been looking out for this type of pillow and was so pleased to see the Amazon ad.Quite comfortable -- I have neck problems with arthritis and pinched nerves and this pillow definitely provides relief
at long last!. i dont have a lot of extra money so i couldnt justify buying this while i had a handmixer that worked.needless to say, last saturday, my hand mixer finally beat the dust... meanwhile i did a little happy dance......and bought this.i do a lot of cookies. that's my specialty.the only gripe i had is maybe the bowl could be bigger so i could do my triple batches, but whatever. i cant afford a more expensive one just so it would have a bigger bowl.i got to use it for the first time tonight on my oatmeal raisin. yeah a little noise, but not unexpected or scary. there was a little movement too, but again not unexpected considering how thick the mixture is.i had to lift it every once in awhile to make sure that all the mixture was getting beat in but didnt really need to- everything got mixed very thoroughly; much easier than having to stand there with the hand mixer and fight with it.i havent messed with the dough hook simply because i use a breadmaker for that, and i havent used the whip because i really never have needed that either.i am looking forward to getting some of the attachments, especially the ice cream one and the meat grinder. we try to eat as "natural" as possible, and i am looking forward to doing ground chicken and other things.i know its not an investment to enter into lightly, but its well worth the money because i know this will last me into my middle age.i love the heft of this machine also. i am one that buys the most durable things i can; i have a sewing machine that was made in switzerland, and i can tell this is the same type of construction- all metal.
powerful little electric broom. i own an oreck vacuum for the rugs in the kids room, but 75% of my house (approx 1500 sq. feet) is sealed hardwood oak floors. i have two dogs, a rottweiler and a jack russell terrier, who shed quite a lot year round. the oreck is very good for the carpeted areas, but the beater bar feature just sort of blows the dirt and hair around the wood floors and is clumsy in the corners. after reading the reviews i decided to try the euro-pro shark. the price was great with free shipping.  it's very small and lighthweight which is a plus, and stores easily in my broom closet. it has a lot of suction power on the wood floors, and picks up all the dog hair easily, even in the corners and under the radiater registers. i've tried other electric brooms, but they didn't have anywhere near the suction of the shark and are made much more cheaply, the last one i had actually snapped in half. if you're looking for a heavy duty vacuum for carpets, this is not the one, but if you want a powerful little electric broom for hard floor surfaces i would highly reccomend this one
Better than other sticker/adhesive removers. Un-Du is a much better product than the other similar type adhesive removers (Goo-Gone, Goof Off, etc.) because it is safe for plastic.  Those other products will dull or dissolve plastic, such as the plastic used to make CD jewel cases.  Un-du does the job without causing damage.  I suspect that like me, the surface that often needs adhesive removed is plastic, so this is the only product to have
Rowenta Steamer. This machine is amazing. I've been wanting a professional grade steamer for a very long time. It is simple to assemble and use. I had to wait for it for a couple of months but it was worth it
It's the right size. I was looking for a smaller electric skillet. This one fits the bill.  Easy to clean.  I use it weekly to cook all kinds of things from eggs to chicken to fish.  Great for small meals
Great for grinding pepper. I liked it a lot better than I thought I would. The plastic feels nice and smooth and it grinds well. It doesn't have a cheap plastic gonna-break-soon feel, after all, it's made in Germany not China. I like that it stands upright and has a cap unlike a lot of other grinders that would leave peppper on the table.
Great everyday wine glass. This glass is not really ideal for any wine, but it's a great everyday glass for everyday use, and it's an excellent tasting glass.  While you'll want to pull out your special, grape-specific glasses for those special bottles, this glass is excellent for getting the most out of everyday wines with a minimum of fuss.  They fit in the top rack of most dishwashers and are very durable.  (I've used them for the past 5 years.) Plus, when you are drinking that special bottle from your special glasses, it makes a very nice water glass
Comfy neck pillow. I overheard a flight attendant raving about the Neckbones and also saw it reviewed highly in Shape magazine.  I still have not tried it in the car or on a flight, but am excited to.  It does feel comfortable, though is bigger than expected, so pay attention to the dimensions before you buy
making the bags work. When you have problems with the bags puncturing or with liquids leaking, try using paper towels or wax paper to wrap the food items in. Wax paper seems to work best for the leaky liquid and paper towels seem to work best for food items that puncture the bags
Life-saver. This shower filter is awesome!  I just moved into my apartment and have always had soft water prior to this.  The filter really helped with my hair (It was getting dry and brittle) and my skin isn't as dry and ashy.  I just wish they would give an estimate for the life of the filter for a single person.  I have no idea how long the filter will last...guess I'll just wait till my hair starts to get dry again? :
Great pizzelle maker. I have had another pizzelle maker for 20 years. The PREGO is so much better. It's easy to use. Clean up is fast. The pizzelles are thin and crispy. I would highly suggest buying it
Holmes #HFH105 1500Watt Portable Heater. The product works as well as I expected it to, but it is a little louder than I had expected
Cool little blender. I use this blender to make protein shakes every day, and it handles blending frozen fruit very easily, and best of all takes up very little counterspace.  Highly recommended, especially for apartment dwellers.
Still Going Strong!. I got a Good Chef pizza stone as a wedding gift about 3 and a half years ago.  I was still a novice pizza chef, so it took me a while to get accustomed to the art of pizza crust.  The better my crust and technique got, the more I appreciated my pizza stone.Crust is crispy and the texture is fantastic, even with heavy, moist toppings (one of my favorites is a variety of cooked wild mushrooms, thyme, a little fontina, and some prosciutto).  I am committed to healthy cooking, so not having to use oil to prevent sticking is a plus.  I just scatter a bit of coarse-ground cornmeal onto the preheated stone and it comes up easily.Of course pre-heating the stone (at a high temperature) is the only way to acheive desired results.  And the more the stone is used the more non-stick it becomes.  We treat it the way we'd treat cast-iron.Having a pizza stone is a great way to get brick-oven-style crust at home (and homemade is almost always healthier)
Good Product. I like the depth of this container.  I use it more for storage than as a marinator because of its depth.  This is excellent for keeping berries fresh.  I have no use for the grater; I prefer the food processor and standing graters.  The canister is a clear plastic, which looks much better than the smoke-colored ones.As a marinator, it produced very flavorful chicken, but I'm not sure if it was more flavorful than traditionally marinated.I am giving this four stars instead of five because the canister is top-rack dishwasher safe, but the lids are not
Knives are great, block should be redesigned. This set was a replacement for a $30 set I owned. The knives are a huge improvement, sharp, no flexing when cutting through hard items, and the set includes all the knives an amateur cook will use.However, the wood block is a different story. The holes go completely through the wood block and the steak knives are too long so that the tips (of the bottom row) extend past the block. This means they scratch the owner's counter and possibly dull the knife tips. As a solution I store half the steak knives in a drawer, not ideal, but I never heard a response from an email sent to Henckels website.If the block was redesigned it would be a five star product
Krups FBC512 in white. This toaster oven works well.  It has various presets for pizza and bagelsthat makes it very easy to use. For bagels it toasts the top and warmsthe bottom so they really come out nice.It cooks pizza a lot faster than the oven with no preheat time.Toast always seems to come out just right.  The toast setting defaultsto level 4 but needs a setting of 6-7 which is easy to change.When the time is up a fairly loud beeper sounds and the oven shuts off.This is really great esp. for kids since they tend to getdistracted and leave stuff in the oven for too long.I think the white color is much more attractive than the black and it alsomatches all the appliances in our kitchen
Great item. Love my butter bell.. Visited a friend of mine this summer and she is a butter lover and English so she had one of these and suggested that I get one to keep butter spreadable.  Works Great.  Suppose to keep it fresh for month without refrigeration.
This stuff works great!. We have a cat boarding business & have the occasional 'guest' that has accidents.  We take pride in hosting a clean environment and insist that our facility smells pleasant at all times.  This product works great on urine / vomit.  You MUST use this product initially as your only means of cleaning soiled area.  If you introduce other products it will not work.  AFTER all the scent is gone with this product, THEN you can use bleach / other means of disinfecting.  Worth the money!  Make certain to get the JUST FOR CATS product if that's what you need.  Otherwise the GENERAL use Nature's Miracle works great for dogs messes (We house trained a puppy 2 years ago!
If I could only own one pot/pan.... I love this pot/pan/dutch oven. It can do everything! Bakes fantastic crusty bread...sautees vegetables for a cassarole and then goes into the oven to bake, almost a one pot meal! The enamel has such a pleasing feel to it. It cleans easily, even baked on food. It is so versatile. It has inspired my cooking...I am so excited for a host of winter stews etc. In short, a sturdy (and heavy), versatile, aesthetically pleasing cooking vessel. Plus, you don't have to worry about all those non-stick surfaces poisoning you or what have you
Works as advertised. Works good and has a long loud ring if you turn it to 60 and then back to the time you want
Elegant dinnerware. This item was more than I expected. I received all the pieces that was advertised. The color of the plates were not a red that i expected, but more of a burnt orange color
Really Sharp. This knife is the lightest and sharpest chef's knife I have ever used.  I've been showing off to everyone in my restaurant just how sharp it is.  I can dice half a potato into "graph paper" and it looks uncut, until you touch it.  When I first got the knife it felt dull to the touch, be careful, it's not
Awesome Dehumidifier. I bought the unit to control the humidity problems we were having in our home.  The musty smell in the room is gone now.  All we need to do is empty the water that collects every once in while.
Versatile!. Why worry about where you are going to store that china to be used only on special occassions?  While this simple but elegant pattern can be used on special occassions and holidays, it is durable enough to be used on a daily basis
Very Good Product. I gave these as a gift to my mother for Christmas. She could not have thanked me enough. A very good product for the price
I love these pans!. I did some research on pans because I wanted some for Christmas to replace the old ones.  I have a 10 inch skillet, 4.5 quart sauce and 5 quart oval pans and they are best pans I've ever owned.What I love about them?1.  Mine do not have any sticking issues what so ever.2.  They clean extremely easy and fast via hand washing (no hard scrubbing at all).3.  Since it only takes seconds to clean, I can reuse to cook something else without any flavor from the previous meal.4.  The handles do not get hot and they have a good non-slip grip (I have the silicone rubber handles).5.  They apparently can be put in the oven up to 350 degrees but I have not tried that yet.6.  They are not as heavy as some professional ones.I would recommend buying this brand.ConIf I had to say anything bad about them, the only thing I can think of is the rivets that are inside the pan that attach the handle to the pan can get food stuck around them so you really have to clean around that area good.  I wish they would have just attached the handle to the outside of the pan
Great filter:  Just put on an extra rubber washer!. For all you people out there who have a hard time stopping a Brita filter system from leaking, just pop out the washer from the original aearator that you just unscrewed to install the Brita in the first place and add it on top of the Brita washer!  Then just reinstall it!  It's just that simple
wonderful thing. I recently got diagnosed with allergy to dust. We got this gadget for the bedroom. We try to keep the door closed and run it on low/med all the time. We can't hear it but the results are great, I feel much better
SS Skimmer. Good kitchen tool but the 14" handle is a bit too long.  It should be 3" shorter
MyPod for Senseo. This is really great - it makes only a single cup but of any kind of coffee - you can get it at your local walmart without paying shipping!  If you have a senseo coffee maker it is a must hav
Happy pet owner. The Mattress Tool is the most used tool from my Dyson DC14 Animal Upright Vacuum collection.  I inherited a cat who assumes my queen size bed is hers.  I use this tool on the mattress, mattress pad, feather bed, sheets (while still on the bed), pillow cases (left on the pillows),pillows and my beloved quilts and shams (easiest to clean while left on bed).  It really saves time and my washer and dryer.  I used to double and triple wash to get rid of the cat hair and have to clean hair out of the washer each time.  I even use it on clothing (I put them on a hanger and hold the bottom down while gliding the tool downward).  I also have a 12 yr. old German Shepherd who sheds a lot.  I use the Mini Turbine Head to clean her super-sized bed and twin-sized sheets (easiest while still on bed).  I also have the Low Reach Floor Tool.  Fantastic for getting pet hair from under my heavy furniture.  I've owned a lot of vacuums and Dyson is by far the best out there for pet owners.  I use all of the tools and they are great.  I hardly ever used the tools on my other uprights because they didn't seem to get enough suction to do the job right.  After 12 years of struggling to keep up with all of the pet hair now I can get the job done in no time and the results are a truly clean house.  I've actually reversed the damage to my carpets from embedded pet hair.  Dyson is powerful enough to pull out the pet hair.  Another good point,  Dyson is the cleanest vacuum to use.  No spilled dirt while emptying the dirt bin (like my other two bagless vacuums) and no nasty filters to wash every time you vacuum.  How good can it possibly get?!
Geat Curtain. The Hookless Shower Curtain was so easy to install that it didn't hurt my arthritic hands.  It hangs nicely and, on the rounded curtain rod,  doesn't try to cling to someone in the shower while the water is running
Greatest Ever. I burned up countless lesser spatulas before I found this one.  Try as I might, I can not damage it.  Not even in cast iron cookware.  Get one and see for yourself
Works wonders!!!. My dog had ear problems for years and finally came across this product.  Cleared it up in one week, with only a couple of applications.  I'd highly recommend it to anyone who has a dog with chronic ear problems
Great oversized towels. For the price these bath sheets are great! Very soft and plush. Exactly what I was expecting
Awesome spoons!. These are a great addition to your kitchen for those of you who LOVE red, as I do and are looking for an alternative to wood.  They don't scratch your non-stick surfaces and are great sizes.  The small one is a perfect size for me and the larger one my husband loves because it was made for larger hands with larger diameter and scooping.  Anyhow, for their price I feel they are worth it.  They have held up great in the top rack of the dishwasher and with their darker color, don't hold stains.  They are super heat resisitant, as my son left one in the saucepan while he was "helping" me cook, unknown to me, and it never melted at all.  A must have... they have it in blue too
worth it. These aren't great sheets by any means, but for the price they are nice.  They're comfortable.  They seem large though, I might need to try to shrink them in the wash to fit as well as my other sheets. They feel thin, which is actually very comfortable, but I don't know if this is the 'microfiber' part or if they are just cheaper sheets.  A good buy for a cheap, nice extra set
Excellent product. Works well.  You can adjust the mill to grind pepper to your desired level of granularit
Impressive. These little cutting boards are excellent.  Ordered 2 more after finding the first one so useful.  We love the fact that they solve the dripping issue and make excellent casual serving trays.  Not bulky, easy cleaning and storage, what more can you ask for
Solid and sturdy, it does what you want a toaster oven to do. Broil, toast and bake. Those are the three things I look for my toaster to do.  It does all of them just fine.  I like the bottom crumb pan which helps to keep those nasty burnt crumobs from ruining your toaster
Great vacuum for the price. This vacuum was very reasonably-priced and the suction is phenomenal!  It puts my old vacuum to shame.  Every carpet in my house feels flufflier after vacuuming with this vacuum.  At first I thought it was my imagination but the next day I felt it too. Now on to the problems:  One of the side wheels came off the first time I used it.  Also, the wheels underneath left grey skid marks on my floors.  And lastly, you HAVE to buy the 20' hose attachment.  I didn't and regretted it the first time I was using this vacuum.  It's really a necessity and should come with the vacuum.  I have since ordered it and am awaiting its arrival.
Good Replacement Parts. I have had the Krups Crystal Arome #398 for almost 8 years now and the original carafe just broke.  This replacement fits the coffee maker just fine, but the "white" color is a little off from the original one.  They did make some improvements to the lid design, which is more sturdy than the original.  Overall, I am very pleased with this item
Crafter's Creative Helper. This neat little organizer, plus its coordinating friends, has turned my collection of beading supplies, scrapbooking supplies, paints, glues and assorted "treasures" from scary to streamlined, and almost doubled the amount of "stuff" I can fit in the closet allocated for my projects.  The items are easy to build, units can be attached with dowels, and are made to accommodate oversized craft supplies
Worth Every Penny!. You won't believe how much difference a shower filter can make, & this one is wonderful! My brush & comb just glide through my long hair now, instead of dealing with tangles & hair braking off. My skin is so soft, even without a moisturizer. My soap & shampoo lather much better & I'm able to smell the scents so much better. I'd highly recommend this product
So comfy!!. These sheets are so pretty and really comfy/silky.  THey are tough to get wrinkles out though
The best. I have been cooking on cast iron cookware for about 35 years,it is what I was taught to cook on. My Great aunt and MOM used only cast iron. I have about 30 different pieces most were handed down from them. It is the longest lasting of any cook ware made. Once it is seasoned I never wash with soap just plain steel wool and hot water,the into the oven set on 250degrees to dry and season more! IT IS THE BEST
Great mixing bowls!. Love the bright colors on these bowls.  They are super functional too and the sizes seems to work well for various mixing jobs.
Obsession. Harley has always shown a polite interest in toys. He will dutifully chase the tennis ball for a few minutes before settling down for a nap, one eye half open to monitor my activities. In the Pre-Bad-Cuz Era, Harley's main interest in life was me. Following me around the house, sitting on his bed and simply watching me with those big brown eyes, yipping uncontrollably whenever I left him in the car. That was all before the Bad Cuz. Once I introduced this toy to my 85-pound dane/pit/boxer mix, he transmogrified into a ruthless squeaky toy killer. There is no other way to describe him but obsessed. My dog cares of nothing else but a red rubber squeaky toy with martian legs and two tiny pointed nipples. He can't bear to look at it in my hand or in another dog's mouth. He goes crazy barking and whining whenever he believes I have waited too long to throw it. The Bad Cuz has become an addiction. I fear what he might do to get more Bad Cuzes. Or, what if I was throwing the Bad Cuz and then I tripped and sprained my ankle? Would Harley continue to chase and play with the toy, or would he run over to me in concern and lick my face? I fear the former. And yet I continue to give him what he wants, because I have never seen my dog so frenetically wildly happy. I am willing to give up being the center of Harley's world because it gives me so much pleasure to see him so pleased with himself when he has wrestled the toy to the ground and commenced to squeak it to death. This is the first Bad Cuz I have bought Harley, but I guarantee you it will not be the last.
Works pretty well, but wrong size adapters!. I was really annoyed for a day or two when I got this, because it definitely did not fit on any faucet in the house, and none of the included adapters worked either. I have a pretty standard kitchen sink, so it shouldn't be this hard. I did find the correct adapter at a local hardware store for $3, and since then the filter has worked well.We have a weird problem with some compound that smells like gasoline in the tap water in the SF Bay Area. This removed most of the smell and taste. So in that respect, I'm pretty happy
Very pleased. I'm very pleased with this cutting board - it is functional and washes well.  I leave it sitting on my counter at all times because it's also attractive.  The 'Granite' used in the product description is simply referring to the color and look of the board, not the material it's made from.  It clearly states in the description that it's constructed of plastic material.  A great board for a great price
Gorgeous!. This is a very handsome set on my countertop. The tools are very well-made and have exceptionally comfortable and sturdy handles. My favorites are the omelet turner and the ball whisk, which makes whipping up gravy on the stove a breeze. The little hooks on the exterior of the basket canister are very useful for a peeler, measuring spoons, etc.. Happy with this set. Kudos to WMF
very useful / should be included with vacuum. The low reach tool is very useful and easy to use, fast to attach and good on every surface. With this tool you can reach under the shallowest of furniture. The only reason I don't give it five stars is because I think this tool should be included when you purchase the DC07 because of the DC07's inability to get under almost all furniture unless you put the tiny tool on it which is tedious
It does not have a sound option. I bought one of these based on the Amazon product description that says it has a sound option.  When I received it I found it does not and only has spray capabilities.  Saying that it seems to work well and so far is deterring our cat from spraying the piece of furniture the kit is protecting
Great Cooking Gear. My wife and I first purchased Calphalon Contemporary Nostick cooking gear about a year ago.  We both love them.  Not only do they cook evenly and quickly, but they are easy to handle & store.  Additionally, clean up is easier then anything we have previously owned.We purchased some additinal items through Amazon, and received them in less than 5 working days.  We are thoroughly impressed with both Calphalon and Amazon
GranPappy. It was a Christmas gift, truly enjoyed by my grandson who loves to cook (with supervision).  It's easy to store, and able to keep the oil in its container for several uses.  Bigger than the GranDaddy so you can cook more at one time.  It's great.  Have one myself and it has been with us for years.
Love It!!. I use mine in the closet where we have two litter boxes for our cats.  You don't realize it's working because you can't smell anything but I can tell a difference in the smell when the SmellKiller runs out of water.  Our condo is only 780 square feet, so you would certainly know it if there was a big mess in the litter boxes.  I have to go and check in the closet to see if it needs to be cleaned out.  I like the Universal one because it seems to me that it would be harder to keep up with the water levels in the regular ones.  Since the metal piece has to be in both water and air, it seems easier to get the Universal so you don't have to monitor the water level in the cup
beautiful, but small. This is another gorgeous piece by fiesta.  It is lovely and functional.  My only issue is that the dimensions state it is 12" tall, when it is really less than 8"!!!  So, beautiful, but small.
good size. I have 2 of these mugs in plum.  They are the perfect size for cereal, soup and hot chocolat
I like it so far!. I just used it for the first time today and I made a very nice pizza that was very crispy on the bottom unlike with my old metal pizza pan.  It does take a bit more prep than just using a metal pan though (read instruction manual) but I knew it would be, so it doesn't bother me.  I haven't tried cleaning it yet but I don't imagine it being too difficult. make sure you get a pizza peel to go with it! It makes things alot easier!
Great Product, Great Price. I have several brands of silicone baking mats and these are just as good as the ones costing twice as much... highly recommended
Make the pot removeable!. The only reason this doesn't get 5 stars is the fact that you can NOT take out the pot.You also cannot immerse this in water, so cleaning is a giant pain.That said, it's GREAT for dips that need to be kept warm, such as my famous 'chile con queso'. Just put everything together and plug it in.A few hours before a party, cut a 4" block of Velveeta into 1" cubes, put in the Lil' Dipper. Add a few tablespoons of medium Pace Picante. Add 1/3 of a small can of chopped green chiles.For more spice, dribble in the juice from a jar of jalapenos.To thin it out, you can add cream, half and half, or milk. Or even water (but that will dull the taste).Serve with your favorite torilla chips.You can also make this in the microwave if you need to make something 'in a hurry'.I wouldn't recommend putting this on a dining table, as you'd need an extension cord, and kids could trip over it and burn themselves (heck, I guess at some parties, adults could, too!) but a buffet or counter against the wall would be fine.
Great supplemental light. Okay, I haven't used this while reading in bed yet...but as a supplemental light for uses in areas of minimal lighting, it's great!The light isn't good for areas that are adequately well-lit, so don't bother to use the light there. But in areas where light is dim, the light shines. Literally. It casts a bright light on the page(s) that you need to view. It's helped me tremendously get through pages of reading.Yes, it's a bit pricey for what you get, but it's incredibly compact as it fits nicely in my bag. Imagine carrying a lamp everywhere you go.  The power adapter, however, is a cumbersome brick. As for the limited time in which the light bulb is useful for, I can't offer an estimate of time yet - but so far my bulb has been running for at least 15 hours or so- cumulative, not consecutive hours. So, no complaints yet about that.Whenever I saw this light online or in the store, I used to think, "Why in the world would I ever want something like this?" Now, my thoughts are: "Why didn't I ever think to buy this before?
Very practical!. These may not be a cute as the tabletop salt and pepper shakers (the smaller round ones) but let me tell you that having the handles makes a world of difference when it comes to cooking.  You know the moment that I am talking about....your hands are covered in whatever you are making (flour, butter,chicken juice, ect.) or they are already pre-occupied by the spoon, oven-mitt, pot, or pan you might be tending to but you still need a little more salt.  What do you do?  You grab the handle...thats what it's there for, and you need not worry about it slipping out of your hands and onto the floor or into your food
Very nice gift. I ordered this wine tote as a gift and was pleased how fast it was shipped. I live in Alaska and had ordered the bag last Thursday...it was here on Monday.The bag it's self is awesome. This is the perfect gift.
I LOVE THIS GRILL!. I wanted to replace my George Foreman grill and happened upon the Hamilton Beach Indoor Grill at this site.  After reading the ratings from other consumers, which I think is a fantastic idea for Target.com, I was ecstatic!  All of the things I disliked about the GF grills were mentioned by others, especially the task of cleaning them.  Cleaning my HB grill is far less difficult because everything except the electric probe is immersible.  I was a bit concerned about grease splattering because the HB grill isn't covered but that turned out to be a non-issue.  Not to mention, it costs less than 1/2 the price of the comparable GF grill!  Thank you Hamilton Beach for making such an outstanding product and thank you Target.com!
Fine for inexpensive can opener. I like the color. It's a little bigger than I thought and the arm pops off alot but as far as opening a can it does great. The magnet holds the lid after opened. Great for an inexpensive can opener
Great for the office!. This is a wonderful, inexpensive little space heater that functions perfectly for my needs (over-airconditioned office).  It's unfortunate that this item has received so many poor reviews--but I feel that's mainly the result of operator error.  The timer function seems to be stumping quite a few people.  If you purchase this heater and have trouble after reading the enclosed instructions, simply read the review, "Things you should know before buying" from November 4, 2006-- everything is explained very clearly
one of My boys bought this and.... This is a GREAT shower curtain, it resists stains and it pretty well made, specially for the price
Delonghi portable radiator heater. Arrived in great condition.  As indicated in the directions, there was a slight burning smell the first time I used it.  I haven't had that smell since.  Easy to use programmable timer and temperature settings.  A great way to heat up a room instead of the whole house
The Little Magic Wand. Rarely would I give an ordinary vacuum attachment a five star rating, but this is far from ordinary.I was impressed first off with the packaging. Usually when I buy something that's encased in plastic it takes Superman to cut the thing out. Not so with the thoughtful folks at Dyson; they provided a package that you can easily open and then close again.Second, I was impressed by the construction of the brush itself. The bristles are very fine yet sturdy and practically mold themselves around anything you vacuum with it. And the material used to make the rest of the brush is the same tough crash helmet plastic as the Dyson itself. Nice.Something to keep in mind is that the brush comes with two small adapters; one has a small triangle on it and the other has a small "O". In the package there is a small booklet with pictures showing what the adapters are for; the one with the triangle attaches to the brush when you want to put it on the long wand, the adapter with the "O" attaches to the brush when you want to use it with just the hose. I mention this because I ended up vacuuming all my blinds (and even my curtains) before I realized I needed one of these adapters. Nevertheless, even without the adapter the brush picked up a lot of dust, which says a lot for the suction power of the Dyson.I have never been this amazed by something as simple as a vacuum attachment before. This brush is like a little magic wand. Never before have I been able to vacuum my TVs, computers, blinds, curtains, and just about anything with this much ease. The brush not only increased my respect and admiration for the Dyson itself but also for the ingenious minds behind the development of it.I highly recommend this product to anyone who owns a Dyson vacuum
just what the doctor orderd. this is a great product!!! it works great!! it makes a cake look great with holiday theme....product is built to last two life times  and then some....a little green food coloring makes it look like a forest/powered sugar and you have a masterpiece....happy holidays to all!!!!!!
Attractive and functional. This is a clever design that really works. It heats up quickly and you can simply lift the kettle and use it anywhere without dragging the cord around. The on/off knob seems a bit fragile but I've been using this thing 2-3 times per day for a couple of months and I'm quite happy with it. I recently noticed some salty crystals in the bottom of my coffee cup. I found that the mineral deposits that usually crud up heating elements simply sit on the bottom of this kettle. They don't stick to the metal, they just pile up. No boiling vinegar required, just wipe it out occasionally and it is pristine
Dogs LOVE the sound and get so excited. . . could be more durable though. . . My dogs just go crazy over the sound this toy makes! Excellent exercise for them. I really, really wish it were a bit more durable as my dogs are able to destroy/chew them -- I have to take them away long before the sound mechanism gives out due to them makes holes in the 'skin'. Please Wiggly Giggly. . . can you make them stronger somehow? Then they would be perfect! :-
Best little fan ever. I love this little fan.  It's perfect for cooling one person.  I have it on my nite table and use it every night.  Amazingly quiet and soothing air.
Forget the foot switch -- it has a timer!!!. I got this for my old SF apartment where I have no heat in the bathroom and the room gets terribly cold on winter mornings.  This unit has a 24 hour timer, so you can set it to turn on at regular times every day.  So the heater turns on 10 minutes before my alarm goes off, and I don't scream when my feet hit the bathroom tile anymore!  I LOVE it!  If you use the timer funtion, you never have to use the foot pedal switch (which is a bit stubborn).  The heat plus fan is also a real plus, you don't end up with one really hot area in the room and the rest of it freezing cold.  The best possible unit particularly for bathroom and kitchen use (safe in both rooms)
Simpe, useful, cheap. What could be better?. Since there's no picture, here's a little useful information:Unlike most of the kitchen thermometers, this one is laid out with the display on the side rather than the top, more like a fever thermometer. For making tea this is a little inconvenient, but it'll be nice for grill use since I usually stick the thermometer into burgers from the side.Also, the cap which covers the probe conveniently snaps (securely) onto the other end of the case to extend the thermometer a few inches so you don't burn your fingers. Nice touch!Otherwise, it is as advertised and works quite well. I'm ordering another, in fact
Good Gadget. For very little money, you get an easy to use and sturdy corkscrew
Great bed for little animals.. My family has two dogs, and I bought it for the older one, but the puppy liked it so much.    Now the older one just sleeps on the couch instead of her bed.   The puppy has claimed it as hers....I didn't need to fluff it as I thought I would.  It holds the shape well, and I liked the fact that you can wash the bedding inside using a washing machine.
The BEST Cervical roll-- for me, at least. As a physical therapist who suffers from neck pain, this is the ONLY pillow that I can use without waking up to having cervical muscle spasms in the mornings. This pillow is great for people who do not have the normal curvature of the cervical spine a.k.a.-- straight necks (cervical arthritis etc).I bought one 3 years ago at CVS & have been looking for a year now for a replacement since mine cannot support my neck very well anymore.  It has been a week that I have been waking up to neck spasms & I am delighted to find that it is here at Amazon.  It was here all along, I just have been typing in the wrong name-- cervical pillow, cervical roll, neck roll etc....  I am happy that I remembered what my 5 year old son called it-- BONE, typed it, and boy was he right.
Two years and running. This gadget works well if you do not overfill it.  The MISTO website says to put no more than 1/3 cup of oil in it.  We made the mistake of putting too much oil in at first and it would only "stream" oil for a month or so.  We thought it was a terrible device until the oil got down to the level where it should be.  I'm guessing most of the unhappy reviews here are because of this problem.  Now that we know this is the issue, it sprays wonderfully!  We're going to get another one for canola
Great Product - but be aware where you buy. I find myself somewhat in a dilemma as I am writing this review. To avoid any confusion, let me start out by saying that this grater is quite good. As with all graters, there are problems with certain products - generally those that are very soft. A fresh Gouda might clog up the grater whereas a medium-ripe Gouda will be grated without any problems. Personally, I use this grater only on Parmesan and for this purpose it simply cannot be beat.Installed on a wall, the grater sits snugly in a cradle while it is being charged - making at always ready when you need it. If you, like I, use large amounts of certain cheeses (or perhaps chocolates) in your cooking, this grater will make your life tremendously easier.One thing to consider, though, is that the rechargable batteries - just like all such batteries - have a limited life. My first grater stopped working after about four years but frankly, by then I had certainly gotten my money's worth.I also want to point something out to the prospective Amazon shopper that I wish I had known: While this product is great (as I described), please be aware through which retailer Amazon sells this item. One of the retailers offering this product here is Stacks and Stacks. If you go to the effort of looking at the company's website, you will quickly learn that their products center around shelves, small containers, etc. but NOT around kitchen items. That said, the grater seems to be constantly listed as "In Stock" when it is, in reality, not. Stacks and Stacks will have to order the product from the manufacturer and it will take much longer than the stated delivery estimate. It actually took so long when I ordered the item that I had to file a claim through Amazon to get a refund - the company itself refused to respond to any email. While I cannot attest to the company's reliability with other items, I advise you to forgo ordering it from them
Simply the Best. I have used this Taylor thermometer for years and it is reliable, accurate and easy to use.  You can use it in the oven while the meat, casserole, etc. is baking.  Other thermometers have a glass insertion rod and can break.  The stainless steel Taylor goes in without having to make a hole first with another utensil.  For Christmas I gave these thermometers to all my children and my parents who could not find them.  My husband cannot grill without this thermometer
Loving them. Purchased these BRIGHT pink sheets for my 22 year old daughter.  The fun bold color and the HIGH quality are beyond my expectations. She has only two sets of sheets so they are in and out of the laundry quite a bit. They fit, wash and wear well,  saying I am pleased is an understatement
My poochies ought to be bald, WE LOVE THE FURMINATOR!. I have a Jack Russell Terrier and a Rat Terrier. Both have that short wiry hair that sticks to EVERYTHING, and they make little hair cobwebs throughout our home as well. Brushing wasn't working, frequent washing wasn't working. It was too expensive to buy this furminator treatment and have both dogs groomed too. I was at my wit's end.I purchased the small blue Furminator tool with 1.7 inch blade along with the Furminator Shampoo and Furminator Solution. I washed both dogs with the shampoo for 5 minutes each as directed. The shampoo smells like Pina Coladas which made the Rat Terrier lick-this is bad as soap does upset dog tummies. But a TON of hair came off of both dogs after the shampoo, about a fist-full each. Next, I slathered them up with the solution, which smells like roses or some other floral scent and left that on for 5 minutes. Again, another fistfull of hair came out with the rinse! I allowed both dogs a couple of hours to dry all the way, then came back and used this tool. The Rat Terrier wouldn't go for it, he hates all brushes. But the Jack Russell Terrier loves being brushed and let me go over her whole body except the sensitive areas with the tool. And let me tell you, I got a wad of superfine undercoat fur the size of her head off of that dog. And the only hair she's leaving around the house is hair that was already all over the place prior to the Furminator treatment. I don't get hair flying off her when petting her anymore, and even the Rat Terrier that wouldn't let me use the tool on him is still not putting out a lot of shedding.I would highly recommend the Furminator products. They are expensive and somewhat time consuming to use, but they work as advertised.
Works Like a Charm. One of my biggest challenges in baking pies is to ensure that I don't burn the crust while baking the pie itself. This shield really did the trick. It fits my best pans, and I don't worry about my crusts any more. I also took another reviewer's suggestion and sprayed the inside with oil prior to placing on the crust, and it worked like a charm
Easy to use. This little factory is great.  The tube is easy to fill, use & squeeze; and surprisingly, it turned out 1000% better than any we have ever had. This item is A+
Great for College!!. I bought this set for my daughter who is in college.  She was doing her kitchen in "fat chef".  According to her, "My dishes are great!  They're good in both the dishwasher and the microwave.  All my friends compliment me on how they look!"  And she's real excited about the red, having grown up with all the "icky ivey" that we use at the house.  In short, it's easy to use, easy to clean, and really tough.  Perfect for college.  :
COPPER OR STAINLESS STEEL CLEANER. I HAVE USED THIS FOR YEARS ON MY REVERE PANS. IT WORKS GREAT. MAKES THE PANS LOOK LIKE NEW.
A Great deep fryer. It's hard to have much to say about such a simple device.  This is number five or six from Presto. They've all worked great and lasted well past my efforts to keep them clean. Keep them coming
Gorgeous Shape. A wonderful bowl to use as a table centerpiece. The pedestal bottom is subtle and still allows for stacking when storing. As far as serving, the bowl is about medium sized. Works well as a roll or biscuit holder, salad mix for side salads or side dishes. It is not quite big enough for main dishes for more than 2 people. It is a must have bowl for your Fiestaware collection.I read so many reviews from people who received broken dishes when ordering Fiestaware from Amazon. The shippers must've really changed their packing techniques because every piece of Fiestaware that I've received when ordering directly from Amazon has been packed with much care and a lot of cardboard bumpers. Not a broken dish (knock on wood)
Last Blender you'll ever need. Bulky, noisy and takes up lots of space - BUT it is the greatest drink mixer you'll ever buy.  My wife is the queen of frosty drinks.  With this blender the ingredients don't separate half-way through your drinking pleasure.  Our old mixer, also touted as a professional blender, caused the ingedients to separate in the glass after about 3 minutes.  Have not seen that happening after this blender get's through doing its job. Crushes ice without cringing and is esstially oblivious to anything thrown in, just blends everyting into a great pulp.  Highly recommended for the serious frosty drinker
My banana's still think they are on the tree!. Do your banana's turn brown and mushy before you have a chance to eat them?  This used to be a huge problem in my house.  But now that I have the Lipper Beechwood Collection Banana Hanger this is no longer an issue.I hang my bananas up the moment I get home from the grocery store.  They think they are still on the tree out in the wild!  Silly bananas...Green bananas turn yellow quicker when they are hanging and yellow ones stay yellow longer.  Once, I got a bunch of those little mini bananas and those even fit on the hanger!The Lipper Beechwood Collection Banana Hanger is compact and doesn't take up much counter space which is a definite plus.  And it's almost like art in my kitchen putting those bananas on display
It is shaaaaaarp!. I bought one for my daughter a year ago and finally bought one of my own recently and it is the most amazing knife imaginable.  As a vegetarian, I use it constantly for chopping and so on and it is simply effortless.  Money very well spent as I know it'll last a lifetime
$9.95 for the best design. I wish these would go on sale like the heart version.  It is so much fun to poke the cookie dough off through the hole in the handle.  Dook
Great Vacuum. I like everything about this vacuum cleaner...the tools fit nicely in the body of the cleaner, it is easy to wheel around and the cord retracts.  You can hang the main attachment on the body and store easily.  So far it has certainly lived up to all the vacuuming tasks and would not hesitate to recommend it esp. to those with hard wood floors
The right tool for the job. I'm at a point in my life where I am developing a taste for quality, and can finally afford the kind of quality I desire.  I like to dabble in the kitchen, so I've been building my arsenal of kitchenware recently.  I've invested in some high-quality cookware and utensils, and started working on some appliances.  I've got an 11-cup Cuisinart food processor, but that tends to be overkill for a lot of smaller jobs - I hate all the cleanup involved with making a cup of guacamole dip, for instance.  I like to use peeled whole tomatoes to make tomato sauce for pasta dishes, but my wife doesn't care for chunks of tomato in the finished sauce.  No problem... I just dunk the stick blender right into the can of tomatoes and out comes a nice thick puree with all the rich flavor that pre-made sauces seem to lack.This stick blender came highly recommended by an acquaintance, and it doesn't disappoint.  With its high-power motor, variable speed settings and versatile accessories, this is a compact and high-impact kitchen tool.  Easy to clean, too.  I would urge caution if you've never used one of these before, especially when working with very watery liquids as they can end up getting blown right out of your container if you're not careful
Super towels!. Great towels.....they are soft, absorbent and thick.  Super value for the money.  I would buy them over and over again
French Press Coffee  Maker. After a period of eighteen months of burning out three different bands of automatic coffee makers (Mr Coffee etc )and each having spouts that seemed to have minds of their own , I decided to try something that has no automatic features and nothing to burn out. After several months I love it it brews great coffee  especiallyif you have a grinder that can grind coarse.The only thing I miss is the clock on the other type makers
I'm OK with Robots taking over the world if they also do my chores... I'm OK with Robots taking over the world if they don't mind doing my chores as well!  This robot is perhaps the best purchase I've made in years.  We have hardwood floors and pet hair tumbleweeds that we were not able to reach, but were able to see.  Not only do we have clean floors now, but I barely have to do anything.  Probably the only thing it doesn't do is empty itself (you also have to occasionally make sure that the junk on your floor doesn't clog the brushes--just like any other vaccumme).  You also still have to pick up the stuff on the floor if you expect it to vaccume underneath, but it just gives us an excuse to keep our stuff tidy.Coming home each day to a clean house has been AWESOME! I just can't wait until they get a robot that will clean the shower...
Well worth the money!. I'd been thinking about buying a blender for making smoothies, milkshakes etc. for ages but instead made do with the ordinary blenders made exclusively for the home.  In short, those blenders have been utterly disappointing because they don't crush ice, feel too 'plastic-ky' and never produce good drinks.So, after reading the glowing reviews for Waring blenders, I decided to take the plunge and buy one.  I bought the commercial bar blender with the stainless steel canister (I guess I was worried that the traditional glass one might crack, even if others insist that it won't).  It seems expensive, but once you buy this you'll be wondering why you ever settled for anything less!  It crushes ice like a dream and I can turn out superb drinks (no lumps!).  It's extremely easy to use and so easy to clean.  I make breakfast smoothies every day now
The Best. i just can say, you must have one at home....helpfull and resistant...wonderfull piece for the kichen..
He can't put it down... a great combination toy that allows him to enjoy the visual stimulation of feathers and the ability to grip the plush carrot body - don't think it's just the catnip that makes him go crazy over this toy
coffee pot review. the machine works very well.  My complaints are minor, but annoying,  namely the off and on switch is so small that during the day you can't really tell if it's on or off unless you stand right at thei machine and cup your hands over the area.  Ulnfortunetelyl,l many new applieances also have a minesciule light.  The other thing is the pour while brewing feature.  The pot is so samll, for one, why would you want it? and, two, I use my own cup instead of the glass caraffe so that the coffee drips right into the cup, and with the pour and brew feature nothing fits under it except the original caraffe-- so I took off the extra button, made the drip hole smaller with a piece of aluminum foil, and now I'm set.
Dyson Dusting Brush. A great purchase!  I use it on just about everything.  Forget the Pledge...it just moves the dust around.  The Dyson eliminates it!  Hello, to a dust-free home
Luv it. 5 Stars. This is a doorway curtain, not a window curtain. The spaces between the strands is exactly as shown. It's a dcor accent, not a light blocking tool, and I assure you the one I have in my closet door way makes my room feel tropically stylish. Luv it.
Not bad!!. As with everything, I went on a search of all mug warmers in the universe before buying this one.  I found a universal complaint of ALL mug warmer reviewers (of any brand) was "doesn't get hot enough" (especially the USB models).  I think the manufacturers walk a thin line between "doesn't get hot enough" and setting the house on fire.Initially, I tried putting a cold cup of coffee upon my new Mr. Coffee and was disappointed in the warmer's ability to heat up an already cold cup of coffee.  (tried both metal and ceramic mug)The good news is that if you put a fresh hot cup of coffee right from the coffee maker onto the "burner" that it does a pretty good job in keeping it hot from that point.  I review this as satisfactory performance and give extra credit for its slim and sleek design
Most beautiful cocktail glass I've ever seen. I've yet to find a finer looking cocktail glass. A friend who doesn't even like martinis asked me to make one for him after seeing one in this glass. It looks that clean and perfect
Open French Skillet. I purchased this product as a gift, and it turned out to be absolutely wonderful.  The color is a beautiful red which matched the kitchen.  It is large, easy to clean, and the best feature is the extra handle
Great  pizza stone. For an inexpensive pizza stone, it does the job.  If you're looking for something that is more versatile, look somewhere else.  This stone is primarily for breads, pizza and the like.  I know this because I tried baking cookies on it. The cookies turned out fine, but they stuck to the stone. However, when I make home made pizza from scratch, the crust comes out perfect! Not too soft, not too crisp. It bakes it perfectly all the way through with a nice golden crust
You light up my night. I wish I would have bought the regular one instead of the paperback version. I love this light. I can see everything and don't get the shadows hindering my reading. I prefer to read in bed and this allows me to do so without waking up dh
great canisters. I love these canisters.  They are pleasing to the eye, easy to get into, and different enough to feel unique
GOOD VALUE. I purchased the I-Roast 2, after having decent luck with I-Roast 1.   Hearthware seems to have corrected some of the very minor flaws with version 1 and I am extremely happy with it. The major thing that has been corrected is the tendency of the sealed top to unseal itself, which was a mess.  I have not had this happen with version 2.With some green beans, you have to roast smaller batches (Ethopian comes to mind) or it will overheat and shut down. However, it will do almost any controlled roast you could ever want. Version 2 seems much improved in roasting the entire batch more evenly, something that was not necessarily the case with version 1.  Version 2 also seems to take more slough out of the roasting chamber.Do be forewarned that this unit is VERY noisy (as most home roasters are, with the exception of the FreshRoast), so your neighbors may hate you if you live in an apartment.This is a great unit for the home roaster
it's a towel!. I am pleased.  It is not a cheap discount towel, nor is it a super-plush towel.  It looks good and it washes well
Fast and Beautiful!. I received this hutch just three days after I ordered it, and it was in flawless shape when it got here.  The color is beautiful, and the piece is very heavy, sturdy solid wood.  The desk in this set was a bit too small for what I was needing, so I ordered a walnut dining table from Target, and they blend wonderfully well together.  The hutch is pretty large, so it holds quite a bit of office supplies, paperwork, etc.  You won't go wrong with this choice
Durable, easy to clean. I've had this a couple years and it shows no signs ofdecay or staining (cleaned many times in an automaticdish washer)
Good Buy!. Bought this for my mother as a gift.  For years she has bought microwave bags, and was sceptical when I mentioned this idea.  Well, no more.  In her words, 'it's fantastic'.  She says it's better because she has more control over the flavor and will save her money.  I think I'll be buying one soon to replace my aging hot air popper
RIVET!. Great item, does its job in the kitchen. Looks great as well, love all Calphalon products
Excellent edge, some design flaws. I baught my 8" global chef's knife about 5 years ago.  It has been of great use in the kitchen and remains one of my favorite knives on the market.  The molybdenum/vanadium steel of the global knives holds an edge far longer than its Henkles/Wustolf counterparts.  My only complaint is the handle design which does not suit my gripping style, nor my large hands.  I don't mind the steel handles, although they do contribute to slippage and some loss of grip.  My main problem is with the tapered bolster, which is almost a lack of bolster altogether.  Coupled with the thin spine and heal of the knife, extended use can be uncomfortable for the hand.I highly recommend globals, but I might suggest the 8 1/4" heavyweight model, which appears to have a more standard handle design and less tapering to the Bolster.For more info on knife handling and care you might check out the CIA's book titled "The Professional Chef's Knife Kit".And one last comment.  Although all knife companies like to claim their knives are dishwasher safe, please, PLEASE, don't put your knives in the dishwasher.
Great but loud. Great dehumidifier. Works very well. Takes gallons of water out of my house. I love everything about it except one detail. It's loud. I can't compare it to others as this is the only one I've owned, but it's the loudest appliance I own. Not a problem if you're putting it in a basement, but maybe a bit much in a living/sleeping area
Good for hard cheeses, not so great for soft ones. Asiago cheese works well in this grater, but softer cheeses like cheddar and especially mozzarella tend to get smooshed through instead of being grated.
The Best Pot In The House. I never though that I would pay $99 for a pot, but I'm glad I spent the money on this one. It arrived in perfect condition and was put to the test immediately. There are no hot spots and the pot is fairly easy to clean. All of the receipes that we've tried have been marvelous. The meats are so tender and juicy, they melt in your mouth. This dutch oven has taken on "favorite" status in our house. Highly recommended
Mice are nice. These colorful and furry little mice are great for cats that enjoy chasing small toys. They are treated with catnip, but to be honest, I don't think my cat knows the difference. Unlike their Zanies Furry Mice counterparts, Zanies Rainbow Mice also rattle, since they have tiny pebbles inside them. A word of caution about this though: the pebbles are encased inside a semi-rigid plastic cartridge (which makes up the body of the mouse). The furry fabric is simply wrapped around this plastic piece and glued. After my cat played with one of the mice, the fabric unglued itself and the plastic was exposed. Since there are pebbles inside, unsupervised play might not be very safe. It's best to regularly check the condition of the mice after the cats play with them. Other than that, these are great toys and the price/quantity/quality ratio is pretty good. Quantity is important here, because, due to their small size, most mice will most likely end up lost behind some piece of furniture. Since you get 60 mice in this package, you can just keep replacing the ones that go missing in action. In the long run, it's a lot cheaper than buying them individually
Great Knives. Great item, I would reccomend them for anyone in the market for new cutlery
Absolute best buy in a Chef's knife. I bought this knife after reading a review of 8 inch Chef's Knives in Cook's Illustrated.  They rated this knife above ALL others, including knives costing more than a hundred dollars.  It arrives in extremely sharp condition.  I've used some expensive Chef's knives, and even an expensive Henckels Santoku.  None were as good as this knife
THE BEST KNIFE EVER. NEED I SAY MORE????   EASY TO HOLE AND MANEUVER THROUGH ANYTHIN
Fantastic. I have had this product for a couple of days now and don't know why I never tried it before.  It works great and you don't have to cut cucumber or small potatoes.  I had seen the cuisinart on tv and almost bought it and thought about the salad shooter.  I am a single senior and do not have the need for such a pricey one but needed it as I am getting rid of heavy food processor but still wanted to be able to slice and shred.  Should have bought this long ago.  Saves space.  Can you tell I love love it
Ideal for Pet Hair. The Miele vacuum cleaner is already a substantial investment, but I recommend the turbobrush for those models that don't come with one. It's an especially useful add-on for those with pets, because the regular-head does only a fair job of picking up our golden retriever's shedded hair.  I could just manage it by tipping the regular brush, but this is not nearly as effective as the Turbo.  The Turbo rotates extremely fast (sorry, but the company supplies no specs on how fast), and has longer, more effective brushes to scoop up pet hair and any other kind of debris. This model (205-3) fits Miele vaccums only, but Model STB 201 Vario's adapter enables Turbo to attach to non-Miele vaccums with suction tubes that are between 30 and 38 mm. One other note: There's no storage cover; in fact, this one was not even wrapped in plastic for protection during transit. However, there was no damage.The rugs look noticeably cleaner with the Turbo, as the brushes also tend to fluff them for more effective vacuuming of debris. The difference is most noticeable on medium to heavy shag rugs.  There's one adjustment, a "slide" that you push to one side when going over heavy pile. The Turbo head adds a little of its own noise, a steady, non-annoying WHIRRRR as it speeds around. It's light enough to lift onto furniture that needs cleaning.  The instructions (which come in 14 languages) show how to remove hair, thread, etc. stubbornly caught on the brushes--either by cutting them away at the opening, or by removing the cover and either cutting or pulling manually. The instructions also include the line, "Do not use on people or animals," a certain ice-breaker at your next social function.Overall, I'd recommend this as an immediate purchase for those with pets that shed (or get a model that comes with the Turbo). Otherwise, you may wish to wait and see whether the Miele on its own does a satisfactory job
This is a charming item worth the investment!. A perfect deep, well-shaped 8 BIG ozs. in a great shade of almost crimson red.  Consider this an investment for lots of fun meals from Valentines'Day to Christmas and even harvest dinners.  I was impressed at how large the container is for it's shape, easily holding enough of any treat for two or a main dish for one.  Right off, we used it for a nut dish and got many compliments on its' charm.  So I went back and ordered 7 more!!
Very cute - but requires responsibly. I have this tank sitting on my desk at the office and have had a beautiful healthy beta living in it for over two months.  This is wonderfully adorable novelty item and it looks very cute in my cubicle.The important thing to remember is that this is a fish you are committing to take care of.  If you are willing to put in the effort, great!  If not, DO NOT BUY THIS!What I have been doing is this:1.  Get a beta - not a goldfish.  Goldfish need more room than this tank can supply and also would prefer a filter.2.  Change the water often.  I do a small water change 2 or 3 times a week.  I only use filtered water, I am sure to let it stand for several hours so that it adjusts to room temperature and I use a water conditioner designed for betas.3.  Do not overfeed!4.  About once a month I carefully move my fish into another bowl with the most of the fish tank water and rinse out the tank.My fish seems very happy and loves swimming in, over, under, through and around the furniture exploring his environment.  He even sometimes lurks in the file cabinet!  His fins are long and beautiful and have never gotten caught on any "sharp" edges.The only concern I have for him is that he might eventually get bored since the furniture is locked down and can't be rearranged to provide stimulation for the fish.  But other than that, I think that with the proper care, a beta can be very happy living in his office.
Aquarium review. This was for my husband, it is our third aquarium.  We have one outside, and 2 inside.  He decided it was time to upgrade some of his older aquariums.  He loves the rounded edges, and it is really pretty with the fish, rocks, and plants inside!A happy custome
Okey. It works fine. However, it arrived without a base and Amazon was unable to find a replacement part or another fan like it. Foertunately I was able to rig one up for i
cookin' with little people. These are fabulous for giving preschoolers independence in the kitchen.  I can simply ask my son to give us two scoops of the yellow, one scoop of the blue, etc.  The only reason I wouldn't give them a five is that the vertical handles can sometimes be a bummer when you're working for a level scoop
SMART BUY!!. This product is the best on the market.  Others don't come close.   With 4 teenagers you have to have a clothes system that works.  This does
Nice look but doesn't retain heat. The black cup is unique and eye catching but the lid is not airtight and therefore leaks and does not keep the liquids hot. I still think it looks cool
Apron Accessories Galore. This collection from CooknStyle is superb. I bought several aprons, oven mitts, and pot holders for my wife for Christmas. As a woman who loves to cook and who loves to really get into the act of cooking, she has owned many aprons in the past. She has been quite impressed with the quality of workmanship from everything she received. Our only minor complaint was that not all lines carry all accessories, for example one apron only had the matching mitts, and not the pot holders also. But for the most part, CooknStyle has a wonderful collection.In addition to a very nice collection, they also provide free shipping over $60. And I was very impressed with their service. I ordered late in the day on the 18th of December and had them in my hands on the 20th.Great service, great products, great price. You can't go wrong
Upper back pains solved. I spent a lot of time and money on physical therapy for my weak upper back muscles.  I've tried all sorts of specialized pillows for years -- buckwheat pillows, down/feather pillows, contour pillows, memory foam pillows etc.  This was the only one that made me wake up in the mornings with no upper back pain.  It also works for my husband who likes to sleep on his side because the individual coils adjust to support the head and neck separately
Constantly in use in our house. My thoughtful guy stopped off at a Le Creuset outlet and called me from the store: "Hey, I'm at the Le Creuset outlet and you can have anything you want!" Oh, boy, it wasn't even my birthday. After consultation with the helpful sales assistant, we chose this casserole. It's large and flat like a skillet, has a domed cover, two side handles and it has the regular enamel lining. The sales assistant claimed it was the most used pot in her kitchen. I agree!We leave this out on the stove as it's rather large. We do a lot of things in it, but recently we made Swiss Steak. I am not a big Swiss Steak fan, but when someone comes home with the wrong meat for the grill (hint; you BRAISE round steak, not grill it) then you deal with it. I hammered flour into the steaks with the cubed side of the meat mallet. Then sauteed the meat in the Le Creuset casserole. I added minced onion, a can of diced tomatoes and let the whole thing simmer on the stove (though I could have finished it in the oven--this goes in the oven at moderate temperatures.) The result was a tender Swiss steak and with judicious stirring from time to time with a spatula to release the meat from the enamel surface, it was an easy cleanup.Unlike teflon, you do have to stir to avoid catching the food on the bottom. I find that a nylon spatula, shoved under the meat from time to time, releases it well. But I'd advise you never really leave this kind of pot to cook on its own even on the lowest heat unless you have a heat spreader or even heat. Our gas stove seems to create hot spots under the surface, so I keep an eye on it from time to time.The cleanup is easy--no abrasives or rough pads, please, but a good soaking cleans it up with a mild scrubbing nylon pad. The cream enamel does stain from tomato and caramelized foods, quick cleanup mitigates this, but over time, you will see some darkening. This bothers some people but as long as the surface is intact, we are ok with a bit of staining.If you do a lot of skillet cooking and like Le Creuset, this piece is wonderful and it can go from stove to tabletop because it is quite pretty
love it!. I used to have a Cuisinart, and I gave it to Goodwill after buying this Mandolin.  Yeah, the Cuisinart was great and it can do some things this can't, like making pesto.  But you know, I make pesto twice a year; I can use my mortar and pestle.   On the other hand, slicing things and making julienne strips is something both these do effortlessly, but I never used to take the cuisinart out to do it because the cleanup was such a hassle.  With this, its washed and dried in 20 seconds.  I find that I *actually* use this, instead of just owning it for &quot;someday&quot;.  The only caution I have is that blade is SHARP, so always use the guard
Brita filter. This is the second filter Brita that I bought (the first one slips off the tap after more than 2 years of usage). I'm happy with Brita system. I'm planning to use it in the future as well
Great Knife. I bought this knife for boning deer, and it works wonderfully!  I particularly like the flexible blade as it makes it easier to cut the meat off of the bone.  It is very strong too.  This is a high quality knife, and I will purchase more Global knives
Slept for 6 days straight... ok just kidding.  these pillows are awesome.  i prefer a bit more fluff, but i'm rating these based on what they are and claim to be, not on what i want them to be.  very well made, very comfortable.  for sleeping on your stomach, so if you're a back/side sleeper, seek a more stable pillow
nice thermostat. We installed this about a month ago. It was very easy to install and set up. The touch controls are intuitive, so you don't have to drag out the book every time you want to reset it. It holds the heat at a very constant temperature, so the room temp doesn't go hot and cold like our old thermostat. I like that, if you overide the current setting which is very easy to do, it automatically goes back at the next schedule change. You don't have to remember to put it back on its schedule. I'd recommend it to someone else now while ours is new
So much fun!. My dog, a heeler/sheltie mix, loves this ball.  While living in my apartment, she would herd it around the place, but beware when it caught under a table.  She'd bark at it for a while, and when it didn't come out, she'd bark at me to get it!  When I took my dog to my dad's out in the country, she herded the ball all over the yard.  She loved getting it going down the hills, going on each side of it to keep it in line.  It's definitely one of her favorite toys
Not for frozen green coconuts. Do not attempt to open frozen, green coconuts with this otherwise delightful knife, unless you want to buy your friends a new one
50% more free!. I just wanted to add that my order on March 11, 2007 came with 15 dingo stix per package, thats 50% more free, and they are still priced @ 1.25 with buy 3 get one free, a great deal and the dogs love everything dingo so far
Fiestaware Pie Baker. I like it very much.  It works well & easy to clean. I would recommend this product to others
great dispenser. I received one of these as a gift.  I love it!  I enjoy a p-nut butter & honey sandwich and this is the best way to apply honey to a sandwich without all the mess and cleanup
Good sheets. These sheets are nice and have held up for a year very well.  There was a lot of fuzz in the wash at first but all of the flannel didn't wash off.  The flannel retains heat well and are still warm when I come back to bed if I get up in the middle of the night.
Good Deal. This purchase came with 3 stackable racks - I thought it was only one rack. It stores very easily in a compact space and works well. I don't know if it rusts since I have only wiped the tray with a cloth after using it
Works good, just small. I really like this kettle. I've had it a month and it boils water fast. I like that the kettle is self contained with nothing to contaminate the water and that I can take the kettle off the base without a cord following me around. My only complaint is that I wish it was bigger. With my big mugs for coffee or tea, it only fills a couple at a time
great tool!. This product works great.  It allows me to froth milk and use coffee made in a regular coffee pot.  Basically I can make lattes without having to have an espresso maker
Excellent Quality, Assembly, Durability, Usability, Value. This is the fourth size of these shelves I've gotten. One larger and two smaller - let's call this one 'large'. The X-large one was my first. It is one 6-shelf unit or two 3-shelf units. I use it as two units. It is loaded with heavy power tools, loaded tool boxes, etc and handles it with no problem. The medium sized ones are packed with garden supplies, gallons of paint, etc. The small one is loaded with gallons of bleach and detergents and softener bottles. This large size I use for boxes of house supplies - some heavy some lite. The product is as described and looks exactly like the picture.QUALITY = Zero defects with the legs, shelves, plastic height adjusters, wheel assemblies, welding and chrome plating. The design is simple and effective - the weight of the shelves and items of the shelves hold everything in place - no screws.ASSEMBLY = The instructions are poor but once you figure it out it is quick and easy and simply repetitive to put together. I've assembled all of mine by myself. The first x-large one I got took me an hour, now it takes me 10 minutes to put them together or tear them apart to change the shelf heights. No special tools required - all of mine came with a little wrench to tighten the wheel bolts. A rubber mallet proved handy to tighten the shelves down on the plastic adjusters (and to knock them loose to change the height as desired) but a shoe works as well. One corner of a shelf kept popping up and causing the plastic adjuster to pop off until I figured out I needed to get it on a level floor, square up the legs by twisting the whole unit a little, and whacked it with the mallet to wedge it down on the plastic adjuster. Caution: Don't step on any of the plastic height adjusters as you assmble it cause there are no extras to work with.DURABILITY = I can't imagine what I could put on it that would be heavy enough to break it. Compared to the laundry shelf/hanger unit I bought from a competitor these shelves are commercial strength. The laundry shelf wiggles and wobbles every time I touch it but these shelves are sturdy. Heavier than I expected too.USABILITY = Great. I definately prefer the models with wheels for ease in rearranging my basement storage and for cleaning around, etc. Even fully loaded with heavy items the x-large one is easy to move around with wheels. The shelves can be installed with the lip up or down. Stronger if the lip is down. Keeps things from falling off if the lip is up. The wheel locks work well (just place them both on a long side or opposite corners of each other). The shelf spacing is very flexible with grooves for the plastic height adjusters every inch or so. Excellent for workshops, garages, basements, pantry, and comtemporary or chef-quality kitchens - but not something I'd put in my living room - at least not in chrome. I'd probably lose the wheels if I were to put it in the kitchen to soften the look a bit.VALUE = I was pleasantly surprised. I looked at the plastic shelves which cost less but for me the wheels, the looks, the adjustable heights, and the  durability was worth the extra money. My sister has several versions of the plastic shelves in her basement and she doesn't like having to unload them or drag them across the floor to rearrange or clean. But if all you're going to store on them is boxes of bows and wrapping paper then these shevles are probably overkill. If I had a garage and/or a place for them in the kitchen I'd have more of them and put my heavy Kitchen-Aid mixer and the like on one of these
Great machine for office. Life at work wouldn't be quite the same without this and my shots of Buzzworthy. However, I do find it an expensive way to drink coffee (the pods are expensive here in Trinidad) and so I don't allow myself the luxury of home use. But for the office, with no grains to worry about etc., it's simply the best
Perfection. This compact unit is comfortable in the hand, attractive on the counter, and works incredibly! Froths even whole milk so fast. Better than more expensive and bulkier units in performance. Yeah
Great cup of coffee!. I purchased this coffee pot after a lot of consideration.  I was very concerned about the comments regarding cleaning the grinding bay.  You do have to clean it after every use but it can be rinsed and put in the dishwasher or just rinsed and dried.  However, the effort it takes to clean the unit does not compare to the great coffee that you get.  It makes hands down the best coffee I have ever had from a standard coffee pot!
Good size, occasional hot spot. I ordered this crock pot to replace an older version that didn't have a removable crock.What I like about it:- Crock is removable and dishwasher safe.- Size is perfect for 2-person meals.- Doesn't take up much storage space.- Glass lid allows you to see the contents.My concerns:- Seems to have a hot-spot on one side but it's only an issue if I leave the dish cooking longer than I should (such as if I get home from work really late.)- The lid doesn't look like it fits well; however, I don't think I'm losing any heat. So it might just be an aesthetic issue.I have used this crock pot 6 times in the past month and am very happy with it.  So far the "hot-spot" issue has affected two meals and I was able to just cut off the overcooked part. But that's the reason I gave this 4 stars instead of 5.A general warning to anyone who is not familiar with crock pot cooking: the days of putting a dish in the crock pot before you leave for work and it being perfectly done when you return home are over, in my opinion. The new slow cookers/crock pots cook *much* faster and hotter than those our mothers owned in the 70's. My large, 5-quart Rival crock pot actually boils when I turn it on high! I suggest you experiment with yours on a weekend before you go off and leave it cooking unattended while you are at work for 9 or 10 hours. I find that if a crock pot recipe calls for cooking on low for 9 hours, it only takes 6 hours in my small or large crock pots.If you enjoy good oatmeal try the oatmeal recipe in the instruction manual. I ate the instant/microwave oatmeal for years but have now become hooked on the "real" oatmeal we make overnight in the crock pot.
Excellent shaker. I see a lot of people have leaky shakers.  Not me.  Mine is absolutely perfect.  The top/strainer piece fits snugly, leak-free, requiring just the right amount of effort to de-couple it from the canister.  The design of the canister lip also makes it easy to attach the top to the canister.  The lip on some shakers makes it hard to attach the top.  The cap/jigger also fits perfectly, with just the right amount of snugness that it stays attached but also comes off easily
Doxie Corn Holders. These were a gift so I have not used them.  They were very cute and what I expected in the package
Awesome Fun, Great Value!. I bought this little thing about 1 week ago, and have been amazed.  It works great, comes with spare props, and is one of the slickest little toys I've ever seen.  It lasts for about 5 minutes on a charge, and takes about 10 minutes to charge.  The headlight flashes when the batteries are dying to warn you, but as the sub floats automatically, it's not really necessary.  Its two motors make it very maneuverable, although a little tricky as forward causes the sub to dive, and reverse raises it.  The fish in my pond and aquarium are mildly curious, and mildly annoyed by the sub.  So far, it's been fairly rugged, withstanding frequent use by me and my 10 year old sub.  Hard to beat at this price
Pleasant surprise. This is a lovely product.  I would buy another one and also recommend it to my friends
Small problem with the large size. This set  has all the quality and good looks that I expected. There is only one problem-it is BIG! The 11&quot; plates are so tall in my dishwasher that they only fit in the center of my KitchenAid dishwasher, so I can't wash more than 4 at once, and the bowls don't slide in between the prongs, but kind of have to lean over, so that they take up extra space. I got the Rio set  partly because of the 16 oz. mugs (my husband is a serious coffee drinker!).  I love the design, but the plates and bowls are really way bigger than any person with a normal-size appetite needs
Very good cookware, but exterior is not dishwasher safe. The bodies are made of 1/8" thick aluminum with a full stainless steel lining on the inside.  The thick aluminum bodies make them heat evenly and the stainless interior make them non-reactive with food.  My only gripes are that the rim of the pots have exposed non-anodized aluminum which become discolored with use.  And the anodized aluminum exteriors become discolored if washed in a dishwasher.  These are just cosmetic issues that don't affect the function, but I had higher expectations given the relatively high price of this set.  I also considered the All-clad cookware that has stainless steel cladding on both the interior and exterior.  In retrospect, perhaps those would have been a better choice assuming the thermal properties don't suffer too much from the exterior stainless steel coating.
NOT the one Alton Brown recommends... Previous reviewers are attaching Alton Brown's recommendation to this item but unfortunately if you go to his web site you will learn differntly.http://www.altonbrown.com/pages/elements.html - click on the "Pt." box
Beautiful and Exquisite. I love this set - this is the favorite of all my china teacup sets. I have both Irish and English bone china, and this pattern is exquisite. The color is beautiful - so delicate. I serve formal tea and scones with these teacups. I LOVE THIS SET!!
Excellent Buy...especially from Uncle Joe's!. My husband's family cans every year...but we have never done it.  So this year I am heading down to a "pick-your-own" farm with my husband and 5 daughters in search of some good old fashioned family fun!  This kit was exactly what I needed...not only comes with everything (except a few extra jars and the fruit) but also gives me a variety of recipes to try!  We used the coupons right away at Walmart to get the other few items we needed.***Also, this item was shipped and arrived so quickly I was shocked... unfortunately, it was damaged and I was afraid I couldn't get a replacement on time.  Uncle Joe's IMMEDIATELY shipped a new one.  Their customer service is excellent.  Second to NONE
A GREAT fan!. OK, now that we know the instructions are a little hard to follow, and you only get the size you order, let me review the fan itself.The fan is:1)Very powerful. The 16" circumference shoots a comfortable blast of cool air at you, and around you.2)Very well made. The whole unit is very sturdy [but not overbearingly heavy] and it doesn't vibrate when you have it on high.3)Very easy to use. The remote control makes it so you don't even have to leave your chair.All-in-all, a GREAT fan
I like it. This spice rack saves space in my kitchen cabinet, and makes finding spices while I'm cooking SO much easier.  I have had no problems with the quality of the materials or breakage, and I use it daily.  I plan on buying another
Worth every penny. It isn't often that I find something so inexpensive that performs to my expectations.  While you do have to scrub it thoroughly after each use (since it is bamboo) it does exactly what it promises to do.  We use it frequently and it has held up admirably
What a great knife!. A friend of my girlfriend came over to cook dinner with us one night and brought her Global knife. After using it to cut vegetables and meat we were very impressed. It is perfectly balanced and very lightweight. The blade is super sharp so the carrots don't go flying off the cutting board while you're chopping them. My girlfriend especially liked the knife so I went on the Amazon and bought her one. Although I have never owned a quality knife before, so I cannot compare, I am very happy with this knife and would like to collect the entire set
All you need!. This filter is a wonderful 3 part filter. You get the mechanical, biological and chemical filtering all in one easy to use, easy to maintain filter. It does take about 4" clearance from back of tank to wall. So measure! I like the big sponge and the idea that the water has to start at the bottom and then go up through all the media, before going into the tank. Also, for leveling, you can use a piece of 3/4 inch tubing between the body of the filter and the aquarium, to make it level. I found that this works very well and stays in place. Just a helpful hint! LOL  When I get the courage to move my 55g tank away from the wall a little more, I am going to get another 110.
Martex Diamond Weave Cotton King Blanket. Nice, lightweight blanket for use in the summer.  Well made and durable.
great cleaver for the money. great weight; ok balance; well-made; good quality metal; for the price - a great bargain.
Simply the BEST. Pies are perfect-Clean up is amazing!!! The cookware is absolutely beautiful.  There are few things I pay good money for and even fewer things I end up not regretting.. This is one Pie dish you will never regret owning!. It's wonderful and still looks as bright and perfect as the day i took it out of the box.. I throw it in my dishwasher without pre rinsing too! And comes out looking as though I just brought it home..I Make the best Apple Pies I ever ate..the crust is perfect every time.It would be nice to thank the man responsible for such a nice tool as this.
Cordless Hand Blender. The CSB-44N Hand Blender is an amazingly compact Unit.Works great for Drinks and Veg. Puree for Soups.Love the Cordless feature!!
Simple and effective. I've had this model or something similar for about the past 8 years, and love it.  I inadvertently burnt out the motor on the first one by trying to chop some cheese using the food processor attachment.  Don't keep the motor going if the blade stops spinning because the food is too tough!  Shake it up or do less food at a time and try again.This is the only blender I have (I mostly use it for smoothies) and love having something small and efficient that gets the job done.  No big hunk of blender sitting around, and fewer materials needed to make and ship it.  Mixes stuff right in the container you want it in, avoiding more mess and cleanup, and when you're done, the mixing end twists off for easy washing.  Nice
Highest Quality. Our original Micro Go Round finally gave up the ghost after twenty years of use.  We were happy to find the product still available for purchase, and there have been significant improvements in design and functionality.  We have no reason at this point to think that we won't have the "new and improved" model for another couple of decades
Party Favorite. This new margarita maker was the hit at out annual family Christmas Party.  Easy to use, easy to clean up and best of all it just makes a great drink.  If you like frozen drink this is a must have in your ba
Excellent!. I have this 4 quart saucier pan as well as two of the Mario Batali 6 Quart cast-iron with enamel pots with lids.  These are oven safe!!! I believe up to 450 degrees.  They are excellent cookware.  I rarely use any other pots anymore.  Heat retention is fantastic and they cook extremely evenly.  Remember to use wooden (preferably) or plastic spoons with these pots as metal tools will scratch up the coating.  Handwash and dry, no dishwashers with these! They are expensive but when you figure that you will have these for life, and possibly your great-grandchildrens lives as well...they are well worth the investment.  I really haven't found a type of cookware that compares to this.  If you are serious about cooking do yourself a favor and get one of these!
Comfortable, sharp, nice Quality. I first tried the Shun chefs knife and loved it. This paring knife is great. Everything I want from a paring knife; Sharp, Comfortable, just flexible enough and a great grip.
Delivers on promise. I bought this kettle for our office, since we needed boiling water for tea and such.It does everything we need, and it's pretty.We haven't had any problems with it, and it's been used several times a day. It works like a charm
Arrived on Time... The item I ordered arrived on time and as pictured so I would order from this seller again
awesome knife set. I purchased this set for my husband who is a chef. He raves about these knifes. I am happy I made this purchase
Great Juicer, but hold on to the lid!. I purchased this juicer about a year ago, and it's been great.  The only reason it doesn't get 5 stars from me is that when it gets unbalanced, you have to make sure to hold the lid on, because it shakes and vibrates a whole lot.  The juice is great, the cleanup is easy, if a bit time-consuming, and the motor is very powerful.  I'd definitely recommend this juicer
Two Pans In One!. Get both a springform pan great for making cheesecakes and also a more than serviceable bundt pan for angel food and pound cakes in the same package with Nordic Ware's great baking pan. Simply switch out the bottoms--one the standard springform flat bottom and the other a springform insert--to convert from one use to the other. The pan is also non-stick (although normal oiling or flouring is recommended) and easy to clean-up and maintain. For the price of a decent springform OR bundt pan, getting both in the same package is an exceptional value
Perfect vacuum cleaner for small apartment overrun by cat fur or other similar things. This baby assembles in 2 minutes so you'll be vacuuming in no time.  The user manual is clear and concise.  The vacuum is lightweight and easy to move.  The 4 attachments - floor, upholstery/curtains, crevice, dust - are well-built and sufficient for most homes.  It's very quiet - so quiet that my cat didn't run from the room!  It picked up everything:Kitty litter in the carpet - check.Cat fur on the microsuede sofa - check.Hardwood floors in the corner of the room - check.Plus, it's absolutely adorable.  I've used several vacuum cleaners before, including a Dyson, and this one's my favorite.  Cleaning was so fast, I'm looking forward to next time.  I don't know if this is typical, but I received it the day after I ordered it
Decent bag. The oxygen vacuum this goes in works great, I used to think the bags cost too much but the first 5 pack I got last me a year
This is a cast iron skillet. As a ceramic cooktop owner who loves cast iron, I had to invest in some enameled cast iron.  (Unenameled cast iron may scratch the surface.) I chose Le Creuset.  I enjoy cooking with all the Le Creuset skillets and pots that I own.  I have noticed some comments here that compelled me to write this review.  The black seen in the pan is not teflon, but black cast iron.  Cast iron skillets come either seasoned or unseasoned.  I have ones that stick worse than others.  I can't explain it, but if the surface looks dull and gray as opposed to shiny and black, it probably needs to some grease added to it.  I usually just spray with cooking oil  prior to cooking for easier cleanup.  I'm just guessing.  Directions for that may be found on the Lodge cast iron website.  Lodge now offers an enameled cast iron line as does Nordic Ware, but Le Creuset seems to be on sale more often and offered in more places.  Also to avoid cracking the porcelain enamel, follow the manufacturer's instructions about allowing the pan to cook down to room temperature.  Extreme temperature changes may crack the glaze.  I will say these are really heavy pans and I have had to strategize on which shelves they can go.
Yummy Homemade Yogurt. I've had my yogurt maker for about 18 months now and still love it!  I once had a Salton (back in the 1980s), but I can attest to this being much better. Every batch I've made has been great, even with occasional differences. I enjoy eating my yogurt plain, but I also love topping it with  fresh fruit, nuts and maybe a touch of granola.  Sooo good.I prefer the boil method of preparation, but there is a non-boil method as well. Try them both and see which you prefer.I highly recommend buying a box of spare jars too.  It adds to the cost, but this will allow you to start a new batch without having to wait to use and clean up the jars from the previous batch.  It will also provide you with spare parts, which I discovered the hard way.  I somehow lost a lid from the original set about two months after I got the yogurt maker.  If I hadn't had the extra jars, I would now have a yogurt maker that makes six jars of yummy yogurt, rather than seven.Speaking of yogurt, I think I'll go get some now! Yum
Great heater though slighly large. I bought this heater to head my bedroom/finished basement.  The room is 16'x21' with 9 food ceilings.  The heater does a fantastic job at heating the room, though takes a while (~1 hour) to do so.... which is fine with me.  I really like the fact that it is dead quiet and has a convienent lcd timer.My only complaint is that it is rather large/long
Premier Citronella Spray Refills for Premier Anti-Bark Collars. Firstly, we have found Premier brand's new Citronella battery-operated Anti-Bark Collars with on/off switch for Dogs to be quite efficient a majority of the time, in that Dogs seem to bark more selectively.  So, we still have a watch pooch but not a yapping pooch!  And, the Citronella Spray Refills are easy to use in refilling the spraying mechanism container on the collar. Do check battery often. Do check collar often to maintain appropriate tightness/looseness so collar does not fall off. Do refill collar at least daily or more often to maintain consistent spraying of Dog when barking to reinforce selective barking habits. Amazon.com carries Premier's Anti-Bark Collar, Citronella Spray refills and batteries at competitive pricing
Great Buy. We use the fryer in a small to go restaurant setting.  We sell barbeque but use the fryer for frys, hot wings, fish and pork chops.  We use the machine daily and have had great service from it.  I would recommend it for the user who frys light to medium duty.  It is not good for the large chain type cooking because of the size only.  The machine is good and sturdy enough for the home cook and the small restaurants
Smaller than it looks which is better!. I purchased this as a gift for my son who loves anything dipped in chocolate. He had his eye on the much larger fountains. I wanted something smaller that he could use without making a big mess. I also did not want 3 pounds of chocolate melted at once. This little pot is perfect for that reason. You melt 1 1/2 cups of chips or whatever type of chocolate you want. This will allow you to dip over 2 pounds of strawberries and numerous pretzels from one batch. Because of it's size and ease of use it has been pulled out several times already. I highly reccomend this to anyone who is looking for a smaller chocolate fondue pot. Think of it as a mini crock pot as that's what it reminds me of most.
Convient storage. The product shipped great.  Only problem was that one lid did not come with a seal on it so it had to be returned.  The colors are great and the storage is good.
FiestaWare brings color to life. This is a great set of dinnerware!! After 25 years, my husband and I decided to bring some color into our lives by replacing our wedding gift white Corelle with festive FiestaWare. How lovely to open the cabinets and see color!!! We've mixed colors and have an eight piece display of color. FiestaWare is not only beautiful, but durable.  And it can be put in the dishwasher, microwave, oven and freezer!!! It may cost a bit more than some of the trendy stuff available, but it's adaptability to all uses makes it a fabulous value!!! If you are at all tempted by it --- BUY IT!!!! You will LOVE it! Put some color in your life
Good sheets for the price. I have read all the reviews on this product and some people pick and complain about these sheets. They are 300 thread count for a SUPER CHEAP price. I think I paid like $15 for these babies and they are good for the money. Put them in the spare bedroom on the bed that gets used by your inlaws or infrequent comapny and they are just wonderful
Like New Pots After Every Meal!!. I am totally satisfied with this product! Out of all the other recommendations on the web for cleaning stainless steel pots/pans, this is the product that has worked the best. I have not been able to find it in any of our local stores so I was pleased to find it on Amazon.
I Love my NESCO !!!!!. I have had my nesco for 6 years and I have two of them. One is 6 quarts and the other one 18 quarts. I too was dissappointed with the fact that you had to pre-burn it out. But I was stuck and had to do it. What helped me through this was my air purifier. My sister bought her nesco in the winter time so she raised all of her kitchen windows up to help her through it.After the curing procedure, it was well worth it. I can cook a whole dinner in it. I just love it. Sometimes in life you have to go through pain to get to pleasure. I love this because it cooks bake potatoes. fish, hot dogs, pork chops, chicken, and steaks tenderly. Oh, and what it does to ribs is sinful -- it is so tender and good. In my 18 quart nesco; I put those babyback ribs on along with my secret seasonings and forget about it.I don't use it as a slow cooker because I basicly use it to cook healthier. I put the meat on the rack inside and all of the excess fats are drained into the well. I love cooking fish on the rack. I use it to steam my foods and the flavor is preserved that way. I have cooked string beans in aluminum foil and other vegetables on the rack with water at the bottom for steam and it has been wonderful for me.Once I had some friends over for dinner and I was serving pork chops, as you can guess, some of my family members decided to drop by. In the bottom of my freezer, I had some freezer burned pork chops that had been in a plastic bag for over a year. I took them out and seasoned and cooked them in the nesco and you could not tell them from my new pork chops buy appearance or taste.My nesco saved me. So this is why I love it so much. If you can get pass the burning process, it will be well worth it.Although there are far more ways to use this remarkable oven I use it to steam all of my foods because it doesn't tie me to the stove If I want my meat crunchier I leave it in the nesco longer.Yes, I would recommend this product and have recommended it to my sister and she loves hers.EditEdit your postsonnsett Radius  Initial post    Thank you for that review everything you said is true.  I have had my nesco for 6 years and I have two. One is 6 quarts and the other one 18 quarts.  I too was dissappointed with the fact  that you had to pre-burn it out.  But I was stuck and had to do it.   What helped me through this was my air purifier. My sister bought her nesco in the winter time so she raised all of her kitchen windows up to help her through it.After the curing procedure, it was well worth it. I can cook a whole dinner in it. I just love it.  Sometimes in life you have to go through pain to get to pleasure.  I love this because it cooks bake potatoes. fish, hot dogs, pork chops, chicken, and steaks tenderly.  Oh, and what it does to ribs is sinful --  it is so tender and good. In my 18 quart nesco; I put those babyback ribs on along with my secret seasonings and forget about it.I don't use it as a slow cooker because I basicly use it to cook healthier.  I put the meat on the rack inside and all of the excess fats are drained into the well. I love cooking fish on the rack. I use it to steam my foods and the flavor is preserved that way.  I have cooked string beans in aluminum foil and other vegetables on the rack with water at the bottom for steam  and it has been wonderful for me.Once I had some friends over for dinner and I was serving pork chops, as you can guess, some of my family members decided to drop by.  In the bottom of my freezer, I had some freezer burned pork chops that had been in a plastic bag for over a year. I took them out and seasoned and cooked them in the nesco and you could not tell them from my new pork chops buy appearance or taste.My nesco saved me. So this is why I love it so much. If you can get pass the burning process,  it will be well worth it.Although there are far more ways to use this remarkable oven I use it to steam all of my foods because it doesn't tie me to the stove If I want my meat crunchier I leave it in the nesco longer.Yes, I would recommend this product and have recommended it to my sister and she loves hers.Because you have to burn it out before you can use it I will have to give it 4 stars.  If we did not have to do that I would have given it five stars.     Jan 15, 2007 7:15 AM PST
Great for Cooking, Serving, & Storing *****. I took a chance on ordering these, and I'm glad I did.  They are heavy-duty!  I like the handles as I do a lot of microwave cooking and it's nice to be able to use the handles instead of having to have hotpads each time with the regular white corningware.  I've also used these in a convection oven, and them seem to work really great!  I picked the "Sapphire" color, and they are very attractive on the table as well!
Great little opener. Bought this for my Mom and had a chance to check it out and use it during a Thanksgiving visit.Pros:1. Very sturdy and feels well made.  Has great hand feel and I think it will last a good long time.  (I'll post an edit to this review if it doesn't!)2. Opens a wide variety of containers and should serve my Mom well with 90% of her opening needs.3) The portion of this tool that grips the lid to be opened has a semi-tacky feel and provides a good hold on the interior of the tool.Con:1. The exterior handle, where your hand contacts the tool, could be prone to slipping.  It's hard textured plastic with no rubber gripping surfaces and that concerns me.Again, this is based on a good amount of Thanksgiving usage, but no long term tests so far.  I'll re-post if this review changes based on my Mom's experience.-We
Great for the office!. I've had it for several months now, using it daily, and it's performed very well! Here is the deal with temperatures. If you place a hot cup of tea/coffee on it, it keeps it hot! Not the burn your tongue hot. As you drink, the cup becomes less full, and actually heats the contents more. Also, I've placed a half full cup of cold coffee on it, and it heated it up to a nice warm temperature within a few minutes. The heating plate will accommodate larger coffee mugs. The only disadvantage I've noticed with it is the counter gets rather warm were it is placed, so keep flammables and paper away to be safe. Also it does not have a auto shutoff that I'm aware of, however I have it plugged into a power box with motion control, so if I leave my desk for a long period it will shut off. I also try to make sure the bottom of my mug is dry before setting the cup down on it, to keep the heating plate clean. So if your like me and like sipping on tea or coffee at the office, with out going to refill for a hot cup every time your liquids get cold, then you'll be happy with this warmer
fresh step ease. Great product that makes everything so much easier and tidier.Our cats enjoy the crystal litter very much
Still learning... Having never worked at a Starbucks or otherwise, I only knew that I liked boutique coffees more than Folgers, et al.. Trusting the products lines of the local gourmet Kitchen Store, I tried many of their machines on display, noting ease of use as well as the final product. In many cases it came down to the obvious, personal taste and the particular "roast" being used. Trying to spend my $4.00/day specialty coffee money on a machine that would appeal to design, ease of use, reputation, functionality and most of all the coffee it ultimately produced made the JURA/Swiss made extremely attractive. I realize nearly $2000 for a coffee machine seems a little crazy to many, but you do the math. The short list included the slightly more expensive S8 with the dual heating elements for shorter down time, but the touch control LED won out for me. No looking back, I've been extremely pleased with the F9 and the automated promps are a "no-brainer".
Great Item and Great Value. This set is attractive and well made.  A great value for the money!  The crackers are nice and sturdy and I'm confident that they will stand up to years of hard use.  I am back to order additional sets as gifts for my seafood loving friends
Great Protection. This product is more substantial than the one we previously got from Cost Plus, works better, and has a small hole in the top for steam, useful. Keeps the mess on the plate
As easy as cutting warm butter... Why did I ever use the elbow greese and stone methode to sharpen my knives? I recieved this sharpener as a gift. setup was easy I just pulled it out of the box made a couple of miner settings then pluged it in. In a matter of minutes I was shapening my dull kitchen knives. The sharpening action is very easy, just run the knife through the first slot a few time then through the second slot a few more and with the aid of the electric motor my knives come out sharper then when new. I've used this sharpener 40 or so times now and it still puts a fantastic edge on my knives. This sharpener would've been well worth my investment with just the time I save not having to sharpen by hand, had I bought it for myself. It does it's job well
AMAZING. Hands down the absolute best cookware Ive ever tried, and I LOVE to cook!Ok so the debate about teflon getting hot and gassing off is scary. Swiss Diamond says they dont have the same problem as everyone else with the diamond coating, who really knows. The good news is that the diamonds really do work.They say they transfer heat better...oh ya. I have to cook with lower heat, so for me that pretty much lessens the hot teflon scare.The top of the skillet is just as hot as the bottom so the claim about heat transfer is true. Its amazing! They have the coating on the outside as well, I presume to transfer the heat quickly and uniformly.They say diamonds are slick... for sure. I can fry and egg with no oil, well allmost none, and come out sunny side up without breaking.Its thick, and cast. Pretty heavy, but thats a good thing for us. Its ok because the handle fits your hand. The vent is a great idea, and why anyone would make a lid you cant see thru doesnt get my hard earned buck!I am sold on German power tools, and use nothing else but German or Japaneese tools. ( no that does not incude Chinese)Now Im sold on Swiss cookware.  I will still never use a metal utensil even if they say its ok, because I dont want down time for a new skillet!I love this thing and would highly recomend it!I find myself planning dinner on what I can cook in my new tool!!!You will fall in love the minute you take it out of the box and hold it in your hand. Its so well made it just feels good, and you know it was worth every penny because its the last one you will have to buy!
Good job Drinkwell!!!. I have two cats and I definteley spoil them rotten!  When I first decided to get a water fontain for my cats I chose the Petmate Freshflow over the Drinkwell because the Drinkwell was more expensive and I was completely against the idea of listening to running water all day.  Unlike most customers I've heard from the Petmate worked farily well as a water BOWL.  It was easy to clean and my pump never stopped working as I've read many others did.  However, the water running down the little ramp really didn't satisfy my cats.  They did drink from it, but they would still jump at any chance to drink running water out of a faucet which is the whole reason I started thinking about getting them one in the first place.  About a ear and a half later I started thinking about getting them a new one and possibly going with the more expensive Drinkwell this time.  I saw the new Drinkwell Platinum and decided to go with it right away.  The Platinum is more expensive than both the previous models I was looking at but it is definteley worth the extra cost.  It's like Drinkwell took all the criticism and praise for both thier design and their competitors and created an exceptional pet drinking fontain.  I have had my Platinum for about 5 months now and have been very pleased with it.  The Drinkwell team designed the water outlet so that it would minimize the water from braiding which cuts down on the water noise. In fact at the setting I have mine, about mid way between low and mid level, I can't hear it at all!  They also put a little debris trap before the water even gets to the pump which should greatly increase the pumps life.  The water resevoir is also much bigger than that of my Petmate and the Drinkwell's optional larger resevoir on their original design.  All and all I veiw this as a time where a company actually went out there and designed their product by what thier customers wanted!!!  So after reading all that you maybe wondering why I only gave this product 4 stars.  Well the one thing that I would really like to see is that the actual bowl area be made of stainless steel or some ceramic mix which is totally what I have been told by several vets is the BEST material for any pet to be drinking/eating out of.  If they were to add that one extra feature than I would give this 5 stars out of 5 hands down!!!!!
Yes! A product that does what it promises to do. After spending hundreds of dollars and hours upon hours of my time washing my floor with Swiffer type products I got tired of pushing around dirty water and chemicals only to have to go over the floors with towels to sop up the remaining residue. I will admit I did not have high hopes for this $99 unit, though it promises to clean throughly I thought sure, thats what they all say, well I can tell you, this one actually does what it says it will! I washed my floor with the Swiffer mop, I waited till the floor dried and went over it with this unit you can not beleive the dirt that was on the units mop head. What really impressed me was when I lifted the rug next to the exposed tile and both colors matched, which meant the floor was just as clean as tile that had not been exposed to shoes. If this works this good on ceramic tile on high traffic areas I know this will be great for all its other uses.
It is a wooden spoon. I must confess that I do not use this spoon a whole lot, but when I do it serves its purpose well.  I have no complaints
Beautiful. These knives are so beautiful and sharp. Although a bit expensive, the quality is stunning. I purchased my set w/ a free cutting board($60 value) and and free shipping at Etronics.com for $299.99. I regret I did not purchase the 9 piece set for $399.99. This is one purchase you won't regret
I can still have kids!. I have had a Lapinator for six months now and it has performed exceptionally. It may not do much, but it does it well. Comfortable and lightweight, it works well while travelling or just as a desk to allow ventilation. The rubber pads adhere well and provide a decent grip. Virtually all heat is absorbed. As a bonus, any future children of mine will have this device to thank for allowing me to retain the means to procreate them.My only concerns: The questionable product name that seems hokey for a device of such simple elegance (my apologies to the inventor, who contacted me after my purchase and seems quite nice), and the size which does not allow me to pack it in my 15" laptop bag (but that is to be expected)
Excellent coffee. First, let me say that this product makes excellent coffee. I usually regret drinking regularly-brewed coffee because of the acid, but I've been drinking this cold-brewed coffee for two weeks now and have had NO ill after effects.The only reason I'm not giving it 5 stars is because it's basically just a couple of pieces of plastic, and so I'd consider it fairly overpriced for what you get.What you get is: a plastic carafe with snap-on lid, a container to put ground coffee in, a filter pad, and another container to put water in. Water empties through a small hole into the container with the ground coffee in it, and you let it sit over night. In the mornning, pop the cork out of the coffee container (on the bottom), and let the syrup drain into the carafe (through an included filter pad). That's it. You could, if you were motivated enough, make one of these out of those x-large soda cups from 7-11.But, the coffee is excellent. I've been using it to make iced coffee, and it's wonderful. One part syrup, 2-3 parts milk, a shot of chocolate syrup - and you've just saved yourself $5 from Starbucks. It's that good.It's easy to use, easy to clean, you only have to use it once every week or so (depending on how much coffee you drink), and the coffee is excellent. And it has low acid, to boot.(Disclaimer: I like mellower roasts of coffee. I've never been a fan of very strong, dark roasts - and that may factor into my appreciation of cold-brewed coffee. Smooth is how I'd describe it.)
Steam Fast A600-016 EZ Stand for Models SP-660, SF-661, and SF-680. Stand is sturdy. I'm satisfied with it
It's ok. It works as it should, but it really does not hold alot and has to be refilled often if you use sugar as much as I do.  I tried it with Splenda also and it did not work too good.  Splenda is to lite and airy.  If you like alot of sugar it gets alittle old pushing the button so many times.
Excellent item. This was exactly as expected and an ample size. It looks nice and is a better value than some of the cheap, too-small stainless steel ice buckets available out there. You'll need some tongs, though. I would not place it in the dishwasher due to the way the knobs are attached (threaded holes), but it is very simple to clean being stainless
LOVE THESE BOWLS. These are called "Fruit Bowl" but they are the perfect size for a couple of scoops of ice cream
Nice quality cotton sheets. My wife and I find these cotton sheets to be very comfortable.  The higher thread count makes them nice a thick
no soggy cookies. I got this cookie jar for Christmas. It was the style I have been looking for. I was aware of the review about soggy cookies, however I have not had that problem. Perhaps it has to do with location. I live in the Pacific Northwest. The size of the jar is great as well. I can actually fit all the cookies that are produced into the jar. Previous jars have not been able to hold as much
Great pad. This is a nice, thick pad, and an excellent bargain.  You probably won't find a better pad, especially at this price
Nice Sheets. These are great sheets.  They are comfortable, sturdy, and very well made.  The colors are also vibrant and there is an almost satin feel to them.  Definitely a quality purchase
Great product. I just bought this one a month ago, its work fine and take care of my hung 450sqft living room. The timer funtion is best, you can break it by 15min cycle (on & off) for more that 25 times.I am 100% satisfied.
Best Krumkake baker ever!!. After spending many years using a manual cast-iron stove-top Krumkake baker, shoulder arthritis made it impossible.  I actually dreaded the season and the Krumkake I always made to give as gifts.  With my new electric Krumkake baker, I just made a batch in only 1 hour (usually took 3 hours on the stove), no burned fingers and no shoulder arthitic problem!  And my very first krumkake turned out perfectly (it usually took me about 5 to "get it right" with my stove-top system).  Thanks for a terrific product and recipe.  I'll use it all year (not only at Christmastime)
The ultimate kitchen knife. I must say this is one fantastic knife.  It is the knife I usually use when prepping a meal (sandwiches don't count).  When I purchase a knife, I always personally sharpen it, so I can't really speak for the factory edge, but it accepts and holds an edge wonderfully.  Having the extra wide knife (along with added heft) has more of a curve to it allowing for an easy chopping motion.  I have purchased Henckel Pro S in the past and, after noticing a couple of flaws that passed their QC in my expensive knives, I will never purchase one without personally inspecting it first.  Wusthof has much better QC so I have no problem ordering them through the mail.FYI-This knife needs a large cutting board and a serious knife block to hold it.  I personally use the Wusthof 25-slot "mega" block and it fits in all three of the top chef knife positions. Overall this knive is an investment, but you will love it!
Use no other knives!. I have owned my set of Miracle Blade III knives for over 2 years now and they have NEVER dulled! I use one of the smaller knives as a utility knife in the kitchen to open both packages and to cut small vegetables and the other knives for their designed purpose. When I go to someone else's house, it is still so frustrating to use their knives, which do not perform as well as my own! A must for anyone who cooks! I have given an extra knife I had as a gift!
Daryl. Our son & daughter-in-law gave us this model for Christmas in 2005 & we love it. In 2006 we gave them this same model
Cup is exquisite and perfectly balanced in saucer. I have this cup and am very satisfied with it.  The design is elegant and lovely to say the least.  I enjoy it very much.
my favorite pan. I only have one All-Clad pan (I'd like to have more). I love this little pan. I use it all the time for cooking different things:  a hamburger, some linguicia (portuguese sausage), and  eggs. I use some canola oil in it for something that might stick (such as an egg). I have NO problem cleaning it at all! As soon as I am done frying something, I put some water in the pan. Whatever might be stuck to it comes right off...even better than with a non-stick surface. Having used 'cheap' pans my whole life, it was amazing the difference it makes using a pan that works the way it should. It makes cooking fun!  Love my little pan
Great Product but Poor Shipping!. My only complaint is that Amazon does not properly pack their products.  It took 3 attempts to get them here with out any damage!  The canisters are pretty and are able to hold a large amount of product
Excellent quality, attractive and does the job!!. I ordered one of these gates to fit a large opening (68") between the foyer and living room.  Prior to ordering this gate I was using ugly, plastic garden fencing to keep my little dogs out of the living area.  This gate looks terrific.  It was easy to put the pieces together.  It's sturdy and I was so pleased I ordered 3 more to block the dogs from other areas of the house.  It's very easy to step over, too.Probably wouldn't work for large dogs or hyper little dogs that jump.  But my little dogs see the gate and walk off and ignore it
Great quality. I was very impressed with this duvet cover. I searched a long time for a quality cover at a reasonable price. I highly recommend this one. It was super soft, overall a good product
Very Loud but powerful. A very nice blender... It crushes and purees, just about anything.. I've had it for three years now and it is still in great condition, and still very powerful... VERY LOUD! You might need ear protection as you use this.  I often turn it on, leave the room, do something else, and come back in when I think it is done!  I'm not kidding!:
Not as bad as the reviews... I agree these aren't the softest I've ever felt, but I wasn't expecting Egyptian cotton for $30 bucks, either, so I didn't think they were nearly as bad as the reviews I read.  My 6 year old son loves them and says they are comfortable...(I did not purchase the comforter, though - he has a down comforter, which may add to the overall comfort of his bed)...I did use a few fabric softener sheets on the first wash..
By far the BEST coffee maker I've ever owned... Who wouldn't want to wake up every morning and have not only freshly-brewed, but freshly-ground coffee waiting for them???  No, we don't have a butler...  we have a Coffee Team!Ok... I'll admit the price of this coffee maker seemed a little high in the beginning.  My husband is a coffee fanatic and I wanted to get him a coffee maker for his birthday that would hopefully last longer than 6 months and reduce his morning coffee-making time.Immediately after discovering the Coffee Team I started doing the math on how many Starbucks drive-thru trips my husband could make for the price of this coffee maker and realized that in the end this would be more cost-effective for our budget.I can't say enough about the quality of this coffee maker.  I was initially skeptical as the coffee pot part appeared to be similar to several of the other no-longer-functioning coffee makers we have lying around our garage.  I will admit that there isn't anything super-fancy about the actual coffee-maker part itself, but it is the incredible attached burr grinder, water filter and array of digital settings that sets this coffee maker apart.It comes with a manual and a video.  We never watched the video, but we did study the manual to figure this thing out.  Once you get your settings right and make a couple of pots of coffee, it is really quick and easy to whip up a pot of fabulous coffee.I love to drink coffee, but was notorious for making coffee too strong or too weak.  Also, I could never really figure out how much to grind to make the perfect coffee.  The Coffee Team really makes it easy to make a great cup of coffee without having to over-think it!We love the three separate strength settings (mild, medium and strong) which actually change the flavor (unlike some of the other coffee pots we've tried).  This really comes in handy when we switch from milder to richer beans.  We also appreciate the ability to switch the number of cups we make with the touch of a button.  It also has a reminder light to change the water filter (which I need!).  I never realized how much water quality affected coffee, but now I can definitely tell when the filter needs to be replaced.  I was a little skeptical about having to buy replacement filters, but they are only $10 for a 3-pack sold here at Amazon.  Spend more than $25 and they'll ship 'em to you for free!I will warn you that when you switch coffee brands or flavors you may need to make small adjustments to the settings for different beans, but ultimately this coffee pot always makes a great cup of coffee!I highly recommended the Coffee Team as the ultimate gift for the coffee-lover in your life!!
Cake pans. These pans are made by Ekco and durable.  The nice thing is they do not brown the edges like the tephlon coated ones.  Just be sure to use wax paper on the bottom and they will come out with ease
Awesome for dorms, tea drinkers. This kettle is amazing.  It's simple -- you plug it in and flip the switch (a light turns on to let you know it's working).It heats very quickly, &lt;5 minutes for a full kettle of boiling water and if you only want a cup or two for tea, it heats in about 3.For students in dorms, you can use it for oatmeal, soup, tea.  Automatically cuts off after boiling for a minute, so no worries about fire hazards.  Great product, I use it every day.
I like it!. We had an ancient Kitchen Aid and I loved it... but always had to store it in the cupboards since it was so big and clunky.  Our daughter now has it and is happy with it.  We bought the Hamilton Beach mixer and I like it almost as much as the Kitchen Aid.  The best thing about it is that the mixer lifts up, making things a bit easier.  The only slight complaint I have is that the medium to high speed is a big jump... it's a little too fast for what I want, most of the time.  Another plus is that it sits beautifully on my counter
Great tank for about THREE fish. Tank is well built but the plastic scratches easily.  The rule of thumb is 1inch per galon and if you intend to buy a Goldfish with this baby you should not exceed 3.  I have 4 Neon tetras and a betta. The betta is bullet proof (can breath air) but one of my neo's isnt looking to great.  Im considering moving the Neos into a larger tank and leaving just the Betta in this tank
Gift well received. My daughter is thrilled with the quality and heft of the knives
Very nice. Bought as a filler to get free shipping. Gave to a friend who owns a ot of this design - she loved it
Well-made, generous sized; makes roasting nearly fool-proof. Fabrication quality is very good, with polished exterior, machine-turned base, sturdy handles, and thick walls. Because it's aluminum, it's not so heavy that handling it becomes awkward.Slip even a large bird with ease into this roaster, sprinkle with spices, pour a can of chicken broth into the bottom, and roast in a 325-degree oven for three and a half to four hours with the lid on. Then raise the temp to 350 and take the lid off for another 15 minutes or so. Your bird is perfectly moist throughout, delicately crisped on top, and clean-up is quick and easy.What's not to like?
Highly Functional!. I purchased this colander for my mother's birthday after the paint chipped on her last much "fancier" colander.What I like about this stainless steel colander:-It's five quarts. My mother's last colander only held three quarts, which is really inadequate if you are cooking a spaghetti dinner for more than a few people.-It's functional. The stainless steel won't break, won't chip, and won't rust. It's sturdy and reliable.-It's more than functional. Hey, the colander has a cute fruit pattern. It's unnecessary, it's not spectacular, but why not! It adds visual interest to what would otherwise be a fairly basic colander.What I don't like about this colander:-It's a little wide. Its width makes the colander hard to store. You can hang the colander from a hook on your backsplash if kitchen space is an issue.
A bit too big but excellent quality. I purchased two of these hampers for my daughters age 9 and 5.  I have had them for a few months now and, so far, there is no damage to them!  They are a bit too big for my daughters to carry down the stairs to our laundry room so I have them empty them when they are about half full and that works just fine.  They are very cute and the quality is excellent
Very cool. Just what I expected...very cool look and well made.  Great turnaround shipping time from seller.  Would highly recommend
Great product. I have had my steamer for about 3 years now and I love it.  I haven't used the iron in ages.  It heats up fast and does a great job. It also sits flat, which most small steamers do not do; this is convenient if you want to set it down to grab the next article of clothing. I bought one for my son and my niece.  I tell people forget the iron, just get this steamer. You can use it on almost all fabrics, unless the label states don't use steam. I even take it when I travel, because it is pretty light weight.
SIMPLY THE BEST. This Mission Folding Bookcase is simply the best. Although I wanted a black bookcase but the natural is also great and it took me about 5 minutes to put it up since no assembly was needed.
Realllly convenient!. I've had a couple of these divided containers for 3-4 years now. Unlike some Tupperware products, you can't just throw this in a tote bag and expect it to not leak at all if it goes somewhat vertical. BUT, that said, for the price, it's great. Love the fact that it's entirely see-through. Perfect for taking leftovers for lunch to work.
Excellent little kitchen tool!!!. I got this as a gift from my mother when I moved to my first apartment away from home. She already had one, and loved it. I use mine quite frequently, and makes quick work of dicing onions and peppers for philly steaks or burgers. My brother and father have also since purchased these units. I have had mine going on 5 years now, not a problem with it. great value, good gift for cooks for one or two, who do not need a huge unit to chop stuff.
Great for pancakes. This griddle does a great job on pancakes, but I've found that it's a bit slow for sausages and bacon. It's easy to clean (fully immersible without the cord, and non-stick) and, although large, easy to store in my small kitchen, where it sits above the microwave, ready to be used for pancakes
First to review... what you pay for is what you get. Hello all amazon users,First person to review this item leaves a so-so favorable impression.  The image is deceiving as you do not get a glass lid with the wok.  Handles are not wooden but rather 2 stubby iron wings that you grab on to.  Other than that, this sucker is heavy.  Good in the send that when you are actually stir frying your stuff, you are not moving the wok around.  The base is pretty thick so heat will be uniformly dispersed.  What you pay for is what you get,  I can't complain.  Add on the 25 off 125 purchase so it's a good deal.
What a great indulgence!. After reading every review on deep fryers I could find, I finally decided on this one.  It has been great and I couldn't ask for anything better or more easy to use.I put it on my cooktop and let my big hood suck away any odors.  It heats up quickly and the food has always come out great.  We made donuts after cooking shrimp and halibut with no cross-odors or tastes!  My family only tolerates fish, so this was greatly appreciated.Cleanup is easy also.  After waiting for the oil to cool, the pan, lid and rack can go into the dishwasher.  Only the heating element has to be cleaned by hand and it is quite easy.  The oil can be used many times without problems and so it is more economical to use than I originally thought it would be.I would recommend this with no caveats
Corningware success. The mug alone costs 6.99, so the kit for 16.99 is a bargain. I love the mug size, its handle and vent lid. I would prefer an on and off button for the warmer, but it does keep my coffee warm. I don't know if I'll ever use the lunch bag but it is well made
Easiest Ice Cream ever. I was a little worried about buying a reconditioned ice cream maker, but when it arrived it was just like brand new, including all original packing, perfect. I was also afraid that it would be too underpowered to freeze the sorbets and ice creams adequately, but again, it was quite strong in this regard, and froze the mixtures perfectly. Admittedly, doesn't make a huge amount, but the convenience of not having to constantly add ice cubes and salt in the old wooden tub machine MORE than makes up for it. And it's WAY quieter than the old fashioned freezers. ALSO it was half the price of a new one. BUY IT!
Beautiful honey server. I love this honey pot; the design is dainty but the pot itself is really good-sized.  A beautiful accompaniment to the matching tea set
good, attractive product. this is a good, attractive, and solid wine rack.  Assembly was a bit more trouble and time consuming than you might expect (and assembly instructions could be better), but assembly was not all that bad in the end for one this size.  I am very happy with it
works well enough. This sharpener does not work with a thick blade. However, it is fantastic for your thinner bladed knifes. Steak, pocket, paring, everyday chopping knifes come out very sharp.The only complaint I have is, after going thru the initial sharpening stage; using the second and third wheels result in kicking out the blade about 3/4 way thru. Similar to a table saw kicking out lumber back at you. Mine is new and has only seen use once (all of my knifes), and I don't know if there's a "breaking in" period. It'll be awhile before I use it again because it works quite well. But for now I would recommend it
Henckels knife block. I saw the same product at a leading retail store for a much higher price.  I'm very happy with the knife block and with the price.  My old knife block looked grungy and didn't hold as many knives
Our fondue fountain. We bought this fountain with the intention of using at our wedding later this year. We've already tried it out with chocolate, and it was wonderful! So much fun just to look at, let alone dip into, and there are so many possibilities for types of dipping items. Plus, although there were a lot of pieces to clean, everything breaks down easily and cleans quite simply. We're looking forward to trying it with cheese, too. Just make sure to read the directions and maintenance warnings before using it, to be sure it works properly, and lasts a long time. This is definitely a fantastic item to own, and entertain with
fast means hot. I have had 3 microwave rice cooker before this. They were always hard to meet my satisfaction, andante, that was the problem.The last one was even from Thailand from my trip and it did not work well, either.But when I found this from here, I wanted to test if it works any better. I noticed the cone shaped bottom. And, I think it makes the difference after all.I cooked rice in it either with the zatarain's prepared rice sachet or any rice for steaming. they all turned out great. If it is getting dry-because each microwave has different wattages, you have to figure out how long it takes to cook great sticky rice. If the rice turns out too dry, I just add one cup of water and boil for another min. and simmer it. Never ever failed once.The reason for 4 star is for pop corn issues. I followed the instruction for the right amount and the time. But it would only pop the half of it in  2.5min. And, I have to empty the first popped corns and run for another 2 min to pop the rest. But then again, I have Panasonic Microwave (Panasonic NN-T795SF Full-Size 1.6-Cubic-Foot 1,250-Watt) and some reviewer below already warned that popping corn in Panasonic could be disastrous. And, I am watching it all the time.The popping corns left some brown mark at the bottom but the container itself is really sturdy and would not get stained from zatarain's rice.So, for rice cooking mainly, I would recommend this steamer
12" Metal Table Fan = FANTASTIC. GREAT FAN!  GREAT COLOR!  EASY TO CLEAN, & A GREAT PRICE!  QUICK DELIVERY!  WHAT ELSE COULD YOU ASK FOR
So Soft. These sheets were everything that I hoped them to be. They have been washed several times times now ...they have come out beautifully. They will be the softest sheets that you have ever laid on....terrific buy...you must buy these sheets
Toast  comes out like it's been sunning in St. Tropez!. First let me say that I decided on this oven because I refuse to spend a lot on another toaster oven.  They don't live a long time (except for the Cuisinart), and so why spend top dollar?  I love this oven.  I also purchased it at Costco ($60.00).  It was replacing my old, would never buy again Delonghi Toaster Oven, and a Panasonic Infrared Toaster Oven that went right back to Amazon after 3 days. The only thing that compares is the Cuisinart convection toaster oven that I had.  It was THE PERFECT TOASTER OVEN, but a little too small for our needs.  If you don't need a big oven, don't mess with anything else and get the Cuisinart!Yes, it takes eons to make toast in this baby.  (Way more than 6 minutes.  Most often between 8-11 minutes!) It's a big oven.  But, unlike the other reviewer, my toast, no matter what kind of bread, turns out perfectly golden like my bread was sitting out in St. Tropez. The rack must be in the center position and shaped like a "U" when looking at it from the front for the perfect slice. It also can handle nearly 6 full english muffins at one time. (Great for big families.)  I have also found that it will toast things one right after another without getting increasingly browner with each batch. (But it does get faster, with each successive batch.)I would like having the unit interior 1/2" larger from side to side.  It will nearly fit a 9"x13" pan, I mean by less than 1/3"!...which would be great in summer to almost never use my big oven.  So, I'm not sure why the manufacturer wouldn't have gone the extra 1/2".  I mean, it's already a huge oven...might as well go for it.  If you are a small family, or have a super small kitchen, this oven might not be for you.  I have a small kitchen, but a family that likes to eat, so this oven, while taking a lot of space, does a lot of work for us, and is worth it.The bell when toast is done, is not that loud.  So, if you are in another part of the house doing something, you might not hear it.I have made toast, 12" pizza, baked potatoes, fries and chicken strips, muffins, cookies, brownies, roasted chicken, and more in this oven.  They all came out beautiful.I don't like that I can't tell when it is up to temperature for baking, so I have an instant read thermometer to tell me when it is ready.  (And yes, it takes forever to get up to temp.) My oven temp is lower than what it reads on the digital touch screen, but it has not adversely affected my baking.So, with those caveats, I still love this toaster oven.  I can't recommend it for everyone, but if you identify with my likes and dislikes in this review, you will like this machine
Excellent for Saving Space!. I bought this power station because my husband and I had charging cords all over the place.  Our phones and my PDA were being charged in all ends of the house.  This thing is really great!  It keeps the cords neatly inside it, only requires one electrical outlet and is also a handy little holder for the items charging.  Most everyone who has seen it at work at our house has been equally impressed with it.  I highly recommend it for the organizationally challenged.  Everything you need to charge will be in one place and ready to go
my favorite kitchen untensil. I love my red Joyce Chen kitchen scissors, which is what prompted me to give them to my sister-in-law and brother for Christmas this year. They cut perfectly and are in daily use
strong and attractive. This blender is outstanding -- powerful and pretty.  Should have been - however -- "dishwasher safe"
diane. wonderful.. actually as good as I had hoped it would be.  Only wish it had an on/off switch. Plugging in is the on switch
Now I can cook like the pros!. Feel just like Giada and dip out that pasta...  It is a great product with a super long handle for large pots.  I love it.  I gave one as a gift, too
Success on an Australian Shepherd. We have an Aussie/Healer mix (we think...she was a foundling) with a thick, soft coat. I've had her professionally groomed once a year for about 7 years at $60 to $75 a pop so last summer I decided to try it myself with this clipper kit.  To make a long story short, she didn't turn out so bad! (Well, the neighbors didn't laugh, anyway!) It took me a while to get the hang of it--I finally chucked the various combs and went with the bare clippers--but she didn't complain and I had a "cool" dog for much less $$$ than a pro cut.  The best part was I could keep her trimmed all summer as her heavy coat grew back.  No report as yet how long the blades last, but I'm already money ahead even if I must replace them next year
Great machine. After borrowing my finances grandmother's Ronco I bought this unit. I couldn't be happier. It does a great job. Fast, no tray rotating or swapping. Easy clean up. Makes great jerky, fruits, etc. Inexpensive and powerful. Highly recommend.
Bought it for looks. I love this coffee maker, but I don't drink coffee: My husband does. I bought it for the hot water spigot!! I love, love it! I drink hot tea all day long and it is so convenient to have the spigot; however, the main reason I purchased this Waring Pro is because it looks commercial/professional and very sleek on a counter top
Treat Yourself !!. You know when you get new pillows and they don't "fit" right and it takes a week or two before you get them to squish just right ?From the moment I put my head down on these feather/down pillows I was home.  I had been nursing a feather/down pillow from my childhood (and I am 50+!!) because it was so comfy.  I bought other pillows, but still used the old feather/down one on top, next to me.The old feather/down pillow has now gone to its reward and I am sleeping luxuriously with FOUR of these wonderful pillows. I didn't need four, but they look beautiful, plump, and succulent on my bed (I do go on !)You will not be disappointed....and there is NO SMELL, the Royal Velvet cover feels like a fine fabric, and they even come in their own individual plastic zipper tote..complete with handle !
Love it!. It was a little tricky to put together by myself, and the instructions could have been clearer....but now it's done, and I LOVE my new sofa!  It's so much nicer than I expected to get for this price.  I highly recommend the matching tables, too
Very pleased, Great for larger Tanks. I have a 90 gallon tank and sometimes I don't want to perform a water change to get the bottom of the tank clean. I had the multi-vac previously. I have no issues with that except over time, the pieces won't stay together. I bought the sludge extractor (PETCO) and I love it. It reaches to the bottom of my tank and I didn't have to drain any water. The pressure on the vacuum was more than adequate. I was a bit relunctant on the proce, but I'm happy I did buy it and would recommend it to others. Just shop around for the lowest price
Good quality. I bought these because I wanted silicone trivets, but it was cheaper to get a set of potholders.  Actually I haven't seen any that are cheaper, especially since you mostly only have the option of buying one at a time.  I love that they double as potholders, trivets, and jar openers.  I wasn't convinced they'd make a good jar opener, but I tried it and they work!  I gave the product four stars only because as trivets I don't think they are the best looking to have on your dining table
Amazing Sheet Pan. This was the first non- nonstick pan that I bought and it has converted me. I use this more often than any other pan in my kitchen. If you want to make biscuits or scones and you don't want the bottom to burn, you must use one of these.
Pet Training Mat. I got this mat for my Bengal Cat Tristan who loves to jump on my counters. The mat has three setting, Low, Medium and High. The first time he jumped up and landed on the mat(I used the low  setting)he went up in the air and re-landed on the mat with all four paws. He did not go into the kitchen for a day and we bribbed him with treats at that. He stood and staired at the counter but did not jump back up. The mat has a mild shock on low and we have leaned on it ourselves and gotten shocked but it is enough for him not to jump up again on it. It takes some time to break the habit,and I have other counters still to do. But it works great. The only down side it when leaving on the counters everytime you need to use the counter you have to turn off the mat and move it. I don't have a lot of counter space so this effects me more than some I am sure
warm. Love it..so warm and great quality..great price...it is exactly what I have been looking for
The best book light ever. I got two (black and silver), one for my daughter and one for myself. We both like them. It is very bright (both pages completely covered!), easy on eyes and as a bonus batteries last a long time. Turns on fast, clips on a book very easy and secure. A bit bulky to carry around but quality of the light worth it. Very well made
Big, Loud, but makes a difference. The difference in the air quality is noticable.  I haven't tried to clean it yet, but it looks like it shouldn't be too difficult.  One gripe is the blue led's.  Would be nice to turn them off but still use the functionality (especially since they are purely for decoration
A great starter piece or addition to your Le Creuset collection. Le Creuset manufactures porcelain enameled cast iron cooking vessels as well as other products. These cooking vessels are cast from molten iron poured in sand moulds that are used only once. For this reason, one pot may look like another, but each is unique in its own way.Cast iron is a highly efficient material which absorbs and distributes heat efficiently. It is recommended to use low to medium heat when cooking with cast. There are a few exceptions like boiling water where cooking on high heat is appropriate and okay. Otherwise, cooking with high heat may cause food to stick, discolor the enamel coating, or cook the food unevenly. Remove cast iron from the heat and it does not cool off quickly. This helps your food stay warm while serving. Beware; iron tends to be heavy so these cooking vessels tend to be heavy as well.Cast iron is an effective material for cooking so why cover it with enamel? Iron tends to rust; iron oxide (rust) doesn't add any complimentary flavors to your food. If your cast iron cooking vessel was not enameled, you would have to season and maintain it. Adding the porcelain enamel not only looks good, but has multiple benefits. The enamel, being a solid coating, is one of the most hygienic surfaces to cook on, does not stain, absorb odors, retain flavors, and is easy to clean. The enamel can be damaged, so limit cooking tools to plastic or wood.The benefits of cooking with Le Creuset cast iron are many, but lets get down to the soup pot specifically. 4 1/4 quarts is not a whole lot of space when it comes to making soups, consider your recipes when determining the size you need. The soup pot tends to do best if at least 3/4 full. Any less and you may overwhelm your food with the pot's evenly dispersed heat.The pot has flat bottom that broadly curves up the sides to 4 inches high making stirring your soup simple.  Atop internal diameter of about 10 1/2 inches makes for a wide top allowing room for a whole chicken. The tight fitting lid is slightly angled sealing in heat, moisture, and flavors. Use the lid to hold your meat while you are making a sauce from the drippings, or holding your prepared vegetables while creating your culinary feast. Its shape and design makes this an extremely versatile pan. I tend to cook large amounts so this pan is usually used for mole de pollo, chili con carne, chicken and dumplings, tomato sauce, and soups.Once you get beyond the basic functionality, the soup pot can really open up the possibilities. Keep in mind this is a 4 1/4 quart pan with about a 10 1/2 inch diameter, perhaps the optimal pan for families from 2-4. Some possibilities for this pan besides soups include rice pilaf, roasted chicken, braising, steamed artichokes, Jell-O molds, and assembling a baked Alaska.One feature that people tend to complain about is the cost. The cost does seem steep compared to other pans made from other materials. Cast iron doesn't seem like it should be expensive, compared to the old cast iron pans past generations have used for cornbread and camping. However the manufacturing process requires making a mould for each and every pan produced. These heavy pans then go through an enameling process before being shipped. If you take what goes into making and distributing these high quality cast iron products, the cost tends to make sense. Then consider that this pan will easily last a lifetime when taken care of.PROS:Efficient absorption and distribution of heatHygienic enamel cooking surfaceDoes not stain, absorb odors, or retain flavorsEasy to clean when not abused or misusedCan be transferred from stove top to the oven to the tableCan easily last a lifetimeCONS:Its heavy, as cast iron tends to be weighing in at about 10 pounds
great coffee maker. This is a great little coffee maker. I was extremely impressed with this item. It works great and is a great value. I keep it in my office and I love it. It is easy to use, easy to clean and works like a machine that costs twice the price. I like the options of using either the pods or regular coffee grounds. I haven't had any problems with this product
Great Match. Even when I bought the Fiestawere Cinnabar creamer I loved it right away, but to order the Cinnabar Covered Suger Bowl from a nother seller and have them match so well.  I am so happy that my sugar bowl is such a perfect match. Thank
These work great. Their design makes them easy to get in and out, and the company that sells them through Amazon is prompt and easy to deal with
It does its job well - there are things to note. I like this product and I use it nearly every day - it goes well with a french press, and heating water to 200 deg F is its primary function. At other times I used it to help a large pot of water (for cooking pasta) come to a boil much sooner.Things to note:- The brushed exterior is convenient, it doesn't pick up smudges like a polished one would- The 2qt capacity is great when boiling water for a larger pot- It's fast. It gets water to a boil very quickly, especially if you don't fill the whole pot - 1qt will boil really quickly, not just in half the time of 2qts- The indicator window gets steamed and is barely of use. OK, I see how much to not fill it (Max line)- The switch appears flimsy but there's not much to stress it- A subtle red light indicates the switch is on. Initially I used to leave the switch on after pouring out the water, but now I know what to look for. At this point I don't regret that it could have been brighter, because it stays subtle in the kitchen. In a multi-user kitchen you might want to mention that the ON indication is very low-key.- When boiling, the kettle takes a bit more delay than I'd expect to switch off and indicate the water's boiling (with a quiet click). By that time the sound of bubbling alerts me- I haven't detected any weird smell, I did two boils with fresh water before using it- The spout is definitely designed for slow pouring. It doesn't spill a drop. However, if you're trying to dump the water out really fast, like into a large pot, slow down or you'll get a trickle down the sides because the spout won't handle the volume- There's a fine mesh filter across the spout to catch any scaling if it ever occurs (not seen it yet but I have an undersink filter) and I remove that to stick a thermometer to catch it short of boiling. Would have been nice to get something where I could simply set the temperature rather than monitor the kettle - but that would be a different product altogether.- The lid is nice, opens gently- I wondered whether I could heat vegetable stock in it, but I think that better be left to the 670 or 675 that you see on Good Eats - the electric hot pot that looks like a kettle but with perfectly vertical sides. This has a tube in it and its shape won't lend well to thorough cleaning. I'll stick to water.- It feels like it sits loose on the base, but that's what makes it easy to pick up and put down. The base doesn't get lifted with the kettle, so it's nice in that. The cord is solid and has a three-pronged plug at the end.All in all, it feels solid and can do what it's supposed to do. I fault it a star for trickling when I try to pour the water very quickly, and for the odd placing of the level indicator, the difficulty of being able to reach in and deep clean anything. I'd probably give it 4 1/2 stars if that was possible
Wilton course 1 book. If you are like me unable to take Wilton course 1 class or just want to get a head start before taking the class. This book is a great investment for you. All the method taught in course 1 class are given here with step by step color picture. If you don't are unable to master the skills that is fine, just practice and practice you will be ok (I suggest you use a large flat dinner plate instead of the practice board, its much easier to clean up or re-use the buttercream).I learned how to make butter cream roses and shells thanks to this book in addition to wilton's website video. I suggest everyone to invest on this book (you can always sell it later if you no longer want it).
Chantal 48-ounce Tea Steep. I love this tea pot. It's sturdy, colorful and just the right size
Excellent Duvet for Little Money. The price of this item is excellent for the quality you get.  It is extra soft and the blue color was exactly what I was looking for.  It did give off quite alot of lint when I washed it but that did not affect the quality of the item.  The duvet also did not shrink and I have washed it several times so far.  If you are looking for something to keep you warm and cozy I highly recommend this item, for the price it cannot be beat
Braun KF550. Delivers a pot of coffee very quickly.  Only had it a month so cannot say if the filter will extend the life of the device
great for wool rugs, upholstery. This is the tool for those surfaces that seem to suck in pet hair and refuse to let it go.  It's not a quick removal tool (think more along the lines of scrubbing a floor than vacuuming), but for things like wool dhurrie rugs, it saves the expense of frequent professional cleanings or and is quicker than trying to pull the hair up with those sticky tape fur removal things.  It really does pull up tons of fur, even from deep in a rug
I can use on my glass top. This is a solid piece. It doesn't swivel around on my glass top stove. It's great to have a griddle on two burners! I love this item
Love this mug!. I've had a set of 4 of these mugs and LOVE them. They are green rather than clear. They hold just the right amount of coffee and the flared top helps prevent accidental spilling unless you like to fill your mug to the brim. I'm looking for a replacement for one of them which had to be disposed of because the bottom cracked when it was left on a mug warmer when it was empty. Looks like I may have to buy a complete of 6
A great coffeemaker. Because of its design, this coffeemaker isn't subject to the kind of clogging that plagues most one-cup coffeemakers. The arrangement of drip holes in the cone is downright ingenious -- no buttons to push or levers to press. And it turns itself off when it's finished. I think it's terrific
Good for the price. PROS: Works well. Heats fast, auto-shutoff feature and visible water level are nice.CONS: Putting kettle on base requires lining up 3 slots which takes a little extra care and might result in damage to contacts if you're not careful.
Great for Musicians. I use this for my brass ensemble ([...], we often play in chirches with few light, this LED lights are just what we need, they are really bright (and white lights) and cover both music sheets on the music stand. They also last very long with 3 AAA batteries
Does liquids well. I've only had mine for a little over a week, but I've already used it for chopping, slicing, and lots of pureeing.The unit is sturdily built, heavy and powerful, just as others describe.But I want to comment on liquid jobs. If you are considering this unit for liquids, don't be scared off by the negative reviews. The shaft does indeed only rise halfway up in the bowl (this allows the minibowl and blade to sit on top/inside of the main bowl), so you cannot fill the unit to the top with liquid and expect it to be completely leak-free.On the other hand, I've made mayonnaise, pureed for thin soup and made baba ganoush, and I did not end up with liquid/food all over the counter. I had barely a leak, and when I did, it was because I was stil learning the position the blade had to be in for removal, and so when it pulled off, a little leaked through the bowl hole.It *is* important to not fill liquids too high, though this is true of any mixer/processor. Imagine trying to mix cake batter with a spoon in a bowl that you had filled too high -- stuff will fly out! The same is true of a processor.However, that does not reduce it to a 4-cup capacity as someone claimed. I made a thin pureed soup and got more than 7 cups out of it. The bowl hole is about halfway up, so you won't get much more than that unless it's thick (like my baba ganoush).Anyway, use some common sense and this excellent product will treat you fine. But if you need to be able to process 8 or 10 or more cups of thin liquid at a time, you need to buy a larger unit than this one
Amazing Vacuum. I like to clean.  I don't like a lot of noise.  This vacuum cleans beautifully when it's not even on full power.  I have bare floors and rugs, it handles both with ease.  I did purchase the brush head for rugs, although I'm not sure I needed to.  However, I am happy I did, since I like a thorough clean.  I've used shop vacs in the past, more inexpensive run of the mill vacs and for tough construction jobs, I'd use a shop vac.  Only beacause I wouldn't want to ruin the miele.  The miele is very powerful however and very quiet.  We have a 2 month old and she is soothed when I use it.  You can't beat the design as well, it's really pretty.  Anyhoo, I read some review where the person was upset they had to buy the brush extension for their rugs.  Well, I'm glad I did and I don't see myself getting another vacuum for years, which will end up in an overall savings
Great for little ones!. I have to say I LOVED these at first, but after only a few months of use all of mine have broke. The little white sticks that shape the box broke through the seems at the top. I could stitch them closed...but now my kids think they are for sword fighting. I am disappointed. I would still give them 5 stars if they held up but now I would have to go down to 1.I wasn't sure if this would work for my 2 yr old because they collapse. To my suprise they are working BETTER...the biggest problem I have is him dumping his toys flipping over the toy boxes and standing on them. This is not very safe right...since the top of the dresser is usually where he goes :)Whats worse is you spend 5 or 6 bucks on the plastic ones and he stands on the side and breaks them, and they take up alot of space. These boxes are primary colors perfect for kids, large and they can't stand on them because they just won't hold a kids weight...perfect for me. When you open them up be careful to check inside because they are packed with silica gel bags...each of mine had 2. NOT GOOD EATS for a toddler. I think they are great and I am getting a few more
A New Experience in Cutting. Clean, elegant, easy to use and clean, but this cutting board has an aesthetic appeal that goes beyond mere functionality. Clean lines, thinner than most boards, and the look and feel of wood without the practical (and bacterial) problems.A joy to use
a perfect addition.... a perfect addition for any kitchen--attractive and functional--shipped quickly and arrived intact--the price was very competativ
Love this Machine!. I upgraded to the DeLonghi from a 10 year old Mr. Coffee espresso machine, and the difference is amazing.  The machine is easy to use and makes a great cup of espresso with a great crema.  I have used both the pods and my own espresso, and both come out great.  The frother works very well also.  The only negatives are that the cup warmer on the top doesn't seem to work (but I don't think I would use it anyway), it is larger than I had hoped and I have limited counter space, and the reservoir doesn't hold a great deal of water. Overall, I would highly recommend this machine.
Ladder Shelf. This was a Christmas gift for my daughter.  She said that people really liked and her room mate was thinking of getting one
Wonderful, beautiful, and durable cookware!. This set is really nice.  It warms up super fast and retains heat longer due to the cast iron.  It looks wonderful hanging in my kitchen too!! The pots have been used heavily and still no chips.  Cleans up super easy with soap and water (I have never tried the dishwasher). It is a heavy set, but the bestest of quality
Handy items for canning. I wish I had had these things last year. The magnetic stick saves much time and unnecessary hot water burns trying to fish lids out of boiling water. Thanks
Classy toaster. We purchased two of these toasters. We've been using the first one for about a year and have been completely satisfied. Usually, we hide our small appliances under the counter, but this toaster so classy (in its retro way) that we keep it out all of the time. We just purchased the second one as a wedding present, so hope the newlyweds like it as much as we do
Can't do without one. I got a Mogu person pillow a few years back for christmas, and have slept with it everyday since.  My original one was getting flat from all the wear, so I bought another here at Amazon.  I just love the pillow!  Amazon got it to me in no time flat. I must warn you that these pillows not only fun, but addicting.  You won't be able to do without one either.
Cast Iron Wok. Being an amateur of cast iron cook ware, I was delighted to find the cast iron wok offered by the Wok Shop to replace the wok stolen by the movers.The Wok Shop provided fast and exempelary service in shipping the wok. Closely following their instructions on how to cure the wok I was delighted with its utility. It proved to be lighter than my old cold steel wok and has a better distribution of heat. My western cast iron now sits oiled and stored stored under the stove waiting for that rare occasion when the wok will not do.And the price could not be beat.
Wonderfull Accent Fiestaware Trivet. I love the color and design of this trivet.  I use it as a spoon rest and for hot casserole dishes.  It is dishwasher safe and find it comes out clean and the color stays sharp.  A perfect addition for Fiestaware enthusiasts to add to your collection.  I would definitely get another one in a different color when they are available
I love this pan, great grilled sandwiches. I received this pan today and I love it.  It made two fantastic sandwiches in less than 5 minutes.  The bread was crispy and had nice dark grill marks without being burnt.  The lid is heavy enough to compress the sandwich without any additional pressing.If you have a large family this pan might be a little small.  I made two large sandwiches (approx 4 by 8 inches) with focaccia bread and had room for maybe one more sandwich.This pan was very simple to clean as well.  Cheese that melted in the interior of the pan easily released after soaking in warm water for 5 minutes.The exterior of the pan is enameled, as the description states.  However, the interior of the pan appears to be seasoned cast iron, not enamel as is reflected in the description.  This in no way detracts from the functionality of the pan.  I prefer the cast iron to the enamel. Properly seasoned cast iron is more non-stick than enamel.I would highly recommend this pan to anyone that wants to make panini but doesn't want another appliance to sit on the counter
Great Can Opener. Great can opener but doesn't have the knife sharpening feature other openers in the same price range have
Overall a good set. Fortunately, ours didn't break during shipment.  I am not too crazy about this pattern, but still bought this set just b/c it was the best one available in my price range.  They are quite heavy (a bit too heavy for everyday use) and will last a long time.  I really like the large bowl and especially the design of the lids!  The lids are so light and easy to grab, place and remove.  The flat design makes it easy to store in your fridge, which to me is a big plus over those bulky traditional corningware glass lids
Wine Saver--Yippee!. A fabulous product--I have tried most of the other wine savers but this one sets the standard.  Takes the guess work out of pumping--the "click" tells it all.  Thanks for making such a great product.  Wine lovers rejoice!
THE BEST PILLOW EVER!!. Really, this pillow is perfect in every way.  I have had neck pain so long i lost track. I found this on amazon, ordered 2 and what a great idea. If you have any type of neck pain YOU NEED THIS PILLOW
Works like it should, great chocolate!!!. My wife recieved this for christmas and at first I was skeptical.  Would this thing actually work. Well 2 bags of chocholate chips and a little oil (per instructions) and this thing was flowing forth in abundence of chocolate.  This will be excellent for parties and holidays (such as today).   Easy to use, several ideas in book, and reasonable clean up.  Check this out, great value for around 25 bucks!!
Wonderful Plate!. I love this plate!!  I am actually waitng for the other 10 that I recently ordered.  My husband loves them becasue they are heavy duty and have a large eating space.  Love the fact that they don't chip, and the paint does not wear off.  Everyone that eats over my house comments on my dinnerware (all Fiesta).
Exactly what I needed!. This kettle is great!  I use it several times a day; it heats water quickly and doesn't require a lot of maintenance.  Thus far it seems pretty durable- I just hope it stays that way.
Just right for me. This did the trick for me.  It's fine for holding several skillets, grill baskets and even a wok.  I have hung one wok, one 6" skillet, one 12" skillet and one 14" skillet on it, along with a grill basket in the back. I believe there will be no issues with adding many more and it looks good and does not "stick out" too far in my small kitchen.  In fact, it adds a touch of decor to my small kitchen.  I got the graphite and I like it very much.  It matches my black appliances very well.  Installation was easy, although one of my support bracket was bent.  After a little work, it was okay.  It is a bit difficult to screw the mount to the wall, if you are using a cordless drill/driver, due to the brackets being in the way a little, but it's nothing real serious.  The main rear mounting bracket is designed to be mounted on studs (16" centers) and the holes line up fine. There is one other mounting hole at the top which will not be lined up with a stud, but is crucial. The top mount will hold a lot of the weight and will need to be fastened with an anchor or equivalent.  All in all, this unit looks nice and will help you out a lot, freeing up space somewhere else.  I have found similar products that are a lot higher priced and seem to be the same.  I highly recommend this rack!
COAT RACK. THE COAT RACK WAS PERFECT - IT WAS NICER THAN ANY I HAD FOUNDAROUND THIS AREA AND A LOT CHEAPER.  WAS VERY PLEASED WITHIT.THANKS,DONN
The vacuum cleaner I've been looking for. I've had uprights for years and was tired of them not having enough suction.  This bagless canister vacuum has great suction, good tools, is light enough for me(bad back and all), and is easy to manage.  It is also very easy to detach the hose from the motorized floor beater for a quick swipe along the edges. The canister is small so I've gotten into the habit of dumping it after every use.  Everything else makes it worth it
lovely platter. I ordered this as a christmas present for my brother.  He's always been looking for a big platter that would fit in his cupboard.  This platter is not only big and deep to hold a big turkey and the juices, its also rectangular. It fits square in the cupboard!  In short,my brother loved it
love these glasses. i love the large size of these glasses. its great for swirling your wine. we had a large party and everyone commented on how elegant they looked and how much fun they were to drink from
No, it's not cheap . . . but it does everything it's supposed to do, and it does it beautifully. I have to put on my glasses to read the button labels but less subtle labels would detract from the overall attractive appearance.  Besides, the controls are intuitive and I almost have them memorized anyway. This is a terrific unit
Sturdy and practical. These clips are sturdy stainless steel and they stand up to my two boys.  They are also magnetic and I can put them high on the refrigerator to keep them out of reach.So far they are holding up better than the brightly colored plastic OXO clips that my two year old destroyed in 3 minutes.  Worth the extra money.
Pretty good. This would work better if it was more secure on the litter box.  It does a pretty good job keeping the litter in the box, but my cat is pretty spazzy and knocks it off pretty easily.  Maybe I'm just not getting in on right though.  Still, it's better than cleaning up all the litter he would spray everywhere without it
Great little alarm. What a surprise to get so much for so little.  This is a perfect little travel alarm that does exactly what it's supposed to do, very simply
Electric Smoking vs. Charcoal. I use various woods when smoking meats or fish in my smokers and when buildingor creating a back yard smoker, this is the unit as you can control the heat temperaturefor the woods you use rather than using coal, It is the answer to charcoal getting intothe taste over shadowing the flavor. The unit is sturdy and well built . Also good tohave a few for party use, taking up little space and doing the job of keeping your items warm or hot depending on the setting.The price is also good compared to the competition
Perfect in Every Way. If you're a coffee lover but the ONLY one in your house, this coffee maker is perfect for you.  I use mine every day.  It allows you to quickly brew one fresh cup of coffee at a time, and the availability of coffee pods in varying strengths and flavors is only improving.  For the money, this is a wise purchase, and it will meet your needs as a single coffee drinker in your home
Indispensible. I've been using this spatula for over a year, and it has become indispensible. It does a wonderful job getting those last bits of batter and sauce out of mixing bowsl and pans. It's high-temp silicone also makes it handy as a spatula for frying eggs and flipping pancakes. It is easy to clean--no removing the heads as is necessary with other silicon spatulas--and is designed without seams that trap sauces and such. I have thrown away my old rubber spatulas and plastic spatulas replaced them with variations of this handy kitchen tool
A Honey of a Kettle. I think I read about all of the reviews before buying this dutch oven (Cherry Red).  I put it in my shopping cart, then procrastinated - checked back, and the price had increased by about $30.One valuable tip in the reviews was about the non-glazed inner rim of the lid.  It could become rusty, so I try to clean the kettle as soon as possible and put the four little rubber tabs back on the outer rim to hold the lid up off of the kettle when not in use.  It was also a nice idea to keep it on the stove where it adds a cheerful color to the kitchen.I've had the dutch oven for about 4 months now, and I simply love it.  It was a worthwhile investment.  So far I've just been using it for making soups, soup stock, roasts and one-dish meals - but I'll be launching out with more experiments.Thanks to a lot of the reviewers for their excellent tips and also warnings about what not to do.  Here's to good health!!!!
Stoneware Casserole. This is a high-fired stoneware casserole. Its non-porous enamel is same as on iron cast pots by Le Creuset and it looks great.  Because it is stoneware, it can be put in a freezer and then microwaved. Though it's excellent for baking and can be brought to the table for serving as well, I give it only four stars because it's not unique in its baking qualities and I can get same results in Corning casserole for a fraction of a price.  As for cast iron Dutch ovens, I didn't find substitutes so far
Superb. I have probably had twenty espresso cups in my days. I like espresso cups that are sturdy with a good grip and a small saucer.Those doesn't fall in that category, but I love them anyway.I don't have to pre-heat them and it is beautiful to see all the crema through the glass.They hold the espresso warmer than normal cups.The cups are very light weight so they feel a little fragile. I wouldn't wash them in a washing machine I think
So useful!. This bowl is shallow enough to serve from and deep enough to really load it up.  I use mine constantly, and didn't think I would when I bought it.  We reach for this ahead of all the other bowls and platters I own.  I love my Fiestaware, you can't go wrong with these durable and colorful dishes
Kettle is the Bomb!. This Kettle works perfect. It is much faster than stovetop and all features work as advertised. What else is there to be said! 5 STARS
great bargain!. This set is remarkable for the money.  cups AND saucers rather than just mugs, and the quality of the fiesta label indicates how beautifully made the dishes are.  and--cheaper at amazon than macy's
Knife man. This was a great product at a great price.  It is definitely a conversation starter for guests.  The knives are excellent quality too.  This purchase was a steal
Love these plates!!!. I searched for a long time for plates to replace our every day china (after 12 years we were down a bunch of pieces, and I didn't want to pay for the replacements).  I ordered 4 sets, loving the shape and antiquing in the photos. They got here in 3 days, not a single chip or break, the color is better (more creamy) than it looks in the picture, and I love the weight and feel of it.  There are a few minor imperfections (a very small bubble here or there), but nothing that will harm the plate or user, and I love that they are all slightly different. I ordered one set to keep aside to replace breakage (3 kids)... but I love them so much I may order another so I get a good decade out of them
Star Wars Pillow Sham. The Pillow sham looks cool.  Has Jedi written all over the sham.  The sham looks great with the rest of the bed set
great drip coffee, average espresso. The drip coffee is wonderful, but the espresso is weak.  It seems like the pump does not generate enough pressure to make real, full bodied espresso.  Overall, a satisfactory purchase
good support. This neck pillow offers considerable support under the neck---bought it to replace an old one that had become thread-bare...husband uses it all the time.
Great item. Had this for over a year with two small boys.  The fruit bowl keeps this from toppling even when my two are climbing up on the counter to get bananas.  My children ask for fruit more because I keep it out on the counter and they love getting taking the monkey's bananas.The glass bowl is well protected by the rubber stoppers inside and the metal frame.  Mine does not have so much as a chip even with two toddlers being able to reach it on the counter.Expensive but durable
Love this litterbox. I have used many automatic litter boxes, but this is the best one.  The cartridges are easy to change.  I just have to order online to get the cartridges since they are usually out of them at the stores.Thank
Great fan for a great price. We got this fan for our young daughter's bedroom and it works so well in there.  I really like how quiet it is and that it is sealed up well so small fingers won't get injured.  I have found the thermostat to be very useful.  I can leave it on all night and it goes off at the temp I have it set for so my daughter does not get cold.  We are now getting 2 more--one for the nursery and one for the kitchen.  I would recommend it for small spaces because as the other reviewers say it is not extremely powerful.  But overall a great fan for a great price
Nora Pruiett. This crystal is a great bargin for the money - I choose super saver shipping.  I've looked and can't top the quality/quantity for the price. So far I've purchased the set of water glasses and the goblets.  This set is great and worry free when serving a large dinner that usually includes children.  If you like a heavy weight crystal this is it.  Save your "good stuff" for the quiet intimate times. Also, this crystal shows up the china quite nicely.
Rustic Baking Dish. This 1 1/2-Quart Round Casserole with Lid is a small but practical-sized dish to add to a Le Creuset collection. I'm a longtime collector of Le Creuset pots and pans, and 'flame' is my favorite color for them. I love the new Poterie stoneware line: baking dishes, ramekins, pitcher, and the crock for utensils. The colors are great, and they match the pots and pans perfectly. I use this red casserole dish when serving family-style at the table, and it's perfect for storing frozen or refrigerated casseroles for quick reheating on busy weeknights. These Poterie dishes coordinate especially well with Fiestaware dishes and serveware, and they make colorful additions to festive buffets. They are freezer-safe, microwave-safe, ovenproof up to 500 degrees F., and can go in the dishwasher
Useful little bowls. I have several of these bowls and use them frequently.  They are the perfect size for snacks.  I also use them frequently for food prep tasks when I'm cooking - they're a good size to hold a half-cup to one cup of a dry ingredient.  And of course, they are the perfect size for their intended purpose - fruit.  I find myself putting fruit on the table more often now that I have these bowls.  A cereal sized bowl seems like a lot of dish for one serving of fruit.  This smaller size prevents clutter on the table - especially if you are serving salad and bread on individual dishes.
Quality Knife. If you want good quality along with good price,this set of knives gives you the answer.  They are sharp, sturdy and very comfortable.  I just love them.
Strong and Pretty. these were my first martini glasses i purchased.   I chose these because of the bargain and the look..  They are both sturdy and beautiful and i love using them when entertaining.cheer
Must have!!. I absolutely LOVE this cutting board! It makes cutting a lot easier. It is big enough to cut many differnt things and keep them all on the board. The board is very sturdy and heavy, but clean up was not bad at all. I had no problem handling it. It is not for someone with a small sink and not a lot of kitchen space. I also ordered the mystery (mineral) oil to preserve it. I know that this board will be around for a long time
wont regret it. it's a great tool.  i am so glad that i bought it.
Great Little Pan. One of the previous customers said this pan did not have the quality of the other Calphalon Commercial Nonstick cookware.  As far as this user is concerned, it absolutely does.  It is the same qualtiy as other Calphalon Commercial Nonstick cookware.  Yes, it is slightly lighter than the larger pans.  This is called proportionality. I have used Calphalon Commercial Nonstick for several years and am totally satisfied with this product line.  As for this particular 3/4 Qt. mini, it is a pleasure to use and clean-up is a snap.  I use it for sauces, and especially those oil and butter based ones for seafood.  Bottom line is that this is a neat little pan in the tradition of Calphalon's Commercial Nonstick cookware
Multi Cat Jungle Gym - Large. My cats love playing in it. The 3 youngest ones use it to play hide and seek every day.  I on the other hand, am afraid it is going to tip over when they jump on it. It has not yet, but it wiggles a lot!  It is too small for my cats over 10 pounds
krups filters. Love the product, just need to locate the holder so I can use the filter
works well, quiet. this has helped very much and is quiet as well....provides a therapy for our throats and makes waking up in the AM much more enjoyable because our throats aren't dry....good valu
I love this product. The Richell 94118 One-Touch Adjustable Pet Gate with Wood Finish is awesome.  I'm so glad I paid the extra money.  The gate is actually wood and metal.  It is sturdy and relatively easy to assemble.  The gate swings both ways and is easy to open and close
Finally. I've tried several different types of pillows, including a water pillow, but this is the first to give me a good night's sleep. I tend to sleep on my stomach and this pillow seems very good for all sleeping positions. Total support witout being too high. It offers support even when I have my head on the edge of the pillow. With water pillows and others the support just flows away from the edge and I'm left flat. Love this pillow...Mmmmm
Fabulous cat toy. This Turbo scratcher is appealing to cats, even if they reject most scratching posts.  The ping pong ball adds an element of excitement.  I have 5 cats, and they all like to play with this toy
Portable heater. Easy to use, very nice thermostat readout, don't find this on many heaters!  Quiet and even oscillating heat. Great heater for a small room
STILL SPECIAL!. Coffee the old fashioned way is still the best!There is something special in the "hands-on" approach to coffee-making,a touch of the oriental tea  ritual-and with this generous size,there's plenty for your friends too.
Revere Ware Skillet. Revere Ware non-stick skillets are excellent products!  They're very durable and have lasted longer than any two other brands put together.  I would highly recommend their line, which you apparently can buy only online now.
T Fal is wonderful. I have a set of T Fal pans which are 6 years old.  This new pan is even better, and you can't beat the prices for T Fal and the quality.  I have always washed my pans by hand, and the T Fal pans are a sinch to wash by hand.  It keeps them in great condition, and 6 years later, still non stick
Beautiful Shape, Easy to Use. I have about 10 different pans, and this is by far my favorite for a few reasons:1) Kids love the shape (Is it a crown? Is it a forest?)2) The shape makes it very easy to cut uniform size pieces.3) The pan releases very easily.Recommended!
A couple of drawbacks. I recieved my BBQ pit right before Christmas, and overall I love it. I can put chicken, ribs, pork loin.whatever in around lunch time, and it's delicious by supper. But it is LARGE so it takes up quite a bit of room,that also makes it harder to clean. The thing  I really don't like is the lid. It just slides into grooves, so it frequently moves when I am opening the lid. (when it's hot and heavy it's a pain) But it is convenient and my food tastes great.
Why are people so stupid. It's a wonderful cutting board (also available at the store) I'm a bartender and chef and can honestly say this is something I've found very useful. Any good chef knows you need two cutting boards one wood and one of a polyethylene or resistant plastic. This one really lives up to the description and works well for mulitple tasks.The $9.99 price tag isn't bad at all for the cutting size and it hides the knife marks very well. That, and it just looks great in the kitchen. I use boards like this in my restaurant all the time and wouldn't go without them.Don't listen to the idiot who thought he could buy a 14 X 17 solid granite cutting board for ten bucks, not that a rock cutting board is worth anything as it would ruin your knives.FYI to the moron - &amp;amp;quot;Protect your countertops from scratches with these lightweight, tough, polyethylene cutting boards.&amp;amp;quot; Yah, nothing at all... dimwit
Decent vac, but mine was used. OK...in all honesty, I purchased this item simply because it, combined with a full-size vaccum that I was already purchasing, qualified me for a promotional gift certficate greater than its $14.99 price.  However, it comes in handy for tasks such as cleaning out the car - my old Dustbuster doesn't hold its charge long enough to finsh anymore.Upon attempting use one of the included attachments with the device for the firstt time, my wife was unable to insert it in the unit.  Upon inspecting it, I discovered a good chunk of what appeared to be a similar attachment already jammed down inside the vac.  I was able to crack it with a screwdriver, and remove the pieces with a needlenose pliers.  It was the tail end of one of the attachments, and had been obviously snapped off.This did, however, make me wonder exactly who was misrepresenting the vac - is Amazon knowingly selling used equipment as new, or is it their vendor?Used status aside, this performed as well as could be expected for a $15 device.  It sucks, and in vaccum-ery, that's a good thing.
I Love it!. It looks expensive, beautiful and heavy. Right size, right depth for my needs. I was a little concerned before I got it b/c I was afraid to get a broken one. But both pieces are fine. Highly recommended
Well made. Bought after reading cooks illustrated recommendation.   I haven't used it yet, but appears to be very well built.  Has a long handle and a porus thick wire mesh strainer welded to the frame.
Any bad reviewers are insane... Unless you received a defective unit, there is NO way anyone could give this any rating short of 5 stars. Ive owned dozens of booklights by several manufacturers and NOTHING compares to this product. Ive had mine for over 2 years and its still going perfectly.It's also sick that even though I read with it an average of an hour a night, Ive only had to replace the batteries 3 times. My spouse sleeps peacefully while I use this booklight, was not the case with other booklights that shine on page.Don't be deterred by reviewers that say it isn't bright enough. If this light isn't bright enough for your eyes, then you have no business reading in the dark.The only downside I can come up with is that the clear area is somewhat easy to scratch. My unit has many hairline scratches that you can see during the day, but are practically invisible when at use at night.Buy it, you won't be dissappointed
Great little fan. I first I was surprises to see that the blades were made out of cloth, but when I turned it on it worked great and it is absolutely quiet. Also, the cloth blades make it less dangerous if you hit the fan with your hand.  The only small negative is that it could be a little stronger at peak power setting
Great hand towels and even better a bargain!. We just love these absorbent towels. The fluffiness and absorbency get even better after washing. The colors are bright and we could not be more delighted. And the price oo la la just lovin it
excellent product. Received this product quickly as a direct Amazon purchase.  Love the teapot, it is beautiful and as well as strong.  All my fine bone china teapots break easily, not this one, it is very durable.  Love the color
Great Cork Screw. This is the best foil cutter I have used, and I have tried a lot of them.  The cork screw works with the ease of my Raabbit, with out the bulkiness. Great buy
Best for the price. I found this toaster on sale at Amazon. They were clearing out the previous model year. The toast is a little uneven, being more brown on the top than the bottom, but overall it's well worth what I paid! The metal warming tray on the top comes in very handy for reheating biscuits or muffins
OHH What can I bake TODAY?. This is a gorgeous and powerful machine.  What engineering!  There is really nothing comparable out there.  I am not a serious cook but I may become one just so I can watch the beater go around and around in 64 directions! The color is fabulous, kind of a retro/ green glass color, iridescent.  It is way BIGGER than I thought it would be, and very heavy.  It has earned a place on the countertop.   J
return of broken dishes. Just wondering when you think this item will be sent.  Thanks.
Light Show. Both my cat and dog LOVe this. The animals are able to close the lid very easily, so you have to be there to open it again
Perfect for single people. As many people already know most food products are sold in "family" sized package. Living as a bachelor I was constantly throwing away stale dry goods such as various cereals, pastas, and coffee due to lack of use. Thinking of all the food, not to mention Money, that was being wasted I decided to search for a cost effective solution. I was given this product as a gift after mentioning my quest for freshness to several family members. After owning this product for a while I realized just how many different foods can be sealed around your home and used later. I have yet to get a "bad seal" from any of the canisters and have left items up to 3 weeks with out having the seal go "bad". I recommend these canisters to anyone who wants to keep their dry goods from going stale and wasting mone
Love this espresso machine!. I use this machine every day.  Even when my wife makes regular coffee I will quickly brew up a shot of espresso to kick it up a bit.  I use Peet's Italian espresso roast already ground for espresso machines and keep it in a vacuum sealed container.  It is a snap to fill the holder with grounds and pop it in the machine.  Within a couple of minutes I have delicsious espresso with a nice crema on top.  The milk steamer works far better than my old machine and makes terrific frothy steamed milk.  This is the best espresso maker I have found to date
These are really great bags!. Everything about our Miele (Red Velvet) vacuumn cleaner is top notch, including the bags. The nicest thing about them is the way you can slide a protective piece of cardboard over the bag hole when removing the bag. This prevents the dust and other vacuum dander from escaping as you walk the bag to your trash from the cleaner.This is just a small detail, but it exemplifies the thought that goes into this company's products
Proctor-Silex can opener. We are completely satisfied with this product. Good value and a quality product that performs as advertised
Good heater, awkward design. I bought this heater for a spare bedroom. The quiet, and ability to set the thermostat to an exact temperature was a big selling point for me. This unit does a good job of taking the chill out of the air. However, don't expect it to quickly blow out volumes of hot air and heat an entire room within two-minutes.  I like the fact that it is completely quiet, and doesn't off-gas any strange smells (like the Delonghi Mica Panel Radiator). However, since it is a baseboard design, you have to get down on the floor with a flashlight to see and adjust the display, which has no light. A remote control would be a good improvement. Although this unit is very lightweight and has a low, long profile, it is still fairly large and doesn't exactly disappear, if you get my drift. Overall, I am pleased with the job it does
improving port. I was a skeptic, but so many wine lovers and respected critics said Riedel glasses did wonders for the tasting experience that I, a port lover, decided to try these. Now I am a believer. I tasted a favorite port from my (very nice, Scandinavian)previously favorite glass, and from the Riedel port glass. I cannot speak to the issues other reviewers have raised as to the relative quality of the manufacture, but the taste was a marvel
Great rack!. Great coat rack for the price. It's very original in design and accents my home.  It's been very durable all thru last winter and now for another one to come
Best. Knife. Ever. I've been a German knife snob for years.  But this 8-inch chef's knife by Japan's Global is the finest blade I've ever owned.  Period.Maybe it's not as easy to sharpen as a Wustof or a Henckel, but then again, it holds its edge ten times longer.I've spent ten years and hundreds (and hundreds and hundreds!) of dollars collecting German steel.  Global is so good that it has me thinking of starting all over again
Be Careful!. I love the Bodum French Press for making tasty coffee. This is the third beaker I've had to buy though, they break so easily! Be especially careful washing this item in the sink, it will crack at the slightest impact
Luxurious. is the only word I can think of to describe these towels.  I didn't think I could afford such high end towels.  Fluffy, soft, absorbent, large.  An unbelievable bargain.  Wash them several times before using and DON'T USE FABRIC SOFTENER - it makes the towels "waterproof"
Wonderful toaster!. I bought this toaster because I loved the color and the retro look. I bought it at a Williams-Sonoma outlet as a refurbished piece for a 1/3 of the price of retail. I have never had a problem with the toaster since I bought it over a year ago. It makes the perfect toast. What's also nice about it, is it keeps the toast hot and toasty once the slice is done toasting, because it doesn't "pop" the toast out of the toaster. So, if you make toast and forgot about it for a few seconds, the toast will stay nice and toasty till you are ready to eat it.
great for indian food. I've used this for Indian food and it worked really well - you an prepare the meat and keep it on the part with the heat off before you mix it back into the masala.BTW I own other Anolon Advanced saucepots and love the way they cook and cleanup.Re: the squishy handle. If you have gripping problems, as many middle age to older cooks do, this helps you.  Don't listen to the young, self-involved, and obviously inexperienced cooks who blast this feature.  Some day they too will develop weak wrists or arthritis and will appreciate this feature
3 piece Pfaltzgraff Tea Rose Bake and serve set. I use mine all the time.  It made a great gift and my sister really likes it
Great Screen is a BREEZE to clean. WOW!  This baby is even easier to clean than I thought.  My biggest frustration has always been scrubbing my splatter screen clean after using it.. After about 10 minutes of spraying foam all over my kithen counter and sink I give up and just choose to live with a screen full of schmuck...NO MORE...Thank you Tovolo - But seriously.. why the removable handle
replacement bulbs. I was so glad to find a source of replacement bulbs for my Itty Bitty Book Light.....and at such a reasonable price.  Fast shipping too
Furniture saver!. It's hard to find these refills and if you can find them in a store, you will save a few bucks but worth the extra money for shipping.  This toy is the only thing that saves my furniture from my two cats.  Highly recommended.
Hamilton Beach 76383 Ensemble Tall Can Opener, Red. Product is attractive, easy to operate and performs well. Easy to detach opening mechanism for cleaning which is a real plus.
Great cooking tool. This is a sturdy spoon that can be used for all types of cooking tasks without the concern of breaking.  I use this item almost every day for one cooking task or another.  Easy to clean and maintain
Perfect for a duvet!!!. Let's get this clear. It does NOT sound like a newspaper when moving around and it DOES keep you warm and comfy!!We bought this to fit inside a duvet set also purchased on Amazon (check my review on that- another good buy) & could not be more satisfied. It is very fluffy & full and exceeded all expectations in every way.Don't let the price fool you, you get more for your money with this deal. GET IT!
Feliway Diffuser. I have used this product for several years in a multi-cat household with excellent results. It has proven to be very helpful with the stress & anxiety of introducing a new member to our crew and helps maintain happy housemates
sharp purchase. quality knife, comparably priced to same knife if purchased at Williams and Sonom
I'm not gadget-y, but this is great!. I don't normally use alot of electronics in the kitchen-- hardly even a blender, so this is a rarity for me, but I love it.  I am a huge fan of roasted garlic, but also live in Florida, where it's a BAD idea to have your oven going during about half the year.  This machine roasted 3 bulbs to creamy perfection with no scorching and the outside of the roaster was only a little warm to the touch.  And clean up was just a few seconds.  Also, I have the terracotta-colored machine and it looks downright cute on the counter
OUT! Extra Large Deluxe Puppy Housebreaking Pads. I like these pads because they are thicker and larger than other brand pads.  This makes it very convenient when you have more than one puppy or dog.
Nice and big. Years ago I bought a potato cutter at a garage sale. It was all steel and a good size (accepting virtually any potato without cutting it down to size). I've been very happy with it.Recently we bought a cabin so needed to add a second set of kitchen tools. One of the items we decided we wanted was a second potato cutter. I ordered this one because of the "jumbo" in the name hoping that it would work as well as our previous garage sale cutter.Thankfully, this product lives up to the jumbo name. It's larger than our garage sale cutter by 20% or so. It is easy to use and clean up. Not to mention it has a suction cup to attach it to the counter which works surprisingly well.Pros: Large with two sizes of cutting blades; a larger mesh for traditional fries and smaller mesh for McDonald-like fries.Cons: It's plastic and steel which makes me wonder about longevity.All-in-all, I think this was a good purchase.UpdateMy wife loves this vegetable cutter and has asked me to order another! She has used ours at least twice a week since we recieved it in Aug 2005 and has had no difficulties with it at all. I'm surprised to see that another purchaser has had problems with this product. Perhaps they received a defective one? At any rate, I would still recommend the product.
Great product!. I received this as a gift 3 years ago. Since then, I have canned just about everything you can imagine in it. The only complaint I have is that the outside spots up and the inside stains, but I guess it's from all the use. I would definitely buy another one of these, but I think mine will last for years
Everything I was looking for!!. Ok let me start by saying I am not a coffee snob, I am more of a coffee nut, I very much prefer a cup of my nice dark italian roast but if the neighbor offers me a cup of his foldgers I wont turn up my nose.  And for a guy like me this machine is perfect!!  I looked at the 500 dollar machines but just couldnt see spending that for something I see myself using 4-5 days out of the week so I setteled on this machine and I have not one regret.I have had the machine about 3 weeks now, I admit I dont use it every day as I have thoses mornings where I am just running late and dont have time, but in that three weeks I have used it at least 5 days out of every week and it has been great.  This thing is so easy to use right out of the box with the pods I was just amased, my old machine went down quite a while ago so I havent pulled a shot in a very long time and with this machine I was sipping a great one in minutes!The one thing that did dissapoint me is the pods, I bought the machine thinking I would use them as they seemed so convient...and dont get me wrong, the illy dark roast pods make one of the best shots of espresso I have ever had, very quickly, but keep in mind they only make one shot at a time so for me who usually likes 3 or 4 shots in a cappucino they are a bit time consuming and I have found it better to just pack my own double shots.  But besides that little thing this machine is perfect for a coffee nut like me, it does a great job no matter what im in the mood for, be it a straight shot, a cappucino, or the nice mocha latte every now and then this is a great machine for you, may not be good enough for a coffee snob...but just right for a coffee nut!Oh and one hint I found very helpfull...turn the machine on 5 or 10 minutes before you are going to use it (the longer the better) with your cups up on the warmer.  I saw some people complaining that the espresso was only luke warm when it came out, I exprenced the same problem when I dont let it warm up and brew into a cold cup, but if you do let it warm up it will make you a nice piping hot espresso!
Works great on pet hair. I needed a hand-held vac for my travel trailer, particularly since we decided to take the German Shepherd with us on vacation this year.  The ability to pick up pet hair was a must.  I read on a lot of reviews and narrowed it down to the Dirt Devil 0100 and a cordless Shark (forget the model now).I bought the Dirt Devil in a local store because I didn't want the hassle of returning it in case I didn't like it.  But I LOVE IT!  I haven't used it in the travel trailer yet, but I've been using it weekly to vacuum the pet hair from the dog's bed, the cat's bed, and the chair the dog uses.  It works so well, I was amazed at how powerful it really is.  It works even better at picking up pet hair than my upright does using the attachments.Pluses include a nice long cord and a powerful motor with the brush.The minuses are it's a bit noisy (scares the cat!) and kind of heavy.  Someone with an arthitic hand might have problems using this vac.  Also, it seems to get pretty warm, but I only use it for a few minutes at a time so it's not been a problem.  I wish it came with a bag for the attachments.I recommend cleaning the dust cup every time you use it.  Mine fills up fast.  I don't use the little trap door but instead twist off the cap and empty it that way.  Also, I highly recommend cleaning the filter after EVERY use.  It really becomes clogged with dust even after only one use.  I take it outside and tap it against something to knock out the dust.  After about 4 uses now, I'm going to vacuum it with the attachments from my upright.  I think cleaning the filter after every use will help prolong the life the filter and even the vacuum itself.I highly recommend this vacuum for anyone with quick jobs or with the need to vacuum up pet hair.  I'm glad I decided on this model instead of the cordless Shark; now I don't ever have to worry if it's charged
I LOVE THIS LID. I owned the sheets but without the lid.  here are the reasons i love the sheets:1 - you can really clean it without worrying about the teflon coming off.2 - no concerns about teflon poisoning3 - dishwasher friendly4 - i use it for everything (cookies, fries, meat ...)so now that it comes with a lid i bought it.  the lid is especially handy if you are taking it with you (i.e. veggie pizzas are especially easy now !!!
fiestaware bread tray. this bread tray is just the right size and the perfect finishing touch to a table set with fiestaware
Metal Grapes Napkin Holder. I purchased this for my Sister in law for Christmas. She totally loved it. So therefore I'm happy with it too!
Good product but I prefer Joint MAX DS. I used this product for 2 years for my big boy Terrence, an 80 lb Boxer who was diagnosed with hip dysplasia about 3 years ago. It worked well but then I put him on Joint MAX DS when one of my friends told me about it.  I've been using Joint MAX for a year now and it's really made a big difference. Terrence's mobility has improved a lot more than when he was on Cosequin. Plus Joint Max is less expensive
meets our expectations. We had heard good things from other people who have purchased Le Creuset products and it is easy to see why. Not only does it cook and clean well, it is a beautiful addition to our home.  We hate to put it in a cabinet. We are looking forward to the upcoming season to make soups and stews
Perfect for my needs... When purchasing the Sharp Warm & Toasty I knew not to expect great cooking power either as a toaster oven or microwave.  I'm a single guy living in a small apartment and this product does about what I expected and meets my needs.  Granted, the microwave wattage isn't all powerful at 650W and the toaster oven section tops out at 400 degrees, but again, it is OK for me.  I use the microwave for reheating or light cooking and the toaster oven gives me the crisping and toasting power a microwave can't.  I have to say that I rarely use all the myriad of buttons.  I think it is more complicated than necessary really.  I generally just hit plain old "microwave" or "bake" and select my time.  If you are looking for a space-saver and are not expecting to create big meals then it is a nice product.  My one complaint, though many love it, is the "brushed aluminum look".  To me it is a fad like the avocado and brown refrigerators of the 70's.  Plus, it is a pain to keep clean looking
Great pizza. Completely pleased..the pan AND his recipe (Mario's that is) was perfect!P.S. I am WAY over the age of 13
Great Glasses!!. The Z-Stem is great! It is actually much easier to hold than a straight stem. I wasn't quite sure how it would feel to hold. You cannot beat the price either. I purchased the 4 pack in the store, and liked it so much I purchased another 4 pack. Now Target needs to make the Z-stemed Margarita glasses
Great for cleaning up in between vacuumings. I bought this sweeper to sweep my basement carpet, which is dark in color and shows every bit of fuzz.  It does a reasonable job cleaning, transforming my carpet from "Does she ever vacuum?" to "Oh, she must have vacuumed yesterday".  It doesn't get all the fuzz and crumbs, but it does what I'd expect from a sweeper.  It is also much lighter than my vacuum, so I'm much more likely to use it.My three-year-old daughter enjoys using it too.  She insists on sweeping her own room (I won't complain).The main thing I've learned is that, because the handle slides together, it will not consistently support the weight of the sweeper head.  This means that if you pick it up or suspend it by the top of the handle, the sweeper will probably fall off, so pick it up near the sweeper.  (It stays together fine when actually sweeping.
Almost a home run. Wedgey certainly is cute. However, keep in mind to only use this on eggs or other very soft food items. It is a little hard to line the wires up appropriately. For the price, this is a good piece of equipment and a whimsical addition to any kitchen.
Great Gift!. These sheets were a gift for my 80 year-old mother, who had never owned flannel sheets.  She loves them!  My mother told me "they're soft, warm and wonderful!".  Money well spent
VERY HAPPY CUSTOMER. FAST SERVICE! THEY HAD THE EXACT ITEM, IN THE COLOR THAT I WANTED, CHEAPER THAN THE STORES THAT I HAD BEEN DEALING WITH!! I NEVER HAVE TO LEAVE THE HOUSE TO SHOP AGAIN!!!
Mortar and Pestle. My daughter, 12, suddenly decided she wanted a Mortar and Pestle, she's mad keen on cooking and watches the cookery channel non-stop. I couldn't even spell it! After looking around the local mall, we came home and went to good old standby, Amazon. Great selection, everything imaginable, bought this one, it arrived quickly and it's perfect. It's still sitting on the counter in the kitchen full of crushed pepper corns, she never puts anything away
Works pretty good. I replaced my steel sharpener that came with my Twin Cuisine set with this one.  Works great and looks good enough to leave on the counter
excellent purchase. Purchased this pitcher from Amazon and I am extremely pleased with the quality.  It matches my kitchen perfectly.  The item arrived within 3-4 days and I had no problems at all with Amazon.  I will purchase again from Amazon in the future.Tammy W.Indianapolis, I
Solid Hardwood makes this a good buy. I have bought 2 of these bookcases.  They are very well made, set up in 2 minutes.  Forget the pressed wood bookcases -- I have.  They sag and fall apart.  Not these bookcases.  They are solid wood, the real thing, and best of all, there is no assembly required, just unfold where you want it, and start filling it up! Also, very easy to move in the house especially through narrow places because it can be folded up again.  Excellent buy for the price.  Not made in China, I think it is made in Vietnam
Great for cats who insist running water. I purchased a waterfall style fountain for my cat.  It was horrible.  On the highest setting it barely made a tiny stream.I picked up this fountain here, and my cat loves it!  Instead of leaving a water faucet on for her to drink from all the time, she is quite happy with this.It's quiet,  and even the lowest setting and still has a potent stream of water.If you have a cat who demands fresh water from the faucet (I know i'm not the only one with a cat like this)  buy this fountain.  You won't have to put up with the "turn the faucet on for meee!" kitty dance ever again
Great Lamp!. After looking high and low for a lamp with multiple heads, I was excited to find that Target had this one. I read about the problems people had with the other similar lamp and the problem one person had with this one, but purchased it anyway as it truly fit my need. My conclusion: It's PERFECT! The base and pole are heavy with excellent connections with each having about an inch long of threading. Very sturdy lamp that gives off great light. Three settings let you light a set of 2 bulbs or the other set of 3 or all 5 of the bulbs. Great Lamp
Easy to Use &amp; Festive Too!. I was given this dish (by request) for my birthday and it has barely gotten a rest since! It works wonderfully for pies and tarts, but even better for baked appetizer dishes or nachos. The dish washes well in the dishwasher and stacks nicely in the cabinets. I wish it had little handles on the edges for better gripping when it comes out of the oven (it has a rim that is good to hold onto, but for clumsy chefs, something more might be better). Other than that, I love this dish and keep finding more and more uses for it
Mold? What mold?. I'm puzzled by the several reviews that say the filter gets moldy too fast. I am replacing my first filter after about a year because it has built up deposits of lime. I never noticed any mold
Stress-free Travel with your dog. My 5 month old lab literally hangs out of the window while I'm driving, in the driver's seat! I hated driving driving without my husband in my car so he could hold her. Her crate doesn't fit in my car, so I looked for another option. This seatbelt is perfect for her! It's so easy to use and she can still stick her head and front paws out of the window and be completely secure. Now I'm not worried about her jumping out. She can comfortably lie down too. I think this is a better option than the booster seat because this pulls the dog back by the chest, not the neck. Plus, you don't attach the leash so there is no risk of strangulation
almost up to par. I like everything about the mighty mite except it doesn't glide smoothly along the floor.  It's easy to use as far as the hose, attachments and the weight of the canister
Great Buy. Love the way the mattress pad works... no leaks... but even better it's comfortable and QUIET ... no crinkly sounds like a vinyl cover... Very comfy and unnoticable!  Only reason I gave it a 4 and not a 5 was washing... when removed from the washer it's very heavy... I was afraid to dry it... although it did dry fine... so no concerns there either
Keeps coffee hot, sturdy no-drip sip top. The Nissan flip-top backpack mug keeps coffee hotter, but the hinges are too fragile on the flip-tops.  These keep coffee hot for several hours, and the any-direction sip top is great for those early-morning, still dark-out drives.  And these cost only about half the price of the Nissan
Not fancy but useful. This item is not as fancy as others available, but it is sturdy enough, and it provides the extra surface area over the unused side of my sink that I bought it for.  It wipes clean easily
Good Product. I have used this product for about a month and I find it to work well. Some coffee grinds escape the plunger, but I expected that
Wsthof Under-Cabinet Swinging 9-Slot Oak Knife Block. It is a great product. It cleans up the counter space. I'm buying some for Christmas gifts
def a good fan for the price. i have this fan in my stereo cabinet so it will keep my xbox and equip. cool.  on its lowest setting it does that. not really on the noisy side, the whir of the motor is only matched by the sound of the wind comming out of the thing.  so far no problems, and is a steal for the price
Swiss Diamond Pans. In my opinion, these are the greatest pans available! Non stick without the worry. Goes into the dishwasher, no problem. I am replacing all my other pans with this brand
Glide Shower Curtain Hooks. These shower curtain hooks are FABULOUS!! Never a snag, no more ripped eyelets. Whoever invented these... KUDO'
There are better toys out there from sit stay. Dog loves the squirels to play with, but has trouble with the game.  There is a 3 additional squrel pack.  I would recomend that instead.  They honey bea and the hedge hog.  The extra eggs are good on their own to.  They squeek.
Wonderful baking dish. A high-quality Creuset product! I love it, I've made great dishes with it and its easy to clean with no discoloration/deterioration after mutliple uses. But be warned - Creuset products are on the heavy side. I do not consider this a drawback (this is a sign of quality and durability) but if you have never owned a Creuset product, it is something to be aware of.
Fiestaware. This was the first item that I purchased on Amazon.  Item was received in excellent condition, and in a very timely manner.  Very pleased
BEST DEHYDRATOR OUT THERE FOR THE MONEY.... I have only gotten to use my new Gardenmaster once so far but it is great!   I have a FD-50 from about 15 years ago with 12 trays that I have used many times a year.  I've always wanted the 30 tray professional model but couldn't justify it because my old one still worked fine.  Well, I was ordering a jerky gun for a Christmas present so that became all the justification I needed.   I have 24 trays for mine at the moment and I was able to do my whole allotment of beef jerky at one time where it would have taken 3 different batches with my old one.  All I do is beef jerky and it usually takes me about 6 hours per batch with my FD-50 and it took the same amount of time with the Gardenmaster but with 24 full trays!  You can't beat this!   Everyone always wants me to make jerky and it is very time consuming but this certainly makes the end result get here faster.  Do yourself a favor, buy one....
Great value. This is the first dehumidifier I have owned, so I really can't compare it to others.  We bought it to take away some of the damp smells that seemed to come from our finished basement.  This thing seems to have done the trick.  Run continuously, it wrings out the moisture quite well, making a noticeable improvement after only a couple of hours.  Run on the range settings, you can specify it to come on only when the humidity reaches a certain point, allowing you to save power. We haven't noticed much of an impact on our electricity bill.  The only drawback is the thing is a bit loud, but not any worse than a window-unit style air conditioner
Easy as 123. The Presto 05411 GranPappy Electric Deep Fryer is as easy to use as 123. Plug it in, wait 15 minutes and it's ready to fry your Chicken legs or breast or french fries or any other fryable food. In 15 minutes your food is done and your eating nice juicy food. The Presto GranPappy Electric Fryer is a defenant 5
Wonderful home espresso maker. If I knew making esperesso at home was going to be this easy I would have bought a machine like this years ago!!! It's so easy to make great espresso with this stove top machine. The quality seems excellent to me and the brewing process as well as the cleaning of the machine has always been very easy. The cups that "6 cups" refers to are espresso cups or shots not full 8 oz. cups so if you drink a lot of espresso or want this to simply brew strong coffee (or teecino, a coffee alternative I often use) you'll want to be aware of the true amount of the what is brewed. However if you just want a few espresso shots, this is perfect. I find that I can make one XL espresso drink or two smaller ones with this espresso maker.I love the elegant look it has sitting on my stove top as well.
Hot plate. The hot plate works well. I use it in my smoker and I like the variable heat control.  The element does not sit flat without some weight on it.  That is the only small bad part.  Over all a very good unit
Swiss Diamond cookware. Best investment I have ever made in cookware.  Heats evenly, more thoroughly and burns less.  Amazingly tough and the best part is I don't have to hunt for special "plastic" utensils to mix and stir.  This is sweet cookware and so dang easy to clean, I love it!
A Gift from Grandma. THE PILLOW!!! It is NOT the NORMAL 14 1/2" x 6 1/2", 1 pound Dogbones Neckbones pillow!! It took TWO Fedex men to carry the box to the door! I sent it as a gift for my 16-mo old granddaughter to cuddle with in her crib because she liked my REGULAR one, but my daughter is afraid this would smother her!  Look at her laying beside it!  My 6'7" son-in-law can't cuddle with it because it's so BIG - and ORANGE!  Their 85-lb black lab runs the other direction every time she sees it!  My kids thought I flipped out and were going to have to hide it until I came to visit!  We'll figure out what to do with it when we stop rolling on the floor laughing!  HINT:  If the description states 6 (SIX!) pounds, it's a DINOSAURBONES Neckbones!!!!
calphalon 7 piece block set review. Received my 7 piece contemporary block set with santoku knife just under one month ago.  I read a lot of reviews and checked out my top three choices at the local gourmet kitchen store before deciding on the Caphalon set. The finish on the Calphalon set at the store wasn't quite as nice as the higher priced Wusthof and Henckels, but I just couldn't justify the additional cost given the limited amount of time I spend in the kitchen.The handles are comfortable to hold and use and the blades were all very sharp straight out of the box. Haven't had do any sharpening yet.  The labels on the butt of the handles ensure you get the right knife everytime. The block is well made with a nice finish including the Calphalon label.Despite my lecture regarding care of the new knives, my wife has managed to run at least two of them through the dishwasher so far.  This has made no noticeable change to the appearance of either knife.In summary, I'd say I'm quite happy with the Calphalon knife set.  It's a great buy for the money and I still look forward to each new opportunity I have to use them
YES!!!!. I have wanted this kitchenaid for years now.  It was just a bit out of my price range but through amazon I was able to afford it, and the service was fast...we did have to return our first mixer b/c it was damaged in shipping, but amazon quickly sent us out a new one.  Now I have the best mixer on the planet! - I love this machine, my sister has had her mixer for over 5 years without a problem...and let me tell you we COOK alot!  This is well worth the money! Kitchenaid is top of the line in product and customer service
Fun and easy. I purchased this for my little guy when he had throat surgery, and I enjoyed more than he did!  He just doesn't like anything that's "different" and it wasn't smooth and creamy like ice cream.  I look forward to using it again this summer.  It is also easy to create sugar-free recipes, so everyone can enjoy
F.Q., Potomac, MD. This is a wonderful product.  It is simple to use, economical and cooks rice perfectly, just add rice and water, push the button down and walk away.  I use mine atleast 5 times a week.
Travelling made easy. We take our frozen concoction maker with us on numerous trips and this makes that much easier
topsy turvy. I haven't used them yet, will use them soon.  They look great though and come with good instructions
Follow these tips for a unique coffee. Every family in Italy owns one of these machines.  Here are a few tips:1. In Italy this is NOT called an espresso machine, but a Moka machine.  An espresso is what you would drink in bar made with a steam or high pressure machine with the crema on top.2. Smaller size Moka machine tend to make better coffee.3. Never wash the Moka with detergents, just rinse it under tap water4. You've gotta use it often for a good coffee.5. If you haven't use it in a while, make a weak coffee ("lungo") and discard6. DO NOT put the MOka in the dishwasher.7. Use drinking water. Avoid tap water especially if very chlorinated8. Never compress the coffee.9. For a strong coffee fill the filter with ground coffee and make a small cupola that slightly protrudes beyond the rim. Do not press down.10. For best coffee, heat at very low heat.  It's ok if it takes 10min.11. As soon as coffee reaches the top, remove from heat12. Do not let the coffee boil13. Use good quality coffee, not too strong, medium grind (try Illy for a good commercial brand)14. Sip while still hot, enjoy
num num num num num. The perfect cookie jar.  In fact, we bought a few more and now keep rice and flour in them too.  I sweat this makes cookies taste better
Nonstick 3.5 pan. This was a Christmas gift so we haven't used the pan often yet.  The two times it has been in service, it performed very well.  It's deep enough to hold sauces and soups without running out of room and the clean up is a breeze.  The weight of the pan is what we've come to expect from Calphalon products too.  It is a great choice.
purina cat chow. great product, too bad the shipping cost as much as the produc
Great product!. I love this pot.  It melts my chocolates perfectly every time.  I don't have to stir constantly or worry about the chocolate burning.  I have had this for two weeks and have used it more times than I can count.  I only wish there was a larger version also available.  I may try my crockpot, but I am afraid my chocolate will burn.  I need to melt a lot of chocolate for Christmas candies.  This will work great, but because it is small, I'll have to keep adding to the pot.  I do recommend this product.  I have already bought a second one to use for my white chocolate.  I plan to buy two more for gifts
Great utensil. Perfect size and weight for a 12" skillet. Keeps the bacon, chops flat for even frying while preventing any splatters. High quality materials. You won't cook bacon again without this indespensible utensil. Easy 5 stars for this great product
Easy to use. I really like these wipes for all of my stainless steel appliances.  They clean and shine everything really well.  I just use a soft cloth to dry the appliances after wiping them down.  I also use the spray made by the same company along with the wipe.  I have several appliances and 1 wipe dries out before I am finished. No streaks doing it this way.
good quality for the price. This is a nice set of flatware. There are many pieces that come with the package. They seems like good quality flatware. I am pleased with my purchase
These bakers are WONDERFUL!!!. LeCreuset is simply the best. These are an ideal size for one or two people. The larger one holds 2-3 chicken breasts or roasted potatoes or vegetables.  The small one is a perfect one serving size for a fruit cobbler. They hold the heat for a long long time and are a breeze to clean, besides being really pretty to look at. I do love my LeCreuset
an alien's perspective. Flawless "tea-steeping" device.  Probability of unplanned release of leaves into liquid medium during normal steeping processes is approximately zero, in contrast to failure-prone clasp of device "tea ball."  High reliability values are obtained through the omission of moving parts and fabrication from corrosion-resistant metal, therefore it is probable that optimal item operation will persist beyond the cessation of original purchaser's biological functions.  Therefore, omitting aesthetic considerations, the device possesses obvious heirloom suitability
LOVE LOVE LOVE THESE SHEETS~~~~~~~. I had no idea these sheets would be such a great quality at such an unbelievable price.  Shipping was fast, the sheets fit more than perfect and I find myself can't waiting to go to bed at night to feel the softness and smoothness of this quality sheet!!I will definately buy this product again!!!Paulett
Sometimes less is more. I've had other digital thermometers with pre-programmed temperatures that were just confusing to use. Finding the preferred temperature for any meat or poultry item is such a simple matter (any decent cookbook will have them, many recipes specify, and there are always the many online resources) that I much prefer the straightforward approach here of just inserting the probe and checking the display occasionally. I also LOVE the little gadget that allows you to attach it to a saucepan for candies and other liquids that need careful timing temperature-wise. I happily threw out my old candy thermometer after using this one. It's more accurate and easier to read. Highly recommend
Marriage saver. I like to read in bed at night but my wife likes to have the bedroom completely dark when she is trying to sleep.The light wedge gives just enough light to enable me to read without disturbing her sleep.  The size is perfect and covers the entire page of a standard paperback.This little gem just may have saved my marriage
Great Product!  Can't go back to regular boxes. I started buying the littermaid back when I owned 1 cat.  I have since grown to a 5 cat family and have had several units.  I recently purchased the designer series. We had 2 megas and one unit did stop working after 3 years.  But what do you expect with 5 cats that each can on the average use the box 5 to 10 times a day.  I have read many of the reviews and can see why some folks would be disappointed.  Do not expect this to be something that requires no maintanence, you do have to manage and keep up on it.  It is advertised as "no more scooping" not not more cleaning!  The motor is not as loud as some of the other reviewers have mentioned. The cats acclimate very quickly to it. With proper care this will last you years!  I also have just seen the latest product Littermaid Elite with a steel rake and ionic air cleaner.  I would have tried that one has I known it was available, looks like they made a few improvments on an already great product
A gift for someone who has everything. This bar set is gorgeous!  I received this as a gift for my birthday and intend on purchasing one as a gift for Christmas.  It is dazzling in appearance and is not only functional but a wonderful show piece on my bar
fryer rocks!. We purchased this Fryer a few weeks ago and have used it over 10 times. We LOVE it!!! The only downside is the "viewing" window isn't really functional unless you want to hold a flashlight in one hand.  Many many positives which include:  1. easy to clean, easy to use, easy to drain oil.  2. Well built 3. compact 4. safe  This size works great!  We LOVE it
Tips for Lids. If you have a Tupperware item with a seal that will not fit; just soak the seal (lid) under very warm water for a minute.  Then work the seal on to the container and let cool.  This should mold the seal to fit properly onto the container.  If there are any other problems contact your Tupperware Consultant.  Because Tupperware has a Lifetime guarantee.  I am also a Consultant if you have any problems, http://my.tupperware.com/KID2KID3
shaken not stirred. The Lenox set is wonderful!  The finish and fit are excellent.  I would highly recommend this bar accessory as a MUST HAVE
KitchenAid Cutlery is a Great Addition to my kitchen. This KitchenAid 16pc cutlery set is a beautiful addition to my kitchen which is decorated using red and white appliances.  The cutlery set includes a variety of different size knives- each perfect for chopping and slicing.Beauty and Function together
Le Creuset 15 1/2-Quart Cast Iron Oval French Oven, Flame. The Le Creuset name is synonymous with quality, thus, I had no doubt that if in fact the item I was purchasing was Le Creuset, that I would be satisfied with it's beauty and performance.  My concern then was, is this actually a Le Creuset? Answer, yes it is!  Perplexing the situation was the amazing price.   I hoped I was not going to receive a used Le Creuset.  Well, surprisingly so, when my Le Creuset 15  -quart cast iron French oven arrived, it was new, in excellent condition, matching the rest of my Le Creuset set perfectly, and I am a very, very happy granny cook.  Thank you Le Creuset and [...]
Instructions for refilling your PepperBall. Chef'n has a great website that includes instructions on refilling the PepperBall:  http://www.chefn.com/faq
A little smaller than our last press but it sure beats ironing!. We had a press made by Singer that finally gave up the ghost after more than 10 years. After a several days of ironing clothes with mixed results & a lot of frustration, we researched presses on Amazon based on customer reviews. We decided on this press and have not been disappointed. The press is ready to use as soon as it's out of the box. Operation is simple & all but self-explanatory, and it heats up VERY quickly. It is a little smaller than our previous press, but not so small as to be a drawback. Clothes are ready in no time compared to ironing. The press comes with a water spray-bottle if you prefer not to use the steam feature. Definitely worth the money spent
Great, Multipurpose. I have these and love them.  I'm glad I didn't waste my time with some look-alikes I saw.  These are the same quality as the rest of my Fiestaware and match perfectly.  I use these for hot cocoa loaded down with marshallows, chili, soup, cereal.  It's a bowl, it's a cup.  The cup is heavy enough that it can sustain some abuse from daily use and keep you from getting burned by the hot stuff inside.  I really love these cups
Okay product. The only issue I have with this product is using the frother.  The tube could be redesigned to allow a bit more movement when frothing the milk.  Other than that it is a good buy for the money
Satisfied Customer. I am very pleased with this product.  The Atelier wash is soft, absorbent and looks good after laundry.  I have always found the Martex brand to be top quality.
Weird color, cute casserole. I've got just about every Le Creuset color in existence, so why not try out kiwi? It's an oddball color, I think, but this little casserole is soooo cute. I used my petite casseroles recently for serving French onion soup & it's an excellent individual serving size for this. Keeps the soup warm and I was able to put them all in the oven to broil momentarily for the Swiss cheese & slice of French bread on top. It's rather expensive for the size, though, so it gets knocked down one star for price
YOU GET WHAT YOU PAY FOR. I WILL MAKE THIS SHORT AND SWEET, THE PAN LOOKS GREAT, COOKS GREAT, AND THE FINAL PRODUCT MOST IMPORTANTLY, TASTES GREAT
Beautiful and Exquisite. I love this set - this is the favorite of all my china teacup sets. I have both Irish and English bone china, and this pattern is exquisite. The color is beautiful - so delicate. I serve formal tea and scones with these teacups. I LOVE THIS SET!!
Absolutely FABULOUS!. I now have these pillows on all our beds, including our guest room.  It is almost impossible to describe how wonderful these pillows feel under your head at night without sounding gushy.  The feeling you get(at least based upon the amount of water we add) is firm and secure. You never feel like the water is sloshing around. These pillows do not flatten out... ever and the fiber fill around the edges of the water bladder is high quality.  The first thing our guests ask after sleeping on them where to get them. Not often your can give someone the wonderful gift of a comfortable nights sleep.  All the positive comments from guests lead me to conclude that they are wonderful gifts as well and they do get oo's and ahs! I have bought them pairs for my parents, friends and other relatives and they all rant and rave. The pillow cover is also very nice quality. Not like the ones you buy in a department store and it really does protect the investment(the price here can't be beat) since you will never buy another foam or feather pillow after using these. I bought my first one in the doctors office for $69.99 so its like you get two for the price of one.
Good, but could be better. I got this pan because I've been coveting All-Clad when reading reviews of high-end cookware, and because of the low price.  I figured that the low price made it a teaser--something to get you prepared to pay the fortune you need to buy other items in the line.  It's a nice pan, but limited.  On the good side, it's hefty, has a perfectly flat bottom for good contact with the stove, heats evenly and holds the heat. It is not non-stick, so I use it when I want the contents to produce the fabled &quot;brown bits&quot; that come up with deglazing.  Stuff sticks, unless you use a lot of fat. As noted by other reviewers, it does not have a pouring spout.  The rim is squared off, so the pouring stream tends to be very wide.  My other major gripe is that it does not have a lid.  All-Clad lids are pricey, like everything else in their line.  I sometimes use a cheap tempered-glass lid with it.    I still covet All-Clad pans, but not as much as I did before
Handier than a collander. No longer dreading making pasta. Spaghetti fits in the pot without breaking, and the water can be drained out after cooking right into the main pot. Great! However, do not overfill the water in the pot or it can boil over, coming out the sides between the pot and the insert
I Love my Sunbeam Toaster. I had a Sunbeam toaster for many years and it finally stopped working properly. I went shopping and could not find a Sunbeam anywhere so I bought another brand and did not like it, took it back and got a different brand which I also did not like. I kept it for about 2 months and got on line determined to find a Sunbeam, which I did and as I said...I Love my Sunbeam Toaster! It met all my expectations of Sunbeams products and I will stick with it from now on. Thank you
Highly Recommended. Cooks Illustrated "Highly Recommends" this sheet. Its their first choice. Im just looking for a store I can buy it at!
Aerobie AeroPress Coffee Maker. A good way to make a cup of coffee.  Particularly good if you want a fresh brewed taste, but don't need to brew a full pot for only one or two people.  Can be stored in a cabinet or drawer, eliminating the use of counter space.  A must have for small kitchens
You need this vacuum!. WOW!  Our old vacuum finally bit the dust and it was time to buy a new one.  Concerned about quality and function, my wife and I looked at all the "big price" vacuums on the market yet we were hesitant to pay a small fortune for a vacuum.  Cleanliness is a high priority in our household, especially with a one year old son who puts everything in his mouth!  I read a ton of reviews and finally decided to take a chance on this vacuum and I am so glad I did!We thought our house was clean, but after using this vacuum just one time in one room, we were frightened at just how dirty our floors were based on how much this vacuum picked up from our floor.  This thing has great power, a nice wide head, and is so easy to use that my five year old wants to help vacuum.  We love it so much we are buying another one for our clothing store.The vacuum is a bit loud and heavy.  However, if you are vacuuming the noise shouldnt matter all that much.  The weight actually enables us to move it around furniture easier than a lightwieght because it tracks better.  Don't spend $500 for a vacuum.  We bought this for less than $100 with free shipping and we couldnt be happier.  If you need a vacuum and have a family or pets, this is the vacuum you need, you wont be disappointed
Victory. I turned the device onto human sound because on sub-sonic, I didn't get the satisfaction of hearing it trigger when the neighbor's two daschund dogs barked early in the morning.  The device itself on human sound was triggered by many things, air condtioner, mower, air plane, thunder, etc. which was not good in that I doubt it would serve as an effective training device. The dogs seemed to trigger it at random times.  We have large lots here in this area of NJ and I placed the device on the property border and that may have been the problem.  HOWEVER, my neighbor became so annoyed by the constant cycling on and off of the very invasive long distance tweeting noise that she begged for me to remove the device from the pole I placed on the border of my property and agreed to a more reasonable regime for dogs' outside times. She advised me that her book clubs (inside) and pool parties were interrupted and disturbed constantly.  The capitulation occurred about two weeks after installation. I would say that this device is well worth the cost for that reason alone
Great value. When you consider the great convenience of the Cuisinart TTG-500RM Mug to Go Coffeemaker--and the low price that Amazon is asking--this deal is too good to pass up. Enjoy a hot, tasty brew and save cash while you're at it
Cookie Cutter(s). I ordered various cookie cutter sizes and shapes.  I was pleased with them all.  They were shipped quickly and packaged carefully
Fantastic service and quick delivery. I appreciate the quick response after my purchase and the quick delivery.Thanks
Beautiful. They are bigger than what I'd consider ice cream bowls- but thats perfect for me. They came in perfect condition and are absolutely lovely
Very pleased with table. Love It! Great addition to my home:]. I just received my table and do have to say that I am empressed. To tell you the truth, after reading the other reviews, I was quite skeptical about purchasing this table. Like the hard headed person that I am, I went ahead and purchased it anyways. I didn't know what to expect when it first arrived. I read about how some people received only the table top or others received only the base. I was extremely happy to see the delivery man carrying both packages. Some people also mentioned that once they opened the boxes, pieces of the table were damaged/broken. After throughly inspecting all pieces, the only damage that I was lucky to receive is a slight, tiny scratch on the table top [which I can fix]. I am very satisfied with my table. I wish the best of luck to the next person that purchases it. I hope my review was helpful. :
THE CUTEST AND BEST PILLOW. This is a great gift because there fun,cute,and usefull so when you come home from a bad day at school or work there alaways there.To me there like a special friend that you can cuddle.So for kids and adults this is a must have
Works very well, I'll have to buy Lodge in the future. Nothing bad to say at all about this pan except for losing a few points in the beginning.  I seasoned this in the oven about three times before use, and the pan gets better every time.  It works very well on my gas grill, so I can cook breakfast outside which is fantastic
Overall, a great machine!. Good points:1) Heats up to the right temperature relatively quickly.2) Makes a great, strong cup of espresso with great crema (I have been using the Lavazza Gran Crema E.S.E. pods, never tried with ground espresso, because I am trying to avoid a mess).3) Mine takes about 20 seconds to go from "espresso" temperature to the hotter "frothing" temperature, as opposed to the one or two minutes other machines take4) It really does froth a nice thick froth, nothing runny and flimsy like every other cappucino maker I have ever had!5) You can pretty much brew one shot after another, with a few short seconds in betweeen to allow boiler to heat up the water to the right temp.  The consistency of brewing temperature is really very satisfactory and stable.6) You can make hot chocolates and tea with the frother and hot water coming from the frother, respectively.  Nice for a couple drinks at a time and a lot quicker than boiling a kettle for tea.7) Obviously, it is a beautiful piece and you will definitely notice it gets commented about.  Looks good in a modern kitchen but is also just as comfortable (in Stainless, pastel pink, cream or white) in a Shabby, retro, or country romantic kitchen.8) The clean up is a total breeze if you are using E.S.E. podsNot-so-good points:1) The water resevoir will need to be refilled if you make "longer" or "taller" drinks like lattes and "americanos", especially if you are making drinks for two or more in a household.  If you prefer straight espresso shots and those topped off with a nice scoop or two of frothed milk, you're in business and can go for three days or more without re-filling.  Otherwise, be prepared to refill daily.2) The "cup warmer" on top of the machine is not really hot enough to keep the cups warm unless you turn the machine on for a good 20 or 30 minutes before brewing with the cups on top.  But it is a cute place to store the cups and I never really had problem drinking espresso from a room temp. cup anyway, have you?  Just a small thing I noticed, really but something I thought could be pointed out.Just to note:  I bought mine off Ebay from the outlet refurbished and have had no problems.  It came with a 6 mos. warranty, and I saved hundreds.  If you cannot come up with 800 bucks for one, this is the way to go.  Happy brewing and lattes of love
Super Sofa. We ordered this sofa and matching ottoman on Target.com with a discount we recieved via email.  It has far exceeded our expectations!I read all the reviews and they are dead on.  The upholstery IS darker.  The cushions are firm and comfortable. It's very nice.  The frame is solid and the fabric luxurious.The only problem we had is with the freight conractor that Target used being slow to communicate. But, it did arrive in one piece and was easy to put together (having 2 people helped).If you are thinking about this couch....go ahead! You won't be sorry.It's high quality and affordable! This is very durable and looks like it costs twice as much.  I would buy it all over again! We love it
So nice to have sharp knives again. I had been using my Victorinox steak knives for all my cutting needs because I can't be bothered to get out my huge cooking knives and have to clean them afterward (yes, I am that lazy). I finally decided to get some knives for paring, etc. that I can throw in the dishwasher. The first time I used the paring knife in this set I actually cut my thumb because they are so much sharper than what I had been using (yes, I have that horrible habit of cutting towards my thumb and not away). Anyway, I was pretty impressed. This is a good brand, and this is a nice little set
Very practical and good looking product. This wood stand is exactly what I have been looking for.  It blends in well with other wood furniture.  The base doesn't take much room and is surprisingly quite stable
aerobed twin. Very easy to use, easy to deflate and put away.  The fan pumps it up quickly, and it hasn't leaked yet after 7 uses
great service& pizzelle press. this press is #1 in my book it is the best one that ive ever used serviceon delivery prompt&fast thank-you
Matches perfectly with Fiestaware!. I bought the plates, bowls, cups, etc. to go with my fiestaware because I like to mix and match my patterns to create a colorful, festive table to suit my mood for myself or entaining dinner guests.  The colors are actually more vivid and brighter than the pictures show on Amazon and the merchant's website.  I have tangerine, sunflower, cinnabar, persimmon, scarlet and shamrock in the fiesta. This set would also go well with the periwinkle and plum colors as well. Hopefully, they can find a way to create a more accurate picture of the colors. I have had the Santa Fe set for a few weeks now and using them in microwave and dishwasher is no problem. That said, if you like to mix n' match colors with Fiestaware or want a nice sturdy dinnerware set with lots of color, than this santa fe style is it
Great Expresso--Granos performs like machines four times as expensive. Superior product, great tasting expresso (rivals Starbucks), and very reliable.  I have owned the Granos for about 6 months and have found it to be a pleasure.  It is easy to use and makes a top quality cup of expresso.  The style of the unit is also unique and has generated much conversation with house guests.  If you want a reliable expresso machine that makes a great straight shot or latte, I can't recommend the Granos more highly. I plan to buy another for my office
I did it -- I made great BEER!. What can I say -- it works!  The trickiest part is assembling the unit so as to contain pressure.  I had to assemble it twice to get it right, but the patience paid off.  Once you are past that hurdle, the rest is simple.  My beer feremnted quickly and clarified nicely.  The directions are straightforward.  The beer tasted real good, like a true microbrew.  Very clean and light with a distinct hoppy aftertaste.  And the stock formula had quite an alcohol kick!  Wow.The unit suggests bleach cleaning but everyone else on the web says "beware".  I picked up some formulas and one step cleaners from Mr. Beer that should work fine in the Beer Machine
All-clad cookware set. This product lived up to the all-clad reputation as a quality set of cookware.  Having had commerical non-stick calphlon, the cleanup is a little more intensive, but the fact that the product cooking surface is all SS is important to me primarily from a durability perspective.  I will be buying more all-clad products
The Best. These are just  the best. Everyone who drinks from them, wants them. I have several sets, they're perfect for iced tea. I wash them in the dishwasher and have yet to see one break from it.
Great Juicer. The best juicer I've ever used.  Brings Kitchenaid quality to a product that can be anything but with other brands.  Easy to clean up and especially quiet
Just the thing for unlighted areas. I've always looked for lights that are useful in areas where reaching electricity is difficult.  This light is excellent.   I use it primarily in a garage storage area that has few outlets for electricity and always a spot that needs light.  However, if you forget and leave it on for an extended period, it will use up the battery quite quickly.  Best for short lighting projects
Superb Quality. Our queen mattress is not a pillow top so the fitted sheet is deeper than necessary but it tucks under fine.  Having the elastic around the entire fitted sheet helps with this.  The lace edge needs to be ironed after they come out of the dryer but that only takes a minute.  These sheets have held up well so far and feel great.  If you get the ruby color, make sure you wash them in cold to keep their bright color and prevent color runs.
Low Heat Cooking. I have had my eye on this pot to add to my collection for a long time, but was avoiding the price.  It is on sale at the Le Creuset Outlet this month for 249.99 - a veritable steal!  I bought it yesterday.  I own MANY pieces of Le Creuset; they are indeed heirloom quality and perfect for cooking anything that needs to cook at a steady, low heat.  They are fabulous in the oven, too.  I will use this one for my osso bucco for sure!  Find it at the outlet if you can.
EXCELLENT. THE CHAIRS ARE GREAT, THEY CAME IN SOONER THAN EXPECTED AND WERE REASONABLE AND CONSTRUCTED WELL
rival vsb1-6 seal a meal 8" bags. very pleased with the bags. they work very well with the model vs-110 seal a meal unit
Review for KitchenAidKFP750OB 700-Watt 12-Cup Food Processor, Onyx. I love my new KitchenAid Processor, it is wonderful and works fantastic!  I recieved a great price on it in comparison to the local stores and even received a special 1 day promotion code plus a rebate!  All in all it was my best buy of the year, thanks to Amazon.com
Silicone grip is excellent. I don't know why someone hasn't made a non-slip pot holder before but what a great idea.  Used it during Christmas and it works great
Feather & Down Comforter - warm as toast!. Got one for myself and one for my son, with no high expectations. I wanted to get away from electric blankets without adding weight. This did that job superbly. Light as the feathers within, it warms up fast and I sleep marvelously in the comforter cocoon. Wish I'd bought it years ago
salt shaker. I bought the pepper grinder in the store but couldn't find the salt grinder and this one is the perfect match
Great Item... Fiestaware is great anyway, but this piece is wonderful.  I use it for late night salads.  Plenty of room for the "Big Salad".  And if you want, a great bowl for chips at parties, or on football days like Saturday and Sunday.  A big roomy bowl that Jethro Bodine would have loved.  Be creative and put what you want in there.  The color is electric, and goes great with alot of things
Doors only partially solid oak and missing instructions!. This Item came well packaged, but was missing the assembly instructions.  A quick call to the Seller resulted in an e-mailed PDF copy being sent.  I searched the internet for instruction and most stores stated that you needed to e-mail or call for a copy.  I think the manufacturer should swallow the cost and print the 4 pages of instructions and include them.  The Assembly was very easy and was not missing any hardware.  The overall quality is decent.  The Product details are a little foggy.  Everything on the unit is MDF except the very front of the doors which is a nice oak.  The product description stated the entire door is solid oak, not the case as the sides, top and bottom as well as shelves in the doors are all MDF.  The back of the unit is rigid cardboard.  Overall, I am pretty happy with the construction.  I did have to redrill one of the holes because when assembled, the non locking door (left side) has a latch on the inside that did not match up with the predrilled hole.  I would recommend this cabinet based on its storage capacity, relatively low price and ease of assembly, just don't expect anything that will last several moves and a lifetime of use.
Simple, attractive, works very well. Unique looking with the soft polypropylene body contrasting with the chrome; distinctive and attractive for an item that sits in plain view in the kitchen all the time.  With normal bread in before lowering, the bread sticks almost 1/2 way out of the toaster, making it very easy to remove hot toast, to toast smaller items (the plunger will go up even further to assist);  the slots are extra wide so, although I have not used the sandwich cage accessory, I can see how there is enough room to make a sandwich and toast it in the cage (apparently a British idea, and  maybe something worth investigating).  I am doing normal toast on only setting 2, bagels on 3 and with the separate bagel feature they come out perfect! (bagel feature: push a button on the end of the darkness knob so that the heating elements change their normal output to get the bagels just right).  The machine feels solid as if it will last a long time.  The Cobalt Blue color is more of a bluish-purple in normal light, but very attractive.Very happy with the machine (the vendor that sent ours had it to us inside 48 hours with normal shipping!
Great gift!. This was a beautiful gift for my daughter who has beaucoup fiestaware. Much appreciated
Love them!!. These earthy-looking canisters are beautiful! I have  matching dinnerwear and accessories also.They look great on my brown quartz counter tops .An excellent purchase
Huge cup!. Holds alot and keeps them warm! Fits in my car cup holder as well where not much else does
A must for all bakers!!. I love this new Aluminum rolling pin!  It is fast approaching my favorite time of year and I am gearing up for tons of baking ( I give away baked goodies to our neighbors during the holiday season--which in my mind starts in October!!) I love the weight of this one--just throw it in the fridge for about 20 minutes ( I did it while I was making the dough) and it works great--I was making molasses cookies and the dough didn't stick at all! I am a sucker for red---so I also LOVE the color
Ice Cream Delight. Excellent machine for an outstanding sale/reconditioned price, 1/3 of current retail for SAME machine at Williams Sonoma!  Amazon Prime delivered it the NEXT DAY, WOW, How good is that!  Machine has been in frequent use since arrival and most recently turnoud out the chestnut icecream featured in a Gourmet magazine recipe.  The self-contained freezing unit is so much more convenient than the other style where you have to devote a portion of your refrigerator to freezing the bowl of the machine in readiness
Visi-Therm; Deluxe Aquarium Heaters 50 watt. keeps the tank warm for my little fish friend
10-inch Stainless-Steel Open Skillet. This skillet is of high quality stainless-steel and I am completely satisfied with it and the prompt delivery
This knife can perform. I bought this knife because I needed a boning knife to use in my meat science lab course.  This knife is amazing and it held up nicely despite the fact that I sharpened it weekly for several months and I used it to cut up a lot of different cuts of meat.  It is very flexible and it works really well at trimming fat and removing meat from bone.  Another positive thing about the knife is the handle.  It is easy to clean, it doesn't absorb moisture when you wash it, and it is comfortable to hold.  I highly recommend this knife, and at this price you definitely will not be dissapointed.  I paid more for it and I love my boning knife
Pleased. Got tired of can openers that left little "burrs" or that were difficult to get started.  Hesitant about buying a "As Seen On TV" product, but went for it.  Works well, amuses my toddler and the dogs.  Overall happy with product, hope it lasts
Very good grinder. This is a excellent coffee grinder..the only thing I would want different is one that adjusts to fine, med,. course grounds..You can mostly figure how long to run it to adjust the texture of the ground you want..Also very nice modern looking design.
Great filter but a bit hard to clean. I bought this for my boyfriend for christmas and he loves it and uses it several times a day.  He loves the lid that keeps the water hot while the tea is steeping and it seems to fit in all sizes of our mugs.  His only complaint was because the bottom of the filter is flat and made of plastic, it is harder to clean.  If it was slanted or had a little bit of filter on the bottom, you could run water through the bottom to get some if the tea sludge out.  Instead you have to dig around with your finger, scrape it for a bit and rinse it a lot.  All in all though he loves it and I may be getting myself one too.
Lightweight yet durable. I looooove these dishes so far. My mother had a set of corelle livingware while I was growing up and we had those things forever. They never break! I love that they are so light, but don't chip very easily. They don't overheat as much in the microwave like some other dishes either. The pattern is very simple but cheery. I'm actually thinking about buying another set, I like them so much
Star Wars Sheets and Comforter. I am very satisfied with these sheets.My child LOVES them.Yes the sheets are alittle thin,but mine child doesn't know or care about that.Make sure you wash them and the comforter in COLD WATER ONLY! They will last longer if you do this,after a couple of washes the sheets will get alittle softer.Just remember that you are buying this for your child,not you
Super frother. This gadget really works.  Warm up some milk, whip it with the frother, and, if you let it stand for a minute, the froth will hold up very well when you add the milk to your espresso or coffee.  The only reason to give this less than 5 stars is that I had to return one I ordered because it arrived with the frother rod separated from the housing.  Since it couldn't be put back together, I had to return it.
Instant babysitter... just add chocolate!. My husband LOVES chocolate, so I got this as a surprise for our wedding reception, which was held at my parents' place in the mountains... not that you needed to know that, but there it is.  :)We used the SF dark chocolate (which I purchased on Amazon) and it was fabulous!  No oil, no fuss.  You just melt it in the bag in the nuker and your good to go!The husband loved the surprise and the kids who attended our wedding were easy to find at any given time...  "If you're missing a kid, check the chocolate fountain."
A wonderful tool. The Global 10&quot; is a great knife that comes with a very sharp edge. It is rather light (at least for a 10&quot; knife) and is well balanced. It is well situated for both slicing meats and cutting and dicing vegetables, as it is easy to hold the knife forward towards its blade for a quick and balanced wrist action. The only reason I gave this knife 4 stars and not five is due to the handle. While it is dimpled it can still get slippery when cutting fatty meat. I would prefer a synthetic handle covering, but otherwise this is a well designed tool -- perhaps the best chef's knife available now
GOOD CHOICE. This is just the right size, The quiet lid closing is a pleasure and the feature that allows you to fasten your trash bag  saves frustration when heavy objects are put into the can.  Glad I made this purchase!
Amazing!. I've had 2 other down comforters before this one that were a couple hundred dollars each.  I could hardly believe the price!  It really is the deal of the century!! This one does poof up nicely.  The down really does stay evenly distributed and it is so warm! It is by far the best down product I've ever had
best damn fryer on the planet. this is a well thought out product for consumer use. easy to clean, easy to use. tried others and was very disappointed but i'm extremely pleased with this one. some advice stay away from the euro-pro
Great set of knives!. I received these knives as a gift for xmas and I love them.  They are beautiful and are very sharp!  I have heard that they rust if not cleaned right away and dried so I am preventing this by doing so.  I have heard that all good knives rust so it is not as though these are the only set that might.
Coffee lover. Greetings, I love this stove top espresso maker but there are some differences you may find of value.1)- The boiler where you put the water can only be filled about 25% compared to most at 70% which means a rather large unit in relation to the amount of espresso you can make.2)- Maintenance is more than others because this machine uses more pressure and there are more seals to replace when necessary. These are not readily available locally and you will probably have to have them shipped to you at an extra expense that may exceed your sense of reasonableness. Also..most of these types of machines come with extra seals. This unit doesn't come with any extra seals at all.3)- The picture looking through the window at the top of the machine seeing the nice crema is a farce. The only way to see the nice crema if you carefully follow the directions is to lift the lid up and wipe the condensation off of the inside that is always present that blocks your view.4)- Realize that this unit is made of Aluminum and some are concerned with the toxic effects of that if any gets into your Java that has high acidity content.Plusus include -1)- Very nice and tasty espresso superior to other stove top machines.(no aluminum taste)2)- Really nice crema but only if yor coffee is of a fine grind #1, or #2 and the coffee needs to be freshly ground. If you buy pre-ground coffee packages at the market you will not be seeing any crema. I buy fresh coffee ground by the half pound at #1, or #2 fine grind and get really good results.I hope this is helpful to you.Cheers
Some inexpensive entertainment. I love this little fish bowl. I have had no problems with the size or quality of the bowl. When I clean the bowl. I gently remove it from the base. Use both hands. Take it to the sink, do not pour the water out of the bowl. Leave the betta in the bowl, just be gentle and slow with your movements. I use a turkey baster and suck the yuck and food that has settled to the bottom of the bowl.  I clean the bowl every 7 to 14 days so there is not much junk in the bowl to suck out. Take your time and move your baster around the bottom and squirt it out in the sink with each fill of fish water. My Charley Brown doesn't mind at all having his home cleaned if you take it slow and gentle and don't disturb him. After about half the bowl of fish water has been removed take a paper towel and run it around the inside of the bowl and remove any residue that may have built up on the inside of the bowl. I use spring water that I pick up at walmart in the gallon jugs. VERY SLOWLY, pour and fill the bowl back up to the top, I leave about an inch of space at the top. The fish does better if you leave some of his old water in his bowl.  The fish gets stressed if only all fresh water is used to replace his water. Replace the bowl back in its base using both hands gently. I can't emphasize enough, show and gently, when doing this job. Your betta will love you for it. If you are having a lot of junk in your bowl, you are feeding too much. I only give 2 little pellets every other day.  Don't seem like much but its plenty. And the betta is fine without a heater for the bowl. Unless in the winter you sit him outside on the patio. Now that would not be good. Keep your baster only for your betta bowl. Don't want turkey in your betta bowl. My Charlie is thriving so I must be doing something right. If you don't have much space you will love this. Make the cat keep her paws to herself
Danby countertop dishwasher. We use the dishwasher in the office workroom of our church.  It is the perfect size for a small staff of 10 to 12 people.  Does a great job and is rather quiet and was easy to connect
It works. The spray has helped a lot. Forget the plug-in diffuser.  Our boy cat has been spraying/marking because of outside animals, so when we spray this on the doors, it deters him. The key is to spray EVERY night and EVERY morning, and to hit every spot where he might spray (under windows, etc.).  Also recommend Rescue Remedy drops in the cat's food or water, or behind their ears.  Together with the Feliway, it's the only thing that has worked. (Don't do more the 4-5 drops at a time.
More Shoes Please!. I got tired of having shoes all over my room so I ordered this shoe rack.  I'm happy, happy, happy with it.  It takes up very little floor space since it uses vertical space to store shoes.  Shoes also have a chance to air out between wearings.  I think I actually wear more of my shoes since I can see them and get to them in a second.  I highly recommmend this shoe rack for anyone who loves shoes and has limited storage space.
I love my mogu. I love my mogu doll this is the third one that I have purchased.  I now have two and my sister-in-law who always wanted to steal mine now has her own
Fits my needs to a Tee! Buy It!. I got this pot to replace an old 5 quart teflon lined aluminum pot of similar shape but with plastic handles, which kept it from the oven without extraordinary measures. The old pot simply did not heat up very quickly or evenly and it's dark interior made it more difficult to see what was going on with braises or pasta cooking.So, I was often lugging out my 8 quart Le Creuset dutch oven when the smaller lighter pot would be the perfect size, but for the plastic handles.I have used it a few times since receiving it, and it meets every expectation, even outperforming a similarly sized 5 quart Calphalon pan which was my old favorite when I bunked with a gas range.This is an incredibly uselfu size and shape, and worth the cost if you cook a lot.Highly recommended
what I was looking for.. Finally, a product that will do as advertised and NOT RUST!!!!!THANK YOU
Outstanding. Exactly as pictured.  Looks great.  Pumps work flawlessly.  I put hand-soap in one and dish-soap in the other.  I have used it for about a year now without problems
elegant and sturdy. I must admit that I always thought that people who decanted their wines were just a little bit over the top.  A friend of mine told me that he could take a relatively cheap - or new - wine and make it taste better by pouring the wine into a decanter through a wine strainer.  By increasing the wine's exposure to oxygen it reduced the tannic taste some wines have when poured immediately from the bottle; proving the old "let it breathe" adage.  He won me over after we hammered down a couple of bottle of wine his way.   I purchased this along with the 1 liter version as a gift for another friend
Dissappointed I cannot purchase. Hi I am really sad that I cannot purchase this product as I live in Australia I think it is out of this worldCheersAnn
Works well but UV light has short lifespan. Has worked well for two years, but the UV light only seems to last for a few weeks.  I have stoped replacing it.
Great Quality and Size. My Mom asked for one of these to replace some $200 carafe she had broken that came from William Sonoma.  The one from William Sonoma seemed grossly overpriced to me so I bought this one based on reviews from others.  My Mom liked it even better than her old one!  I bought one for myself at the same time and enjoyed serving tea to guests in it.  It's not too big to be too heavy but it holds enough tea for 4-6 people.  Perfect
TV Top Shelf. Item as described and very easy to assemble.Arrived in a timely manner.
Great table and chairs. I ordered the rectangular version of this table and chairs set even after reading the other reviews.  This was after my husband said that he could get it together no problem.  When the table and chairs arrived my husband was busy, so I tried putting everything together.  I had a hard time getting all the screws in and was close to stripping the heads as well.  My husband helped me out.  He backed out all the screws, applied soap to them as lubrication (i.e., from a bar of bath soap) and screwed them back in.  The table and chairs are as sturdy as can be and the quality of wood is wonderful (especially for the price...most sets I looked into were in the $300 to $500 range).  I would recommend this product
Worked great for us!. This works well. You do have to adjust the oven temp for the darker pan. I was worried about using non non-stick tools on it, but it did not scratch.
Perfectly sized!. I, like the last reviewer, found that the bowls in the 16 piece-service for 4 Sango Gold Dust Black are quite large.  These bowls are the perfect size for ice cream or cereal.  Very nice appearance and feel.  I ordered a full set of Sango dishware from Amazon.com and all of it shipped very well protected and not a problem with the items at all
Buy for youself, get some for gift giving. Wine server looks great and ends the drips! What a great hostess gift for the price
cute candle piece. I think these little candle holders are great for any occasion. And they aren't expensive either. Therefore you can buy any color for any occasion to match any room in your house. These can be used for formal occasions or just everyday use
Exceptional Value and Quality. I have wanted a nice soft down comforter ever since we took a cruise and had such a nice one on our bed. Unfortunately, before this one, all of them were out of my price range. I was hesitant to order one this inexpensive, figuring the quality couldn't be that great. Boy, was I wrong. My husband looked at it on our bed and asked me twice, "Are you sure that's what you paid for THIS?"It is soft, it is luxurious, it's just a fine quality comforter. I hope to get another one for our guest room before Amazon wises up and charges more for this. Wow! I'm very happy with this purchase
Great Value for the money... This knife set is a good value for the money.  Need to keep the slicer and butchers knives sharp through proper maintenance but that is true of all good knives.Utility knife is wasted and I really wish the scissors came apart for easy cleaning as I use them to cut whole chickens often.  Otherwise Chef's knive and slicer feel very good in the hands.  Steak knives still sharp after 6 months of use.  And overall the quality of manufacture is excelent
Excellent quick grill for the kids & adults. I purchased this so that my 14 year old wouldn't use the stove on his own. I wished I had bought one of these years ago for myself. It cooks evenly and the meats retains moisture. The only drawback is cleaning it - other than that it's a great product.
Picky baby food eater. While my son is still picky about the consistency of baby food, he does eat it.  Which is great.  In addition I will also say this is a very easy to clean, use and store baby food grinder.
Fixed our Problem!. Our two and a half year old son was just potty trained and couldn't quite make it through the night. We had a smaller pad on the bed, but it would shift and move and never give us 100% coverage. This pad is perfect! Fits wonderfully and easy to toss in the wash. Would definitely recommend it
Puppy Playpen. This is a really nice pen for puppies or older dogs. It is a great item to have when you do not want your furkid underfoot. I bought mine to put my pups that I am selling in when people come to look at them. It would be nice to find a bottom pan that would work for this especially when using it for pups that are not potty trained. I recommend this to anyone with furkids
Wamsutta 100% Cotton Luxury Gingham Flannel Standard Sham, Maple. Really nice quality at a great price
Just what I needed. My stove hood was getting darker and VOILA!  It's bright again!Easy to install and minimally packaged
Melitta One, Mango. A very interesting coffeemaker indeed. Funky but conservative colors and a rocket-shaped design lets you know this product is unique. It is not small, however, just because it's a single serve maker does not make it small. It serves about 4-5 cups with one coffeepod and is instantly warmed up and ready to go. The only drawback is buying the pods specifically made for coffeemakers such as these and they can't be used for any other coffee maker
wonderful. the product does what it is suppose to do. you can not go wrong with Kitchen Aide products
GREAT coffee roaster. We had one of the orginal Hearthware roasters and wore it out after 3 years of weekly roasting.  we looked at several other brands and went back to the newest hearthware,  and very glad we did.  the programed options are outstanding,  its easy to use and makes great coffee, very consistant roasts  a friend has another brand and can not get consistant results
A god send. Great shape for the freezer or fridge.  Our food has kept so well that there is little wastage.  Good for marinator or just as a food saver canister.  The whole concept is such a 'friendly' product to the Earth - recycleable and reduces food waste.  I wish everyone would get at least one of the food saver products.
Nice 'Winter' Grill. This grill comes in handy in the middle of Michigan winter when we can't fire up our outdoor BBQ.  It cooks quickly and cleans fairly easily.  I have never dared to place it in the dishwasher, although it sounds like a lot of people have so I might try it.  There are a few downfalls - you do get grease splatters on the countertop no matter how careful you are and if you like your meat medium-well be prepared to crack a window open because the 'burnt' smell will linger for days otherwise
High quality and user friendly. The Henckels 4 star knives are wonderful. I am able to get such a good grip on these. Very happy with the set. The only difference between this 4 star set and the 5 star set is the handles. I personally liked how my hand contoured to these handles. Previously owned the famous and expensive cutco knives. These are just as well balanced. Highly recommend
Great, affordable, German China. German made china that is fabulous. I paid $10.99 per plate a week ago, and now Amazon lists this same plate at $16.10! Of course, that is still way below retail, but not the great buy I got. However, you'll like the plate as it is beautiful and goes with any other dishes you may have. I bought 10 for use as buffet plates. Be aware that the plate is almost flat, the edge is only slightly raised. No design except on the wide edge which is smooth but with discreet dotted design the exact color of the plate itself. Easy to coordinate with about anything else you put on the table. Only 4 stars because of unreasonable price increase
Well-worth the extra cost!!!. "I just received and tested my new Miele office vac. Even this lowest-end Miele is FANTASTIC! It's as quiet as the one I have at home, it's similarly designed, easy to use, and works terrifically well. I am so pleased that I spent the extra money and got a really good vacuum.
nice pan, a little small. I guess I should have taken into account measurements.  It is a small Jelly roll pan, but good quality.  Gooey packaging came off with goo gone.  Bakes well
Works well and can be cleaned completely. The best thing about this deep fryer is that all parts could be taken apart and cleaned. It works well and is safe. But it fills my house with greasy smell. It was a lot more than just deep frying on the stove top. Also, it was a little too big for a family of four, considering the amount of unusable oil I had to throw down the drain. I will still use it for recipes which call for a deep fryer, with good ventilation
silicone baking sheet. It's great, but I realized I can't cover my non stick pan with it and broil because it can't have direct flame.  Other than that, it's great
Think &quot;out of the box&quot;{. Fill the ramekin with a dip and place in a matching (coordinated) LeCreuset oval casserole dish filled with chips or veggies.  Nice presentation
Love these pieces. I love these pieces. I plan on using them as decorative items when not being used to entertai
Very happy with purchase. I purchased the Round Metro Metal wall clock for my husband for his birthday.  I was pleased with the sturdy metal case the clock is encased in.  My husband liked the color and the easy-read face.  I would recommend this clock to anyone
cast iron 13 inch wok. this is exactly does what it says , no fancy gourmet designs. after seasoning, will last a lifetime with proper care
Better than original carafe. After the handle broke off the carafe that came with our Krups AromaControl (after about 2 years of use, perhaps several times a week), I found this one and ordered it.  My belief is that cleaning the original carafe in a dishwasher is what caused the handle to come off, however I am perturbed that I had to go to the trouble of replacing it.One would think the engineers would consider the heat of a dishwasher when choosing the plastic components.  I am not entirely sure, but it is possible that the plastic (ABS?) became too brittle with oxidation and simply fractured.  I searched on the internet and found this to be a very common problem, which is at the same time comforting and annoying.Upon receiving this carafe, I was disappointed due to the lightweight feel of it.  I prefer a certain heft, and I assumed that the lack of this in the new unit means that it is cheaply made.  However, this has proved not to be the case; moreover, the decreased weight is actually something of a blessing.  Further, I think they removed some of the threads around the neck of the carafe (inside) on this model.  The advantage of this is that the coffee pours better (a tighter stream, not a wide cascading waterfall like the original carafe), however, I it seems to make screwing the top on more difficult.In all, it is superior to the original, however I am not washing the carafe in the dishwasher for fear of the handle coming off.  I assume that they have fixed this problem in this model, however I cannot be sure of this.  I also must say that it is a tad over-priced, and that perhaps [...] might be a more reasonable price.  The only reason I did not get a new coffee maker is that the AromaControl works well and makes good coffee (I use Illy)
Pleased Buyer. These dishes are just what I needed for every day use.  What with one husband and four grandchildren who inevitably drop one dish or another, this is just what I needed and am very happy that I found it at such reasonable prices
Love butter?  You need a "keeper". Love it that it keeps the butter soft and spreadable and fresh.  This one holds a larger amount than others I have had.  It is a bit more awkward to hold, however.  It has a wide lid with no handle so you need to grab on to the sides of the lid to pick up. Love the Emile Henry colors
The Best Grinder for the Best Grind. We have had one of these grinders for over 15 years.  It was always the best and easiest to use.  Simple to change grind size, easy to fill and the side turn gives excellent leverage when grinding.  We broke the top and kept it in place with duct tape - not real pretty.  We were so happy to find the same grinder and now have two
not for smaller dogs. I bought this but found the swivel clips to be too heavy for my Shih Tzu and Yorkie so I gave it to my friend who has bigger dogs. It's pretty good quality and heavy duty
Happy chopper! Review applies to both 5" & 7". I completely agree with Sobai's January 9th review. I looked at the Furi knives when shopping locally two months ago, but my husband encouraged me to purchase a set of Wusthof classic knives instead. While I love the Wusthofs, I reach for my Furis just as often.I received the Furi 5" knife as a Christmas gift and was so pleased with the product that I ordered the 7" a week later.  Both knives were incredibly sharp right out of the package. I give them a couple of swipes down a steel before each use and they're holding an edge beautifully.Like Sobai, I also like the orange silicone grip (did someone actually call it plastic?). I have small hands and find the grip to be ergonomic, safe and comfortable. The knife remains secure in my hand even when cutting chicken! The orange color stands out in my block, making it easy to find the desired knife quickly. Besides, nothing like a little "Harley Davidson" orange to brighten up the kitchen ;-)Knives are a matter of personal preference. I'm pretty picky and have found the Furis to be a quality product. My recommendation: go to a local knife shop and hold a lot of different knives in your hand. Pay attention to how each feels and imagine how your hand would feel after cutting a mountain of veggies. The "best" knife in the world for one person may not be the best choice for another.Happy chopping
Grape paper towel holder. This item was shipped quickly and arrived sooner then promised.  It is a beautiful piece and I get compliments from everyone.  Thanks
Good Quality, but wouldn't recommend for top bunk. I bought this mattress pad for my 4-yr-old son, who sometimes had accidents in the bed at night.  The pad is of good quality: it adds coushin to the mattress and it has never leaked for us.  I also bought one for my older son's bed, which is the top bunk, and it's really difficult to put it on his mattress.  It's quite a workout, so I would not recommend it for loft beds or bunk beds
Very Satisfield. So far I am very satisfied with this product.  I was surprised how large the basket was.  It handles the needs of our family quite well and I love the fact that oil isn't splattering all over my walls
Great cups for the kids, guests, anyone!. I originally purchased these tumblers for our kids to use.  I wanted something that was unbreakable (for the kids), but also something that would withstand the dishwasher (our old "kid" cups cracked after two runs in the dishwasher...they were cheapies from Target).These tumblers are great.  The smaller size in the set is ideal for little hands, but my kids use the bigger ones as well.  They've been dropped several times without breaking/cracking.  HOWEVER, we did have one that was sitting full of water in the sink, and someone dropped a heavy butter knife into the cup.  This created a small crack on the inside of the tumbler; the crack does not go all the way through, so we still use the tumbler.Overall, these tumblers are great as an unbreakable option for kids.  We've had friends over for dinner and sometimes they actually prefer to drink out of these versus our regular glass tumblers.  With their modern design, they will work well out on the patio this summer as well!  My only word of caution is to not drop heavy silverware directly down into them (kind of a no-brainer there), otherwise they WILL crack.They look like glass from a distance, and have a very substantial feel to them as well.  We initially ordered one set, but after they arrived we ended up ordering another one!  They've withstood the dishwasher AND my kids.  I highly recommend these to everyone
taylor 10 key timer. The timer is easy to use, and a very convenient size to carry around in a pocket.  I can hear it ring from another room, if necessary.  I wish the ringer, or buzzer, would go off a second time, after a brief interval.I have yet to figure out how to replace the battery if it ever dies
this is the only cat litter I buy. I highly recommend the Fresh Step litter, it clumps hard and I never have stinky litter boxes. I have six cats, so it is well tested.I don't recommend the "used" litter as offered on this page. Wonder who got the bight idea to sell the used stuff at a discount...bleah
loves waffles. after searching high and low for a NON Belgian Waffle maker, I decided to try this one..   Make great waffles and love my grilled cheese sandwiches.  Seems the only waffle makers you can find are Belgian waffle makers, and I do not like Belgian waffles.  This iron is a great buy
Perfect for a smaller bedroom. This works great, it's quiet.  It does take a while to get warm, but when it does, it maintains the toasty-ness.  I wouldn't recommond it for a huge room or a living room area, but works great at night in my bedroom.  It's not super warm, but an oil-filled radiator isn't supposed to be.
DRY FOOD DISPENSER IS VALUABLE ADDITION. THIS IS A TRULY TERRIFIC "UPGRADE" TO OUR KITCHEN.  WE RECENTLY DID A COMPLETE REMODEL, AND WE WERE DETERMINED TO MAKE THINGS HANDIER TO FIND AND USE.  THE CEREAL DISPENSER IS DECORATIVE, AS WELL AS EFFICIENT
Best Dog Toy Ever. My dogs love this toy! Granted that they only last a month or two in my house, but when I do have them my dogs love them, a lab/pitbull mix and a shih tzu. Both love to play with them and my lab mix really loves the sound he just goes around "honking" all day long. Definatally worth the buy to see if your dogs love it like mine do. They also come in small sizes for toy dogs if you don't want a big one
The Perfect Wok!. I highly recommend this wok.  It is super light but very strong.  It comes unseasoned, but it was easy to season as it was so light.    Once seasoned, it became a deep coppery color, and is slowly getting darker.It cooks beautifully, very quickly and the vegetables stay crisp and delicious.  Originally, I wanted a wok with a longer handle thinking this would make it easier to move.  Suprisingly the handles do not usually get very hot, and I haven't really had any trouble holding it when cooking or picking it up.Cleaning it easy, once seasoned nothing sticks, and even when I leave it unwashed overnight, it cleans quickly just using cold water and one of those plastic covered sponges.I definitely recommend getting the wok ring, this makes the wok far more stable. Otherwise this is the perfect wok, it is light, strong, cast iron and is a pleasure to cook with.
Excellent quality for the money. I bought this cake dome at least 2 years ago and am still using it today. It is very sturdy and the glass quality is pretty good, especially considering the price. I paid something like $15 at the time which is an incredible deal
This kettle saves me time in the kitchen. My husband thinks that small appliances are a waste of counterspace and money.  I don't always disagree, but we make press pot coffee twice a day and heating up the water on the stove took 15+ minutes and there was always floating sediment in the bottom of our kettle...sounds appetizing!  I researched this kettle and liked the description that the water boiled quickly and turned off automatically....I also wanted it to retain heat and be able to be taken off of the heating source for serving.  My husband (and I) really like this pot.  We use it not only for coffee (full pot to boiling takes just under 5 minutes) but to boil water for pasta and other cooking.  It saves me time and I don't want to be in the kitchen all night....this is one small appliance that we do not want to be without.  The only change I would make is that the handle seems a bit large for the average hand so it is not as comfortable to hold and I still have sediment...which is probably a problem with my water.  At least now I can get into the pot to clean through the large opening.  No weird smells here and we have been using daily for 6 months
A Must Have for Serious Ice Cream Consumers... I don't know how many spoons my husband bent while he was scooping his gourmet ice creams.  Nevertheless, I never really considered buying an ice cream scoop or spade - afterall, a spoon was good enough for my parents, so why not for us.  However, tennis elbow set in and my spouse needed something that would allow him to dig into the hardest ice creams.  I needed something to round out an Amazon order so that I qualified for a $25 discount and voila - this ice cream spade was the answer to both our needs.  We love it - it's sturdy, well made and we're thrilled with this "accidental" purchase that turned out to be an absolute necessity
Great juicer. Have bought several of these juicers for members of the family and myself.It allows me to juice about anything.Only change I'd make is a slightly larger mouth in which to put produce, so that less cutting would be required.  But the results are great. Relatively easy to clean.  Use mine to make healthy juices for my husband, who has cancer.  The surprise to me was that healthy can taste so good.  Use this several times a week, and it's holding up very well after a year of use
Nice Product. I use my blender for protein shakes and it works very well chopping frozen fruit and mixing. The product does exactly what it says it will do; however, I didn't think about the fact that some of your contents will get stuck at the top when you turn it over to blend. You sometimes have to do a little shaking to get everything down to reach the blade. I still give it 4 stas though since it does work very well
Dog collar for wireless fence. Works great, actually better than the original with more features
Definitely worth it. I love this blender.  We use it at least 3 times a week to make strawberry smoothies.  I've never had a problem with it and its a cinch to clean.  Great product
Works really well. I bought this to replace an old Honeywell Heppa air purifier. Since we were use to the white noise of the old one, we wanted one we could hear. If you put this one on the lowest setting it's just right noise wise.The 2nd and 3rd settings we find way too loud.  It cleans the air well. I only gave it 4 stars instead of 5 because the light around the control is extremely bright. I had to paint around it to black it out and it still shines through some
Love the plates but they arrived scratched. I'm sticking with the lighter colors due to scratching.  My persimmon 16 piece setting arrived with two dinner plates scratched.  I think next time I'll order them as individual place settings as they weren't packed well.  Amazon will give me a 20% discount for keeping them.
Old is New Again. I purchased a refurbished Eureka Boss Upright and found it to be as good as new! We have two dogs with fur flying in short hairs, sticking and embedding into the rugs. This upright has such great capabilities with dog hairs. I feel like my efforts of starting up the vacuum are now worth the effort.I love the ease of switching from rug suction to cleaning tools suction- it is the most user-friendly one I have ever used.I recommend the refurbished vacuum to all. It was worth every penny and shipping was very quick with this company
Spa Washcloth Weight. Columbia towels are especially luxurious to use and for a long time I didn't use them because they looked so lovely and new hanging in the bathroom. The color is especially pretty and reminds me of a deep lavender, they call it Plumberry. The weight of the towels is especially luxurious and they absorb water so well, that the towel at times can still feel almost dry after you use it. When the washcloths are completely drenched, they do seem a little more heavy than most, although they have that "spa feel" to them and they retain heat very well, which makes them sort of comforting. I've tried many towels and these are the most absorbent I've found. They are made with 100% combed cotton and have a heavier feel. The edges are sewn especially well with a nice fabric border so they don't fall apart the first time you wash them.~The Rebecca Review
Best in show. I dont honestly know where I first found mine, but I fell in love with it immediately.  You never have to struggle with the cork.  My parents recently discovered a love for wine and as a gift I was going to get them one of these.  Well to my suprise, there is not a single shop in a 100 mile radius that carries this.  Everyone still uses the one step approach or worse yet, the auger approach.  Five stars all the way
Great sturdy product. I've had this for several months already and it holds up very well.Great thick durable plastic. And the suction works well for the tiling behind my kitchen sink. Surprisingly, it has not fallen since. I made sure to follow the instructions and clean the surface and allow to dry before applying the suction. Although, it is not holding a heavy amount of items, just a few sponges and a 3oz dispenser of soap.Note: Don't mistaken this product to being the same one as "OXO Good Grips 1056042 Utensil Holder, White", also sold on amazon. When I looked closer to the product image+reviews, that doesn't have suctions. The compartments on that would have been great for this sink basket.
Icecream maker helped family reunion be a success. We enjoyed using this icecream maker very much.  It froze the icecream in under 20 minutes, the instructions were clear and the icecream delicious.  All the kids had a turn at the crank handle and it was fun, like grandma's old summer reunions.Only problem we had was in setting it up. A small metal burr kept the handle from cranking properly, but a bit of time and muscle got it working perfectly.
Really Love This Set. I'm not a professional cook by any means, but I got this set almost a year ago and I really enjoy it. If you buy it I would recommend also purchasing some Bar Keeper's Friend (cleaner) and some copper polish. I've been able to keep my set looking great- I even requested and received a pot rack for Christmas just so I can display them. It really hasn't taken much time or effort to clean them and keep them nice. I usually use just soap and water and then the Bar Keeper's Friend every few washes. Nothing major. The copper needs to be polished every few washes, but it's really easy - just put the polish on a rag and wipe. Rinse and done.I can honestly say I don't have any complaints
Very Stylish. Very sleek and stylish mirror. Compares favorably to mirrors selling for much higher prices.
Customer Satisfaction. My order was delivered to my house within a few days; and it was the XMAS rush!  I have always wanted some LeCreuset cookware, and I was able to purchase it on sale, and there was no tax and shipping and handling!  I was thrilled.  I plan to purchase more pieces.  And I have been using it regularly since XMAS.  The product is great, and Amazon.com was great!
Great little expresso pot!. This concerns the Bialetti Class 4 cup expresso pot.  After becoming addicted to the much too expensive Starbuck's caramel macchiato but living too far away to have one daily, I happily discovered this small expresso pot.  The Amazon reviews sounded encouraging so I ordered one.  It's amazing!  I use sugarfree vanilla syrup, nonfat milk (frothed with the Aerolatte milk frother, another wonderful product) and sugarfree caramel sauce and when combined with the expresso made with the small pot I have an even better tasting drink than Starbuck's in less than 3 minutes.  I like it so well that I've ordered the Bialetti Class 10 cup for when I have guests.  Both are made in Italy of heavy gauge stainless steel and are very handsome.  Incidentally, my husband bought a Bialetti Musa 6 cup for me but I had to return it.  It leaked around the seal when making the coffee.  It was made in India and although it looked very nice, the steel  was a lighter gauge or it was possibly made of aluminum, I don't remember for certain, and I didn't like the handle or lid opener button nearly as well as the Class version.
Good but a little mis-sized. I bought this two years ago. I probably use it once a month for baking. Even though it's non-stick, I had purchased a silicone baking mat since it allows the pan to last longer and cookies don't burn. Unfortunately, I discovered that this sheet is about a half inch too narrow (probably 11" when I needed 11 5/8"). It would have been nice if the full dimensions had been listed on the product desciption.Otherwise, it's done pretty well. Nothing sticks and it cleans up well except for some condensation that seems to have left brown stains that I cannot wash away
great little vac. This is a great all around small, inexpensive vac for apt or to use with an upright. It comes with tools for small spaces and has a long hose and cord. It has great suction and cord and tools store on the unit. My only complaint is that the tube and tools may leave black marks on the walls if you are not careful
A nice version of a useful item. The napkin holder is a great compliment to your kitchen, especially if you have a wine theme going.  I bought it for my sister-in-law and it looks great on her countertop.  The only think that was a bit deceptive is that it looks like black wrought iron, but it's really more a dark brown
My 2-year old loves this. We also got the ladybug and lion for my 2-year old and 16 month old.  My 2-year old thinks it's really cool to feed the ladybug his dirty clothes.  It sure beats them piling up on the floor!  This is a really fun way to get little kids accustomed to doing some of their own chores to help mommy clean up.  They really are pretty cute and the low price is a bonus
This is excellent for cappuccino lover!. This is very easy to use and to clean and I love this cappuccino more than starbucks. I also love this looks. It is so cute
Perfect every time. The product is as sdvertized and is very simple to use. I am not a coffee connisseur but I do enjoy a good espresso. It has never been bitter or burned. I am very pleased with this product
Beautiful table. I ordered this coffee table.  It arrived as scheduled.  It was average difficulty to assemble.  The quality is consistant with the money paid.  I love it.  Everyone who sees it asks where I got it because they have not seen anything like it.  I have had it for over a year and am extremely happy with it
Love it!!. This thing is great. I would give it 5 stars. But the 2 stoppers that come with it are the same size. It's great for most bottles of wine. But I found that if the cork is a little big, that the stoppers do not seal properly. I put a bottle of wine in my refrigerator (and I had to lay it on its side) and it leaked. Despite that....I love it.
Use it all the time. Very hady not only for deep frying in the wok, but for fishing raviloi and other pasta out of a large pot of boiling water instead of straining.  A must have tool in the kitchen and for the price, you really can't go wrong
Absolutely wonderful!!!. I love  this pan! We have a large family and I easily fit 5-6 chicken breasts in this pan at one time.You don't have to cook with high heat because this pan easily distributes the heat evenly. Low heat is also best so the food doesn't stick.Clean up is really easy!!! Warm, soapy water and that's it!This is definitely a quality made pan. I have several pieces from Le Creuset and know they will last me through my lifetime
A Newer Version. Our old Gizmo's battery gave up the ghost.  We liked the can opener because it was compact under the cabinets and worked well.  The only problem with the first version was that it was always plugged in a charging which shortened battery life.The new version must be removed from the holder to charge overnight.  This lets you fully discharge the battery before charging which extends battery life.  Much better.Oh, it does a very good job of opening cans
Great product.. The Flexible Chopping mats are great for preparing/chopping and dicing fruits and veggies!Thank you
Super quick machine- Works great!. I am a pastry chef at a small restaurant and just spent countless hours over the holiday season making sorbets and gelatos in my home sized (1 pint) Lello  gelato maker, which I recommend, but this makes 1/2 gallon of in 15-30 minutes ( depending on the product desired).The upside - works well for both soft-serve/ frozen drinks and gelato/ice cream. It's easy to clean. It's made in the US, and it's fast.The downside. IT'S HUGE. I thought the UPS man was delivering a Toyota when it showed up.  It's loud...really really load, makes the washing machine sound like the toaster.All in all, I am very pleased. Amazon's price was great ( $200 less than Kitchenaide is selling them on Ebay) and the shipping was fast ( overnight) and free.
RAVE REVIEWS. Very nice set, sleek design feels good on the hand.  Ultra sharp blade and gleeming metal.  We will order more of these and give some as gifts
my favorite appliance. I have had my machine for several weeks and it rocks! There was a wee learning curve (my fault, not the machine's) but it is now turning out loaf after loaf of delicious fluffy bread. I've had absolutely no mechanical problems at all so far. As long as I follow the recipe instructions (who knew it was so important to use all room-temp ingredients so the bread would rise properly?!)I get a perfect loaf every time. My family of bread-loving men couldn't be happier and I really believe it is saving me money to make my own bread, plus it is so much more convenient than making the trek to the closest grocery store, which, given where I live (Middle of Nowhere), isn't very close
Solid Cleaner. This unit cleans floors very well, even short berber patterned carpet that has different levels.  It is easy to use with the separate soap dispenser.  Overall it works well.  My only 2 compliants would be the upholstery attachment spray is sporadic and it is hard to clean out the used water tank and path.  I have dogs and it takes some work to get all the dog hair out
best one so far. i have used others but so far, this was the best one and easy to use....my sister used it and she loved it so i ordered one for her also.....highly recommen
Rowenta Ironing Board Cover #ZD4430. This hard to locate ironing board cover was exactly as advertised, shipped quickly. It was a very satisfactory transaction
Going strong after 10 years. After 10 years of marriage, 2 rough kids, 5 different houses/moves, multiple dishwashers I'm ready for more. I think my kids have lost some of the spoons (in the garbage) so I'm ready for more and am ordering another set. My only beef is that you can't just order teaspoons, but have to get another whole set
Commercial Hard-Anodized 2-1/2-Quart Shallow Saucepan with Lid. Very pleased with the quality of this pan, good weight and cooks food evenly, clean up is easy too. Good product
i love this skillet. what I like most about it is that I am able to use very little oil for sauteing, and I can use it in the oven for making steaks
Nice compact unit. If you're looking for an ultrasonic cleaner for general purpose usage then this is your unit. I've used it to clean a variety of objects and it definitely does the job. It has been trouble-free. The size of the unit is compact enough for easy storage or travel. In short, this cleaner performs as advertised
Excellent. Great Product for the price.  Paid 29.99 for a king sized waterproof mattress pad.  Hard to find one for that price in the stores with such a high level of quality.  I am extremely pleased with my purchase
Makes a huge difference, some features confusingly lacking. I got this to accompany my Gaggia 35005 Carezza, because had been having inconsistent results with blade grinders, and store bought pre-ground wasn't doing it for me. This thing makes a *huge* difference, it's incredible. For that particular espresso machine, I found that a grind setting of 9 works great.The problems are the doser doesn't actually neatly dose anything, sometimes I have to hit it 5 times, sometimes 3... puzzling. You can eye it, but the thing only appears to work if you grind a bunch of beans, and make more than one drink. First drink, it takes a few pulls to get the grounds to the front for the doser. Also, there's no neat way to only grind what you need to use, looks like some experimentation and another timer will be required.Another issue is it looks like you have to actually disassemble it, which is not a simple task, to clean it thoroughly... or really even at all.Overall, it's quiet, creates perfect grounds, has a *ton* of settings (although, I can only see myself using two, one for coffee, one for espresso), but the doser is garbage. I might have opted for a cheaper model, knowing this... but my lattes are perfect now
Oscar Rocks!. I love my duvet cover. The fabric is of a very high quality and the print is attractive. It is also washable which is a bonus
Pleased with the Product. I love the capability that can be transferred from a microwave to an oven.  I use it primarily for my frozen crab cake that I microwave it first for couple minutes, then move it to an oven to finish cooking with crisp textures
Soft with a good fit. We are verry satisfied with our Pinzon sheets, we had pruchased other more expensive sheets in the past and these were just as good if not better than the fancy name brand.  The two things that were a deciding factor in my purchase were the free shipping and the depth of the pockets, when the sheets arrived I was more than happy as they fit our pillow top matrice quite well and were ever so soft, I was looking for deep pocket sheets and these didn't say that in the description so I was not sure how they would fit. I have since purchased several more sets from Pinzion, including many of their plad ones.  Here in Alaska there is nothing better than a set of soft, warm, flannel sheets on a cold winter night. They are nice in the summer as well
Cuisinart Mini-Prep - Worth the Money. This unit is worth the 39.99 price.  I've had it for about 2 years now.  I don't have a need for a large processor.  I just want to chop and grind stuff in a hurry.I always leave it on my counter as it has a small footprint.  Its easy to take apart and the cup and lid will go right in the dishwasher (top rack).This week I used it to chop pickles and olives together for a tuna salad.  I was done in less than a minute.Try it, you'll like it
Bigger than expected. What can you say, it's a garlic keeper? I used to keep garlic on my counter in a small dish. This garlic keeper is pretty and covered and keeps garlic out of sight. It matches in color with the butter keeper I bought, so it works well for me and keeps my counter looking better organized. I like that it's bigger than expected. I can keep 4-6 bulbs in it
Surprisingly Cool. I have sworn by air conditioners since I was a child, keeping it cranked on high all day and night to keep me as cool as possible in otherwise HOT conditions. However having recently moved out from my parents I was faced with the dilema of air conditioners high energy costs, not to mention the cost of an AC itself. I was at first disinclined toward the window fan (having never used one) remembering all the slow oscilating fans that did NOTHING to cool me off. well to my suprise it drops the temperature in my room so low I need a blanket (just how I like it). this units design allows one side of the fan to intake cool air and the other to exhaust hot air at the touch of a button (or have them both do the same thing) which adds greatly to the convience this is a huge plus cinsidering most window fans I have seen require you to manually take the fan out of the window and turn it around to exhause air. All these great features accompanied with a low price tag and low energy costs (80% less than an air conditioner) and the lazy mans IR remote make this one fine package that, as it appears so far, will get me through the hot summers cooler and cheaper. five stars, does what it says it can do and very well. Now I am going to my bedroom, better put on a sweater
Nice pillow for Star Wars fan. This is a nice pillow for a Star Wars fan
Le Creuset Tagine. I have found this to be valuable addition to my kitchen. I am interested in Mediterranen cooking and this is a traditional form in Morocco. This is a low-fuel cooker, never used above a medium setting on a cooktop and used to simmer for long periods on low or very low. Uses very little liquid with the unique Tagine shape; do not overfill or you will have a mess. This is a great way to make stews and braises! Long cooking allows flavors to mingle. It cooks for 4 but is not big enough to serve large groups unless used in a multi-course meal; a bigger size would be nice to add. Would love to have more recipes
Good but. My microwave arrived today - it was the Sharp R model.  Arrived very quickly and I was thrilled with the speedy shipping.  I can always count on Amazon for quick delivery.You can imagine my disappointment when the microwave door wouldn't open no matter what we did.  The booklet was inside the microwave so we had to pry the door with a knife to see what we were doing wrong.  As it turned out I called Sharp and they gave me some names to call for a repair.  The 1st place I called said they would need the microwave for a week, the second couldn't be sure how long it would be away from here.  Finally I called the third place in Franklin, MA and we brought it to them.  When we got inside the repair person met us with a rolling cart, brought the item in the back and within 10 minutes had it fixed.  It was just a missing part.  So now the microwave is in my kitchen and I tried it as soon as I arrived home and it works perfectly.  Great size, lots of power.Happy with purchase - this was the first thing I bought from Amazon that even had a hint of a problem.
Most amazing!. This is probably the best knife I have ever owned.  Never dull, and always a smooth cutting experience.  This knife has never let me down.  Before owning this knife I didn't think it mattered what I used to cut up food items.  Boy, was I wrong.  I love the hollow edge technique.  It really does keep the food from sticking to the knife!  It is worth spending the extra money on a few really good knives that you will never have to replace.  I would also recommend a good knife sharpener.  With those two items you will never have to purchase another knife again
My cat loves these. My cat loves these.  As soon as I opened the package my cat came running and started to play.  He usually gets bored with the toys I buy fairly quickly but he still loves these months later.  The price was good too.  In the local stores it's costs this much for just 6 mice not 12.  All around a good deal for the money
Norpro Deluxe Cherry Stoner /Pitter. I was inpressed.Stoner worked well on all size cherries,got all stones as long as you did not fill hopper all the way.I put 20 to 25 cherries in hoppper at a time and help direct them to plunger.You can do a gallon of cherries in about 20 minutes
Slow Cooker works fine but smells like hot plastic when it cooks. We've only had this CrockPot for a few weeks, and used it a handful of times.  It cooks great, but emits a smell of hot plastic when cooking.  There is no visible piece of packaging or wrapping material stuck anywhere and we can't figure out the odor source, but we're hopeful that eventually the smell will go away.  Otherwise, it's A-OK
my bunnies love this. This mat is very soft and after hundreds of washes it is still very soft and fluffy enough.  I don't know about dogs or cats but my bunnies love them.  It's a perfect carrier liner too.  I would recommend it
Very, very nice!. This is the piece I was dying to try and I'm not one bit sorry I got it. Being cast, it cooked a great paprikash evenly although it extends beyond the burner quite a bit. There was no real 'hotspot', which there won't be if you follow use instructions for heat. I love the way it goes into the oven right from the stovetop. I'd read some questions in a forum about a sticking problem and the recommendation was to heat the piece thoroughly before putting in the food, then to keep the flame lower and let the natural characteristics of the pot do the work. It worked like a charm! Easy cleaning, even with a long cook time. No burned garlic and onions in the saute, either. This is a wonderful piece
Space Effecient. I really like this appliance.  It does a good job toasting my bread and microwaving my food if necessary.  The baking item does okay but I haven't mastered the amount of time to bake something.I would own it again.  It's nice to have my toaster and microwave as one unit to save space in my kitchen
Best One I've Found Yet!. This smokeless ashtray works extremely well at containing second-hand smoke.  Cleaning it can be a challenge; however, it works just as advertised!  Recommend cleaning and changing the filters often to maintain the unit especially if you're a heavy smoker.  I'm definitely sold on this item!
Emerilware Stainless Cookware. I've had this cookware almost a year and really like it. The glass lids allow me to see inside the pot as it's cooking and I don't find that the lid gets hot like others have reported. The small loop handles on the pots do get hot, but I just use a hotpad. I don't have a problem with food sticking as I don't cook on high heat. I bought a nonstick pan to compliment the set and use that when needed. The copper around the bottom of these stainless pans is so pretty but will tarnish - it cleans up so quickly and easily (you just wipe) with Barkeeper's Friend cleaner. I can't wait to have a house again and hang these pretty pans
Heavy duty for all purpose!. I love these!! Ordered three sets of these brick-red colored mini-bowls for my family and continue to be pleased with the performance. They are good quality little things- used for yogurt, ice cream, nuts, little snacks for the kids- and are microwave oven and dishwasher safe. Try them for yourself- they come in a multitude of different designs. Kudos!
They're Filters. I ordered these filters for my fish tank.  They were shipped quickly.  The quality is good and they keep my tank clean.
Great looking product!. I was very pleased with both the design and construction of this product. There are enough hooks for all of my pots and pans and the shelf above is holding all the lids. It was easy to install, the brackets are actually 16" on center so I was able to use the studs (not all products have this dimension). I have purchased the bronze finish and it is a dark bronze.I recomend it for those who need to get more room in their cabinets
This is a good buy. I liked the comforter set. It's a good buy, although I would have liked to have more preferences in colo
What size is this item?. It looks beautiful and I want to purchase it but there is no size anywhere.I don't want a small board - I want a fairly large one.  Can anyone help
The Perfect Madeleines. This pan provided a wonderful light golden color to the madeleines.  I recommended using a spread of 1 tablespoon of melted butter and 1 tablespoon of flour mixed and brushed on to the molds.  This made them virtually nonstick and added wonderfully to the color and taste.  This product is wonderful, I might have to order a second one since my recipe always yields 2 batches!
WMF Nortica Hostess Set. We chose the WMF Nortica design because of the quality of the heavy 18/8 steel and the timeless classic look of the brushed metal finish and simple, elegant lines.  This 5-piece hostess set is all of that.  The design of the salad fork is kind of funky but all the pieces are usable, well designed and look fantastic.
The best. These are my favorite cookers.  So much so, I bought this one for my friend
Microwave steamer. It's a standard pyrex microwave casserole dish with a plastic steamer basket.  As usual, dollar for dollar you can't beat the quality of Pyrek products for cooking.  This is a nice addition to any cook's supplies, especially if you do frozen veggies in the microwave.  It's simple, basic, easy to clean, no gadgetry.  Love it
Inexpensive Lighting. Pros:inexpensive at $9Look like they cost moreLights the room wellCons:cheaply made , but only apparent if physically handled------For $9 they're a bargain but I wouldn't pay much mor
I love my Black & Decker Open-it-All Center. I bought the Open-It-All because I am beginning to have arthritis in my hands. I noticed after I opened jar lids, that my hands often hurt. It opens all kinds of jars with ease. I really hadn't planned on getting an electric can opener, but decided to spend a few dollars more to get the combination and I am delighted that I did. I haven't used the bottle opener, but rarely used one anyway. The price I paid is well worth it to help protect my hands. No regrets at all. I highly recommed the product
The only cat toy I've ever needed??. I bought one of these at a cat show about 6 years ago and have never regretted it.  This thing absolutely memerizes my kitties and.... ***This is an update, I bought a replacement set of feathers and within a week my cats had torn them out of the holder.  I guess the quality went down. ***
Not so EZ clean. I love how the fryer works and looks. It is named EZ Clean but that isn't true yet. Somehow the seal leaks on the oil drain button.  The oil leaked terribly when I drained the oil.  For the next several times I used the fryer, I left the oil in the basin.  It slowly leaked out and was a huge mess on my counter.  I didn't see the oil at first so I ruined my sweater.  I have put paper towels under to monitor the leak and I emailed T-fal customer service just now.  I hope they can help.  It is the best fryer I've tried and I love the look
Ball  canning. the kit was every thing that we expected.  It was delivered in a timly fashion.  very pleased.Gerr
Great Coffee Machine. I purchased this for work, as I have the same unit for home. The choices in coffees and teas for use in the machne have greatly increased. It is simple to operate, and there is no miss to worry about. And best of all I don't have to risk the chance of having a cup of paint removing liquid that someone is trying to pass of as coffee from the community pot
Furi Knife review. The knives are perfect - just what my husband, the cook, wanted for Christmas.  They came in a timely manner and are in perfect condition
brita water filter. I have previously used the Brita water container, but the on tap water filter system is wonderfully easy to use!  NO more awkard handling of a big water pitcher.  I also enjoy the ability to switch between unfiltered and filtered water.  It is small in size and not too bad to look at
So far, so great!. After doing some comparison shopping for rice cookers and finding this model at a local houseware store, I purchased this cooker today. I used it this evening to prepare brown rice for dinner, a bit of an acid test in my mind for any rice cooker. The rice turned out flawless -- luscious, plump, flavorful, soft and not chewy, and not burnt at all. Clean-up was simple and easy. The instructions were easy to follow. The power cord is retractable which is a plus for keeping one's countertops clear of too many cords. I look forward to trying the other features of this cooker, perhaps even making a simple cake with it. The instruction manual includes sample recipes as well. All in all, highly recommended and very competitive with the Zojirushi models I considered but which are more expensive. You just can't go wrong with Panasonic
Recipe Card Dividers. Just as I expected!!! Hard to find even in stationary or kitchen product stores. Delivered quickly with no complications
nice pan but lid is thin. I like the pans shape and size.It is really large but not too heavy.The only thing is the beautiful shiny lid is too thin.It is almost sharp it's so thin.But I do like the pan and it cooks lots of potatoes with easy non stick cleaning
Great Desk Heater. I bought this heater for my desk to keep my hands warm.  I was really surprised at the amount of heat it produced.  It won't heat a room but it does a great job on a cubicle
One of our best wedding gifts!. My husband and I received this as a wedding present. I had never heard of this product, but it is one of our favourite gifts. I am not experienced with slow cookers, but I understand one of the disadvantages of slow cookers is that you sometimes  have to worry about your food scalding. That is not a concern with the thermal cooker. We typically use it for soups and chili. You do have to actually cook it first (the inner pot can go on the stove) and bring it to a boil. Then just place the pot in the thermal cooker and leave it for HOURS without worry of burning. It's hot, good and clean up is easy. We love it
Love my comfy new chair!. This chair is really easy to assemble, but you have to kind of work a little to get the wheels in. The directions were not really helpful. But its basically self explanatory when you put it together.It has great lumbar support. I have a herniated disc in my lumbar spine. and this fits the small of my back like a glove.The price is kind of misleading... The shipping charges were more than they had the chair on sale for. The chair was on sale for $24.99 and shipping was $32. Its still worth the $58 I paid alltogether.
Best Wine Opener Available!. *****This is by far the best wine opener I have ever used.  It is beautiful, a work of art, just to start with--therefore it can be left out and does make a great conversation piece. (I have the "clear" WineMaster.)It works wonderfully, from the attached foil cutter, to the heavy duty parts--everything does what it is supposed to.  First, you lock the opener onto the bottle.  This took me a few tries to understand, but now that I understand the concept it is a piece of cake to do (I'm not great with mechanical things).   Then you manipulate the levers (raise/lower the long ones and the short ones each once) and very easily not only does the cork come right out, but it is easily released from the opener so that you can save it if you want to, and it is not damaged.It is well worth the price.  It also would make a great gift for someone special.****
KitchenAid Mixer. I purchased a factory reconditioned KitchenAid mixer back in September. I was so excited about the price and have been wanting one for so long. It took only 2 days to get the mixer once I purchased it. I couldn't wait to use it. I just love it. It is so much easier making bread, cookies, etc. I would definately recommend this mixer or any other KitchenAid mixer. I have been very pleased with the performance, price and ease of use. Thanks!Andrea AbbottLayton, U
Perfect match. Perfect accessory for any knife set much less a Wusthof knife set.  Will also revitalize every pair of scissors in your house!  It is a bit difficult to use with serrated or ribbed knife edges, but not impossible
garbageman. Great can! looks good and very convenient! Make sure you measure your cabinet before purchasing. Most cabinet maybe too small to fit this can.  You may have to remove a shelve inside of your cabinet or if your sink is a corner sink you can angle the can to fit
Brita On Tap Water Filter. I have been using the Brita On Tap water filter a few years. I like it because it saves me from carrying bottled water. It also lets you know when it has to be changed which is a plus. I also use the filtered water for coffee, tea and whatever use I have for recipes using water.I have tried other brands and always go back to the Brita. I think it is a good investment
HAPPY SO FAR. We've used this at the grill with steaks, in the oven with a turkey breast and on the stovetop to make candy.  It's worked perfectly every time so far.  I like that you can stick it to the outside of the oven and it beeps when the correct temp has been reached.  A very useful kitchen gadget to have on hand
love this unit - have 3 of them. We have one at our house, and two in the office. Works like a charm and the design is sleek and simple. Too bad Cuisinart isn't making them anymore
multifunctional pan. You can do a lot with this besides make cornbread. Any kind of muffin mix seems to work
I LOVE THIS PRODUCT. I really do love this product!  It is easy to use (as long as you follow the basic set of instructions), quick and produces a great hot beverage.  I don't have time in the morning to stand in front of an expresso machine and wait or use 3 different special cups before I get my coffee.  The Mukka lets you put everything together and before I am finished with breakfast it is ready.  A must have for any coffee (or tea) person. Oh, and the instructions are right, it does get better every time you use it.
Antique Styling, Modern Durability. This trivet is wonderful - virtually indestructible.  And it's absolutely beautiful, too!  My friend from Brittany said her grandmother had the same exact trivet when she was a child.  I am sure this one will last me a very long time
sturdy and beautiful. The picture doesn't quite do the coloring justice. The bottom of the pitcher is much darker than the top, ranging from a deep brown/red to a beatifully vivid fire-engine red at the top. The size is just right for sangria for four or a dozen dahlias. As a pitcher, the handle is large and comfortable,and the spout is well-designed and prevents those irritating drips that happen with shorter spouts. As a vase, it'll win you a zillion compliments. My cats have managed to knock it over a couple times, even though it's quite heavy, and there's not a chip to be seen. (This says more about the determination of the cats than about the weight or balance of the pitcher.
Beautiful dining set!. My husband and I bought this dining set while being a little worried about some of the previous reviews about delivery problems, cracks, etc. However, we were pleasantly surprised when the table arrived in perfect condition. It took us abt. two hours to put it together, but it was not difficult at all. We have had it for about two weeks now, and so far so good! It's a very nice looking, classy table, and the color is so rich and elegant.
Hooray!. I bought this to help organize my children's play room and this is perfect for their board games.  Some of the games are a little long and stick out the front, but that isn't a problem.  I'm considering purchasing another for hats, gloves and the like.The item is very sturdy and built well.
Waterford Bedding. Waterford makes top quality, well styled bedding that lasts & lasts. We have several groups & love them all. Great product
I USE IT DAILY TO MAKE BACON. I like this bacon plate because of it's circular size which is great for my microwave. I use it daily to make one to three slices of bacon for family breakfast. I've had it for over six years and was looking for another one (via the internet) because it's starting to look tired and browning. I thought it was perfect until I read the negative reviews. But then again, I never tried to "grill" a burger in the microwave??? One side is smooth, I assume for defrosting and the other has elevated "grill" lines. The fat drains off nicely which I store in a baby food jar in the fridge to flavor veggies, etc. When I bought this product it did not come with a grill cover. Anytime you use a plastic cover in a microwave, the end product will be a steamed result. (Great for veggies)
Much better than my last fryer. Mine has been great. Keeps temperature pretty well, the heating element is MUCH better than my previous. It still drops temp when you put cold food in, but that's to be expected.As far as the house reeking of fish, open some windows. That's a circulation problem in your house, not the fryer. If you just fried fish, it's going to smell like, ... uhm... fried fish.Cleanup is incredibly easy, stainless steel looks sexy in my kitchen, and I'm very pleased with this fryer so far. I had the same "did not work" problem, but I just reseated everything (correctly) and it powered up again. That was user error on my part.Would buy again in a heartbeat
Love Fiestaware. My husband suggested this as a birthday gift for me. I thought okay until I opened the package. This shamrock green is so pretty. This dinnerware is great. A nice heavyweight. The glazing is brillant. And the cereal bowls are a good size. Not too small as other types tend to be. I am very happy I own this and have bought more since
Elegant. I was so impressed with these sheets, I immediately ordered a second set. I recently purchased a pillowtop mattress and had to replace all my bed linens to accomodate the deep pockets needed.  Out of the 5 sets I purchased, these are the BEST...outranking the Sealy sheets I bought @ $110.00 per set.  Obviously, I wish I'd found these first.  Outstanding fit, comfort and quality
I enjoy using this crock-pot. The pot is very easy to use and food cooks perfect
A book Light can be a calculator light. I got this to use with my calculator, the display of which is not back-lit, and it works like a charm
Honeywell HAC504 Replacement Humidifier Filter. Great price - even honored later date sale price but lacked outer evaporative "cloth" covering of original
my husband's valentine. This pillow was purchased for my husband who says that this is the best pillow he has ever slept on.  His neck does not hurt in the morning with this pillow
Gorgeous. I absolutely love this pitcher. It's both functional & gorgeous. Used as a vase filled with red roses, you'll find you can't keep your eyes off it & roses will never have looked prettier
microwave cook set. I have been happily surprised with the ease of cleaning and performance of these products.  I cook lots of eggs in the microwave and dread soaking and cleaning the dishes.  NordicWare is the easiest clean -- no soaking or scrubbing necessary.  Great dishes
Yep, it's that good. Preliminary review: I just used the aeropress for the second time and am very happy with it. I've read the reviews here and at [...] and as effusive as they were, I had one over-riding concern: would the coffee be too bland and not strong enough (with a slight bitter kick) for my taste? I like coffee black and strong; always have and always will. , Good espresso is heavenly. Therefore all the reviews about how "smooth" the aeropress coffee is made me wary. I like a touch of bitterness and distrusted the c.170 degree recommended water temperature.Anyways, the espresso came out nice and thick, very full-bodied and rich. There also was a very nice combination of enough acid with a heavy, rich taste experience. The complexity of some good beans came through, and perhaps were even enhanced over my good french press. I'm delighted.I'll come back and expand when I've used this a bit more, but as for now I highly recommend the aeropress and can assure those who may have similar concern that a hand-press won't deliver "real espresso": It does. One more word: There is real crema if one firmly pumps down an inch or two of air on top of the grounds. The quality of the crema is just so-so, (light, with no distinction) but it's there. A professional espresso machine works at about 130psi (9-10 bars/atmospheres) to get the crema everyone loves; and that is one thing, and as far as I can tell, the only thing, out of reach for the aeropress.
A Must-Have for Tea Drinkers. I switched from coffee to tea a few months ago, purchased this unit and am completely happy with it ... I can't recommend it highly enough.  It's well made, ergonomic, well thought out, and a joy to use.  The Japanese think of everything.  A Japanese friend of mine told me that homes in Japan almost always have one of these units, or one like it.  Now that I drink only tea, I can understand why.The three temperature settings (well, four if you count boiling) are perfect.  208 is good for herbal teas, tissanes, and also the increasingly popular (and wonderful) Rooibos.  That's also a good temperature for ramen, oatmeal, etc.  195 is good for black tea and also oolong, and 175 is good for green tea or white tea.  Now, you can make gourmet tea properly with no muss and no fuss.  Just get yourself some gourmet loose tea, herbal tea, or Rooibos, (all available from Garrett, Adagio, or Teavana), and a convenient brewer, like "IngenuiTea" from Adagio (Teavana also makes a good one that might be slightly better in quality), and you will be good-to-go!  Your taste buds will thank you and so will your body.  (The health benefits of green tea and oolong are well-known, and also Rooibos has 30-50 times the antioxidants of green tea, and no caffeine).  My blood pressure has dropped 20 points with less caffeine (compared to caffeine in coffee, black tea = 20-25%, oolong = 10-15%, green = 5-10%, white = 1%, rooibos and herbal = 0%).Buy a Zojirushi!  You won't be disappointed.
Great. Made my knives sharper than new.  Worked very well on serrated knives.  Extremely quick and easy to use.  Highly recommende
Upper back pains solved. I spent a lot of time and money on physical therapy for my weak upper back muscles.  I've tried all sorts of specialized pillows for years -- buckwheat pillows, down/feather pillows, contour pillows, memory foam pillows etc.  This was the only one that made me wake up in the mornings with no upper back pain.  It also works for my husband who likes to sleep on his side because the individual coils adjust to support the head and neck separately
Le Creuset Mini Cocotte. This miniature pot is decorative as well as utilitarian since it can be used on the flame for melting butter or small amounts of sauces
Great, well-made product. Love the tilt function. I bought this slicer after very extensive comparison.  I wanted a slicer with a stronger motor, but was undecided if I really needed the tilt feature.  This slicer is very well made.  It cuts meats very thin.  I thought I would need to buy the optional blade for thin cuts, but the blade it comes with has worked perfectly for me.  I have cut up ham  and meat roasts.  The taste is wonderful, not to mention the cost savings.  I also have cut thick steaks (the ones at Costco) thinner to make steak sandwiches.  The tilt feature is advertised to gravity feed vegetables.  I use if for meat as well because the food falls away from the blade.  It is much safer and I can cut a large amout before I need to remove the accumulating pile of cut food.  I highly recommend this product.  I was also very concerned that cleaning could be so time-consuming that it might cause me to not use the product as often.  This is not the case, clean-up is a breeze and can be completed in less than 10 minutes.
Eclipse 12 used for Dwarf Seahorses. I purchased an Eclipse 12 so I could set it up as a habitat for dwarf seahorses.  I put a filter sponge over the intake pipe so the adults and babies would not get pulled into the filter.  I set the tank up 3 weeks before I got the seahorses so it could fully cycle.  After it was cycled I purchased 14 adult dwarf seahorses from a local dealer (I life in FL).  Within 48 hours, 2 males had given birth and another gave birth yesterday and I have seen pairs doing the courting dance so I know more babies will be on the way.  I have lost only one adult so far and the rest appear to be thriving.  I keep the tank full of newly hatched baby brine shrimp for them to feed on and I do a one gallon water change per day.  This tank is the perfect size for a population of dwarf seahorses and the filter does not make too much turbulence for them.  The lighting is enough to keep caulerpa (macro agae) and I also have a gorgonian coral in there as well.  I have always wanted to keep seahorses and now I am keeping them and raising them thank to my Eclipse 12
Very satisfied. This is a sturdy well made appliance.   A little soak, soap & wash gets any food   that might be  leftover in the textured surface.   I don't know that the textured surface serves a major purpose because it is so slight of a texture.  I am getting ready to buy this same appliance for my mother in law
permanent filter. I have a combination Krups unit in white for both the coffee and expresso that is so old that I don't think they make that color any more. Bought this filter the day I got the machine use it almost every day. I use Folgers gourmet dark in this unit and with that size of grinds have no problem with residue in the pot. It is as good as gold. The brightness of the gold faded long ago but performance remains the same. My white pot lid however is bowning with age. The filter is older than my grand children and still works well. Hand wash don't scrub
suprised/ a neat bowl. I debated on buying these for 3 weeks was not sure what they would look like,...I very please when they arrived,neat bowls,they look like cerel bowls,handels on the side.I done puddings and oin soup so far,graet clean up and I like the look.A step up from a cerel bowl
These towels are wonderful!. I ordered the Shadow Green and I love the soft green color it is beautiful!  The towels are thick, abosorbent and luxurious feeling
HEPA Filter - Hamilton Beach. Excellent product which does exactly what it is advertised to do
Saved my wardrobe. I live in a tiny Manhattan apartment with basically one closet. This device literally saved me from having to weed through my closet and give my clothes away to goodwill.It manages to double up the space in your closet and allow you so much more room to "breath" -- allowing you to get all the clothes into a limited space.I put my blazers and dresses on the top rail, and then on the hanging part, I put all my skirts.It's efficient and nicely designed and worked wonders with my cramped closet space.It's great
Mrs. Anderson's Pie Crust Shield saves the day!. I LOVE this product!  I have been waiting all week for it to arrive, and it finally did today!  I baked my pie (I've been anticipating this moment for days), and when it came out of the oven, there were no spills to clean  up!  And my crust, lets just say it was a perfect golden brown, light and  flaky, mmmmmmm......
AWESOME PRODUCT!!. I bought this for my older cat who has no body fat on her. It serves a dual purpose in that it protects her favorite chair from the majority of the hair she sheds; but the best thing about it is the warmth it provides to her. Yes, it does "crinkle" as the previous reviewer said. That didn't bother my cat though. She took to it right away. The faux fur provides comfort and warmth and the "crinkly" stuff on the inside reflects back her body heat. I rested my feet and calves on it one day while I was napping on the couch; I can verify that it actually works in reflecting back your body heat; my legs were kept toasty by this pad. No wonder my cat loves it. Highly recommended
Great surface. I have an extra wide ironing board and the cover that came with it was so thin. This cover makes a great surface to iron on, almost make me want to iron!
Great Product. This is my 3rd pressure cooker. The last 2 higher end products. Broke within the 1st year with just average use. This pressure cooker is simple, basic and so far withstanding the abuse. Super Fast shipping.
The best thing I ever bought for my kitchen. I have a small, one person kitchen with very little storage.  The hanging pot rack saved more space than I thought it would.  Assembly was simple - we only had to go out and buy the hanging hooks (as they do not come with the pot rack) and we had it up and functional in about 20 minutes.  I love the lid feature on top of the rack - it's so much more convenient than having to search for lids in a cupboard.  I bought two of the hanging pot racks and would recommend them to anyone
EXCELLENT transaction!!!. Fastest shipping ever!  Thank you so much, we will buy from you again
Strong little hand blender. This hand blender is much stronger than the previous blender I owned. The blade is very sharp and a workhorse for its size
Great Waffle Iron - Great Price. I really like this waffle iron. It's EASY to use and makes waffles FAST. I bought two - one for a gift and one to keep (got free shipping, too). I recommend it.
Great Pie Dish. This is a large deep pie dish.  The shape of the dish yields a beautiful pie, especially apple
Heavy Weight Guest Towels. Columbia towels are especially luxurious to use and for a long time I didn't use them because they looked so lovely and new hanging in the bathroom. The color is especially pretty and reminds me of a deep lavender, they call it Plumberry. The weight of the towels is especially luxurious and they absorb water so well, that the towel at times can still feel almost dry after you use it. When the washcloths are completely drenched, they do seem a little more heavy than most, although they have that "spa feel" to them and they retain heat very well, which makes them sort of comforting. I've tried many towels and these are the most absorbent I've found. They are made with 100% combed cotton and have a heavier feel. The edges are sewn especially well with a nice fabric border so they don't fall apart the first time you wash them.~The Rebecca Review
Does just what it says it does. I've owned my Duet for well over 2 years and I'm a bit baffled by the negative reviews I'm reading here at Amazon.  Perhaps Cuisinart has produced a few lemons?  I've had absolutely no problems with it and it hasn't even hinted at breakage, cracking, or anything else.  I use it several times per week, both blending and food processing and overall, I'm very satisfied.Combining a powerful motor with the dual functions of processing and blending is a natural idea and works well.  Switching between blending and processing is quick and easy and the pieces fit well together with no leakage and seamless operation.  The base houses the power and the Duet really does blend as well as any blender I've ever used including the Waring Pro.  The buttons are flush and seamless with the display background, so cleanup is easy and the base is heavy, solid, and will not tip over easily.  The blender blades are sharp, so handle and wash them with care.The processor bowl is a bit small and is good for small and medium-sized tasks such as making salsa, pesto, sauces, tapenade, etc.  The shredder/slider insert works like a charm and I've used it mainly for vegetables and cheeses.  The placement is just about perfect and although others have complained that the feeding tube is too small, I've never had a problem inserting everything/anything into it and obtaining the desired results.  It's really pretty logical.Any gripes?  Besides the processor bowl being small, my main complaint concerns the number of speed selections.  The selections go from stir to chop to ice crush to food processor and the difference between chop and ice crush is a huge one.  I would prefer that there be an intermediate speed that allows for a quick blend with less of a danger of pureeing the blender's contents than if ice crush or food processor is selected.  Since all the speeds apply to both blending and processing, this would be a logical improvement.  Another improvement would be a better-fitting clear plastic insert to the blender lid.  Mine is too loose and considering this is placed over rapidly gyrating liquids, a tighter fit would give me more confidence that I'm avoiding flying food.Again, I've had no reliability/durability issues with the Duet.  Other than a couple of minor design flaws, I enjoy using it regularly.  Here are a few tips that might help you enjoy your appliances for a longer period:Although many companies claim their products are dishwasher safe, it's better to hand wash as many pieces as is logical.  In this case, hand wash the blender blade mechanism -- doing so will maintain the sharpness of the blades and the plastic attachment pieces will fit better longer and won't crack or break.  Use hot, soapy water and a mild detergent.  Pieces like the processor and blender bowls should be sanitized in the dishwasher.Handle your appliances with care.  Don't toss them around or bang them against other objects.  Store them carefully by avoiding piling things on top of them or shoving them into too-small spaces.  Put pieces and attachments together carefully.If possible, roughly cut up your food prior to processing and blending.  This will assist in achieving the desired results and will avoid problems like unprocessed lumps, inconsistent blending, or sudden bursts within the food bowl.  It also reduces the need to stop the machine and scrape the sides.  Don't just shove the food in, turn it on and expect great results.Remember, these are not commercial-grade appliances and as another reviewer has mentioned, even if they were, a professional would not abuse his/her equipment.  Treat your appliances well and they'll do the same for you.  The Cuisinart SmartPower Duet is no exception.Recommended.
OVE Glove. I love.No more burnt fingers and the price special was just right as well.  Get one- or two
happy so far. we bought this heater almost a year ago to use in the home office area.  we have no heating system in that room and it gets pretty cold. we keep honeywell running at 70F for approximately 6 hours a day and it works fine and heats up the room efficiently.  yesterday we purchased the delonghi TRN0812T to put in the baby's room to save some space. we hope delonghi will do the job as good as honeywell
GREAT COUNTERTOP WATER SYSTEM. We used the Britta system for almost 9 years to filter our nasty tasting local water.  We were becoming dissatisfied with the "floating" carbon particles with each filter change and found that the filters were not taking out all of the bad taste.  We decided to give the PUR countertop system a try - about the same price as Britta to set up - and were amazed at the better quality of filtered water! The taste is great and no more carbon floaters from the filters.  The only "complaint" would be that these filters are harder to find and more expensive than Britta.  The extra cost is worth it
powerful!. This blender is very powerful. The lid is a little difficult to take off, only a minor issue with me
This one's a winner!. Tired of a hot lap(top)? The Lapinator is the answer.  I highly recommend this item and I have thoroughly tested it.
Cute and reliable, missing a couple features. Have had this for 6 months and it works great. People always compliment me on how stylish it looks!As noted in another review, it's hard to get the toast out early. The only other nitpick I have is that there isn't a timer associated with the toaster over -- others I have can turn off automatically when they hit a time limit, but this one you have to watch. Has not led to disaster yet, though..
Great for those with limited space, excellent invention! Some minor pitfalls:. First of all, I love these. They fold neatly, take up little cabinet space, etc.However, it does NOT say on the package that they are microwave or freezer safe. I find that info only here on AMazon which leaves me wondering...are they or aren't they?Secondly, because the flattened containers have to be pushed open, these might be difficult for an elderly person to handle. It isn't exactly hard to do but does take at least normal strength, average strength, not something a weak, ill or otherwise impaired person might manage. Other than that, I think they are great. They clean up nicely, store food, the lids stay in place, etc.Now if I only know about their microwave capabilities!
Easiest furniture to put together. My husband and I just bought 4 of the Santa Fe pieces.  I have been putting similar furniture together for years, this is by far the easiet ever to put together, the directions were easy to follow everything lined up perfectly and the quality is wonderful.
good buy. bought this for my automatic cat box seems to work well with it.I do think the odor control could be better I recommend using a sprinkle on odor control.overall it cleans up way better than traditional litter and without the dust
Great little instant read thermometer. I have this thermometer in black and it's been great.Important tip to note:  Stick the metal tip into item, let it sit for a couple of seconds and then turn on the thermometer.  Do this and you'll get the instant read feature.  If you turn it on first, the thermometer will show the temperature of the air, then you stick it into the item and the display will slowly move to the temperature of the item.  This takes a bit of time.  So be sure you stick it into your item FIRST, let the metal acclimate to the temperature of the item, and then turn it on.  Then you'll get the instant read each time.I've washed this, I've dropped it, and it's still going strong.  It's not a replacement for an oven thermometer or a probe thermometer, but it's great at what it's designed for - a quick and easy instant read thermometer
Amazon was the answer to my Christmas gift-giving problems. I was looking for a tea kettle for my sister for Christmas and couldn't find one anywhere.  Finally I tried Amazon and came up with a new problem, which one to choose.  Amazon had a wide variety of items to choose from.  Their prices were excellent and with their Super Saver shipping, I saved a lot of money shopping online versus a store.  The kettle came very fast and was everything I wanted it to be.  It's not some cheap, flimsy tea kettle but the real deal.  My sister loved it.  I would definitely recomment using Amazon for anything you're looking for.  The prices are great and you can't beat the convenience
Great knife. I purchased this for my wife.  A hundred bucks for a knife insane!  Until you use it.  I think this is worth the money.  My wife says is the best thing since sliced bread.  And... you can slice bread with it.   Seriously, great knife.  It will last a long time.  Don't keep buy cheapo knives year after year.  Just get one of these.  Very sharp edge, nice weight, and comfortable.
pleasure. Keeps my butter (the real stuff, not margarine) soft and able to spread on soft bread.  Love it
Mugs to match nice dishes!. Who really uses cups and saucers any more? Maybe for a formal company dinner or fancy tea party.The cups that come with the sets of Mikasa Antique White dishes hold 8 ounces (with sipping room). These mugs hold 12 ounces. They have a great slim style and are made of a more refined china than most casual mugs. One consideration: they do not hold the heat like a big, clunky mug. So if you drink your coffee slowly, you may be zapping it more often
Media Storage Review. This is the best all-around media storage cabinet i have owned in over 25 years of storing media.  It's outside design is great.  The shelving design inside is flexible so you may use it to hold CDs, DVDs, Videos, including those "non-standard sized special edition sets" if you like.  It's durable.  I've bought six of these and placed two in 3 of the rooms in my house, each of which have different furniture/spacing availability and I've found that these are the right overall size for all of my conditions.
Smelling like a rose. For  years our garbage has gone into a 1 gallon plastic pitcher.  No amount of washing could keep it socially acceptable. A new era began with the purchase of this wonderful little can.  It's very sturdy, the top fits securely but not tightly (can be opened with one hand every time) and you can't smell a thing!  Capacity is generous.  I'm in love
Great whisk. I've owned this whisk for about a year now, and I'm quite happy. It is pretty small, but that's great for me since I don't make any large batches of anything.  It's easy to store, goes in the dishwasher easily, and it's as good as the day I bought it.
I HATE spiders. The vacuum works great. It would be perfect if the bugs didn't need to get removed from the part where they are zapped. I would also make the top part a little softer to get a tighter fit in corners.I have tried everything and this is the best product I have found
excellent product and service. These wicks are excellent - original product, not a knock off.  Great value, quick delivery
Tumblers. I was pleasantly surprised at how quickly my order arrived. They were exactly what I was searching for!  Because they are insulated the tumblers don't "sweat" so no need for coasters to protect the surfaces they are placed on. Also, no need for constantly adding ice to beverages...it seems to last forever
the smell of morning coffee. This is close to the same coffee maker my dad's girlfriend uses.  Sometimes I get confused when I'm in the back room on the computer and I hear the coffee maker turn on by itself (thanks to a timer).  I think it's strange how your coffee will make itself while you're still asleep.   When I hear it start up and see no one in the kitchen I think "ok, a ghost must be around me right now".  It's like we're living like the Jetsons or the Exorcist.According to everyone who uses Black & Decker, this is a good coffee maker (and the white color matches everything else in the kitchen).  The only thing I don't know is if it's safe to get water under the coffee maker (since it's located next to the sink and no matter how hard you try, water will squirt over there).  Of course I don't deliberately splash water under it to see if a fire starts, but I always make sure it's dry under there.  I can only imagine it's developed for the best safety.
A Wonderful Oven Mitt. An excellent product!  They work exactly as advertised.  They're good looking and comfortable as well as functional
Took 2 tries. The first set came very very broken.  I sent them back and got another set just fine
Clean Air. My wife and I noticed the difference within a day of using it.  We felt better in the morning.  Neither of us has been sick this Winter after using it for several months.  And I was amazed at how much dust was on the pre-filter when I replaced it for the first time.  I'm so glad we bought it.  Note: As with all HEPA filters it does make noise.  I recommend buying a large one and running it on low when you're sleeping in the room.
Super Great!. This bowl is very durable and I love the different colors that it comes in.  The bowl is dish washer and microwave safe and my kids have banged them in the sink what seems like hundreds of times.  We basically use them for eating cereal but have used them for eating ice cream, popcorn, nachos, etc.  I love these bowls and am going to buy a set of Fiestaware for my mom
I Want To Buy More Of This Item (in varying sizes). Recently purchased this in mid-2006 and it is the best cookware item I have ever owned and used.  As one of those millions who rely on mid-line priced discount department store brands, I can state with 100% certainty I was amazed (and still am) with the high-performance this item offers!  The clean-up is still a dream-come-true, all I have to do is get it in the sink and with a very very small amount of liquid dish detergent clean and rinse, it practically cleans itself.  My burners are all equal size (gas stove) and highest setting is "6" I have learned all I have to do for pancakes is level 3!!  Cooking bacon, an entire pound, is no problem for this cookware.  I do want to purchase more of this item, there is a smaller griddle version of this item also available.  I'm even thinking of slowly switching to this brand "All-Clad" nonstick
Humidifier. We like the product. There is not a lot of noise and refilling is easy.
Great Product. Using this product for about 4 months now and it's simply great.  This unit received a lot of use during the Holidays and it never missed a beat.  I've read a few reviews here and they seem either fake or the folks didn't understand how to operate it and should probably go back to a Fry Daddy for simplicity.  The Euro does require that you get the unit set in the rails to trip the safety switch and you do need to keep this thing clean.  I change the oil about every 2 months - depending on how much protein I fry.  Nice to be able to put the tub in the dishwasher and looks like new upon reassembling.  The MAJOR difference between this unit and several others I've owned is the larger capacity (4 liters!).  Capacity is very important in keeping the oil to temperature and keeping the food less greasy.  In addition to the capacity, the wattage is upped to 1800 watts which is above par for consumer level fryers. This is one of the largest capacity home fryers around at this price.  Fried zucchini and mushrooms are simply restaraunt quality!  I also recommend experimenting with batters - search the net for this (i.e. use Italian dry mix in flour for a KFC type fried chicken - good stuff!)
Good low end but check out new Vivants. I got a bunch of Overtures when Amazon was discounting them heavily but never did like the stumpy proportions. Now Riedel has apparently come out with a new low end line, Vivant, that it is selling through Target which is available through Amazon web site. For about the same price, it appears that you get a somewhat better glass
Really Surprised How Strong This Vacuum Is. in picking up hair and animal hair. Crevice quick flip makes it easy to use for hard to reach places, picking up the dirt! Downside is the small dirt container but that is minor vs. the power this small machine has
Beautiful pattern and delicate cup. Teacup and saucer are even more intricate than pictured.  Also, Amazon did a fabulous job with careful packaging and shipped very promptly
Great product. Works as advertized. Heavy Duty. Easy to clean. Kids use it almost every night to mix milkshakes. They prefer it to our blender.
Pretty serving tray... Pretty serving tray, my only complaint is that I thought it might be a bit taller, but it will still do it's job at a buffet table.  Very pretty and great for the price.  The glass is nice and thick and the line of products is beautiful.  I do see the handle becoming a problem after constant use, but who uses these things constantly.  My problem I mean the silver coming off.  Still recommend it.  You won't regret it
Good price, good item!. My bofriend and I were moving into a small house with no counter space and knew that we needed something to put our microwave on.  I had gone on Target.com to see what they had and was dissapointed to see the bad reviews for this particular product.  The other day though, I couldn't beat the price so I bought it hoping the people who wrote the bad reviews had put it together wrong.  This product is great! It holds our medium sized microwave, our toaster on the slide-out rack and our quesidilla maker on the bottom rack.  The four hooks on the side are great for our hot mits and hot pads.  This product was very easy to assemble and it didn't take that long either.  I would highly recommend buying it and making sure that you read the directions carefully
White Mountain Ice Cream Freezer. We were very pleased with the White Mountain ice cream maker. It brings back fun memories of when we were kids while making new ones with our kids
Love our V1725T Shark!. I absolutely Hate to vacuum and anything that postpones it is great in my book.  Most vacuums are so loud and heavy that I hate to drag them out every time crumbs are dropped on the floor.  We also have a cat that likes to make a mess.  This product is an extra help around the litter box.  This product is very light and easy to use.  The handle swivels with ease so you can get things at an angle and the base isn't too tall to fit under the couch.  I have been using mine for about 7 months and have yet to have a problem with it
Best stand fan. It is powerful, attractive, and extremely reliable. Easy to assemble and the remote is great
Great silverware. Very good quality silverware.  We bought it to match with an existing set of Henckles silverware.  This Oneida is holding up to washings and little kids much better than the Henckles has.Excellent product!
Dyson. Impressive machine overall.  I've had a problem with some carpets causing the beater bar to stop resulting in the loud percussive clicking of the beater bar clutch.  Looking around on the internet, this seems to be fairly common.  I understand the clutch is there to prevent issues with the beater bar breaking things, but the clutch seems a bit weak on mine.The attachments are great for hard floors, and furniture.I am amazed at what it pulls out of my carpets every time I use the machine, but the beater bar is pretty annoying for a machine at this price point, even the refurbished one
Fiesta Ware. I have used the same Fiesta Ware for the last 12 years and I have not broken a piece yet!  Even when my 2 teenage boys were babies, and doing dishes, a piece may have slipped out of their hands, but nothing was ever broken.  This shows how durable the Fiesta Ware really is.  I would highly recommend Fiesta Ware to everyone of all ages.  I own 3-20 piece settings at the present time and plan on expanding.  I like the fact that you can collect all different colors and it looks great!  I will be ordering more for when my 2 boys go to college.  I plan on ordering my mother a 20 piece set for her birthday.  I love it and I know you would toooo
Good Report on  Dualit Toaster. For more years then I want to count I have been fussing with one or more Big Box Store toasters and found they all came up realy short on many fronts. I decided to purchase the Dualit as an alternative to the morning frustrations. I am thrilled with it's operation and do agree that any number on the dial above 3 is only there to make a person feel powerful as they are not needed. Thanks again for building a fine product
great skillets. These are just great and the price sure is right....the large skillet is deep and great for frying....about $20.00 cheaper then the cheapest place I found.....I love them and you will to..
LTD is the absolute BEST!. This cookware is without peer. I know, I have been using my first LTD pan since 1989 and have purchased many others since. That 1989 pan still looks nearly new. LTD cooks better than anything else and cleans like a dream. The unfortunate, dissatisfied person that put this cookware into a dishwasher, simply did not read or heed the care instructions provided by All-Clad. There is absolutely no reason to ever even think of putting an LTD or ANY fine pan into a dishwasher. And even though this person has damaged the appearance of this pan, its use and cooking performance have been unaffected. Any cooked on food can be removed without effort by simply soaking it with soap and warm water. The exterior is best cleaned with a paste made of "Barkeepers Friend" and water applied with minimal elbow grease and a cloth. This will remove ALL traces of oil or grease residue, just like All-Clad recommends. Finally, I believe that, with a minimum of reasonable care, LTD cookware will provide a lifetime of daily pleasurable cooking experience and is worth every single penny of its cost. All-Clad guarantees it in writing
great product. This product saves me money on expensive vet bills because it works better than treatments I had received there.  Zymox takes about a week to work, with one or two treatments a day.  It has had the same effect for my sister's dog who had had recurrent ear infections. I have also used the spray for skin infections with the same rate of success
Rooster Pasta Set. I'm very happy with this pasta set.  It exactly matches the dinnerware set and the quality is great.  The pasta bowl is HUGE!  I am considering a second set to complete 8 place settings.  The second pasta bowl would make an excellent salad bowl..
great so far. i've had mine 7 months, and used another one for much longer at a previous residence. never had the mold problem others have reported. i love it. the capacity is great and the nozzle is perfect for refilling bottles, and never drips. my only complaint used to be hauling it into the sink to fill, but my boyfriend had the brilliant idea to leave it on the counter and use the faucet hose. =
R2D2. Cute little pudge looks just like the charactor from Star Wars.  I bought a new stove and it gives one little buzz and then stops.  I was burning too many cookies, so I bought the Kitchenaid Timer. After years of plastic junk, I am very happy to have a quality timer.  It is completely enclosed, with no crevices, so you can pick it up with your gunky hands and just wipe it off when you're done.  It has an ingenius way of activating, but as soon as you get the hang of it, it becomes second nature.  It rings long and loud, which makes me happy
Great for ice cream and a hit with preschoolers. We use these for everything: berries, nuts, raisins, yogurt, ice cream.  My nephew loves them for his chocolate chips, Annie's bunny crackers, raisin and blueberry mixes, and frozen berries...and, of course, ice cream.  They're ideal for smaller portions.  They're easy to clean and dishwasher safe
Visual Wine Decanter. Very pretty, space efficient and the design allows for good aeration of the wine. This was a hit. The recommended knob I ordered was the only miss.
Great product. Just got this in the mail today - excellent addition to our 29 gallon tank!  We have two red-eared sliders, and they are still pretty small.  This ramp will accommodate them until their shell is about 3-4 inches in width.Super-easy to install.  Fast delivery as well, and item was packaged well
Great little machine. After reading many reveiews on this product I decided to go ahead and purchase it. I hate the public laundry so I thought this would be a little bit better even if I had some of the problems other people had mentioned. I had the same problems with the screws that every one else did. The screws dont match up to the holes to screw on the bottom panel. You have to kind of force them in where they dont belong and then screw them on. I also have to weigh down the water out house into the sink or it will flip out of the sink from the water pressure and end up all over the floor. I thought it would be sufficent enough to just place it in the sink, however I learned my lesson after the first load! You can fit quite a bit in it despite the small size, however I would not try to overload the washer as the water level will get too high and overflow. I am able to wash with the water level on high as long as the washer is not too stuffed up. Overall if you can iron out the little kinks with the washer, it is much better than public laundry and will save you a lot of money over the long run. As opposed to the rolling thing for the bottom I got those furniture sliders and they work GREAT to move it from one side of the kitchen to the next.
Beautiful dishes. Dishes are just as pretty as they look but are not quite as bright colored as they show.  Are a nice color, would not want them any brighter. Plates and bowls are a nice size. Cup could be a little bigger but the size most sets carry. Waiting for add on pieces. I have a light tan colored rice bowl and vegetable size bowls from my other set that I bought seperately that matches these pretty well that I kept.  Like the rice bowl size really well for soups. They are Corelle extras. Rgis is my 3rd set of Corelle.
Great little oven. This is a great little oven.  It reaches temperature fast and it stays at temperature.  The convection oven fan is a little noisy, but not annoying.  The rotisserie feature works great, but don't expect to do any large items.  Cornish hens is the limit or a very small chicken. This oven works great for drying peppers.  I use my drying racks from my old Toastmaster convection oven
Must have for wood and tile floors!. When we purchased our Dyson, I read about this tool in some of the reviews and decided to purchase the Factory-Reconditioned unit and use the money we saved to get this accesory.This was a great choice, we love the vacuum and this tool does an outstanding job on our wood and tile floors.  I think it does a great job on steps also.  It has greatly expanded the functionality of the basic Dyson, and is well worth the extra cost
cats are never thirsty. the capacity is great. We have several cats and one small dog and the dish is never dry.  We only need to fill it every other day.The biggest part is keeping an eye on the tank.  I wish the flow was a little stronger but that is on another model.  Very happy with the delivery time and all of the packing to make sure it got to me in one piece
Top rate multi-purpose sheet!. As a serious cook, I look for tough uncoated surfaces that won't rust or require such ginger care. The pan is sturdy, priced right, fits perfectly in the oven without a rack and cleans up like a dream. NordicWare is great!Whether roasting vegetables, roasting a turkey or baking sheets of brownies or cookies, it distributes heat evenly without burning and does a consistent job every time. No need for wooden or teflon utensils, you can use whatever you want, whenever you want. If you're looking for a non-stick surface, add parchment or a silpat that browns cookies evenly and lets you slide them right off.I like this pan so much, I own 4 so I can rotate them and do a great amount of baking without waiting for the sheets to cool. It also ensures they stack nicely in the cabinet. The lid is a nice addition, making it convenient and secure to store cookies and brownies right on the sheet without removing them or worrying if the saran wrap or foil will slip off.Bravo
Wusthof Slicer. Was a Christmas gift for my son-in-law and he was very pleased. This is the second Wusthof knive I have given him.  Excellent
sturdy and convenient. With six children, myself and my husband, sometimes just collecting the laundry from all over the house leaves me worn out.  That's why I like the wheels on this hamper; they help conserve my energy, and I need all the energy I can get.  Plus this hamper can hold all the laundry from my laundry chute, and it's construction seems sturdy.  It was pretty easy to assemble
Nice looking and Useful. Came on time and in great condition.  I use a lot of European recepies, so I stumble on a lot of metric measurements; so I am happy to know that this scale provides weight in grams/kilos/lbs/oz.  Very useful to me as I cook a lot from scratch
The Best!. This is such a great pan for omlets because of the sloped sides that allow you to slide underneath.  This would be a great first peice of cast iron for someone new to using it because of the size and it is pre-seasoned.  I use it all the time &amp; it just keeps getting better
feels great. no complain! felt very good to touch. wormed me during very cold nights.I wish if I had more options in the choice of color
Relaxing!. I tend to stress out a bit so my husband bought me this for my office as a stress reliever.  I love it! It is a great way to zone out for a little while.
FIESTA!. This is a great idea!  Everyone should have AT LEAST ONE of these ~ personally I'd get one for every member of the household.  The well is perfect so theres no slipping or sliding and it can easily be carried without having to worry about it falling off.  We love this.  And this is a great color.  So much prettier than the picture.
Regarding DeLonghi. I have had a DeLonghi for several years now (different model). To be sure, I have had to replace the grommet and the stupid plastic "crema maker." I poked around in my phone book a bit, got the parts without problem. The plastic part broke again, but I find I really don't care -- it has no impact on the coffee
Great gate, but read my review before buying. I just bought this gate because I needed something semi-permanent in my living room to keep my new puppy from running all over the house. My first gate looked very cheap and kept falling down because it didn't have a door and I just propped it against the wall. I needed a gate with a door.I checked at least 3 different sites besides Amazon for a "rich" looking gate WITH a door. I landed on this one.PROS:1.) Looks nice and elegant2.) The door swings open both ways (very nice)3.) Brown / tan (much nicer than the plastic grey colors like Grayco)4.) Solid design (wood and steel, nice)5.) The gate locks at the top and the bottom at the same time, making it impossible for my puppy to push his way through at the bottom.6.) Lock is nicely positioned (but see #5 in the CONS below).CONS:1.) ONLY the door is wood, ALL of the gate material is metal. Would be nicer is the entire gate was the same wood and the hardware was metal.2.) The door does not swing 180 degrees open. The door only opens to about 110 degrees so because it's not flush with the gate, my dog or kids sometimes run into it.3.) The color of the gate does not match the door. It's close and it compliments it, but it's not a match.4.) The rubber feet that touch the wall (I'm not talking about the adjuster knobs, because they are brown) to hold it in place against the wall are grey. At this price, they should be brown to match the gate. I don't know how the company missed this one.5.) The handle to open the gate only works in "baby-proof" mode. I which you could deactivate the thumb button and make it so that you only have to lift up on the handle to open. Not the thumb & lift up. Just a convenience thing. It's sometimes a little tricky when both your handles are full with grocery bags.6.) The screws are shiny silver. They should have painted them brown as well. (Richell, it your reading this, you could have anodized them dark brown like some many other screws, that way they're less noticeable.)7.) THIS IS THE BIGGY **IMPORTANT** This gate only works in certain segments. Unless you're really handy with tools and a welding torch you must pay attention to this. This gate will ONLY fit on the following openings, NO EXCEPTIONS:35" to 37" with no side gates (just door)47" to 49" with one side gate attached59" to 61" with both side gates attachedWhen I bought this gate, I didn't understand this and I was lucky that my opening is 47". If it was only 45" I would have had to return this gate. There is no way around this.Overall this is a quality gate, but just know what you're getting.I would buy this gate again if I had to make this choice all over.I gave this gate 4 stars instead of 5 because only the door was wood. If the gates and door were wood, I would have given it 5 stars
A great way to prevent a fire!. I purchased this for my mother who has melted more than one pan on her stove and has collection pot and pans with delaminated bottoms.  She finds this timer very easy to set and very good at waking her when she wears it around her neck
Excellent Quality. I received my roaster within 3 days of ordering.  It was excellent quality and made of commercial-grade aluminum with a thick bottom on the pan.  The lid fit tightly and allowed the food to cook properly with no loss of moisture.  I would highly recommend this product.  Thanks Amazon
Great towels for price!. Purchased  5 sets of these towels.Bought 2 sets at 29.99 apiece and 3 sets at 19.99 apiece.Very soft and large towels.Very pleased with this purchase.Found some loose threads but not significant enough to complain about.Recommend buying as this was a great deal for a high quality item.Plan on ordering more
maryM. This is an excellent pressure cooker at an excellent price. I do feel they should have included a trivet and metal plate. All of the accessories are extra.I ordered the canning rack which holds 4 pints. I don't believe it would be wise to try to can quarts in this one, but the directions were not clear. In fact, I would have given this a much higher rating if they were, but I had trouble figuring out how to use it...and one does want to follow directions where a pressure cooker is concerned. They kept referring to to pressures, hi and low. I finally realized the 6 qt model has both but not the 10 and the directions were applicable to each model. The 10 quart pressures at 15 lbs....FAST!I once had Fagor 6 qt model and the  metal was heavier than this one. However, the upside is that it is easier to lift up to pour things from it which is a plus if you're elderly as I am.I really like they way this cooks; fast, easy to clean. It's beautifully designed pan.There are numerous uses for non-pressure cooking too. Big enough for a stock pot, cooking spagetting for a crowd, etc etc.I haven't canned with it. However, I plan on making a big pot of soup and canning what's left.One reviewer mentioned that you can't fill it over 2/3 full. That is true of ANY pressure cooker. So if you are debating between a 6 quart or a 10 quart, go for the 10 quart.There are additional accessories for this..canning rack, bucket insert (for spaghetti, etc.)  I recommend getting the lid for non-pressured food and keep the pressure lid for pressure.I don't think you will be disappointed with this product.
A point of clarification. So that other readers are not mislead:A tea pot is designed to hold hot water and tea leaves so as to steep the tea.A tea kettle is designed to hold water to be heated, preferably on the stove top.I do not recommend using a microwave to heat water as that method of heating invariably seems to alter the flavor of the water - at least if you are serious about your tea
Polycarbonate is the way to go!. These polycarbonate glasses are terrific! What the manufacturer says is true:  They really don't break and they don't show wear from the dishwasher.  I suppose if you tried jumping up and down on one or ran over it with a steam roller, it make break.  But these glasses have survived my three kids, and that's a pretty big feat.  And they look great.  Just like glass.  You might think it's made of glass until you pick it up.  A great product for people with kids, or for use in your RV, on your boat, out on the patio, by the pool, etc.
microsuede duvet set. Great duvet and pillow shams for the price.  Soft and comfortable.a great buy
Perfect for a meal serving!. This plate is perfect for serving a nice amount of food in the center of the table or for a larger single meal for one person.  Very sturdy but not overly-heavy.  The Sango Gold Dust set has been very nice!  Amazon.com is the only place I can find the accesories for this set at a reasonable price.  And most of them you cant find in the store
Brita your water. Very satisfied with the system.  Makes water tastes go away.  Water should not have a taste at all and brita makes it that way
Business Is Picking Up. I have Great Danes and can't find any of these in suitable sizes locally. These are not the toy scoops one can get in pet stores. If you have a large dog or many dogs or miniature horses, regular horses, elephants --- these are for you
Scooba floor washer. I bought this product because I liked the vaccumn so much. It stood up to my expectations.
good item. I really like the design, they are easier to take out than the square design. when you place them on the fridge you place one faceing one way and the other one the other way and well never compleatly full or else then its a bit dificult to ake them out.the only thing i don't like much is the material that is made of its not too resistant.
Versatile Chip and Dip. This chip and dip is on my bridal registry but I received it early, as a birthday gift. I just LOVE it!  During the holiday's I used it for shrimp and cockail sauce. I actually got several complements on the piece (who compliments bowls anyway!). It is just so beautiful, almost too nice for plain 'ole chips!
Milano Espresso To Go. I love the end product. Has the appearance and feel of a chair worth twice the price and was exactly what I wanted.However!!! The instructions for assembly leave certain steps to the imagination. At one point in the assembly there were 2 possible ways to go. I guessed correctly and did not have to backtrack and take anything apart. A bit of a frustrating experience to say the least.Is the frustration worth it? Without a doubt
So far so good. This item has broken on a few people, so I will update this  review if it breaks.  So far I really like it.  The only reason it gets 4 stars is because it seems a tad tall for no real reason.  Otherwise it is great.  The grind indicator works well once you get a feel for it, although you can do about as well by  looking at the grinds yourself as it is grinding.  It is also nice that is has a skinny middle coated with rubber so it is easy to hold without slipping.  I guess making the skinny middle part may be why it is a bit tall.  The look is realy cool and the wind up cord is great too.Ok, the update: three years later in 2006 this thing is still going strong, despite my dumping boiling water in it to clean it and doing other non-manufacturer-approved stuff to it.  Two thumbs up
Wilton cake pan. Wilton makes the best products for any baker! I only use Wilton when it comes to making decorative cakes for my friends and family.This cake pan makes the perfect half sheet cake
CORELLE DISHES. I ORDERED 3 SETS SO I WOULD HAVE A SERVICE OF 12. IT IS HARD TO FIND DISHES WITH TRUE RED ON THEM, I HAVE LOOKED EVERY WHERE I WAS HAPPY TO FIND THESE
Wonderful for your kiddos!!. My grandson loves his comforter.  He won't let you take it off his bed even to make it.  Very good quality and so very cute.  I would advise any Thomas fan to get this one for your little one(s).  God bless you all
fridge into wine!. Not bad. this bottle rack set is a little tricky to put together but can turn those empty refrigerator shelves into wine storage. Make 'em as high or as wide as you want. A good deal given the price
West Bend Wok. I purchased this item as a Christmas present for my daughter-in-law.  She had one previously,  but it wore out and we were unable to find a replacement.   She absolutely loves the West Bend Wok and says one of the features she especially likes is the fact that it maintains a certain temperature throughout the whole cooking process, rather than low, medium or high with the control switching off as soon as it reaches that temperature. It is easy to clean and hopefully will last "forever"!
You can't beat Raclette!. I first tried a Raclette prepared meal in 2002 while visiting my fiancee's parents in Lyon, France. Needless to say I was hooked straight away. Although Raclette meals can be heavy (potatoes, cheese and various meats and veg), they are extremely good.The Hamilton beach 31602 raclette grill is great. Temperature control is a nice feature. I have used it a lot since I bought it and recommend it. Good value for money and even has some recipes to try in the instruction manual.
THE BEST  WINE OPENER!!. My husband drinks A LOT of wine, so any wine opener really gets a workout at our house.  This is the second Vacu Vin Winemaster Corkscrew we've had, and it's worth every penny of its $50 price tag.  We've had many other types of wine openers, and they had to be replaced every few months.  The Vacu Vin Winemaster has lasted for over six years so far
Perfect Size. I love this decanter for it is the perfect size.  Had one before and I broke it so I went online and got the same one again
Dog loves it, but it needs a carrying case. This product is sturdy and has plenty of room for my 9.5 lb shih tzu.  It's easy to use, and Lucy loves it.  The only thing I wish is that there was an option to purchase a well-made carrying case to put crate in when not in use and we need to tote it from one place to another.  For example, I'd like to be able to check it at the airport and feel that it's somewhat protected.  (Lucy travels on-board w/ us in an airline approved pet carrier.)
Cuisinart's Chef's Classic Series is a Best Value. We have owned varies types of cookware in the past 20+ years.  Some we have had to throw away, some were passed down to the kids.  However this is by far the best cookware we have every owned.  I never buy anything with first researching the product. I spent hours comparing the various brands of stainless steel cookware based on the various styles of cooking we do.  You name the brand and I more then likely looked at it.  The Chef's Classic Series is every bit as good as the some of the more expensive brands on the market today.  It transfers and holds the heat very well.  It cooks at a fraction of the temperature of lesser quality cookwares.  The handles are comfortable in your hand.   Even filled, they do not feel over whelming heavy but at the same time they have a solid, sturdy feel.  They feel balanced!  Clean up was always a problem with the other stainless steel cookware we owned but not with these.  I'm actually surprised how easily food releases with only minimal oil.  I do not think you would be disappointed if you choose this cookware.
Featherweight Lightweight Bissell 3106A vacuum. It's convenient, very lightweight, easy to use and has very good suction.  It is kept handy and used every day to pick up crumbs, dust, etc., on our hardwood floors.  It's very easy to empty the bagless container. We had hoped that this vacuum would have a thicker brush to protect new hardwood floors.  Since it is advertised as a hardwood floor vacuum we assumed it would have a soft brush that would gently touch the wood floor.  Instead, it has hard plastic wheels with a short, firm brush.  It hasn't scratched our new floors yet, but we worry and try not to press down when we are vacuuming the floor
Mikasa Iced Tea Spoons. These spoons have a substantial feel in your hand and are of excellent quality for such a low price. The satin finish with shiny edges is a nice complement to my Satin Butterfly Meadow stainless.
Looks high quality. I have had many good experiences with the Farberware brand. I ordered this set and it feels like quality. Skip the lower grade sets (even the lower grade Farberware) and go for this set that feels like it'll last for well over a decade
Works like a charm and never needs oiling!. This is a great waffle iron. I like the fact that you never have to oil it. Though that also may depend on your batter recipe. I just know that the old iron I had prior to this, did need oiling every other waffle. What a pain and not as healthy.Some have mentioned the alarm is annoying. Personally I prefer it, whatever the sound. I have been known to always forget the last one and burn it to a crisp. Now that's hard to do with this handy little alarm
The only knife you need. I'll admit it - I've fallen in love. I first used this knife at a friend's house, and was blown away by the ease of use - the ginger and garlic practically minced themselves. I immediately ordered it, and have been delighted ever since. The handle fits my (small) hand perfectly and is comfortable to use, it cleans in a snap, and it can cut through anything - no more slamming the spaghetti squash down on the table with a hatchet. One of the best purchases I've made - well-worth the money
Easy to use. I got this for an apartment with two guys who hate to clean.  I figured if I got a cool gadget that also cleans maybe they will us it.  well, my plan worked perfectly!  not only do they use it in the kitchen, but the bathroom as well.  It does a great job cleaning the floors.  They only thing I would suggest is making sure that you completely vacuum the floor first.  If your floor is heavily soiled (like theirs was) it may take some elbow grease on the first try.  After that keep up is easy
Great Universal knife. I really have enjoyed using this knife.  It is a great universal knife.  It is nice to have when one needs to cut through chicken skin for deboning. I also like the design of the handel
Best cat toy on the market!. This interactive toy is stunningly effective in motivating the hunting instinct of your kitty!  My two both are spellbound by it and it really gets them racing round till they're panting!Great for exercise and stimulation of indoor cats!I will order this again and again, such a change from the usual toys that they get bored with so quickly
Purple Sheers. The sheers are excellent!  The only problem with this order is that there was a mix up in the initial shipping and I received black sheers instead of purple sheers.  However, after a concise email the company quickly took care of sending me the correct sheers and a return label at no cost.  Thank you for taking responsibility for the mistake and working efficiently to correct it!
Hamilton Beach TrueAir Plug-In Air Cleaner, Two-Pack. Very cool product... I bought 16 double packs because it was cheaper to just use the unit and the throw it away vs. buying a filter...  These are very good though... I've been using them for the past 5 months and I can definately notice a difference in the air quality.  They really pick up the dust... Which is what I wanted..
Fabulous Flowing Chocolate. I recently purchased this item and used it for a party of about 40 people.  I had read the reviews on-line and decided on this one for the price that I wanted to spend.  We had to add a little extra oil at first to be sure that there were no clumps in it when we started the fountain up.  I had read some reviews where some people said the units that they bought were noisy and were only good for about an hour before the chocolate started to clump up.  This model works GREAT! It was relatively quiet also.  The chocolate was still flowing after everyone had left that evening.  We ran it for a good 5 hours and it worked super!  I purchased Nestle Chocolate Chips at the grocery store and followed the guidlines in the book that comes with it.  We melted the chocolate with the added Canola Oil in the microwave before adding it to the fountain.  Clean up was very easy! I can't wait to use it again for our up-coming daughter's college graduation party in May and our wedding in July.  Amazon services are also great
the best ever. the thread count is excellent on these egyptian cotton sheets, really something worth considering.  its like sleeping on clouds, in heaven, in the sky, where god lives.
OUTSTANDING. Just what I wanted and I need another set.TY FRED LUNDBOR
Good little gadget for the price. Like another reviewer, I was skeptical about this, but I wanted a frother to give as a Christmas gift and was willing to risk 20 bucks.  I was pleasantly surprised.  Okay, it's not a fancy automatic steamer/frother, but it does what it claims--creates froth out of milk.  It seems to froth cold milk better than warmed milk, but I've been happy with both.  I didn't have much trouble putting in the batteries, and the stand could seem top-heavy, but we haven't knocked it over.  Only thing I wish could be improved--seems like a lower speed might work a little better--the speed of the frothing tip moves the milk so far to the side of the mug that it spills out.  I've had better success using a wide-mouth "latte mug" than a regular size cup or pint pitcher
TO CUTE COOKIE JAR. THIS WAS A GIFT FOR MY BOSS WHO IS VERY PICKY AND SHE THOUGHT IT WAS GREAT.  THIS WAS THE PERFECT GIFT.  IT WAS VERY VERY CUTE
Nice product. I bought this for my office.  I looks great, and works fine.  It also was received very fast.  I was amazed how quickly I received it.  One issue though; it has one of the most lacking owner's manuals, so be prepared for trial and error.  I know a fridge is not the most complicated equipment, but I had to guess which way the cold adjustment knob was supposed to go to make the fridge colder.  The knob is also down in the back, so if you have to adjust, it is a bit of a reach.  Now that I figured things out, though, I really am pleased
toasty review for Sanyo Toasty. The Sanyo Space Saver Toasty is great on saving space and is a good toaster. However it is not the best in using it as an oven to heat up snacks
Fabulous little hot water pot!. We love this pot, and keep hot water available 24 hours--nice to grab that lunchtime soup or late-night cup of camomile tea. It is easy to use (pour in water & plug in) and pour (push down on circle which depresses on top of lid). Great value! This was a surprise appliance in the best possible way--never expeccted to like it so much or use it so constantly on the kitchen counter--good looking too! Jil
Nice Liquid Soap Dispenser. I like this soap dispenser because:1. it's big and I don't have to refil it often;2. when filled up  with detergent, body lotion or what have you, it gets heavier and won't move when you press the pump;3. the advertised non slip base really works;4. the top part of the pump itself is big enough so that you don't necessarily need your finger to push it (like when you already have a sponge in your hand or something you still can get the pump to work by pressing it with the side of your hand, forearm, etc.);5. the pump is made out of plastic and you won't end up with a yucky, stinky gunk on your hands like you would if the pump were made out of metal;6. has no metal details on the base, so no rusty bottoms that leave nasty ring stains on your countertop;7. it does what it's supposed to do everytime you pump the pump, meaning you get a fair amount of whatever you have inside the dispenser.Simple as that!
Great shakers. These are really great shakers.  They're pretty small though so don't plan on serving corn on the cob to 10 people and expecting it to last through the dinner.  They look fantastic on a table display and really add flair to your decorating.  They're functional, but they really could stand to be a little bigger. I'm happy with them though - the plum are just gorgeous
It's worth the money. It's a handy gadget to have around the kitchen, and also for cleaning up the toothpaste blobs in the bathroom sink.  My only complaint is that the battery life isn't very long, and I don't like putting disposable batteries in the trash.  I fixed that by getting a universal battery charger and some rechargeable NiMH batteries.  Problem solved
Flexible in shape and in color. I bought both of my boys this hamper when I redecorated their rooms.  It goes with anything, and the mesh allows the clothes to breathe between laundry days. I wish it was a bit larger in capacity, but 9 and 11 year old boys seem to get their clothes in there, and when it is full to the top, then they know it's time to bring their hampers to the laundry room.  Also, we plan to bring one with us on vacations now, because it is easy to collapse and pack
My wife loves it. My wife loves hot water - for tea and straight.  She was always boiling water on the stove - sometimes forgetting until it all boiled away.  I gave this to her as a gift and she now uses it all the time.  Works great, saves time, saves money.  The cordless feature is great
Form and Function. This is a great little timer! Sure, it's not all fancy and digital, but it gets the job done just the same.  And it adds a bit of whimsy to my little kitchen. When I have freinds over for dinner, they comment on how cute it is. The ringer is loud enough that I can hear it anywhere in my  1 level apt.  If you are upstairs or downstairs you might not be able to hear it as well though. If you are looking for a cute, basic timer, this is it :-
Great for a Long Winter's nap!. I bought one of these duvet covers and liked it so much I went back and bought another for my mother.  She loves hers, too.  I found the description to be accurate and the fabric to be of high quality.  I would enthusiastically recommend this product, and at this price, it's a steal
Best cat toys ever!. My cats don't like to play with many toys, but they love the crackle noise this toy makes.  I had to buy one toy for each cat.  One cat will start playing with it and the other will try to take it away
High quality on par with ALL Clad and good for induction stove. After much research and looking at different triply/clad cookware from Henckels, Kitchenaid, Calphalon, and ALL Clad, I decided on Gourmet Standard.  I am very glad I did.  The cookware is beautiful and the stainless steel and aluminum is thicker than all the other name brands mentioned above except for ALL Clad, which I think is a bit thicker.Compared to All Clad, I feel it is a better value in terms of costs and the size of the pans you get.  Cook's Illustrated stated that this cooked just like All Clad.  So Save yourself some money and go with Gourmet Standard. It's also good for induction stoves
Item does work however, with patience. The apple slicer blade works nicely.  The large cut french fry slicer works but the secret is to place the large end of the potato under the blade first. Remember, these are manual type cutters that do require patience and safety issues.  I have used my cutters many times and they have not broken.  I am a small frame person with not much strength.  Do not try to slam the blade through the item all at one time.  Potatoes are more dense than an apple.  You have to master the use of these blades and they do work
Just what I expected!. The price was right!  The stand looks expensive and does the job!!
Allergy  sufferer. This is a great product, I love the Automatic function where it senses the condition of the air and adjusts the fan speed accordingly. Since I placed this in our bedroom the dust accumulation is about 99% gone, we also sleep so much better and feel rested in the morning. I would not hesitate to buy this purifier,again it is made with such outstanding quality and so very quite.
No more stink!!. it's a cool little tent... it's cute. keeps the area clean of litter sand and the it doesnt make it smell as bad anymore because there's the door that covers it. Except that the door only close half way. yes, i recommend you to get it..
Great Buy!. Does the job and a good buy.  Not a real decorator item, though
Sharp Solid Stainless Style. Another beautiful knife from this series.Wonderful balance, solid forge, well built, great edge, stylish, and practical.  Fits nicely in the hand, great contour.  Quite handy when you need a smaller serrated knife
Versatile!. Why haven't they come up with this before?  I love this little machine.  I have used this both on the stove top (following all directions, of course) and in the base.  I have yet to use it in the oven, but so far it is doing what the company claims it will do, and that is "versatility!"  It cooks well and I think it's about time that slow cooker companies make their stoneware like this one.  Kudos to Rival!  The only knock is that the lid does not fit very flush against the edges, but it is also stoneware and just as versatile.  So if that is the only knock against it, bring it on! :
Nice product, but could be a little more flexible. I have a sort of spatula addiction.  I own far too many spatulas and always buy more looking for the "perfect spatula".  This one is a solidly good spatula.I like that it is wide enough to turn any food that I cook.  It is excellent with delicate food like fish, crab cakes or risotto cakes.   The width of this spatula would make it difficult to use in a tiny pan.  I haven't had any problem with pan size, because I use mostly 10 inch pans and wider.The bottom inch of the spatula is flexible, and after that it is rigid.  This spatula is a little thicker than I would like it to be.  But, if it were thinner it might be too flexible. I would like this spatula to be just a little more flexible.This spatula has been used most days in my kitchen for the last 6 months and so far is showing not signs of wear.  It is holding up better than most of the other nylon spatulas that I have purchased in the past.Overall this is good spatula that I would recommend.
welllll not to bad. i purchased this sprayer to us with spray butter, well it does work but a full pump only get a small amount of spray probably because it is so thick but it still sprays better than the plastic bottle the butter comes with, it is easy to pump the bottle so i think it is worth the trouble to me hope this help
Love It!. I just received this today and I love it!  It's sure to get tons of use!  Nice clean lines...very pretty.  Great price too!  Thanks Amazon/Target
This is my second one!!!. My husband and I love this electric skillet!!  This is our second one - as we over used our first one.  It is the perfect size for cooking breakfast and yet big enough for cooking one dish suppers!  The nonstick finish is great and clean up is a breeze as you can submerse the whole thing (minus the electric plug).  We loved this skillet so much that we searched for this one and could only find it on Amazon!  I have tried another one - but is was to large and took up to much space on my counter
Melitta Ready Set Joe Coffee maker. This coffee maker is super!  My office has access to hot water, but not enough space for a traditional coffee maker.  Ready Set Joe, was the answer.  A delicious cup of hot coffee, with just the pouring of hot water. Everything is here, and only takes the space of a coffee mug.  Low tech, high quality, that's how I define it.Joh
A Great Knife. You can't go wrong with this knife.  I use it almost as much as I use my 8 inch chef's knife.  It holds an edge well, feels light in your hand, and has perfect ballance.
Great Cutting Board. This cutting board is all that it is advertized to be.  I liked mine so much that I went out and bought a smaller version.  Being able to put the cutting board in the dishwasher makes this my favorite cutting board and one that I look forward to using on a daily basis.
cool concept for storage and dispensing. I absolutely love cereal and I just had to have this cereal dispenser. Easy to clean and assemble. It is a fun way to display your cereals and know how much it left before you need to purchase more. There have been way too many disappointing moments when I reached for my box and discovered that I only had less than a stale bowl left! I also bought this because it was stainless steel. Note that the base is the only stainless steel part. The lids and the knobs are NOT stainless steel (which I was disappointed to find out) but made out of plastic with a silver-like coating. I'm guessing that it would either fade or peel off with prolonged use.The first cereal I tried it with was my childhood favorite Lucky Charms. Unfortunately, as I turned the knob, some of my oats got crushed by the rubber :( Perhaps I stuffed it too much?! I also think you could use this product for other dried foods like peanuts, trail mix, or seeds and alike, but nothing big like chips or cheese curls which I am certain would get crushed when you turn the knob to dispense.I also find the product a bit overpriced, too. If the lids and knobs were really stainless steel it would have been more worthwhile.  However, I can't exactly complain when there are not too many competitors out there for this "stainless steel" product. For now, its is doable until the latest model comes out ;-)
Don't burn the macaroni. I purchased this pot in January, and have used it several times a week since.  I love the pot for sauces and other stove top applications, it has worked tremedously on my ceramic stove top (grrr hate the ceramic wish it was gas but that is a different review).  The pot has been easy to clean and the finish has held up very well, and I looked forward to years of use until I boiled the pot dry with my macaroni noodles.  The noodles seemed to have bonded in a blackened brotherhood to the bottom of the pot and no amount of soaking, scrubbing, cleaning can seem to coax them to separate again.  Because this little incident had more to do with being the mother of a teething 8 month old and had very little to do with the pot, I will definatly be purchasing another pot.Overall this is a great purchase at an unbelievable price, so for cooks hoping to take their dishes up a notch I would totally reccomend it just don't leave it on the stove with noodles and no water for over 30 minutes.
Super-nice fan ... Moves a LOT of air, nice controls, well-made, great fan!  My only problem with it was I didn't pay any attention to the HEIGHT dimensions and it won't fit in the window that I bought it for. :-(  Only negative is that it's not as quiet as I expected either
Really NICE!!!. I am very impressed with this dog bed. It is very thick and has extra padding. The cover DOES come off for cleaning. The zipper is well hidden. The bed is also very in style for those hip puppies :
Great pan, but a little on the expensive side.. I love cooking in this pan. I love cooking in cast iron utensils in general of which I have a few (from Lodge). It looks great and cleans well. I don't understand the high price, however. It's just enamel on cast iron. Sure, the colors are attractive but then you don't get the special flavors you get from contact of the food with the iron as you do in the Lodge utensils. It's not some hi-tech product and you cannor really justify the cost. If this is expensive, the rest of the colors at $20 more are prohibitively costly. I can't see myself getting any more of Le Creuset products unless I get them in some special deal (as I did this one) or received them as gift
The Best. I have been searching for months to find a cover to fit my large ironning board.  No one carries one.  This is fabulous
Calphajon 8 inch non-wtick pan. Typical of Calphalon. The best non-stick pan on the market as far as I'm concerned. Excellent product
Sango Nova Brown 4 Piece Hostess Set. The product is exactly what I ordered.  However, the first shipment was not properly packed and arrived broken.  Replacement was prompt with no hassle.
Mixed review. I bought one of these wafflers after doing more research than the subject warrants, I'm sure.  My local mom&pop carry this line so I purchased it from them.  The first waffler wouldn't heat up out of the box so I exchanged it - so far so good with the replacement.  This would be a 5-star review if the first unit had worked and if the "Belgian Waffle" recipe wasn't such a waste of supplies.First trial using the recipe booklet's recipe for "Belgian waffles" produced some rather inedible results.  Even my son the Hoover Vacuum thought they weren't very nice: the finished waffles were pale and spongy despite being baked at a thermostat setting of 6.Second trial run using my tried and true "Joy of Cooking" basic waffle produced well-baked if heavy waffles: crispy outsides, tender insides.  The vacuum pronounced them fit to eat and proceeded to tuck away 6 segments or 1.5 total waffles.This morning's recipe used a modified buttermilk waffle recipe from "JoC".  The results were light and crispy, well-browned, crispy on the outside, tender and airy on the inside.  My son got around two entire waffles.Modified recipe:Separate 3 eggs, melt a stick of butter.Whisk the yolks with 1.5c buttermilk.  Toss together 1.5c flour, .5c cornstarch, 1.5t baking powder, .25t baking soda, pinch salt, optional 1T sugar.Beat the eggwhites until stiff but not dry.Using a spatula quickly stir the flour mixture into the buttermilk mixture, then quickly add the melted butter and stir until the batter is mostly smooth.  Fold in eggwhites.Make waffles
Fine Fiskar Scissors. These scissors work wonderfully.  I had two pairs of large scissors in my kitchen - one with a broken point and neither cut well.  Having used Fiskar scissors before outside my home and finding them great, I decided to buy two to replace my old ones.  The Fiskars not only cut smoothly, but since they are in the kitchen, they sometimes get sticky and dirty from opening packages of sauce, cutting tape, etc. These scissors have a coating on the blades that enable them to be cleaned easily with just a damp sponge, paper towel or brush and a drop of detergent, and they are like new.  No rusty hinges or screws that make cutting a chore like my old ones
Excellent Cookware w/ Style. Besides looking nice when hung from a pot rack, this big pot heats up quickly, cooks food effectively, allows for metal utensils to be used, and is simple to clean.  I especially like the long handle on one end and the short handle on the other - makes maneuvering easy.  It is a bit pricey, but I think it's worth it
One-touch!. We received this model as a gift from dear friends -- after having cooked rice for decades in a covered saucepan on the range.  This is terrific!  Just put in the rice, salt and water, press down on the start button, and wait for the cook light to go off.  It takes about 20 minutes, just like on the range top, and produces perfect rice -- plus no more guessing, no more checking (and no more occasional overcooked rice as I must admit to when I used the old way in the past).
Great Looking / Functioning machine. got the machine about three weeks ago and have since made between 15 to 20 cafe lattes.  first and foremost the machine looks great - primary reason for purchase, as it definitely seemed a great visual piece in our kitchen.  I had read reviews and found nothing that scared me away functionality so went for it.  all in all thus far, we have no complaints.  it 'froth's' low fat milk using the steamer w/ ease and even does a good job w/ low fat soy milk which has to be a good test of a machines steaming capabilities.  the temp gage is great and fully functional.  I like simplicity (especially when it comes to anything requiring ac power) as it typically means less to break down.  the espressione is about as straight forward as can be.note* I have never owned an espresso machine before but used a krups one for about a year while living overseas in a family house.  the espressione is a total step up.  i have an obsessive attention to detail and couldn't find any corners cut w/ this device.  only module that they could have possibly been better w/ is the grounds tray which as listed in other reviews is a bit 'cheap plasticy'.  not a big issue as you can't even see it unless you remove it to clean out the grounds.  (......)
I love my wok. This wok is so far the best one that I have ever had.  It is truly non-stick easy to clean & the glass-domed lid is a really nice touch, which gives the wok a very classy look.I am addicted to cooking most of my meals in this wok from salmon fillets to one-pot family meals.I highly recommend this wok with no doubt!Bygbab
DVD/CD Storage. Beautiful wood tone, would blend with any dark furniture. Can be stacked on top of each other, or side by side looks really nice. I am a short woman; therefore, stacking would not work. Picture does not do justice to produce. Am extremely satisfied and shipment was unbelievably fast.
Mr Coffee. This is the perfect size coffee maker for an apartment or camper. I have one in both
The best flavor. Both of my dogs found carrot to be their favorite flavor over cheese, bacon or any of the others.  Yeah carrot is best.  It was 2 different types of dogs too one pug and one shepheard mix.  This must taste really good and they must like the mild sweetness.  He also likes real carrots and pulp from the juicer.  Yeah carrot is that good.  I go easy on the carrot pulp from the juicer because it is so fibrous.
Sunflower Minidisk Pitcher. It is adorable. We had a large picture just like this when I was a child so this is a special reminder of it. The minidisk pitcher is just the right size for an individual syrup pitcher for pancakes. I would love to have one in every color
Great Juicer @ Times/Manual don't describe Trick of Cleaning. REVIEW:----------------- This Juicer is a Great juicer, and if you know the ""Trick"" to cleaning it, well its a snap and makes this juicer a realy great Juicer.---------- First off, it is very quiet while juicing, and is juices very smoothly, no shimmying across counter top, like some customers have stated of other juicers. It does not foam up, and I have been able to juice over a gallon of juice, with only having having to spend 40 second to lift out baket, scoop out the pulp, and reassemble the juicer, before you are off again.-------- The citrus fruit juicer attachment, which is included at no extra cost, is well made with two sizes to juice large and small citrus fruit. It has safety features that will insure safe opperation while juicing citrus fruit, (some other brand juicers, will require you to purchase the juicer attachment at an additional price). The citrus fruit stainer is so great, you could can juice boxes of citrus fruit, while only having to stop and empty the citrus strainer after every about 30 medium peaces of citrus fruit.-------------------------------------For cleaning, it comes apart very quickly, without any difficulty, there is only two peices too take apart from the base unit.-----------------------------------------After spending many hours of researching the specs of different juicers out there. Then reading several customer reviews for many of the juicers sold by Amazon.com. I decided to purchase this KitchenAid Juicer.---------------------------------- And there was only one negative review concerning the KitchenAid Dual Function Juicer, about difficulty cleaning small food out of strainer, THERE IS A SIMPLE TRICK TO CLEANING!!! ------------------------------------ First off, the "Shaped Spatula", looks like part of the packing material, and was almost trashed, lucky I have always insisted, all packing materials are saved, and not put into the trash. Because if you loose this special shaped spatula, you might as well forget about cleaning this juicer.-----------------------------------TRICK TO CLEANING: Take the basket & the special designed spatula. Using the shorter size of the spatula scrap / scoop the left over fruit material out of the strainer basket.----------------------Then use the specially designed spatula's shorter side to scrap with on the outside of the basket. it will fit pefectly. Then put it under running water, and scrape the outside of the strainer basket, it will scrap off the the pulp that is stuck through the micro screen basket. As you turn the strainer and scrape under the running water, you will see how easyly the strainer basket is cleaned.................. Then repeat the process on the inside of the strainer basket while under runing water. Once you see the pulp clean from the strainer basket's inne sides. --------------- Then the next step is to cup your hand under the strainer, (vertical held), while the water is running. Since the pulp floats in water, the slight remaining pulp will float in the pool od water you have created, Then slightly tilt the stainer, and the floating pulp will float over the rim and out of your stainer. Leaving the strainer fairly clean. Repeat the prpocess as needed.---------------------------------------I am juicing 4-5 times each day, sometime as much as a gallon of juice at a time. It cleans quickly and juicer quickly and quietly. I am very happy with this product!!! I strongly recomend this item.Jef
Love it!. I have small children and I like being able to use the sanitizing steam on the floors which is nontoxic. The pads are cotton and should not be dried in the drier because, as other people have mentioned in their reviews, they will shrink. I think the cinch strings should be a little longer and the pads made slightly bigger to accomadate for easier application on the mop. Otherwise, I love the mop and the ease of use and it really cleans well.
Black Fabric Shower Curtain. Very pretty... simple and elegant for your black and white bathrooms.
I waited too long to buy this. This immersion blender is so easy to use!  I can't believe I lived without it.  I have spent 30 plus years using mixers and blenders that don't do half the job this immersion blender does.  It is especially great for pureeing hot soups.  I used to do this with my regular blender and blew the top off.  Now I have no problem with hot or cold items. This item also works well to make dips, smooth mashed potatoes or smoothies.  It is also easy to clean up.
Works pretty well ...  except. I have three cats and bought this to keep one of them away from my door.  It works very well on two of them but the one I wanted to deter is a Siamese.  If you read the fine print it does state it might not work on some exotics.  It also won't work if your cat has hearing problems.  For all others it is great
amazon has saved my coffee maker. I loved it and I have found more things to buy from amazon. I thought amazon is only for books and music. I was wrong. I am a regular coffee drinker and I can't afford to skip one. I couldn't find the Krups 12-Cup Carafe from the manufacture's web site and were planning to trash my coffee maker for good. Fortunately, amazon has saved my coffee maker. Thank You amazon
great filter, great price!. I have owned this filter for many years and I have to say it is great. I have owned others that were good to just as good, but because of the price, this one beats them out
I love this kettle!. When a cup of tea sounds wonderful, you won't have to wait long for it.  Water heats very quickly, and  with the automatic shut-off, you won't have to worry about it boiling dry.  The very thin base is also great; it's almost invisible when the kettle is sitting on it, and is not cumbersome.  I purchased the black one and it looks great in my kitchen; and is easily wiped off with a damp cloth
Great - if you get good popcorn. Having read the other users reviews of this product, I was not really interested in buying it.  So many of them complained of rough, soggy, chewy or bad-tasting popcorn.  My brother picked up one of these for the holidays, swung by the Fresh Market and got some very good/fresh gourmet popping corn.  Used some butter/oil topping and wow - it was unbelievably good!  I asked to borrower his popper to try at our house and stopped off at the grocery.  Grabbed some Orville Redenbaucher oil and corn.  Terrible.  Worst popcorn I had ever tried.  I went back to the grocery with the corn and returned it.  One of the managers mentioned that since the advent of microwave corn, the stores rarely move the old kernel-style corn.  Said that it could be literally years old, since there is no real shelf-life expiration.  I went to another whole foods type store, bought some organic "black" popping corn and used the same oil as before - fantastic!  Unfortunately I think this item is going to get panned on here by many users because the corn they are using in the popper is simply old.  Not sure where one would go to find it fresh other than maybe a boutique supermarket, but for what its worth, this product is great when used with great popcorn.  When you use lousy corn, its very lousy
good to have one at home. Nice little toaster with good price.  Just be careful it can get really hot when toasting.
Great single malt glasses. Excellent quality for this hard-to-find specialty glassware.  Available in a nice size set
A Chef in the Making. This kit is very durable, and my daughter loves it.  The hat is velcro and can be sized appropriately.  The fabric is thick enough for good durability and washing.
Great Quality, Excellent Value. These stools are very sturdy and well worth the price.  The cushion material is a little plain but overall, they provide excellent quality at an unbeatable price
Corelle Lifestyles Pewter Dishes--20 pc set. I ordered the dishes and love the plates and bowls.  They are light-weight and don't take up much room in my cabinet.  They aren't gray or pewter colored, they're more of a tan to brown color.  I like the pattern.  I am, however, disappointed in the mugs. They are a great size and look beautiful but are very heavy--approximately 14 ounces each. I have other stoneware mugs about the same size that are much thinner and weigh a lot less, making it easier to hold and drink a full cup of coffee
